<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20020823165705.txt.gz
TIME:20020823165705
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (617) 250-3000
 
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
(c)  Exhibits. The following exhibits are being filed herewith.
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure
In a press release issued on August 22, 2002, Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Akamai" or "we"), announced the following:
In an order dated August 21, 2002, the Federal District Court in Boston enjoined Cable & Wireless Internet Services, Inc. from making, using, selling, offering for sale, or importing into the United States, the patented inventions of Claims 1, 3, 5, and 9 of Akamai's U.S. Patent No. 6,108,703, and from active inducement of infringement of these claims. The Court's Order enjoined Cable & Wireless's Footprint 2.0 service as configured and described at trial. That service was recently rebranded under the Exodus name.
Akamai intends to seek damages for the infringement of this patent. No damages trial date has been set and there can be no certainty when, or if, such trial will occur. If and when the Court schedules a damages trial, we expect that each party will retain a damages expert and undertake detailed fact discovery concerning the nature and amount of the damages. Given the complexity of proving patent damages, it is not possible to predict the outcome of any damages trial. Based on our preliminary and internal analysis for the two-year period since the patent issued, we believe that we may seek to prove a nine-figure damages amount.
A copy of the press release issued by Akamai is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K.
This Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, including our expectations with respect to a damages trial and any damages we may seek to prove. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, the inability of Akamai to accurately assess potential damages in the damages trial, the complexity of intellectual property matters and our ability to protect our intellectual property rights and inventions from third party challenges and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: August 23, 2002
 

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced that the Federal District Court in Boston has enjoined Cable & Wireless Internet Services, Inc. from making, using, selling, offering for sale, or importing into the United States, the patented inventions of Claims 1, 3, 5, and 9 of U.S. Patent No. 6,108,703, and from active inducement of infringement of these claims. The Court's Order requires Cable & Wireless to shut down Digital Island's Footprint 2.0 service as configured and described at trial. That service was recently rebranded under the Exodus name.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.  August 22, 2002 
"This major victory vindicates our patent rights and the value of Akamai's industry-leading technology," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai. "We will now turn our attention to seeking full compensation from Cable & Wireless for the long-standing infringement of this patent."
"The injunction is very broad, and we do not believe that Cable & Wireless's post-trial attempts to design around these claims have succeeded," added David Judson, Akamai's patent counsel. "If Cable & Wireless continues to operate its infringing content delivery service, we will seek to hold them in contempt of the Court's Order."
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading provider of edge computing solutions, delivering secure content and distributed applications across the Internet, intranets, and extranets. These solutions enable customers to achieve optimal results from their e-business initiatives, thereby reducing the cost of ownership, improving return on investment, and creating new revenue streams. Akamai's globally distributed edge computing platform comprises more
 
than 12,900 servers in more than 1,000 networks in 66 countries, ensuring the highest levels of availability, reliability, and performance. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai provides services and world-class customer care to hundreds of successful enterprises, government entities, and leading e-businesses worldwide. For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, the dependence on Akamai's Internet content delivery service, a failure of its network infrastructure, the complexity of its service and the networks on which the service is deployed, the failure to obtain access to transmission capacity, our ability to protect our intellectual property rights and inventions from third party challenges and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
2002 Akamai Technologies, Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20020911123138.txt.gz
TIME:20020911123138
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
 September 10, 2002  
Table of Contents
Item 5.    Other Events
     On September 10, 2002, the Board of Directors (the "Board of Directors") of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company"), declared a dividend of one preferred stock purchase right (collectively, the "Rights") for each outstanding share of the Company's common stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Common Stock"), to stockholders of record at the close of business on September 23, 2002 (the "Record Date"). Each Right entitles the registered holder to purchase from the Company one one-thousandth of a share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, $.01 par value per share (the "Preferred Stock"), at a purchase price of $9.00 in cash, subject to adjustment (the "Purchase Price"). The description and terms of the Rights are set forth in a rights agreement dated September 10, 2002 (the "Rights Agreement") between the Company and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A., as Rights Agent.
     Initially, the Rights are not exercisable and will be attached to all certificates representing outstanding shares of Common Stock ("Common Stock Certificates"), and no separate certificates representing the rights (the "Rights Certificates") will be distributed. The Rights will separate from the Common Stock, and the "Distribution Date" will occur, upon the earlier of (i) 10 business days following the later of (a) the first date of a public announcement that a person or group of affiliated or associated persons (an "Acquiring Person") has acquired, or obtained the right to acquire, beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock or (b) the first date on which an executive officer of the Company has actual knowledge that an Acquiring Person has become such (the "Stock Acquisition Date"), or (ii) 10 business days following the commencement of a tender offer or exchange offer that would result in a person or group beneficially owning 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock. The Distribution Date may be deferred in circumstances determined by the Board of Directors. In addition, certain inadvertent acquisitions will not trigger the occurrence of the Distribution Date. Until the Distribution Date (or earlier redemption or expiration of the Rights), (i) the Rights will be evidenced by the Common Stock Certificates outstanding on the Record Date, together with the summary of rights set forth in the Rights Agreement (the "Summary of Rights") to be mailed to stockholders, or by new Common Stock Certificates issued after the Record Date that contain a notation incorporating the Rights Agreement by reference, (ii) the Rights will be transferred with and only with such Common Stock Certificates; and (iii) the surrender for transfer of any certificates for Common Stock outstanding (with or without a copy of the Summary of Rights or such notation) will also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificate.
     The Rights will not be exercisable until the Distribution Date and will expire upon the close of business on September 10, 2012 (the "Final Expiration Date") unless earlier redeemed or exchanged as described below. As soon as practicable after the Distribution Date, separate Rights Certificates will be mailed to holders of record of the Common Stock as of the close of business on the Distribution Date and, thereafter, the separate Rights Certificates alone will represent the Rights. Except as otherwise determined by the Board of Directors, and except for
Table of Contents
shares of Common Stock issued upon exercise, conversion or exchange of then outstanding options, convertible or exchangeable securities or other contingent obligations to issue shares or pursuant to any employee benefit plan or arrangement, only shares of Common Stock issued prior to the Distribution Date will be issued with Rights.
     In the event that any person becomes an Acquiring Person, unless the event causing the 15% threshold to be crossed is a Permitted Offer (as defined in the Rights Agreement), then, promptly following the first occurrence of such event, each holder of a Right (except as provided below and in Section 7(e) of the Rights Agreement) shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon exercise, that number of shares of Common Stock of the Company (or, in certain circumstances, cash, property or other securities of the Company) which equals the exercise price of the Right divided by 50% of the Current Market Price (as defined in the Rights Agreement) per share of Common Stock at the date of the occurrence of such event. However, Rights are not exercisable following such event until such time as the Rights are no longer redeemable by the Company as described below. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, following the occurrence of such event, all Rights that are, or (under certain circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement) were, beneficially owned by any Acquiring Person will be null and void. The event summarized in this paragraph is referred to as a "Section 11(a)(ii) Event."
      For example, at an exercise price of $9.00 per Right, each Right not owned by an Acquiring Person (or by certain related parties) following a Section 11(a)(ii) Event would entitle its holder to purchase for $9.00 such number of shares of Common Stock (or other consideration, as noted above) as equals $9.00 divided by one-half of the current market price (as defined in the Rights Agreement) of the Common Stock. Assuming that the Common Stock had a market price of $4.50 per share at such time, the holder of each valid Right would be entitled to purchase four shares of Common Stock, having a market value of 4 x $4.50, or $18.00, for $9.00.
     In the event that, at any time after any Person becomes an Acquiring Person, (i) the Company is consolidated with, or merged with and into, another entity and the Company is not the surviving entity of such consolidation or merger (other than a consolidation or merger which follows a Permitted Offer) or if the Company is the surviving entity, but shares of its outstanding Common Stock are changed or exchanged for stock or securities (of any other person) or cash or any other property, or (ii) more than 50% of the Company's assets or earning power is sold or transferred, each holder of a Right (except Rights which previously have been voided as set forth above) shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon exercise, that number of shares of common stock of the acquiring company which equals the exercise price of the Right divided by 50% of the Current Market Price of such common stock at the date of the occurrence of the event. The events summarized in this paragraph are referred to as "Section 13 Events." A Section 11(a)(ii) Event and Section 13 Events are collectively referred to as "Triggering Events."
      For example, at an exercise price of $9.00 per Right, each valid Right following a Section 13 Event would entitle its holder to purchase for $9.00 such number of shares of
Table of Contents
common stock of the acquiring company as equals $9.00 divided by one-half of the Current Market Price of such common stock. Assuming that such common stock had a market price of $4.50 per share at such time, the holder of each valid Right would be entitled to purchase four shares of common stock of the acquiring company, having a market value of 4 x $4.50, or $18.00, for $9.00.
     At any time after the occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, when no person owns a majority of the Common Stock, the Board of Directors of the Company may exchange the Rights (other than Rights owned by such Acquiring Person which have become void), in whole or in part, at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock, or one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (or of a share of a class or series of the Company's preferred stock having equivalent rights, preferences and privileges), per Right (subject to adjustment).
     The Purchase Price payable, and the number of units of Preferred Stock or other securities or property issuable, upon exercise of the Rights are subject to adjustment from time to time to prevent dilution (i) in the event of a stock dividend on, or a subdivision, combination or reclassification of, the Preferred Stock, (ii) if holders of the Preferred Stock are granted certain rights or warrants to subscribe for Preferred Stock or convertible securities at less than the then-Current Market Price of the Preferred Stock, or (iii) upon the distribution to holders of the Preferred Stock of evidences of indebtedness or assets (excluding regular periodic cash dividends paid out of earnings or retained earnings) or of subscription rights or warrants (other than those referred to above). The number of Rights associated with each share of Common Stock is also subject to adjustment in the event of a stock split of the Common Stock or a stock dividend on the Common Stock payable in Common Stock or subdivisions, consolidations or combinations of the Common Stock occurring, in any such case, prior to the Distribution Date.
     With certain exceptions, no adjustment in the Purchase Price will be required until cumulative adjustments amount to at least 1% of the Purchase Price. No fractional shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock) will be issued and, in lieu thereof, an adjustment in cash will be made based on the market price of the Preferred Stock on the last trading date prior to the date of exercise.
     Preferred Stock purchasable upon exercise of the Rights will not be redeemable. Each share of Preferred Stock will be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors, a minimum preferential quarterly dividend payment of $10 per share or, if greater, an aggregate dividend of 1000 times the dividend declared per share of Common Stock. In the event of liquidation, the holders of the Preferred Stock will be entitled to a minimum preferential liquidation payment of $1000 per share, plus an amount equal to accrued and unpaid dividends, and will be entitled to an aggregate payment of 1000 times the payment made per share of Common Stock. Each share of Preferred Stock will have 1000 votes, voting together with the Common Stock. In the event of any merger, consolidation or other transaction in which Common Stock is changed or exchanged, each share of Preferred Stock will be entitled to receive
Table of Contents
1000 times the amount received per share of Common Stock. These rights are protected by customary antidilution provisions. Because of the nature of the Preferred Stock's dividend, liquidation and voting rights, the value of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable upon exercise of each Right should approximate the value of one share of Common Stock.
     At any time prior to the earlier of the tenth business day (or such later date as may be determined by the Board of Directors of the Company) after the Stock Acquisition Date, the Company may redeem the Rights in whole, but not in part, at a price of $0.001 per Right (the "Redemption Price"), payable in cash or stock. Immediately upon the redemption of the Rights or such earlier time as established by the Board in the resolution ordering the redemption of the Rights, the Rights will terminate and the only right of the holders of Rights will be to receive the Redemption Price. The Rights may also be redeemable following certain other circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement.
     Until a Right is exercised, the holder thereof, as such, will have no rights as a stockholder of the Company, including, without limitation, the right to vote or to receive dividends. Although the distribution of the Rights should not be taxable to stockholders or to the Company, stockholders may, depending upon the circumstances, recognize taxable income in the event that the Rights become exercisable for Common Stock (or other consideration) of the Company or for common stock of the acquiring company as set forth above.
     Any provision of the Rights Agreement, other than the redemption price, may be amended by the Board prior to such time as the Rights are no longer redeemable. Once the Rights are no longer redeemable, the Board's authority to amend the Rights is limited to correcting ambiguities or defective or inconsistent provisions in a manner that does not adversely affect the interest of holders of Rights.
     The Rights are intended to protect the stockholders of the Company in the event of an unfair or coercive offer to acquire the Company and to provide the Board with adequate time to evaluate unsolicited offers. The Rights may have anti-takeover effects. The Rights will cause substantial dilution to a person or group that attempts to acquire the Company without conditioning the offer on a substantial number of Rights being acquired. The Rights, however, should not affect any prospective offeror willing to make an offer at a fair price and otherwise in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders, as determined by a majority of the Board. The Rights should not interfere with any merger or other business combination approved by the Board.
     This summary description of the Rights does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Rights Agreement and the exhibits thereto which are attached hereto as an Exhibit and are incorporated herein by reference. A copy of the Rights Agreement is available free of charge from the Company.
Table of Contents
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: September 11, 2002
Table of Contents

EXHIBIT 4.1 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- RIGHTS AGREEMENT BETWEEN AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. AND EQUISERVE TRUST COMPANY, N.A., AS RIGHTS AGENT DATED SEPTEMBER 10, 2002 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Table of Contents - i -
Section 23. Redemption.....................................................................................31 Section 24. Exchange.......................................................................................32 Section 25. Notice of Certain Events.......................................................................33 Section 26. Notices........................................................................................34 Section 27. Supplements and Amendments.....................................................................35 Section 28. Successors.....................................................................................35 Section 29. Actions by the Board, etc......................................................................35 Section 30. Benefits of this Agreement.....................................................................35 Section 31. Severability...................................................................................36 Section 32. Governing Law..................................................................................36 Section 33. Counterparts...................................................................................36 Section 34. Descriptive Headings...........................................................................36
RIGHTS AGREEMENT RIGHTS AGREEMENT, dated September 10, 2002 (the "Agreement"), between Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A., a national banking association, as Rights Agent (the "Rights Agent"). WITNESSETH WHEREAS, on September 10, 2002 the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board") authorized and declared a dividend distribution of one Right for each share of Common Stock (as hereinafter defined) of the Company outstanding at the close of business on September 23, 2002 (the "Record Date"), and authorized the issuance of one Right (as such number may hereinafter be adjusted pursuant to the provisions of Section 11(i) or Section 11(p) hereof) for each share of Common Stock of the Company issued between the Record Date (whether originally issued or delivered from the Company's treasury) and the earlier of the Distribution Date or the Expiration Date, each Right initially representing the right to purchase one one-thousandth of a share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock of the Company having the rights, powers and preferences set forth in the form of Certificate of Designations attached hereto as EXHIBIT A, upon the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth (the "Rights"); NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual agreements herein set forth, the parties hereby agree as follows: Section 1. CERTAIN DEFINITIONS. For purposes of this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings indicated: (a) "Acquiring Person" shall mean any Person who or which, together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, shall be the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding, but shall not include (i) the Company, (ii) any Subsidiary of the Company, (iii) any employee benefit plan of the Company or of any Subsidiary of the Company, or (iv) any Person organized, appointed or established by the Company for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan. Notwithstanding the foregoing, (x) no Person shall become an "Acquiring Person" as the result of an acquisition of Common Stock by the Company which, by reducing the number of shares outstanding, increases the proportionate number of shares beneficially owned by such Person to 15% or more of the shares of Common Stock of the Company then outstanding; provided, however that if a Person shall become the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the shares of Common Stock of the Company then outstanding as the result of an acquisition of Common Stock by the Company and shall, following written notice from, or public disclosure by the Company of such share purchases by the Company become the Beneficial Owner of any additional Common Stock of the Company and shall then beneficially own 15% or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding, then such Person shall be deemed to be an "Acquiring Person" and (y) if the Board determines in good faith that a Person who would otherwise be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), has become such inadvertently, and such Person divests as promptly as practicable (as determined in good faith by the Board of Directors), but in any event within 15
Business Days, following receipt of written notice from the Company of such event, of Beneficial Ownership of a sufficient number of shares of Common Stock so that such Person would no longer be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this paragraph (a), then such Person shall not be deemed to be an "Acquiring Person" for any purposes of this Agreement unless and until such Person shall again become an "Acquiring Person." (b) "Act" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. (c) "Affiliate" and "Associate" shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in Rule 12b-2 of the General Rules and Regulations under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act") as in effect on the date of this Agreement. (d) "Adjustment Shares" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(ii). (e) A Person shall be deemed the "Beneficial Owner" of, and shall be deemed to "beneficially own," any securities: (i) which such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates, directly or indirectly, owns or has the right to acquire (whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time) pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding (other than customary agreements with and between underwriters and selling group members with respect to a bona fide public offering of securities), whether or not in writing, or upon the exercise of conversion rights, exchange rights, other rights, warrants or options, or otherwise; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that a Person shall not be deemed the "Beneficial Owner" of, or to "beneficially own," (A) securities tendered pursuant to a tender or exchange offer made by or on behalf of such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates until such tendered securities are accepted for purchase or exchange, or (B) securities issuable upon exercise of Rights at any time prior to the occurrence of a Triggering Event, or (C) securities issuable upon exercise of Rights from and after the occurrence of a Triggering Event which Rights were acquired by such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates prior to the Distribution Date or pursuant to Section 3(a) or Section 22 hereof (the "Original Rights") or pursuant to Section 11(i) hereof in connection with an adjustment made with respect to any Original Rights; (ii) which such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates, directly or indirectly, has the right to vote or dispose of or has "beneficial ownership" of (as determined pursuant to Rule 13d-3 of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act, or any comparable or successor rule), including pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding (other than customary agreements with and between underwriters and selling group members with respect to a bona fide public offering of securities), whether or not in writing; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that a Person shall not be deemed the "Beneficial Owner" of, or to "beneficially own," any security under this subparagraph (ii) as a result of an agreement, arrangement or understanding to vote such security if such agreement, arrangement or understanding: (A) arises solely from a revocable proxy or consent given in response to a public proxy or consent solicitation made pursuant to, and in accordance with, the applicable provisions -2-
of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act, and (B) is not then reportable by such Person on Schedule 13D under the Exchange Act (or any comparable or successor report); or (iii) which are beneficially owned, directly or indirectly, by any other Person (or any Affiliate or Associate thereof) with which such Person (or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates) has any agreement, arrangement or understanding (other than customary agreements with and between underwriters and selling group members with respect to a bona fide public offering of securities) whether or not in writing, for the purpose of acquiring, holding, voting (except pursuant to a revocable proxy or consent as described in the proviso to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (e)) or disposing of any voting securities of the Company. For all purposes of this Agreement, any calculation of the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding at any particular time, including for purposes of determining the particular percentage of such outstanding shares of Common Stock of which any Person is the Beneficial Owner, shall be made in accordance with the last sentence of Rule 13d-3(d)(l)(i) of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act. (f) "Board" shall have the meaning set forth in the WHEREAS clause at the beginning of this Agreement. (g) "Business Day" shall mean any day other than a Saturday, Sunday or a day on which banking institutions in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts are authorized or obligated by law or executive order to close. (h) "Close of business" on any given date shall mean 5:00 p.m., Boston time, on such date; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that if such date is not a Business Day it shall mean 5:00 p.m., Boston time, on the next succeeding Business Day. (i) "Common Stock" shall mean the common stock, $0.01 par value, of the Company, except that "Common Stock" when used with reference to any Person other than the Company shall mean the capital stock of such Person with the greatest voting power, or the equity securities or other equity interest having power to control or direct the management, of such Person. (j) "Common stock equivalents" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof. (k) "Company" shall have the meaning set forth in the introductory paragraph hereof. (l) "Current market price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(d)(i) hereof. (m) "Current Value" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof. (n) "Distribution Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3(a) hereof. -3-
(o) "Equivalent Preferred Stock" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(b) hereof. (p) "Exchange Act" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1(c) hereof. (q) "Exchange Ratio" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 24(a) hereof. (r) "Expiration Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7(a) hereof. (s) "Final Expiration Date" shall mean the close of business on September 10, 2012. (t) "Permitted Offer" shall mean a tender offer or an exchange offer for all outstanding shares of Common Stock at a price and on terms determined, prior to the consummation of such tender offer or exchange offer, by directors constituting at least 75% of all of the members of the Board, after receiving advice from a nationally recognized investment banking firm selected by the Board, to be (a) at a price that is fair to stockholders (taking into account all factors which such members of the Board deem relevant including, without limitation, prices which could reasonably be achieved if the Company or its assets were sold on an orderly basis designed to realize maximum value) and (b) otherwise in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders. (u) "Person" shall mean any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, trust, association, limited liability company or other entity. (v) "Preferred Stock" shall mean shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, $0.01 par value, of the Company having the rights and preferences set forth in the form of Certificate of Designations attached to this Agreement as EXHIBIT A and, to the extent that there is not a sufficient number of shares of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock authorized to permit the full exercise of the Rights, any other series of Preferred Stock, $0.01 par value, of the Company designated for such purpose containing terms substantially similar to the terms of the Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock. (w) "Principal Party" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 13(b) hereof. (x) "Purchase Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4(a) hereof. (y) "Record Date" shall have the meaning set forth in the WHEREAS clause at the beginning of this Agreement. (z) "Redemption Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7(a) hereof. (aa) "Redemption Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 23(a) hereof. (bb) "Rights" shall have the meaning set forth in the WHEREAS clause at the beginning of this Agreement. -4-
(cc) "Rights Agent" shall have the meaning set forth in the introductory paragraph hereof. (dd) "Rights Certificates" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3(a) hereof. (ee) "Section 11(a)(ii) Event" shall mean an acquisition of Common Stock described in the first sentence of Section 11(a)(ii) hereof. (ff) "Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof. (gg) "Section 13 Event" shall mean any event described in clauses (x), (y) or (z) of Section 13(a) hereof. (hh) "Spread" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof. (ii) "Stock Acquisition Date" shall mean the later of (i) the first date of public announcement (which, for purposes of this definition, shall include, without limitation, a report filed pursuant to Section 13(d) under the Exchange Act) by the Company or an Acquiring Person that an Acquiring Person has become such or (ii) the first date on which an executive officer of the Company has actual knowledge that an Acquiring Person has become such; PROVIDED, HOWEVER that, if such Person is deemed not to be an Acquiring Person pursuant to clause (y) of Section 1(a) hereof, no Stock Acquisition Date shall be deemed to have occurred. (jj) "Subsidiary" shall mean, with reference to any Person, any corporation or other entity of which an amount of voting securities sufficient to elect at least a majority of the directors (or comparable body) of such corporation or other entity is beneficially owned, directly or indirectly, by such Person, or otherwise controlled by such Person. (kk) "Substitution Period" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(a)(iii) hereof. (ll) "Trading Day" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11(d)(i) hereof. (mm) "Transfer Agency and Services Agreement" shall mean the Agreement for Stock Transfer Services, dated November 2, 1999, between the Company and BankBoston, N.A. (nn) "Triggering Event" shall mean any Section 11(a)(ii) Event or any Section 13 Event. Section 2. APPOINTMENT OF RIGHTS AGENT. The Company hereby appoints the Rights Agent to act as agent for the Company and the holders of the Rights (who, in accordance with Section 3 hereof, shall prior to the Distribution Date also be the holders of the Common Stock) in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof, and the Rights Agent hereby accepts such appointment. The Company may from time to time appoint such Co-Rights Agents as it may deem necessary or desirable upon ten (10) days' prior written notice to the Rights Agent. The -5-
Rights Agent shall have no duty to supervise, and shall in no event be liable for, the acts or omissions of any such Co-Rights Agent. Section 3. ISSUANCE OF RIGHTS. (a) Until the earlier of (i) the close of business on the tenth Business Day (or such later date as may be determined by the Board) after the Stock Acquisition Date (or, if the tenth Business Day after the Stock Acquisition Date occurs before the Record Date, the close of business on the Record Date), or (ii) the close of business on the tenth Business Day (or such later date as may be determined by action of the Board) after the date that a tender or exchange offer (other than a Permitted Offer) by any Person (other than the Company, any Subsidiary of the Company, any employee benefit plan of the Company or of any Subsidiary of the Company, or any Person organized, appointed or established by the Company for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan) is first published or sent or given within the meaning of Rule 14d-2 of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act, if upon consummation thereof, such Person would be the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding, (the earlier of (i) and (ii) being herein referred to as the "Distribution Date"), (x) the Rights will be evidenced by the certificates for the Common Stock registered in the names of the holders of the Common Stock (which certificates for Common Stock shall be deemed also to be certificates for Rights) and not by separate certificates, and (y) the Rights will be transferable only in connection with the transfer of the underlying shares of Common Stock (including a transfer to the Company). As soon as practicable after the Distribution Date, the Rights Agent will send by first-class, insured, postage prepaid mail, to each record holder of the Common Stock as of the close of business on the Distribution Date, at the address of such holder shown on the records of the Company, one or more rights certificates, in substantially the form of EXHIBIT B hereto (the "Rights Certificates"), evidencing one Right for each share of Common Stock so held, subject to adjustment as provided herein. With respect to certificates for the Common Stock outstanding as of the close of business on the Record Date, until the Distribution Date, the Rights will be evidenced by such certificates for the Common Stock and the registered holders of the Common Stock shall also be the registered holders of the associated Rights. In addition, in connection with the issuance or sale of shares of Common Stock following the Distribution Date and prior to the redemption or expiration of the Rights, the Company (i) shall, with respect to shares of Common Stock so issued or sold pursuant to the exercise of stock options or under any employee benefit plan or arrangement, or upon the exercise, conversion or exchange of securities granted or issued by the Company prior to the Distribution Date, and (ii) may, in any other case, if deemed necessary or appropriate by the Board, issue Rights Certificates representing the appropriate number of Rights in connection with such issuance or sale; provided, however, that (x) no such Rights Certificate shall be issued (other than in respect of shares of Common Stock issued upon conversion of the Company's 5 1/2 % Convertible Subordinated Notes Due 2007 issued pursuant to an Indenture by and between the Company and State Street Bank and Trust Company, dated as of June 20, 2000) if, and to the extent that, the Company shall be advised by counsel that such issuance would create a significant risk of material adverse tax consequences to the Company or the Person to whom such Rights Certificate would be issued, and (y) no such Rights Certificate shall be issued if, and to the extent that, appropriate adjustment shall otherwise have been made in lieu of the issuance -6-
thereof. In the event that an adjustment in the number of Rights per share of Common Stock has been made pursuant to Sections 11(i) or 11(p) hereof, at the time of distribution of the Rights Certificates, the Company shall make the necessary and appropriate rounding adjustments (in accordance with Section 14(a) hereof) so that Rights Certificates representing only whole numbers of Rights are distributed and cash is paid in lieu of any fractional Rights. As of and after the Distribution Date, the Rights will be evidenced solely by such Rights Certificates. (b) As promptly as practicable following the Record Date, the Company will send a copy of a Summary of Rights to Purchase Preferred Stock, in substantially the form attached hereto as EXHIBIT C, by first-class, postage prepaid mail, to each record holder of the Common Stock as of the close of business on the Record Date, at the address of such holder shown on the records of the Company. The failure to send a copy of the Summary of Rights shall not affect the enforceability of any part of this Rights Agreement or the rights of any holder of the Rights. (c) Rights shall be issued (i) in respect of all shares of Common Stock that are issued (either as an original issuance or from the Company's treasury) after the Record Date but prior to the earlier of the Distribution Date or the Expiration Date and (ii) in connection with the issuance or sale of shares of Common Stock following the Distribution Date and prior to the redemption or expiration of the Rights (x) with respect to shares of Common Stock so issued or sold pursuant to the exercise of stock options or under any employee benefit plan or arrangement, or upon the exercise, conversion or exchange of securities, granted or issued by the Company prior to the Distribution Date and (y) with respect to shares of Common Stock so issued or sold in any other case, if deemed necessary or appropriate by the Board. Certificates representing such shares of Common Stock (including, without limitation, certificates issued upon transfer or exchange of Common Stock) shall also be deemed to be certificates for Rights, and shall bear the following legend: This certificate also evidences and entitles the holder hereof to certain Rights as set forth in the Rights Agreement between Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A. (the "Rights Agent") dated September 10, 2002, as the same may be amended, restated or renewed from time to time (the "Rights Agreement"), the terms of which are hereby incorporated herein by reference and a copy of which is on file at the principal offices of the Company. Under certain circumstances, as set forth in the Rights Agreement, such Rights will be evidenced by separate certificates and will no longer be evidenced by this certificate. The Company will mail to the holder of this certificate a copy of the Rights Agreement, as in effect on the date of mailing, without charge promptly after receipt of a written request therefor. Under certain circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement, Rights issued to, or held by, any Person who is, was or becomes an Acquiring Person or any Affiliate or Associate thereof (as such terms are defined in the Rights -7-
Agreement), whether currently held by or on behalf of such Person or by any subsequent holder, may become null and void. With respect to such certificates containing the foregoing legend, until the earlier of (i) the Distribution Date and (ii) the Expiration Date, the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificates shall be evidenced by such certificates alone and registered holders of Common Stock shall also be the registered holders of the associated Rights. Notwithstanding this Section 3(c), the omission of a legend shall not affect the enforceability of any part of this Rights Agreement or the rights of any holder of the Rights. (d) Until the earlier of the Distribution Date and the Expiration Date, the transfer of any certificates representing shares of Common Stock in respect of which Rights have been issued shall also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with such shares of Common Stock. In the event that the Company purchases or acquires any shares of Common Stock after the Record Date but prior to the Distribution Date, any Rights associated with such shares of Common Stock shall be deemed cancelled and retired so that the Company shall not be entitled to exercise any Rights associated with the shares of Common Stock which are no longer outstanding. Section 4. FORM OF RIGHTS CERTIFICATES. (a) The Rights Certificates (and the forms of election to purchase, certification and assignment to be printed on the reverse thereof) shall each be substantially in the form set forth in EXHIBIT B hereto and may have such marks of identification or designation and such legends, summaries or endorsements printed thereon as the Company may deem appropriate and as are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Agreement, or as may be required to comply with any applicable law or with any rule or regulation made pursuant thereto or with any rule or regulation of any stock exchange or over-the-counter market on which the Rights may from time to time be listed, or to conform to usage. Subject to the provisions of Sections 7, 11 and 22 hereof, the Rights Certificates, whenever distributed, shall entitle the holders thereof to purchase such number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock as shall be set forth therein at the price set forth therein (such exercise price per one one-thousandth of a share, the "Purchase Price"), but the amount and type of securities purchasable upon the exercise of each Right and the Purchase Price thereof shall be subject to adjustment as provided herein. (b) Any Rights Certificate issued pursuant to Section 3, Section 11(i) or Section 22 hereof that represents Rights beneficially owned by persons known to be: (i) an Acquiring Person or an Associate or Affiliate of an Acquiring Person, (ii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee after the Acquiring Person becomes such, or (iii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee prior to or concurrently with the Acquiring Person becoming such and receives such Rights pursuant to either (A) a transfer (whether or not for consideration) from the Acquiring Person to holders of equity interests in such Acquiring Person or to any Person with whom such Acquiring Person has any continuing agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) regarding the transferred Rights or (B) a transfer which the Board has determined is part of a plan, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in -8-
writing) that has as a primary purpose or effect avoidance of Section 7(e) hereof, and any Rights Certificate issued pursuant to Section 6 or Section 11 hereof upon transfer, exchange, replacement or adjustment of any other Rights Certificate referred to in this sentence, shall contain (to the extent feasible) the following legend: The Rights represented by this Rights Certificate are or were beneficially owned by a Person who was or became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined in the Rights Agreement). Accordingly, this Rights Certificate and the Rights represented hereby may become null and void in the circumstances specified in Section 7(e) of such Agreement. The provisions of Section 7(e) hereof shall be operative whether or not the foregoing legend is contained on any such Rights Certificate. Section 5. COUNTERSIGNATURE AND REGISTRATION. (a) The Rights Certificates shall be executed on behalf of the Company by its Chairman of the Board, President or any Vice President, either manually or by facsimile signature, and shall have affixed thereto the Company's seal or a facsimile thereof, which shall be attested by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the Company, either manually or by facsimile signature. The Rights Certificates shall be manually countersigned by the Rights Agent and shall not be valid for any purpose unless so countersigned. In case any officer of the Company who shall have signed any of the Rights Certificates shall cease to be such officer of the Company before countersignature by the Rights Agent and issuance and delivery by the Company, such Rights Certificates, nevertheless, may be countersigned by the Rights Agent and issued and delivered by the Company with the same force and effect as though the person who signed such Rights Certificates had not ceased to be such officer of the Company; and any Rights Certificates may be signed on behalf of the Company by any person who, at the actual date of the execution of such Rights Certificate, shall be a proper officer of the Company to sign such Rights Certificate, although at the date of the execution of this Rights Agreement any such person was not such an officer. (b) Following the Distribution Date, the Rights Agent shall keep or cause to be kept, at its office designated as the appropriate place for surrender of Rights Certificates upon exercise or transfer, books for registration and transfer of the Rights Certificates issued hereunder. Such books shall show the names and addresses of the respective holders of the Rights Certificates, the number of Rights evidenced on its face by each of the Rights Certificates, the Rights Certificate number and the date of each of the Rights Certificates. Section 6. TRANSFER, SPLIT UP, COMBINATION AND EXCHANGE OF RIGHTS CERTIFICATES; MUTILATED, DESTROYED, LOST OR STOLEN RIGHTS CERTIFICATES. (a) Subject to the provisions of Section 4(b), Section 7(e) and Section 14 hereof, at any time after the close of business on the Distribution Date, and at or prior to the close of -9-
business on the Expiration Date, any Rights Certificate or Certificates (other than Rights Certificates representing Rights that have become void pursuant to Section 7(e) hereof or that have been exchanged pursuant to Section 24 hereof) may be transferred, split up, combined or exchanged for another Rights Certificate or Certificates, entitling the registered holder to purchase a like number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or, following a Triggering Event, Common Stock, other securities, cash or other assets, as the case may be) as the Rights Certificate or Certificates surrendered then entitled such holder (or former holder in the case of a transfer) to purchase. Any registered holder desiring to transfer, split up, combine or exchange any Rights Certificate or Certificates shall make such request in writing delivered to the Rights Agent, and shall surrender the Rights Certificate or Certificates to be transferred, split up, combined or exchanged, with the form of assignment and certificate appropriately executed, at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose. Neither the Rights Agent nor the Company shall be obligated to take any action whatsoever with respect to the transfer of any such surrendered Rights Certificate until the registered holder shall have completed and signed the certificate contained in the form of assignment on the reverse side of such Rights Certificate and shall have provided such additional evidence of the identity of the Beneficial Owner (or former Beneficial Owner) or Affiliates or Associates thereof as the Company shall reasonably request. Thereupon the Rights Agent shall, subject to Section 4(b), Section 7(e) and Section 14 hereof, countersign and deliver to the Person entitled thereto a Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates, as the case may be, as so requested. The Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any transfer, split up, combination or exchange of Rights Certificates. (b) Upon receipt by the Company and the Rights Agent of evidence reasonably satisfactory to them of the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of a Rights Certificate, and, in case of loss, theft or destruction, of indemnity or security reasonably satisfactory to them, and reimbursement to the Company and the Rights Agent of all reasonable expenses incidental thereto, and upon surrender to the Rights Agent and cancellation of the Rights Certificate if mutilated, the Company will execute and deliver a new Rights Certificate of like tenor to the Rights Agent for countersignature and delivery to the registered owner in lieu of the Rights Certificate so lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated. Section 7. EXERCISE OF RIGHTS; PURCHASE PRICE; EXPIRATION DATE OF RIGHTS. (a) Subject to Section 7(e) hereof, the registered holder of any Rights Certificate may exercise the Rights evidenced thereby (except as otherwise provided herein including, without limitation, the restrictions on exercisability set forth in Section 9(c), Section 11(a)(iii) and Section 23 hereof) in whole or in part at any time after the Distribution Date upon surrender of the Rights Certificate, with the form of election to purchase and the certificate on the reverse side thereof duly executed, to the Rights Agent at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, together with payment of the aggregate Purchase Price with respect to the total number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or other shares, securities, cash or other assets, as the case may be) as to which such surrendered Rights are then exercisable, at or prior to the earliest of (i) the Final Expiration Date, (ii) the time at which the Rights expire as provided in Section 13(d) hereof, (iii) the time at which the Rights are redeemed as provided in Section 23 -10-
hereof (the "Redemption Date") and (iv) the time at which such Rights are exchanged as provided in Section 24 hereof (the earliest of (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) being herein referred to as the "Expiration Date"). (b) The Purchase Price for each one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock pursuant to the exercise of a Right shall initially be $9.00 and shall be subject to adjustment from time to time as provided in Sections 11 and 13(a) hereof and shall be payable in lawful money of the United States of America in accordance with paragraph (c) below. (c) Upon receipt of a Rights Certificate representing exercisable Rights, with the form of election to purchase and the certificate duly executed, accompanied by payment, with respect to each Right so exercised, of the Purchase Price per one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (or other shares, securities, cash or other assets, as the case may be) to be purchased and an amount equal to any applicable transfer tax, the Rights Agent shall, subject to Section 20(k) hereof, thereupon promptly (i) (A) requisition from any transfer agent of the shares of Preferred Stock (or make available, if the Rights Agent is the transfer agent for such shares) certificates for the total number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock to be purchased and the Company hereby authorizes its transfer agent to comply with such requests, or (B) if the Company shall have elected to deposit the total number of shares of Preferred Stock issuable upon exercise of the Rights hereunder with a depositary agent, requisition from the depositary agent depositary receipts representing such number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock as are to be purchased (in which case certificates for the shares of Preferred Stock represented by such receipts shall be deposited by the transfer agent with the depositary agent) and the Company hereby directs the depositary agent to comply with such requests, (ii) requisition from the Company the amount of cash, if any, to be paid in lieu of fractional shares in accordance with Section 14 hereof, (iii) after receipt of such certificates or depositary receipts, cause the same to be delivered to or upon the order of the registered holder of such Rights Certificate, registered in such name or names as may be designated by such holder, and (iv) after receipt thereof, deliver such cash, if any, to or upon the order of the registered holder of such Rights Certificate. The payment of the Purchase Price (as such amount may be reduced pursuant to Section 11(a)(iii) hereof) may be made in cash or by certified bank check or money order payable to the order of the Company. In the event that the Company is obligated to issue other securities (including Common Stock) of the Company, pay cash and/or distribute other property pursuant to Section 11(a) hereof, the Company shall make all arrangements necessary so that such other securities, cash and/or other property are available for distribution by the Rights Agent, if and when appropriate. (d) In case the registered holder of any Rights Certificate shall exercise less than all the Rights evidenced thereby, a new Rights Certificate evidencing Rights equivalent to the Rights remaining unexercised shall be issued by the Rights Agent and delivered to, or upon the order of, the registered holder of such Rights Certificate, registered in such name or names as may be designated by such holder, subject to the provisions of Section 14 hereof. (e) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, from and after the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, any Rights beneficially owned by (i) an Acquiring -11-
Person or an Associate or Affiliate of an Acquiring Person, (ii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee after the Acquiring Person becomes such, or (iii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee prior to or concurrently with the Acquiring Person becoming such and receives such Rights pursuant to either (A) a transfer (whether or not for consideration) from the Acquiring Person to holders of equity interests in such Acquiring Person or to any Person with whom the Acquiring Person has any continuing agreement, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) regarding the transferred Rights or (B) a transfer which the Board has determined is part of a plan, arrangement or understanding (whether or not in writing) that has as a primary purpose or effect avoidance of this Section 7(e), shall become null and void without any further action and no holder of such Rights shall have any rights whatsoever with respect to such Rights, whether under any provision of this Agreement or otherwise. No Rights Certificate shall be issued at any time upon the transfer of any Rights to an Acquiring Person whose Rights would be void pursuant to the preceding sentence or any Associate or Affiliate thereof or to any nominee of such Acquiring Person, Associate or Affiliate; and any Rights Certificate delivered to the Rights Agent for transfer to an Acquiring Person whose Rights would be void pursuant to the preceding sentence shall be cancelled. The Company shall use all reasonable efforts to insure that the provisions of this Section 7(e) and Section 4(b) hereof are complied with, but shall have no liability to any holder of Rights Certificates or other Person as a result of its failure to make any determinations with respect to an Acquiring Person or its Affiliates, Associates or transferees hereunder. (f) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, neither the Rights Agent nor the Company shall be obligated to undertake any action with respect to a registered holder upon the occurrence of any purported transfer or exercise as set forth in this Section 7 unless such registered holder shall have (i) completed and signed the certificate following the form of assignment or election to purchase set forth on the reverse side of the Rights Certificate surrendered for such assignment or exercise, and (ii) provided such additional evidence of the identity of the Beneficial Owner (or former Beneficial Owner) or any Affiliates or Associates thereof as the Company shall reasonably request. Section 8. CANCELLATION AND DESTRUCTION OF RIGHTS CERTIFICATES. All Rights Certificates surrendered for the purpose of exercise, transfer, split up, combination or exchange shall, if surrendered to the Company or any of its agents, be delivered to the Rights Agent for cancellation or in cancelled form, or, if surrendered to the Rights Agent, shall be cancelled by it, and no Rights Certificates shall be issued in lieu thereof except as expressly permitted by any of the provisions of this Agreement. The Company shall deliver to the Rights Agent for cancellation and retirement, and the Rights Agent shall so cancel and retire, any other Rights Certificate purchased or acquired by the Company otherwise than upon the exercise thereof. The Rights Agent shall deliver all cancelled Rights Certificates to the Company, or shall, at the written request of the Company, destroy such cancelled Rights Certificates, and in such case shall deliver a certificate of destruction thereof to the Company. Section 9. RESERVATION AND AVAILABILITY OF CAPITAL STOCK. -12-
(a) The Company covenants and agrees that it will cause to be reserved and kept available out of its authorized and unissued shares of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, out of its authorized and unissued shares of Common Stock and/or other securities or out of its authorized and issued shares held in its treasury), the number of shares of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) that, as provided in this Agreement including Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, will be sufficient to permit the exercise in full of all outstanding Rights. (b) So long as the shares of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) issuable and deliverable upon the exercise of the Rights may be listed on any national securities exchange or automated quotation system, the Company shall use its best efforts to cause, from and after such time as the Rights become exercisable, all shares reserved for such issuance to be so listed upon official notice of issuance upon such exercise. (c) The Company shall use its best efforts to (i) file, as soon as practicable following the earliest date after the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event on which the consideration to be delivered by the Company upon exercise of the Rights has been determined in accordance with Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, or as soon as is required by law following the Distribution Date, as the case may be, a registration statement under the Act, with respect to the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights on an appropriate form, (ii) cause such registration statement to become effective as soon as practicable after such filing, (iii) cause such registration statement to remain effective (with a prospectus at all times meeting the requirements of the Act) until the earlier of (A) the date as of which the Rights are no longer exercisable for such securities, and (B) the Expiration Date, and (iv) obtain such other regulatory approvals as may be necessary for it to issue securities purchasable upon the exercise of the Rights. The Company will also take such action as may be appropriate under, or to ensure compliance with, the securities or "blue sky" laws of the various states in connection with the exercisability of the Rights. The Company may temporarily suspend, for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days after the date set forth in clause (i) of the first sentence of this Section 9(c), the exercisability of the Rights in order to prepare and file such registration statement and permit it to become effective or to obtain any other required regulatory approval in connection with the exercisability of the Rights. Upon any such suspension, the Company shall issue a public announcement stating that the exercisability of the Rights has been temporarily suspended, as well as a public announcement at such time as the suspension is no longer in effect. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights shall not be exercisable in any jurisdiction unless the requisite registration or qualification in such jurisdiction shall have been effected or obtained. (d) The Company covenants and agrees that it will take all such action as may be necessary to ensure that all one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) delivered upon exercise of Rights shall, at the time of delivery of the certificates for such shares (subject to payment of the Purchase Price), be duly and validly authorized and issued and fully paid and nonassessable. -13-
(e) The Company further covenants and agrees that it will pay when due and payable any and all federal and state transfer taxes and charges that may be payable in respect of the issuance or delivery of the Rights Certificates and of any certificates for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) upon the exercise of Rights. The Company shall not, however, be required (i) to pay any transfer tax that may be payable in respect of any transfer or delivery of Rights Certificates to a Person other than, or the issuance or delivery of a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) in respect of a name other than that of, the registered holder of the Rights Certificate evidencing Rights surrendered for exercise or (ii) to issue or deliver any certificates for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) in a name other than that of the registered holder upon the exercise of any Rights until such tax shall have been paid (any such tax being payable by the holder of such Rights Certificate at the time of surrender) or until it has been established to the Company's satisfaction that no such tax is due. Section 10. PREFERRED STOCK RECORD DATE. Each Person in whose name any certificate for a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) is issued upon the exercise of Rights shall for all purposes be deemed to have become the holder of record of such fractional shares of Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) represented thereby on, and such certificate shall be dated, the date upon which the Rights Certificate evidencing such Rights was duly surrendered with the forms of election and certification duly executed and payment of the Purchase Price (and all applicable transfer taxes) was made; provided, however, that if the date of such surrender and payment is a date upon which the Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) transfer books of the Company are closed, such Person shall be deemed to have become the record holder of such shares (fractional or otherwise) on, and such certificate shall be dated, the next succeeding Business Day on which the Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) transfer books of the Company are open. Prior to the exercise of the Rights evidenced thereby, the holder of a Rights Certificate, as such, shall not be entitled to any rights of a stockholder of the Company with respect to securities for which the Rights shall be exercisable, including, without limitation, the right to vote, to receive dividends or other distributions or to exercise any preemptive rights, and shall not be entitled to receive any notice of any proceedings of the Company, except as provided herein. Section 11. ADJUSTMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE, NUMBER AND KIND OF SHARES OR NUMBER OF RIGHTS. The Purchase Price, the number and kind of shares covered by each Right and the number of Rights outstanding are subject to adjustment from time to time as provided in this Section 11. (a) (i) In the event the Company shall at any time after the date of this Agreement (A) declare a dividend on the Preferred Stock payable in shares of Preferred Stock, (B) subdivide the outstanding Preferred Stock, (C) combine the outstanding Preferred Stock into a smaller number of shares, or (D) issue any shares of its capital stock in a reclassification of the -14-
Preferred Stock (including any such reclassification in connection with a consolidation or merger in which the Company is the continuing or surviving corporation), except as otherwise provided in this Section 11(a) and Section 7(e) hereof, the Purchase Price in effect at the time of the record date for such dividend or of the effective date of such subdivision, combination or reclassification, and the number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or capital stock, as the case may be, issuable on such date, shall be proportionately adjusted so that the holder of any Right exercised after such time shall be entitled to receive, upon payment of the Purchase Price then in effect, the aggregate number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or capital stock, as the case may be, which, if such Right had been exercised immediately prior to such date and at a time when the Preferred Stock transfer books of the Company were open, he would have owned upon such exercise and been entitled to receive by virtue of such dividend, subdivision, combination or reclassification. If an event occurs that would require an adjustment under both this Section 11(a)(i) and Section 11(a)(ii) hereof, the adjustment provided for in this Section 11(a)(i) shall be in addition to, and shall be made prior to, any adjustment required pursuant to Section 11(a)(ii) hereof. (ii) Subject to Section 24 of this Agreement, in the event that any Person, alone or together with its Affiliates or Associates, becomes an Acquiring Person (other than pursuant to a Permitted Offer), then, promptly following the first occurrence of such event, proper provision shall be made so that each holder of a Right (except as provided below and in Section 7(e) hereof) shall thereafter have the right to receive (subject to the last sentence of Section 23(a)), upon exercise thereof at the then current Purchase Price in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, in lieu of a number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock, such number of shares of Common Stock of the Company that equals the result obtained by (x) multiplying the then current Purchase Price by the then number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right was exercisable immediately prior to the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, and (y) dividing that product (which, following such first occurrence, shall thereafter be referred to as the "Purchase Price" for each Right and for all purposes of this Agreement) by 50% of the current market price (determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of Common Stock on the date of such first occurrence (such number of shares, the "Adjustment Shares"). (i) In the event that the number of shares of Common Stock that are authorized by the Company's Certificate of Incorporation but not outstanding or reserved for issuance for purposes other than upon exercise of the Rights are not sufficient to permit the exercise in full of the Rights in accordance with the foregoing subparagraph (ii) of this Section 11(a), the Company shall: (A) determine the excess of (1) the value of the Adjustment Shares issuable upon the exercise of a Right (the "Current Value") over (2) the Purchase Price (such excess, the "Spread"), and (B) with respect to each Right, make adequate provision to substitute for the Adjustment Shares, upon payment of the applicable Purchase Price, (1) cash, (2) a reduction in the Purchase Price, (3) Common Stock or other equity securities of the Company (including, without limitation, shares, or units of shares, of preferred stock which the Board has deemed to have the same value as shares of Common Stock (such shares of preferred stock, "common stock equivalents")), (4) debt securities of the Company, (5) other assets, or (6) any combination of the foregoing, having an aggregate value equal to the Current Value, where -15-
such aggregate value has been determined by the Board based upon the advice of a nationally recognized investment banking firm selected by the Board; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, if the Company shall not have made adequate provision to deliver value pursuant to clause (B) above within thirty (30) days following the later of (x) the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event and (y) the date on which the Company's right of redemption pursuant to Section 23(a) expires (the later of (x) and (y) being referred to herein as the "Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date"), then the Company shall be obligated to deliver, upon the surrender for exercise of a Right and without requiring payment of the Purchase Price, shares of Common Stock (to the extent available) and then, if necessary, cash, which shares and/or cash have an aggregate value equal to the Spread. If the Board shall determine in good faith that it is likely that sufficient additional shares of Common Stock could be authorized for issuance upon exercise in full of the Rights, the thirty (30) day period set forth above may be extended to the extent necessary, but not more than ninety (90) days after the Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date, in order that the Company may seek shareholder approval for the authorization of such additional shares (such period, as it may be extended, the "Substitution Period"). To the extent that the Company determines that some action need be taken pursuant to the first and/or second sentences of this Section 11(a)(iii), the Company (x) shall provide, subject to Section 7(e) hereof, that such action shall apply uniformly to all outstanding Rights, and (y) may suspend the exercisability of the Rights until the expiration of the Substitution Period in order to seek any authorization of additional shares and/or to decide the appropriate form of distribution to be made pursuant to such first sentence and to determine the value thereof. In the event of any such suspension, the Company shall issue a public announcement stating that the exercisability of the Rights has been temporarily suspended, as well as a public announcement at such time as the suspension is no longer in effect. For purposes of this Section 11(a)(iii), the value of the Common Stock shall be the current market price (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of the Common Stock on the Section 11(a)(ii) Trigger Date and the value of any "common stock equivalent" shall be deemed to have the same value as the Common Stock on such date. (b) In case the Company shall fix a record date for the issuance of rights, options or warrants to all holders of Preferred Stock entitling them to subscribe for or purchase (for a period expiring within forty-five (45) calendar days after such record date) Preferred Stock (or shares having the same rights, privileges and preferences as the shares of Preferred Stock ("equivalent preferred stock")) or securities convertible into Preferred Stock or equivalent preferred stock at a price per share of Preferred Stock or per share of equivalent preferred stock (or having a conversion price per share, if a security convertible into Preferred Stock or equivalent preferred stock) less than the current market price (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of Preferred Stock on such record date, the Purchase Price to be in effect after such record date shall be determined by multiplying the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such record date by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding on such record date, plus the number of shares of Preferred Stock which the aggregate offering price of the total number of shares of Preferred Stock and/or equivalent preferred stock so to be offered (and/or the aggregate initial conversion price of the convertible securities so to be offered) would purchase at such current market price, and the denominator of which shall be the number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding on such record date, plus the number of additional shares of Preferred Stock and/or equivalent preferred stock to be offered for -16-
subscription or purchase (or into which the convertible securities so to be offered are initially convertible). In case such subscription price may be paid by delivery of consideration part or all of which may be in a form other than cash, the value of such consideration shall be as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes. Shares of Preferred Stock owned by or held for the account of the Company shall not be deemed outstanding for the purpose of any such computation. Such adjustment shall be made successively whenever such a record date is fixed, and in the event that such rights, options or warrants are not so issued, the Purchase Price shall be adjusted to be the Purchase Price which would then be in effect if such record date had not been fixed. (c) In case the Company shall fix a record date for a distribution to all holders of Preferred Stock (including any such distribution made in connection with a consolidation or merger in which the Company is the continuing corporation) of evidences of indebtedness, cash (other than a regular quarterly cash dividend out of the earnings or retained earnings of the Company), assets (other than a dividend payable in Preferred Stock, but including any dividend payable in stock other than Preferred Stock) or subscription rights or warrants (excluding those referred to in Section 11(b) hereof), the Purchase Price to be in effect after such record date shall be determined by multiplying the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such record date by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the current market price (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of Preferred Stock on such record date, less the fair market value (as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes) of the portion of the cash, assets or evidences of indebtedness so to be distributed or of such subscription rights or warrants applicable to a share of Preferred Stock and the denominator of which shall be such current market price (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) per share of Preferred Stock on such record date. Such adjustments shall be made successively whenever such a record date is fixed, and in the event that such distribution is not so made, the Purchase Price shall be adjusted to be the Purchase Price which would have been in effect if such record date had not been fixed. (d) (i) For the purpose of any computation hereunder, other than computations made pursuant to Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, the "current market price" per share of Common Stock on any date shall be deemed to be the average of the daily closing prices per share of such Common Stock for the thirty (30) consecutive Trading Days (as such term is hereinafter defined) immediately prior to such date, and for purposes of computations made pursuant to Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, the "current market price" per share of Common Stock on any date shall be deemed to be the average of the daily closing prices per share of such Common Stock for the ten (10) consecutive Trading Days immediately following such date; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that in the event that the current market price per share of the Common Stock is determined during a period following the announcement by the issuer of such Common Stock of (A) a dividend or distribution on such Common Stock payable in shares of such Common Stock or securities convertible into shares of such Common Stock (other than the Rights), or (B) any subdivision, combination or reclassification of such Common Stock, and prior to the expiration of the requisite thirty (30) Trading Day or ten (10) Trading Day period, as set forth above, after the ex-dividend date for such dividend or distribution, or the record date for such subdivision, -17-
combination or reclassification occurs, then, and in each such case, the "current market price" shall be properly adjusted to take into account ex-dividend or post record date trading. The closing price for each day shall be the last sale price, regular way, or, in case no such sale takes place on such day, the average of the closing bid and asked prices, regular way, in either case as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed or admitted to trading on the principal national securities exchange on which the shares of Common Stock are listed or admitted to trading or, if the shares of Common Stock are not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, the last quoted price or, if not so quoted, the average of the high bid and the low asked prices in the over-the-counter market, as reported by The Nasdaq Stock Market, Inc. ("Nasdaq") or such other system then in use, or, if on any such date the shares of Common Stock are not quoted by any such organization, the average of the closing bid and asked prices as furnished by a professional market maker making a market in the Common Stock selected by the Board. All references in this Section to closing prices, last quoted prices or other stock prices mean prices during regular trading hours, without giving effect to any after-hours or extended hours trading. If on any such date no market maker is making a market in the Common Stock, the fair value of such shares on such date shall be as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes. The term "Trading Day" shall mean a day on which Nasdaq or any national securities exchange on which the shares of Common Stock are listed or admitted to trading is open for the transaction of business or, if the shares of Common Stock are not listed or admitted to trading on Nasdaq or any national securities exchange, a Business Day. If the Common Stock is not publicly held or not so listed or traded, "current market price" per share shall mean the fair value per share as determined in good faith by the Board, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes. (ii) For the purpose of any computation hereunder, the "current market price" per share of Preferred Stock shall be determined in the same manner as set forth above for the Common Stock in clause (i) of this Section 11(d) (other than the last sentence thereof). If the current market price per share of Preferred Stock cannot be determined in the manner provided above or if the Preferred Stock is not publicly held or listed or traded in a manner described in clause (i) of this Section 11(d), the "current market price" per share of Preferred Stock shall be conclusively deemed to be an amount equal to 1000 (as such number may be appropriately adjusted for such events as stock splits, stock dividends and recapitalizations with respect to the Common Stock occurring after the date of this Agreement) multiplied by the current market price per share of the Common Stock. If neither the Common Stock nor the Preferred Stock is publicly held or so listed or traded, "current market price" per share of the Preferred Stock shall mean the fair value per share as determined in good faith by the Board, which determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes. For all purposes of this Agreement, the "current market price" of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock shall be equal to the "current market price" of one share of Preferred Stock divided by 1000. (e) Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, no adjustment in the Purchase Price shall be required unless such adjustment would require an increase or decrease of at least -18-
one percent (1%) in the Purchase Price; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that any adjustments which by reason of this Section 11(e) are not required to be made shall be carried forward and taken into account in any subsequent adjustment. All calculations under this Section 11 shall be made to the nearest cent or to the nearest ten-millionth of a share of Preferred Stock, or hundred-thousandth of a share of Common Stock or other security, as the case may be. Notwithstanding the first sentence of this Section 11(e), any adjustment required by this Section 11 shall be made no later than the earlier of (i) three years from the date of the transaction which mandates such adjustment, or (ii) the Expiration Date. (f) If as a result of an adjustment made pursuant to Section 11(a)(ii) or Section 13(a) hereof, the holder of any Right thereafter exercised shall become entitled to receive any securities other than Preferred Stock, thereafter the number of such other securities so receivable upon exercise of any Right and the Purchase Price thereof shall be subject to adjustment from time to time in a manner and on terms as nearly equivalent as practicable to the provisions with respect to the Preferred Stock contained in Sections 11(a), (b), (c), (e), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k) and (m), and the provisions of Sections 7, 9, 10, 13 and 14 hereof with respect to the Preferred Stock shall apply on like terms to any such other securities; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the Company shall not be liable for its inability to reserve and keep available for issuance upon exercise of the Rights pursuant to Section 11(a)(ii) a number of shares of Common Stock greater than the number then authorized by the Company's Certificate of Incorporation but not outstanding or reserved for other purposes. (g) All Rights originally issued by the Company subsequent to any adjustment made to the Purchase Price hereunder shall evidence the right to purchase, at the adjusted Purchase Price, the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable from time to time hereunder upon exercise of the Rights, all subject to further adjustment as provided herein. (h) Unless the Company shall have exercised its election as provided in Section 11(i), upon each adjustment of the Purchase Price as a result of the calculations made in Sections 11(b) and (c), each Right outstanding immediately prior to the making of such adjustment shall thereafter evidence the right to purchase, at the adjusted Purchase Price, that number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock (calculated to the nearest ten-millionth) obtained by (i) multiplying (x) the number of one one-thousandths of a share covered by a Right immediately prior to this adjustment, by (y) the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such adjustment of the Purchase Price, and (ii) dividing the product so obtained by the Purchase Price in effect immediately after such adjustment of the Purchase Price. (i) The Company may elect on or after the date of any adjustment of the Purchase Price to adjust the number of Rights, in lieu of any adjustment in the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable upon the exercise of a Right. Each of the Rights outstanding after the adjustment in the number of Rights shall be exercisable for the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right was exercisable immediately prior to such adjustment. Each Right held of record prior to such adjustment of -19-
the number of Rights shall become that number of Rights (calculated to the nearest one-hundred- thousandth) obtained by dividing the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to adjustment of the Purchase Price by the Purchase Price in effect immediately after adjustment of the Purchase Price. The Company shall make a public announcement of its election to adjust the number of Rights, indicating the record date for the adjustment, and, if known at the time, the amount of the adjustment to be made. This record date may be the date on which the Purchase Price is adjusted or any day thereafter, but, if the Rights Certificates have been issued, shall be at least ten (10) days later than the date of the public announcement. If Rights Certificates have been issued, upon each adjustment of the number of Rights pursuant to this Section 11(i), the Company shall, as promptly as practicable, cause to be distributed to holders of record of Rights Certificates on such record date Rights Certificates evidencing, subject to Section 14 hereof, the additional Rights to which such holders shall be entitled as a result of such adjustment, or, at the option of the Company, shall cause to be distributed to such holders of record in substitution and replacement for the Rights Certificates held by such holders prior to the date of adjustment, and upon surrender thereof, if required by the Company, new Rights Certificates evidencing all the Rights to which such holders shall be entitled after such adjustment. Rights Certificates so to be distributed shall be issued, executed and countersigned in the manner provided for herein (and may bear, at the option of the Company, the adjusted Purchase Price) and shall be registered in the names of the holders of record of Rights Certificates on the record date specified in the public announcement. (j) Irrespective of any adjustment or change in the Purchase Price or the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of the Rights, the Rights Certificates theretofore and thereafter issued may continue to express the Purchase Price per one one-thousandth of a share and the number of one one-thousandths of a share which were expressed in the initial Rights Certificates issued hereunder. (k) Before taking any action that would cause an adjustment reducing the Purchase Price below the then par value, if any, of the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock issuable upon exercise of the Rights, the Company shall take any corporate action which may, in the opinion of its counsel, be necessary in order that the Company may validly and legally issue such number of one one-thousandths of a share of fully paid and nonassessable Preferred Stock at such adjusted Purchase Price. (l) In any case in which this Section 11 shall require that an adjustment in the Purchase Price be made effective as of a record date for a specified event, the Company may elect to defer until the occurrence of such event the issuance to the holder of any Right exercised after such record date the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock and other capital stock or securities of the Company, if any, issuable upon such exercise over and above the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock and other capital stock or securities of the Company, if any, issuable upon such exercise on the basis of the Purchase Price in effect prior to such adjustment; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the Company shall deliver to such holder a due bill or other appropriate instrument evidencing such holder's right to receive such additional shares (fractional or otherwise) or securities upon the occurrence of the event requiring such adjustment. -20-
(m) Anything in this Section 11 to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company shall be entitled to make such reductions in the Purchase Price, in addition to those adjustments expressly required by this Section 11, as and to the extent that in their good faith judgment the Board shall determine to be advisable in order that any (i) consolidation or subdivision of the Preferred Stock, (ii) issuance wholly for cash of any shares of Preferred Stock at less than the current market price, (iii) issuance wholly for cash of shares of Preferred Stock or securities which by their terms are convertible into or exchangeable for shares of Preferred Stock, (iv) stock dividends or (v) issuance of rights, options or warrants referred to in this Section 11, hereafter made by the Company to holders of its Preferred Stock shall not be taxable to such stockholders. (n) The Company covenants and agrees that it shall not, at any time after the Distribution Date, (i) consolidate with any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction that complies with Section 11(o) hereof), (ii) merge with or into any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), or (iii) sell or transfer (or permit any Subsidiary to sell or transfer), in one transaction, or a series of related transactions, assets or earning power aggregating more than 50% of the assets or earning power of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to any other Person or Persons (other than the Company and/or any of its Subsidiaries in one or more transactions each of which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), if (x) at the time of or immediately after such consolidation, merger or sale there are any charter or bylaw provisions or any rights, warrants or other instruments or securities outstanding or agreements in effect that would substantially diminish or otherwise eliminate the benefits intended to be afforded by the Rights or (y) prior to, simultaneously with or immediately after such consolidation, merger or sale, the stockholders of the Person who constitutes, or would constitute, the "Principal Party" for purposes of Section 13(a) hereof shall have received a distribution of Rights previously owned by such Person or any of its Affiliates or Associates. The Company shall not consummate any consolidation, merger, sale or transfer described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) of the prior sentence unless prior thereto the Company and such other Person shall have executed and delivered to the Rights Agent a supplemental agreement evidencing compliance with this Section 11(n). (o) The Company covenants and agrees that, after the Distribution Date, it will not, except as permitted by Section 23, Section 24 or Section 27 hereof, take (or permit any Subsidiary to take) any action if at the time such action is taken it is reasonably foreseeable that such action will diminish substantially or otherwise eliminate the benefits intended to be afforded by the Rights. (p) Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event that the Company shall at any time after the Record Date and prior to the Distribution Date (i) declare or pay any dividend on the outstanding shares of Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding shares of Common Stock, or (iii) combine the outstanding shares of Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, the number of Rights associated with each share of Common Stock then outstanding, or issued or delivered thereafter but prior to the Distribution Date, shall be proportionately adjusted so that the number of Rights thereafter associated with each share of Common Stock following any such event shall equal the result obtained by multiplying the number of Rights associated with each share of Common Stock -21-
immediately prior to such event by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately prior to the occurrence of such event and the denominator of which shall be the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately following the occurrence of such event. Section 12. CERTIFICATE OF ADJUSTED PURCHASE PRICE OR NUMBER OF SHARES. Whenever an adjustment is made as provided in Section 11 or Section 13 hereof, the Company shall promptly (a) prepare a certificate setting forth such adjustment and a brief statement of the facts accounting for such adjustment, (b) file with the Rights Agent, and with each transfer agent for the Preferred Stock and the Common Stock, a copy of such certificate, and (c) mail a brief summary thereof to each holder of a Rights Certificate (or, if prior to the Distribution Date, to each holder of a certificate representing shares of Common Stock) in accordance with Section 26 hereof. The Rights Agent shall be fully protected in relying on any such certificate and on any adjustment therein contained and shall not be deemed to have knowledge of any adjustment unless and until it shall have received such certificate. Section 13. CONSOLIDATION, MERGER OR SALE OR TRANSFER OF ASSETS OR EARNING POWER. (a) In the event that, at any time after a Person has become an Acquiring Person, (x) the Company shall consolidate with, or merge with and into, any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction that complies with Section 11(o) hereof), and the Company shall not be the continuing or surviving corporation of such consolidation or merger, (y) any Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction that complies with Section 11(o) hereof) shall consolidate with, or merge with or into, the Company, and the Company shall be the continuing or surviving corporation of such consolidation or merger and, in connection with such consolidation or merger, all or part of the outstanding shares of Common Stock shall be changed into or exchanged for stock or other securities of any other Person or cash or any other property, or (z) the Company shall sell or otherwise transfer (or one or more of its Subsidiaries shall sell or otherwise transfer), in one transaction or a series of related transactions, assets or earning power aggregating more than 50% of the assets or earning power of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to any Person or Persons (other than the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company in one or more transactions each of which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), then, and in each such case and except as contemplated by Section 13(d) hereof, proper provision shall be made so that: (i) each holder of a Right, except as provided in Section 7(e) hereof, shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon the exercise thereof at the then current Purchase Price in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, such number of validly authorized and issued, fully paid, non-assessable and freely tradeable shares of Common Stock of the Principal Party (as such term is hereinafter defined), which shall not be subject to any liens, encumbrances, rights of first refusal or other adverse claims, as shall be equal to the result obtained by (1) multiplying the then current Purchase Price by the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right is exercisable immediately prior to the first occurrence of a Section 13 Event (or, if a Section 11(a)(ii) Event has occurred prior to the first occurrence of a Section 13 Event, multiplying the number of such one one-thousandths of a share for which a Right was exercisable immediately prior to the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event by the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such -22-
first occurrence), and (2) dividing that product (which, following the first occurrence of a Section 13 Event, shall be referred to as the "Purchase Price" for each Right and for all purposes of this Agreement) by 50% of the current market price (determined pursuant to Section 11(d)(i) hereof) per share of the Common Stock of such Principal Party on the date of consummation of such Section 13 Event; (ii) such Principal Party shall thereafter be liable for, and shall assume, by virtue of such Section 13 Event, all the obligations and duties of the Company pursuant to this Agreement; (iii) the term "Company" shall thereafter be deemed to refer to such Principal Party, it being specifically intended that, subject to clause (v) below, the provisions of Section 11 hereof shall apply only to such Principal Party following the first occurrence of a Section 13 Event; (iv) such Principal Party shall take such steps (including, but not limited to, the reservation of a sufficient number of shares of its Common Stock) in connection with the consummation of any such transaction as may be necessary to assure that the provisions hereof shall thereafter be applicable, as nearly as reasonably may be, in relation to its shares of Common Stock thereafter deliverable upon the exercise of the Rights; and (v) the provisions of Section 11(a)(ii) hereof shall be of no effect following the first occurrence of any Section 13 Event. (b) "Principal Party" shall mean (i) in the case of any transaction described in clause (x) or (y) of the first sentence of Section 13(a), the Person that is the issuer of any securities into which shares of Common Stock of the Company are converted in such merger or consolidation, and if no securities are so issued, the Person that is the other party to such merger or consolidation; and (ii) in the case of any transaction described in clause (z) of the first sentence of Section 13(a), the Person that is the party receiving the greatest portion of the assets or earning power transferred pursuant to such transaction or transactions; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that in any such case, (1) if the Common Stock of such Person is not at such time and has not been continuously over the preceding twelve (12) month period registered under Section 12 of the Exchange Act, and such Person is a direct or indirect Subsidiary of another Person the Common Stock of which is and has been so registered, "Principal Party" shall refer to such other Person; (2) in case such Person is a Subsidiary, directly or indirectly, of more than one Person, the Common Stocks of two or more of which are and have been so registered, "Principal Party" shall refer to whichever of such Persons is the issuer of the Common Stock having the greatest aggregate market value; and (3) in case such Person is owned, directly or indirectly, by a joint venture formed by two or more Persons that are not owned, directly or indirectly, by the same Person, the rules set forth in (1) and (2) above shall apply to each of the chains of ownership having an interest in such joint venture as if such party were a "Subsidiary" of both or all of such joint ventures and the Principal Parties in each such chain shall bear the obligations set forth in this Section 13 in the same ratio as their direct or indirect interests in such Person bear to the total of such interests. (c) The Company shall not consummate any such consolidation, merger, sale or transfer unless the Principal Party shall have a sufficient number of authorized shares of its Common Stock which have not been issued or reserved for issuance to permit the exercise in full -23-
of the Rights in accordance with this Section 13 and unless prior thereto the Company and such Principal Party shall have executed and delivered to the Rights Agent a supplemental agreement providing for the terms set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section 13 and further providing that, as soon as practicable after the date of any consolidation, merger or sale of assets mentioned in paragraph (a) of this Section 13, the Principal Party will (i) prepare and file a registration statement under the Act, with respect to the Rights and the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights on an appropriate form, and will use its best efforts to cause such registration statement to (A) become effective as soon as practicable after such filing and (B) remain effective (with a prospectus at all times meeting the requirements of the Act) until the Expiration Date; (ii) use its best efforts to qualify or register the Rights and the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights under the blue sky laws of such jurisdictions as may be necessary or appropriate; and (iii) deliver to holders of the Rights historical financial statements for the Principal Party and each of its Affiliates that comply in all respects with the requirements for registration on Form 10 under the Exchange Act. The provisions of this Section 13 shall similarly apply to successive mergers or consolidations or sales or other transfers. In the event that a Section 13 Event shall occur at the same time as, or at any time after, the occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, the Rights which have not theretofore been exercised shall thereafter become exercisable in the manner described in Section 13(a). (d) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, Section 13 shall not be applicable to a transaction described in subparagraphs (x) and (y) of Section 13(a) if (i) such transaction is consummated with a Person or Persons (or a wholly owned subsidiary of any such Person or Persons) who acquired shares of Common Stock pursuant to a Permitted Offer, (ii) the price per share of Common Stock paid in such transaction is not less than the price per share of Common Stock paid to all holders of shares of Common Stock whose shares were purchased pursuant to such Permitted Offer, and (iii) the form of consideration paid in such transaction is the same as the form of consideration paid pursuant to such Permitted Offer. Upon consummation of any such transaction contemplated by this Section 13(d), all Rights hereunder shall expire. Section 14. FRACTIONAL RIGHTS AND FRACTIONAL SHARES. (a) The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of Rights, except prior to the Distribution Date as provided in Section 11(i) or (p) hereof, or to distribute Rights Certificates that evidence fractional Rights. In lieu of such fractional Rights, there shall be paid to the registered holders of the Rights Certificates with regard to which such fractional Rights would otherwise be issuable, an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of a whole Right. For purposes of this Section 14(a), the current market value of a whole Right shall be the closing price of the Rights for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date on which such fractional Rights would have been otherwise issuable. The closing price of the -24-
Rights for any day shall be the last sale price, regular way, or, in case no such sale takes place on such day, the average of the closing bid and asked prices, regular way, in either case as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed or admitted to trading on the principal national securities exchange on which the Rights are listed or admitted to trading, or if the Rights are not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, the last quoted price or, if not so quoted, the average of the high bid and the low asked prices in the over-the-counter market, as reported by Nasdaq or such other system then in use or, if on any such date the Rights are not quoted by any such organization, the average of the closing bid and asked prices as furnished by a professional market maker making a market in the Rights selected by the Board. All references in this Section to closing prices, last quoted prices or other stock prices means prices during regular trading hours, without giving effect to any after-hours or extended hours trading. If on any such date no such market maker is making a market in the Rights, the fair value of the Rights on such date as determined in good faith by the Board shall be used, which determination shall be described in a statement filed with Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes. (b) The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock) upon exercise of the Rights or to distribute certificates that evidence fractional shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock). Fractional shares of Preferred Stock in integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock may, at the election of the Company, be evidenced by depositary receipts; provided, however, that holders of such depositary receipts shall have all of the designations and the powers, preferences and rights, and the qualifications, limitations and restrictions to which they are entitled as beneficial owners of the shares of Preferred Stock represented by such depositary receipts. In lieu of fractional shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock), the Company shall pay to the registered holders of Rights Certificates at the time such Rights are exercised as herein provided an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock. For purposes of this Section 14(b), the current market value of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock shall be one one-thousandth of the closing price of a share of Preferred Stock (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d)(ii) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of such exercise. (c) Following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, the Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Common Stock upon exercise of the Rights or to distribute certificates which evidence fractional shares of Common Stock. In lieu of fractional shares of Common Stock, the Company shall pay to the registered holders of Rights Certificates at the time such Rights are exercised as herein provided an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market price of one (1) share of Common Stock (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d)(i) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of such exercise. (d) The holder of a Right by the acceptance of such Right expressly waives his right to receive any fractional Rights or any fractional shares upon exercise of a Right, except as permitted by this Section 14. -25-
Section 15. RIGHTS OF ACTION. All rights of action in respect of this Agreement, except the rights of action expressly given to the Rights Agent in Section 18 hereof, are vested in the respective registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the registered holders of the Common Stock); and any registered holder of any Rights Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, of the Common Stock), without the consent of the Rights Agent or of the holder of any other Rights Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, of the Common Stock), may, in his own behalf and for his own benefit, enforce, and may institute and maintain any suit, action or proceeding against the Company to enforce, or otherwise act in respect of, his right to exercise the Rights evidenced by such Rights Certificate in the manner provided in such Rights Certificate and in this Agreement. Without limiting the foregoing or any remedies available to the holders of Rights, it is specifically acknowledged that the holders of Rights would not have an adequate remedy at law for any breach of this Agreement and shall be entitled to specific performance of the obligations hereunder and injunctive relief against actual or threatened violations of the obligations hereunder of any Person subject to this Agreement. Section 16. AGREEMENT OF RIGHTS HOLDERS. Every holder of a Right by accepting the same consents and agrees with the Company and the Rights Agent and with every other holder of a Right that: (a) prior to the Distribution Date, the Rights will be transferable only in connection with the transfer of Common Stock; (b) after the Distribution Date, the Rights Certificates are transferable only on the registry books of the Rights Agent if surrendered at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purposes, duly endorsed or accompanied by a proper instrument of transfer and with the appropriate forms and certificates duly completed and fully executed; (c) subject to Section 6(a) and Section 7(f) hereof, the Company and the Rights Agent may deem and treat the person in whose name a Rights Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, the associated Common Stock certificate) is registered as the absolute owner thereof and of the Rights evidenced thereby (notwithstanding any notations of ownership or writing on the Rights Certificates or the associated Common Stock certificate made by anyone other than the Company or the Rights Agent) for all purposes whatsoever, and neither the Company nor the Rights Agent, subject to the penultimate sentence of Section 7(e) hereof, shall be required to be affected by any notice to the contrary; and (d) notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, neither the Company nor the Rights Agent shall have any liability to any holder of a Right or other Person as a result of its inability to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement by reason of any preliminary or permanent injunction or other order, decree or ruling issued by a court of competent jurisdiction or by a governmental, regulatory or administrative agency or commission, or any statute, rule, regulation or executive order promulgated or enacted by any governmental authority, prohibiting or otherwise restraining performance of such obligation; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, the Company must use its best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such order, decree or ruling and to have any such order, decree or ruling lifted or otherwise overturned as soon as possible. -26-
Section 17. RIGHTS CERTIFICATE HOLDER NOT DEEMED A STOCKHOLDER. No holder, as such, of any Rights Certificate shall be entitled to vote, receive dividends or be deemed for any purpose the holder of the number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock or any other securities of the Company which may at any time be issuable on the exercise of the Rights represented thereby, nor shall anything contained herein or in any Rights Certificate be construed to confer upon the holder of any Rights Certificate, as such, any of the rights of a stockholder of the Company or any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to stockholders at any meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action, or to receive notice of meetings or other actions affecting stockholders (except as provided in Section 25 hereof), or to receive dividends or subscription rights, or otherwise, until the Right or Rights evidenced by such Rights Certificate shall have been exercised in accordance with the provisions hereof. Section 18. CONCERNING THE RIGHTS AGENT. (a) The Company agrees to pay to the Rights Agent reasonable compensation for all services rendered by it hereunder and, from time to time, on demand of the Rights Agent, its reasonable expenses and counsel fees and disbursements and other disbursements incurred in the administration and execution of this Agreement and the exercise and performance of its duties hereunder. The Company also agrees to indemnify the Rights Agent for, and to hold it harmless against, any loss, liability or expense, incurred without gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct on the part of the Rights Agent, for anything done or omitted by the Rights Agent in connection with the acceptance and administration of this Agreement, including the costs and expenses of defending against any claim of liability in the premises. (b) The Rights Agent shall be protected and shall incur no liability for or in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by it in connection with its administration of this Agreement in reliance upon any Rights Certificate or certificate for Common Stock or for other securities of the Company, instrument of assignment or transfer, power of attorney, endorsement, affidavit, letter, notice, direction, consent, certificate, statement, or other paper or document believed by it to be genuine and to be signed, executed and, where necessary, verified or acknowledged, by the proper Person or Persons, or otherwise upon the advice of counsel as set forth in Section 20 hereof. Section 19. MERGER OR CONSOLIDATION OR CHANGE OF NAME OF RIGHTS AGENT. (a) Any corporation into which the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent may be merged or with which it may be consolidated, or any corporation resulting from any merger or consolidation to which the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent shall be a party, or any corporation succeeding to the corporate trust business of the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent, shall be the successor to the Rights Agent under this Agreement without the execution or filing of any paper or any further act on the part of any of the parties hereto; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that such corporation would be eligible for appointment as a successor Rights Agent under the provisions of Section 21 hereof. In case at the time such successor Rights Agent shall succeed to the agency created by this Agreement, any of the Rights Certificates shall have been countersigned but not delivered, any such successor Rights Agent -27-
may adopt the countersignature of a predecessor Rights Agent and deliver such Rights Certificates so countersigned; and in case at that time any of the Rights Certificates shall not have been countersigned, any successor Rights Agent may countersign such Rights Certificates either in the name of the predecessor or in the name of the successor Rights Agent; and in all such cases such Rights Certificates shall have the full force provided in the Rights Certificates and in this Agreement. (b) In case at any time the name of the Rights Agent shall be changed and at such time any of the Rights Certificates shall have been countersigned but not delivered, the Rights Agent may adopt the countersignature under its prior name and deliver Rights Certificates so countersigned; and in case at that time any of the Rights Certificates shall not have been countersigned, the Rights Agent may countersign such Rights Certificates either in its prior name or in its changed name; and in all such cases such Rights Certificates shall have the full force provided in the Rights Certificates and in this Agreement. Section 20. DUTIES OF RIGHTS AGENT. The Rights Agent undertakes the duties and obligations imposed by this Agreement upon the following terms and conditions, by all of which the Company and the holders of Rights Certificates, by their acceptance thereof, shall be bound: (a) The Rights Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be legal counsel for the Company), and the opinion of such counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection to the Rights Agent as to any action taken or omitted by it in good faith and in accordance with such opinion. (b) Whenever in the performance of its duties under this Agreement the Rights Agent shall deem it necessary or desirable that any fact or matter (including, without limitation, the identity of any Acquiring Person and the determination of "current market price") be proved or established by the Company prior to taking or suffering any action hereunder, such fact or matter (unless other evidence in respect thereof be herein specifically prescribed) may be deemed to be conclusively proved and established by a certificate signed by the Chairman of the Board, the President, any Vice President, the Treasurer, any Assistant Treasurer, the Secretary or any Assistant Secretary of the Company and delivered to the Rights Agent; and such certificate shall be full authorization to the Rights Agent for any action taken or suffered in good faith by it under the provisions of this Agreement in reliance upon such certificate. (c) The Rights Agent shall be liable hereunder only for its own gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct. (d) The Rights Agent shall not be liable for or by reason of any of the statements of fact or recitals contained in this Agreement or in the Rights Certificates or be required to verify the same (except as to its countersignature on such Rights Certificates), but all such statements and recitals are and shall be deemed to have been made by the Company only. (e) The Rights Agent shall not be under any responsibility in respect of the validity of this Agreement or the execution and delivery hereof (except the due execution hereof by the Rights Agent) or in respect of the validity or execution of any Rights Certificate (except its -28-
countersignature thereof); nor shall it be responsible for any breach by the Company of any covenant or condition contained in this Agreement or in any Rights Certificate; nor shall it be responsible for any adjustment required under the provisions of Section 11, Section 13 or Section 24 hereof or responsible for the manner, method or amount of any such adjustment or the ascertaining of the existence of facts that would require any such adjustment (except with respect to the exercise of Rights evidenced by Rights Certificates after receipt of a certificate describing any such adjustment, delivered pursuant to Section 12); nor shall it by any act hereunder be deemed to make any representation or warranty as to the authorization or reservation of any shares of Common Stock or Preferred Stock to be issued pursuant to this Agreement or any Rights Certificate or as to whether any shares of Common Stock or Preferred Stock will, when so issued, be validly authorized and issued, fully paid and nonassessable. (f) The Company agrees that it will perform, execute, acknowledge and deliver or cause to be performed, executed, acknowledged and delivered all such further and other acts, instruments and assurances as may reasonably be required by the Rights Agent for the carrying out or performing by the Rights Agent of the provisions of this Agreement. (g) The Rights Agent is hereby authorized and directed to accept instructions with respect to the performance of its duties hereunder from the Chairman of the Board, the President, any Vice President, the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary, the Treasurer or any Assistant Treasurer of the Company, and to apply to such officers for advice or instructions in connection with its duties, and it shall not be liable for any action taken or suffered to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with instructions of any such officer. Any application by the Rights Agent for written instructions from the Company may, at the option of the Rights Agent, set forth in writing any action proposed to be taken or omitted by the Rights Agent with respect to its duties or obligations under this Rights Agreement and the date on and/or after which such action shall be taken or omitted and the Rights Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted in accordance with a proposal included in any such application on or after the date specified therein (which date shall not be less than five Business Days after the date any such officer actually receives such application, unless any such officer shall have consented in writing to an earlier date) unless, prior to taking or omitting any such action, the Rights Agent has received written instructions in response to such application specifying the action to be taken or omitted. (h) The Rights Agent and any stockholder, director, officer or employee of the Rights Agent may buy, sell or deal in any of the Rights or other securities of the Company or become pecuniarily interested in any transaction in which the Company may be interested, or contract with or lend money to the Company or otherwise act as fully and freely as though it were not Rights Agent under this Agreement. Nothing herein shall preclude the Rights Agent from acting in any other capacity for the Company or for any other legal entity. (i) The Rights Agent may execute and exercise any of the rights or powers hereby vested in it or perform any duty hereunder either itself or by or through its attorneys or agents, and the Rights Agent shall not be answerable or accountable for any act, default, neglect or misconduct of any such attorneys or agents or for any loss to the Company resulting from any -29-
such act, default, neglect or misconduct; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, reasonable care was exercised in the selection and continued employment thereof. (j) No provision of this Agreement shall require the Rights Agent to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise incur any financial liability in the performance of any of its duties hereunder or in the exercise of its rights if there shall be reasonable grounds for believing that repayment of such funds or adequate indemnification against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured to it. (k) If, with respect to any Rights Certificate surrendered to the Rights Agent for exercise or transfer, the certificate attached to the form of assignment or form of election to purchase, as the case may be, has not been completed, the Company and the Rights Agent will deem the beneficial owner of the rights evidenced by such Rights Certificate to be an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate thereof and such assignment or election to purchase will not be honored. Section 21. CHANGE OF RIGHTS AGENT. The Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent may resign and be discharged from its duties under this Agreement upon thirty (30) days' notice in writing mailed to the Company, and to each transfer agent of the Common Stock and Preferred Stock, by registered or certified mail, and to the holders of the Rights Certificates by first-class mail. The Company may remove the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent upon thirty (30) days' notice in writing, mailed to the Rights Agent or successor Rights Agent, as the case may be, and to each transfer agent of the Common Stock and Preferred Stock, by registered or certified mail, and to the holders of the Rights Certificates by first-class mail. In the event either party terminates the Transfer Agency and Services Agreement pursuant to the section thereof entitled "Termination of Agreement", the Rights Agent will be deemed to resign automatically on the effective date of such termination and any notice required to be delivered pursuant to this Section 21 will be sent by the Company. If the Rights Agent shall resign or be removed or shall otherwise become incapable of acting, the Company shall appoint a successor to the Rights Agent. If the Company shall fail to make such appointment within a period of thirty (30) days after giving notice of such removal or after it has been notified in writing of such resignation or incapacity by the resigning or incapacitated Rights Agent or by the holder of a Rights Certificate (who shall, with such notice, submit his Rights Certificate for inspection by the Company), then any registered holder of any Rights Certificate may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a new Rights Agent. Any successor Rights Agent, whether appointed by the Company or by such a court, shall be (a) a corporation organized and doing business under the laws of the United States (or of any state of the United States) in good standing, which is authorized under such laws to exercise corporate trust or stock transfer powers and is subject to supervision or examination by federal or state authority and which has at the time of its appointment as Rights Agent a combined capital and surplus of at least $50,000,000 or (b) an affiliate of a corporation described in clause (a) of this sentence. After appointment, the successor Rights Agent shall be vested with the same powers, rights, duties and responsibilities as if it had been originally named as Rights Agent without further act or deed; but the predecessor Rights Agent shall deliver and transfer to the successor Rights Agent any property at the time held by it hereunder, and execute and deliver any further assurance, conveyance, act or -30-
deed necessary for the purpose. Not later than the effective date of any such appointment, the Company shall file notice thereof in writing with the predecessor Rights Agent and each transfer agent of the Common Stock and the Preferred Stock, and mail a notice thereof in writing to the registered holders of the Rights Certificates. Failure to give any notice provided for in this Section 21, however, or any defect therein, shall not affect the legality or validity of the resignation or removal of the Rights Agent or the appointment of the successor Rights Agent, as the case may be. Section 22. ISSUANCE OF NEW RIGHTS CERTIFICATES. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this Agreement or of the Rights to the contrary, the Company may, at its option, issue new Rights Certificates evidencing Rights in such form as may be approved by the Board to reflect any adjustment or change in the Purchase Price and the number or kind or class of shares or other securities or property purchasable under the Rights Certificates made in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement. Section 23. REDEMPTION. (a) The Board may, at its option, at any time prior to the earlier of (i) the close of business on the tenth Business Day (or such later date as may be determined by the Board pursuant to clause (i) of the first sentence of Section 3(a) with respect to the Distribution Date) following the Stock Acquisition Date (or, if the Stock Acquisition Date shall have occurred prior to the Record Date, the close of business on the tenth Business Day following the Record Date) and (ii) the Final Expiration Date, redeem all but not less than all the then outstanding Rights at a redemption price of $0.001 per Right, as such amount may be appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock split, stock dividend or similar transaction occurring after the date hereof (such redemption price being hereinafter referred to as the "Redemption Price"). The redemption of the Rights by the Board may be made effective at such time, on such basis and with such conditions as the Board in its sole discretion may establish. The Company may, at its option, pay the Redemption Price in cash, shares of Common Stock (based on the "current market price," as defined in Section 11(d)(i) hereof, of the Common Stock at the time of redemption) or any other form of consideration, or any combination of any of the foregoing, deemed appropriate by the Board. Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights shall not be exercisable after the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event until such time as the Company's right of redemption hereunder has expired. (b) Immediately upon the action of the Board ordering the redemption of the Rights, evidence of which shall have been filed with the Rights Agent and without any further action and without any notice, the right to exercise the Rights shall terminate and the only right thereafter of the holders of Rights shall be to receive the Redemption Price for each Right so held. Promptly after the action of the Board ordering the redemption of the Rights, the Company shall give notice of such redemption to the Rights Agent and the holders of the then outstanding Rights by mailing such notice to all such holders at each holder's last address as it appears upon the registry books of the Rights Agent or, prior to the Distribution Date, on the registry books of the Transfer Agent for the Common Stock. Any notice which is mailed in the manner herein provided shall be deemed given, whether or not the holder receives the notice. Each such notice -31-
of redemption will state the method by which the payment of the Redemption Price will be made. (c) In the event of a redemption of the Rights in accordance with this Agreement, the Company may, at its option, discharge all of its obligations with respect to the Rights by (i) issuing a press release announcing the manner of redemption of the Rights in accordance with this Agreement and (ii) mailing payment of the Redemption Price to the registered holders of the Rights at their last addresses as they appear on the registry books of the Rights Agent or, prior to the Distribution Date, on the registry books of the Transfer Agent of the Common Stock, and upon such action, all outstanding Rights and Right Certificates shall be null and void without any further action by the Company. Section 24. EXCHANGE. (a) The Board may, at its option, at any time after a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, exchange all or part of the then outstanding and exercisable Rights (which (i) shall not include Rights that have become void pursuant to the provisions of Section 7(e) hereof, and (ii) shall include, without limitation, any Rights issued after the Distribution Date) for shares of Common Stock at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock per Right, appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock split, stock dividend or similar transaction occurring after the date hereof (such exchange ratio being hereinafter referred to as the "Exchange Ratio"). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Board shall not be empowered to effect such exchange at any time after any Person (other than the Company, any Subsidiary of the Company, any employee benefit plan of the Company or any such Subsidiary, or any entity holding Common Stock for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan), together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, becomes the Beneficial Owner of 50% or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding. (b) Immediately upon the action of the Board ordering the exchange of any Rights pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section 24, evidence of which shall have been filed with the Rights Agent, and without any further action and without any notice, the right to exercise such Rights shall terminate and the only right thereafter of a holder of such Rights shall be to receive that number of shares of Common Stock equal to the number of such Rights held by such holder multiplied by the Exchange Ratio. The Company shall promptly give public notice of any such exchange; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the failure to give, or any defect in, such notice shall not affect the validity of such exchange. The Company promptly shall mail a notice of any such exchange to all of the holders of such Rights at their last addresses as they appear upon the registry books of the Rights Agent. Any notice which is mailed in the manner herein provided shall be deemed given, whether or not the holder receives the notice. Each such notice of exchange shall state the method by which the exchange of shares of Common Stock for Rights will be effected and, in the event of any partial exchange, the number of Rights which will be exchanged. Any partial exchange shall be effected pro rata based on the number of Rights (other than Rights which have become void pursuant to the provisions of Section 7(e) hereof) held by each holder of Rights. (c) In any exchange pursuant to this Section 24, the Company, at its option, may substitute Preferred Stock (or equivalent preferred stock, as such term is defined in Section 11(b) -32-
hereof) for shares of Common Stock exchangeable for Rights, at the initial rate of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (or equivalent preferred stock) for each share of Common Stock, as appropriately adjusted to reflect adjustments in the voting rights of the Preferred Stock pursuant to Section 3(A) of the Certificate of Designations attached hereto as EXHIBIT A, so that the fraction of a share of Preferred Stock (or equivalent preferred stock) delivered in lieu of each share of Common Stock shall have the same voting rights as one share of Common Stock. (d) In the event that there shall not be sufficient shares of Common Stock or Preferred Stock issued but not outstanding or authorized but unissued to permit any exchange of Rights as contemplated in accordance with this Section 24, the Company shall take all such action as may be necessary to authorize additional shares of Common Stock or Preferred Stock for issuance upon exchange of the Rights. (e) The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Common Stock or to distribute certificates which evidence fractional shares of Common Stock. In lieu of such fractional shares of Common Stock, there shall be paid to the registered holders of the Right Certificates with regard to which such fractional shares of Common Stock would otherwise be issuable, an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of a whole share of Common Stock. For the purposes of this subsection (e), the current market value of a whole share of Common Stock shall be the closing price per share of Common Stock (as determined pursuant to the second sentence of Section 11(d)(i) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of exchange pursuant to this Section 24. Section 25. NOTICE OF CERTAIN EVENTS. (a) In case the Company shall propose, at any time after the Distribution Date, (i) to pay any dividend payable in stock of any class to the holders of Preferred Stock or to make any other distribution to the holders of Preferred Stock (other than a regular quarterly cash dividend out of earnings or retained earnings of the Company), or (ii) to offer to the holders of Preferred Stock rights or warrants to subscribe for or to purchase any additional shares of Preferred Stock or shares of stock of any class or any other securities, rights or options, or (iii) to effect any reclassification of its Preferred Stock (other than a reclassification involving only the subdivision of outstanding shares of Preferred Stock), or (iv) to effect any consolidation or merger into or with any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), or to effect any sale or other transfer (or to permit one or more of its Subsidiaries to effect any sale or other transfer), in one transaction or a series of related transactions, of more than 50% of the assets or earning power of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to any other Person or Persons (other than the Company and/or any of its Subsidiaries in one or more transactions each of which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), or (v) to effect the liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company, then, in each such case, the Company shall give to each holder of a Rights Certificate, to the extent feasible and in accordance with Section 26 hereof, a notice of such proposed action, which shall specify the record date for the purposes of such stock dividend, distribution of rights or warrants, or the date on which such reclassification, consolidation, merger, sale, transfer, liquidation, dissolution, -33-
or winding up is to take place and the date of participation therein by the holders of the shares of Preferred Stock, if any such date is to be fixed, and such notice shall be so given in the case of any action covered by clause (i) or (ii) above at least twenty (20) days prior to the record date for determining holders of the shares of Preferred Stock for purposes of such action, and in the case of any such other action, at least twenty (20) days prior to the date of the taking of such proposed action or the date of participation therein by the holders of the shares of Preferred Stock, whichever shall be the earlier. (b) In case a Section 11(a)(ii) Event shall occur, then, in any such case, (i) the Company shall as soon as practicable thereafter give to each holder of a Rights Certificate, to the extent feasible and in accordance with Section 26 hereof, a notice of the occurrence of such event, which shall specify the event and the consequences of the event to holders of Rights under Section 11(a)(ii) hereof, and (ii) all references in the preceding paragraph to Preferred Stock shall be deemed thereafter to refer also to Common Stock and/or, if appropriate, other securities; provided that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such consent. Section 26. NOTICES. Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Rights Agent or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Company shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Rights Agent) as follows: Akamai Technologies, Inc. 500 Technology Square Cambridge, MA 02139 Attention: Chief Executive Officer with a copy to: Hale and Dorr LLP 60 State Street Boston, MA 02109 Attention: Susan W. Murley, Esq. Subject to the provisions of Section 21, any notice or demand authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or by the holder of any Rights Certificate to or on the Rights Agent shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Company) as follows: EquiServe Trust Company, N.A. 150 Royall Street Canton, MA 02021 Attention: Client Administration Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or the Rights Agent to the holder of any Rights Certificate (or, if prior to the Distribution Date, to the holder of certificates representing shares of Common Stock) shall be sufficiently given or made -34-
if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to such holder at the address of such holder as shown on the registry books of the Company. Section 27. SUPPLEMENTS AND AMENDMENTS. Except as provided in the penultimate sentence of this Section 27, for so long as the Rights are then redeemable, the Company may, in its sole and absolute discretion, and the Rights Agent shall, if the Company so directs, supplement or amend any provision of this Agreement in any respect without the approval of any holders of the Rights. At any time when the Rights are no longer redeemable, except as provided in the penultimate sentence of this Section 27, the Company may, by approval of at least 75% of the members of the Board, and the Rights Agent shall, if the Company so directs, supplement or amend this Agreement without the approval of any holders of Rights in order (i) to cure any ambiguity or (ii) to correct or supplement any provision contained herein which may be defective or inconsistent with any other provisions herein, provided that no such supplement or amendment shall adversely affect the interests of the holders of Rights as such (other than an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person). Upon the delivery of a certificate from an appropriate officer of the Company which states that the proposed supplement or amendment is in compliance with the terms of this Section 27, the Rights Agent shall execute such supplement or amendment. Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, no supplement or amendment shall be made which changes the Redemption Price. Prior to the Distribution Date, the interests of the holders of Rights shall be deemed coincident with the interests of the holders of Common Stock. Section 28. SUCCESSORS. All the covenants and provisions of this Agreement by or for the benefit of the Company or the Rights Agent shall bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns hereunder. Section 29. ACTIONS BY THE BOARD, ETC. The Board shall have the exclusive power and authority to administer this Agreement and to exercise all rights and powers specifically granted to the Board or to the Company, or as may be necessary or advisable in the administration of this Agreement, including, without limitation, the right and power to (i) interpret the provisions of this Agreement, and (ii) make all determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of this Agreement (including a determination to redeem or not redeem the Rights or to amend this Agreement). All such actions, calculations, interpretations and determinations (including, for purposes of clause (y) below, all omissions with respect to the foregoing) which are done or made by the Board in good faith, shall (x) be final, conclusive and binding on the Company, the Rights Agent, the holders of the Rights and all other parties, and (y) not subject the Board to any liability to the holders of the Rights. Section 30. BENEFITS OF THIS AGREEMENT. Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to give to any Person other than the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, registered holders of the Common Stock) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Agreement; but this Agreement shall be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Rights Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, registered holders of the Common Stock). -35-
Section 31. SEVERABILITY. If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Agreement is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated; provided, however, that notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, if any such term, provision, covenant or restriction is held by such court or authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable and the Board determines in its good faith judgment that severing the invalid, void or unenforceable language from this Agreement would adversely affect the purpose or effect of this Agreement, the right of redemption set forth in Section 23 hereof shall be reinstated and shall not expire until the close of business on the tenth day following the date of such determination by the Board. Section 32. GOVERNING LAW. This Agreement, each Right and each Rights Certificate issued hereunder shall be deemed to be a contract made under the laws of the State of Delaware and for all purposes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of Delaware applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within Delaware. Section 33. COUNTERPARTS. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and each of such counterparts shall for all purposes be deemed to be an original, and all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument. Section 34. DESCRIPTIVE HEADINGS. Descriptive headings of the several Sections of this Agreement are inserted for convenience only and shall not control or affect the meaning or construction of any of the provisions hereof. -36-
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed and their respective corporate seals to be hereunto affixed and attested, all as of the day and year first above written. Attest: AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: /s/ Kathryn J. Meyer By: /s/ Paul Sagan ----------------------------- ------------------------------------ Name: Kathryn J. Meyer Name: Paul Sagan -------------------------- ---------------------------------- Title: VP, General Counsel Title: President ------------------------- --------------------------------- Attest: EQUISERVE TRUST COMPANY, N.A. By: /s/ Paula Gill By: /s/ Margaret Prentice ----------------------------- ------------------------------------ Name: Paula Gill Name: Margaret Prentice -------------------------- ---------------------------------- Title: Account Manager Title: Managing Director ------------------------- --------------------------------- -37-
FORM OF CERTIFICATE OF DESIGNATIONS OF SERIES A JUNIOR PARTICIPATING PREFERRED STOCK OF AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. ------------------------------ Akamai Technologies, Inc., a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (hereinafter called the "Corporation"), hereby certifies that the following resolution was adopted by the Board of Directors of the Corporation at a meeting duly called and held on September 10, 2002: RESOLVED: That pursuant to the authority granted to and vested in the Board of Directors of the Corporation (hereinafter called the "Board") in accordance with the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, the Board hereby creates a series of Preferred Stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Preferred Stock"), of the Corporation and hereby states the designation and number of shares, and fixes the relative rights, preferences and limitations thereof as follows: SERIES A JUNIOR PARTICIPATING PREFERRED STOCK: Section 1. DESIGNATION AND AMOUNT. The shares of such series shall be designated as "Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock" (the "Series A Preferred Stock") and the number of shares constituting the Series A Preferred Stock shall be seven hundred thousand (700,000). Such number of shares may be increased or decreased by resolution of the Board prior to issuance; provided, that no decrease shall reduce the number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock to a number less than the number of shares then outstanding plus the number of shares reserved for issuance upon the exercise of outstanding options, rights or warrants or upon the conversion of any outstanding securities issued by the Corporation convertible into Series A Preferred Stock. Section 2. DIVIDENDS AND DISTRIBUTIONS. (A) Subject to the rights of the holders of any shares of any series of Preferred Stock (or any similar stock) ranking prior and superior to the Series A Preferred Stock with respect to dividends, the holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock, in preference to the holders of Common Stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Common Stock"), of the Corporation, and of any other junior stock, shall be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board out of funds A-1
of the Corporation legally available for the payment of dividends, quarterly dividends payable in cash on the last day of each fiscal quarter of the Corporation in each year (each such date being referred to herein as a "Quarterly Dividend Payment Date"), commencing on the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date after the first issuance of a share or fraction of a share of Series A Preferred Stock, in an amount per share (rounded to the nearest cent) equal to the greater of (a) $10 or (b) subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, 1000 times the aggregate per share amount of all cash dividends, and 1000 times the aggregate per share amount (payable in kind) of all non-cash dividends or other distributions, other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock or a subdivision of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise), declared on the Common Stock since the immediately preceding Quarterly Dividend Payment Date or, with respect to the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, since the first issuance of any share or fraction of a share of Series A Preferred Stock. In the event the Corporation shall at any time declare or pay any dividend on the Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, or effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of a dividend in shares of Common Stock) into a greater or lesser number of shares of Common Stock, then in each such case the amount to which holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event under clause (b) of the preceding sentence shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event. In the event the Corporation shall at any time declare or pay any dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock payable in shares of Series A Preferred Stock, or effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the outstanding shares of Series A Preferred Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of a dividend in shares of Series A Preferred Stock) into a greater or lesser number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock, then in each such case the amount to which holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event under clause (b) of the first sentence of this Section 2(A) shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock outstanding immediately after such event. (B) The Corporation shall declare a dividend or distribution on the Series A Preferred Stock as provided in paragraph (A) of this Section immediately after it declares a dividend or distribution on the Common Stock (other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock) and the Corporation shall pay such dividend or distribution on the Series A Preferred Stock before the dividend or distribution declared on the Common Stock is paid or set apart; provided that, in the event no dividend or distribution shall have been declared on the Common Stock during the period between any Quarterly Dividend Payment Date and the next subsequent Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, a dividend of $10 per share on the Series A Preferred Stock shall nevertheless be payable on such subsequent Quarterly Dividend Payment Date. (C) Dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative on outstanding shares of Series A Preferred Stock from the Quarterly Dividend Payment Date next preceding the date of A-2
issue of such shares, unless the date of issue of such shares is prior to the record date for the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in which case dividends on such shares shall begin to accrue from the date of issue of such shares, or unless the date of issue is a Quarterly Dividend Payment Date or is a date after the record date for the determination of holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock entitled to receive a quarterly dividend and before such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in either of which events such dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative from such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date. Accrued but unpaid dividends shall not bear interest. Dividends paid on the shares of Series A Preferred Stock in an amount less than the total amount of such dividends at the time accrued and payable on such shares shall be allocated pro rata on a share-by-share basis among all such shares at the time outstanding. The Board may fix a record date for the determination of holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock entitled to receive payment of a dividend or distribution declared thereon, which record date shall be not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for the payment thereof. Section 3. VOTING RIGHTS. The holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock shall have the following voting rights: (A) Subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, each share of Series A Preferred Stock shall entitle the holder thereof to 1000 votes on all matters submitted to a vote of the stockholders of the Corporation. In the event the Corporation shall at any time declare or pay any dividend on the Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, or effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of a dividend in shares of Common Stock) into a greater or lesser number of shares of Common Stock, then in each such case the number of votes per share to which holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event shall be adjusted by multiplying such number by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event. In the event the Corporation shall at any time declare or pay any dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock payable in shares of Series A Preferred Stock, or effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the outstanding shares of Series A Preferred Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of a dividend in shares of Series A Preferred Stock) into a greater or lesser number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock, then in each such case the number of votes per share to which holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock outstanding immediately after such event. (B) Except as otherwise provided herein, in the Certificate of Incorporation or by law, the holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock and the holders of shares of Common Stock and any other capital stock of the Corporation having general voting rights shall vote together as one class on all matters submitted to a vote of stockholders of the Corporation. A-3
(C) (i) If at any time dividends on any Series A Preferred Stock shall be in arrears in an amount equal to six quarterly dividends thereon, the holders of the Series A Preferred Stock, voting as a separate series from all other series of Preferred Stock and classes of capital stock, shall be entitled to elect two members of the Board in addition to any Directors elected by any other series, class or classes of securities and the authorized number of Directors will automatically be increased by two. Promptly thereafter, the Board of the Corporation shall, as soon as may be practicable, call a special meeting of holders of Series A Preferred Stock for the purpose of electing such members of the Board. Such special meeting shall in any event be held within 45 days of the occurrence of such arrearage. (ii) During any period when the holders of Series A Preferred Stock, voting as a separate series, shall be entitled and shall have exercised their right to elect two Directors, then, and during such time as such right continues, (a) the then authorized number of Directors shall be increased by two, and the holders of Series A Preferred Stock, voting as a separate series, shall be entitled to elect the additional Directors so provided for, and (b) each such additional Director shall not be a member of any existing class of the Board, but shall serve until the next annual meeting of stockholders for the election of Directors, or until his successor shall be elected and shall qualify, or until his right to hold such office terminates pursuant to the provisions of this Section 3(C). (iii) A Director elected pursuant to the terms hereof may be removed with or without cause by the holders of Series A Preferred Stock entitled to vote in an election of such Director. (iv) If, during any interval between annual meetings of stockholders for the election of Directors and while the holders of Series A Preferred Stock shall be entitled to elect two Directors, there is no such Director in office by reason of resignation, death or removal, then, promptly thereafter, the Board shall call a special meeting of the holders of Series A Preferred Stock for the purpose of filling such vacancy and such vacancy shall be filled at such special meeting. Such special meeting shall in any event be held within 45 days of the occurrence of such vacancy. (v) At such time as the arrearage is fully cured, and all dividends accumulated and unpaid on any shares of Series A Preferred Stock outstanding are paid, and, in addition thereto, at least one regular dividend has been paid subsequent to curing such arrearage, the term of office of any Director elected pursuant to this Section 3(C), or his successor, shall automatically terminate, and the authorized number of Directors shall automatically decrease by two, the rights of the holders of the shares of the Series A Preferred Stock to vote as provided in this Section 3(C) shall cease, subject to renewal from time to time upon the same terms and conditions, and the holders of shares of the Series A Preferred Stock shall have only the limited voting rights elsewhere herein set forth. (D) Except as set forth herein, or as otherwise provided by law, holders of Series A Preferred Stock shall have no special voting rights and their consent shall not be required (except to the extent they are entitled to vote with holders of Common Stock as set forth herein) for taking any corporate action. A-4
Section 4. CERTAIN RESTRICTIONS. (A) Whenever quarterly dividends or other dividends or distributions payable on the Series A Preferred Stock as provided in Section 2 are in arrears, thereafter and until all accrued and unpaid dividends and distributions, whether or not declared, on shares of Series A Preferred Stock outstanding shall have been paid in full, the Corporation shall not: (i) declare or pay dividends, or make any other distributions, on any shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Series A Preferred Stock; (ii) declare or pay dividends, or make any other distributions, on any shares of stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Series A Preferred Stock, except dividends paid ratably on the Series A Preferred Stock and all such parity stock on which dividends are payable or in arrears in proportion to the total amounts to which the holders of all such shares are then entitled; (iii) redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration shares of any stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Series A Preferred Stock, provided that the Corporation may at any time redeem, purchase or otherwise acquire shares of any such junior stock in exchange for shares of any stock of the Corporation ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon dissolution, liquidation or winding up) to the Series A Preferred Stock; or (iv) redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of Series A Preferred Stock, or any shares of stock ranking on a parity with the Series A Preferred Stock, except in accordance with a purchase offer made in writing or by publication (as determined by the Board) to all holders of such shares upon such terms as the Board, after consideration of the respective annual dividend rates and other relative rights and preferences of the respective series and classes, shall determine in good faith will result in fair and equitable treatment among the respective series or classes. (B) The Corporation shall not permit any subsidiary of the Corporation to purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of stock of the Corporation unless the Corporation could, under paragraph (A) of this Section 4, purchase or otherwise acquire such shares at such time and in such manner. Section 5. REACQUIRED SHARES. Any shares of Series A Preferred Stock purchased or otherwise acquired by the Corporation in any manner whatsoever shall be retired and cancelled promptly after the acquisition thereof. All such shares shall upon their cancellation become authorized but unissued shares of Preferred Stock and may be reissued as part of a new series of Preferred Stock subject to the conditions and restrictions on issuance set forth herein, in the Certificate of Incorporation, or in any other Certificate of Designations creating a series of Preferred Stock or any similar stock or as otherwise required by law. A-5
Section 6. LIQUIDATION, DISSOLUTION OR WINDING UP. (A) Upon any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, no distribution shall be made (1) to the holders of shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Series A Preferred Stock unless, prior thereto, the holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock shall have received $1000 per share, plus an amount equal to accrued and unpaid dividends and distributions thereon, whether or not declared, to the date of such payment, provided that the holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock shall be entitled to receive an aggregate amount per share, subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, equal to 1000 times the aggregate amount to be distributed per share to holders of shares of Common Stock, or (2) to the holders of shares of stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Series A Preferred Stock, except distributions made ratably on the Series A Preferred Stock and all such parity stock in proportion to the total amounts to which the holders of all such shares are entitled upon such liquidation, dissolution or winding up. (B) Neither the consolidation, merger or other business combination of the Corporation with or into any other corporation nor the sale, lease, exchange or conveyance of all or any part of the property, assets or business of the Corporation shall be deemed to be a liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation for purposes of this Section 6. (C) In the event the Corporation shall at any time declare or pay any dividend on the Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, or effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of a dividend in shares of Common Stock) into a greater or lesser number of shares of Common Stock, then in each such case the aggregate amount to which holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event under the proviso in clause (1) of paragraph (A) of this Section 6 shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event. In the event the Corporation shall at any time declare or pay any dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock payable in shares of Series A Preferred Stock, or effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the outstanding shares of Series A Preferred Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of a dividend in shares of Series A Preferred Stock) into a greater or lesser number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock, then in each such case the aggregate amount to which holders of shares of Series A Preferred Stock were entitled immediately prior to such event under the proviso in clause (1) of paragraph (A) of this Section 6 shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock outstanding immediately after such event. Section 7. CONSOLIDATION, MERGER, ETC. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, in case the Corporation shall enter into any consolidation, merger, combination or other transaction in which the shares of Common Stock are exchanged for or changed into A-6
other stock or securities, cash and/or any other property, then in any such case each share of Series A Preferred Stock shall at the same time be similarly exchanged or changed into an amount per share, subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, equal to 1,000 times the aggregate amount of stock, securities, cash and/or any other property (payable in kind), as the case may be, into which or for which each share of Common Stock is changed or exchanged. In the event the Corporation shall at any time declare or pay any dividend on the Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, or effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of a dividend in shares of Common Stock) into a greater or lesser number of shares of Common Stock, then in each such case the amount set forth in the preceding sentence with respect to the exchange or change of shares of Series A Preferred Stock shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event. In the event the Corporation shall at any time declare or pay any dividend on the Series A Preferred Stock payable in shares of Series A Preferred Stock, or effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the outstanding shares of Series A Preferred Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of a dividend in shares of Series A Preferred Stock) into a greater or lesser number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock, then in each such case the amount set forth in the first sentence of this Section 7 with respect to the exchange or change of shares of Series A Preferred Stock shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock outstanding immediately after such event. Section 8. NO REDEMPTION. The shares of Series A Preferred Stock shall not be redeemable. Section 9. RANK. The Series A Preferred Stock shall rank, with respect to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets, junior to all series of any other class of the Preferred Stock issued either before or after the issuance of the Series A Preferred Stock, unless the terms of any such series shall provide otherwise. Section 10. AMENDMENT. At such time as any shares of Series A Preferred Stock are outstanding, the Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, of the Corporation shall not be amended in any manner which would materially alter or change the powers, preferences or special rights of the Series A Preferred Stock so as to affect them adversely without the affirmative vote of the holders of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of Series A Preferred Stock, voting together as a single class. Section 11. FRACTIONAL SHARES. Series A Preferred Stock may be issued in fractions of a share which shall entitle the holder, in proportion to such holder's fractional shares, to exercise voting rights, receive dividends, participate in distributions and have the benefit of all other rights of holders of Series A Preferred Stock. A-7
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, this Certificate of Designations is executed on behalf of the Corporation by its President this 10th day of September, 2002. AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: ------------------------------------- Name: ----------------------------------- Title: ---------------------------------- A-8
[Form of Rights Certificate] Certificate No. R- ______ Rights NOT EXERCISABLE AFTER SEPTEMBER 10, 2012 OR EARLIER IF REDEEMED OR EXCHANGED BY THE COMPANY. THE RIGHTS ARE SUBJECT TO REDEMPTION AT $.001 PER RIGHT AND TO EXCHANGE ON THE TERMS SET FORTH IN THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT. UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES, RIGHTS BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY AN ACQUIRING PERSON (AS SUCH TERM IS DEFINED IN THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT) AND ANY SUBSEQUENT HOLDER OF SUCH RIGHTS MAY BECOME NULL AND VOID. [THE RIGHTS REPRESENTED BY THIS RIGHTS CERTIFICATE ARE OR WERE BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY A PERSON WHO WAS OR BECAME AN ACQUIRING PERSON OR AN AFFILIATE OR ASSOCIATE OF AN ACQUIRING PERSON (AS SUCH TERMS ARE DEFINED IN THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT). ACCORDINGLY, THIS RIGHTS CERTIFICATE AND THE RIGHTS REPRESENTED HEREBY MAY BECOME NULL AND VOID IN THE CIRCUMSTANCES SPECIFIED IN SECTION 7(e) OF SUCH AGREEMENT.]* Akamai Technologies, Inc. Rights Certificate This certifies that ____________, or registered assigns, is the registered owner of the number of Rights set forth above, each of which entitles the owner thereof, subject to the terms, provisions and conditions of the Rights Agreement, dated September 10, 2002 (the "Rights Agreement"), between Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A. (the "Rights Agent"), to purchase from the Company after the Distribution Date (as such term is defined in the Rights Agreement) and at any time prior to 5:00 p.m. (Boston time) on September 10, 2012 at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, or its successors as Rights Agent, one one-thousandth of a fully paid, non-assessable share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock (the "Preferred Stock") of the Company, $0.01 par value per share, at a purchase price of $9.00 in cash per one one-thousandth of a share (the "Purchase Price"), upon presentation and surrender of this Rights Certificate with the Form of Election to Purchase and related Certificate duly executed. The number of Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate (and the number of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock which may be purchased upon exercise hereof) set forth above, and the Purchase Price set forth above, are the number and Purchase Price as of the close of business on September 23, 2002, based on the Preferred Stock as constituted at such date. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms in the Rights Agreement. - -------- * The portion of the legend in brackets shall be inserted only if applicable and shall replace the preceding sentence. B-1
Upon the occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, if the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate are beneficially owned by (i) an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined in the Rights Agreement), (ii) a transferee of any such Acquiring Person, Associate or Affiliate who becomes a transferee after the Acquiring Person becomes an Acquiring Person, or (iii) under certain circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement, a transferee of a person who, concurrently with or after such transfer, became an Acquiring Person, or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person, such Rights shall become null and void and no holder hereof shall have any right with respect to such Rights from and after the occurrence of such Section 11(a)(ii) Event. As provided in the Rights Agreement, the Purchase Price and the number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or other securities which may be purchased upon the exercise of the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate are subject to modification and adjustment upon the happening of certain events, including Section 11(a)(ii) Events. This Rights Certificate is subject to all of the terms, provisions and conditions of the Rights Agreement, which terms, provisions and conditions are hereby incorporated herein by reference and made a part hereof and to which Rights Agreement reference is hereby made for a full description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities hereunder of the Rights Agent, the Company and the holders of the Rights Certificates, which limitations of rights include the temporary suspension of the exercisability of such Rights under the specific circumstances set forth in the Rights Agreement. Copies of the Rights Agreement are on file at the principal offices of the Company and are available upon written request to the Company. This Rights Certificate, with or without other Rights Certificates, upon surrender at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, with the Form of Election and Certificate set forth on the reverse side duly executed, may be exchanged for another Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates of like tenor and date evidencing Rights entitling the holder to purchase a like aggregate number of one one-thousandths of a share of Preferred Stock as the Rights evidenced by the Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates surrendered shall have entitled such holder to purchase. If this Rights Certificate shall be exercised in part, the holder shall be entitled to receive upon surrender hereof another Rights Certificate or Rights Certificates for the number of whole Rights not exercised. Subject to the provisions of the Rights Agreement, the Rights evidenced by this Certificate may be redeemed by the Company at its option at a redemption price of $.001 per Right at any time prior to the earlier of (i) the close of business on the tenth Business Day (or such later date as may be determined by the Board pursuant to clause (i) of the first sentence of Section 3(a) with respect to the Distribution Date) following the Stock Acquisition Date (or, if the Stock Acquisition Date shall have occurred prior to the Record Date, the close of business on the tenth Business Day following the Record Date) and (ii) the Final Expiration Date. Subject to the provisions of the Rights Agreement, the Company may, at its option, at any time after a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, exchange all or part of the Rights evidenced by this Certificate for shares of the Company's Common Stock or for Preferred Stock (or shares of a class or series of B-2
the Company's preferred stock having the same rights, privileges and preferences as the Preferred Stock). No fractional shares of Preferred Stock will be issued upon the exercise of any Right or Rights evidenced hereby (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock, which may, at the election of the Company, be evidenced by depositary receipts), but in lieu thereof a cash payment will be made, as provided in the Rights Agreement. No holder of this Rights Certificate, as such, shall be entitled to vote or receive dividends or be deemed for any purpose the holder of shares of Preferred Stock or of any other securities of the Company which may at any time be issuable on the exercise hereof, nor shall anything contained in the Rights Agreement or herein be construed to confer upon the holder hereof, as such, any of the rights of a stockholder of the Company or any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to stockholders at any meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action, or to receive notice of meetings or other actions affecting stockholders (except as provided in the Rights Agreement), or to receive dividends or subscription rights, or otherwise, until the Right or Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate shall have been exercised as provided in the Rights Agreement. This Rights Certificate shall not be valid or obligatory for any purpose until it shall have been countersigned by the Rights Agent. WITNESS the facsimile signature of the proper officers of the Company and its corporate seal. Dated as of _______________ ATTEST: AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: - --------------------------------- ----------------------------------- Secretary Title: -------------------------------- COUNTERSIGNED: EQUISERVE TRUST COMPANY, N.A., as Rights Agent By: ------------------------------ Authorized Signature B-3
[Form of Reverse Side of Rights Certificate] FORM OF ASSIGNMENT (To be executed by the registered holder if such holder desires to transfer the Rights Certificate.) FOR VALUE RECEIVED _____________________________________________ hereby sells, assigns and transfers unto _____________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________________ (Please print name and address of transferee) _________________________________________________________________________ this Rights Certificate, together with all right, title and interest therein, and does hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint ______________________ Attorney, to transfer the within Rights Certificate on the books of the within-named Company, with full power of substitution. Dated: ________________ ____________________________________ Signature Signature Guaranteed: Certificate The undersigned hereby certifies that the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate are not beneficially owned by, or being assigned to, an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate thereof (as such terms are defined pursuant to the Rights Agreement). Dated: ______________ ____________________________________ Signature Signature Guaranteed: NOTICE The signature to the foregoing Assignment and Certificate must correspond to the name as written upon the face of this Rights Certificate in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever. B-4
FORM OF ELECTION TO PURCHASE (To be executed if holder desires to exercise Rights represented by the Rights Certificate.) To: EquiServe Trust Company, N.A. The undersigned hereby irrevocably elects to exercise ___________ Rights represented by this Rights Certificate to purchase the shares of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of the Rights (or such other securities of the Company or of any other person which may be issuable upon the exercise of the Rights) and requests that certificates for such shares be issued in the name of and delivered to: Please insert social security or other identifying number __________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________________ (Please print name and address) ________________________________________________________________________________ If such number of Rights shall not be all the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate, a new Rights Certificate for the balance of such Rights shall be registered in the name of and delivered to: Please insert social security or other identifying number __________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________________ (Please print name and address) ________________________________________________________________________________ Dated: ______________ ______________________________________ Signature Signature Guaranteed: B-5
Certificate The undersigned hereby certifies by checking the appropriate boxes that: (1) the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate [ ] are [ ] are not being exercised by or on behalf of a Person who is or was an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate thereof (as such terms are defined pursuant to the Rights Agreement); (2) after due inquiry and to the best knowledge of the undersigned, the undersigned [ ] did [ ] did not acquire the Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate from any Person who is, was or became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate thereof. Dated: _______________ ______________________________________ Signature Signature Guaranteed: NOTICE The signature to the foregoing Election to Purchase and Certificate must correspond to the name as written upon the face of this Rights Certificate in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever. B-6
SUMMARY OF RIGHTS TO PURCHASE PREFERRED STOCK On September 10, 2002, the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company"), declared a dividend of one preferred stock purchase right (collectively, the "Rights") for each outstanding share of the Company's common stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Common Stock") to stockholders of record at the close of business on September 23, 2002 (the "Record Date"). Each Right entitles the registered holder to purchase from the Company one one-thousandth of a share of series A junior participating preferred stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Preferred Stock"), at a purchase price of $9.00 in cash, subject to adjustment (the "Purchase Price"). The description and terms of the Rights are set forth in a rights agreement dated September 10, 2002 (the "Rights Agreement") between the Company and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A., as Rights Agent. Initially, the Rights are not exercisable and will be attached to all certificates representing outstanding shares of Common Stock (the "Common Stock Certificates"), and no separate certificates representing the rights (the "Rights Certificates") will be distributed. The Rights will separate from the Common Stock, and the "Distribution Date" will occur, upon the earlier of (i) 10 business days following the later of (a) the first date of a public announcement that a person or group of affiliated or associated persons (an "Acquiring Person") has acquired, or obtained the right to acquire, beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock or (b) the first date on which an executive officer of the Company has actual knowledge that an Acquiring Person has become such (the "Stock Acquisition Date"), or (ii) 10 business days following the commencement of a tender offer or exchange offer that would result in a person or group beneficially owning 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock. The Distribution Date may be deferred in circumstances determined by the Board of Directors. In addition, certain inadvertent acquisitions will not trigger the occurrence of the Distribution Date. Until the Distribution Date (or earlier redemption or expiration of the Rights), (i) the Rights will be evidenced by the Common Stock Certificates outstanding on the Record Date, together with this Summary of Rights, or by new Common Stock Certificates issued after the Record Date which contain a notation incorporating the Rights Agreement by reference, (ii) the Rights will be transferred with and only with such Common Stock Certificates; and (iii) the surrender for transfer of any certificates for Common Stock outstanding (with or without a copy of this Summary of Rights or such notation) will also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificate. The Rights are not exercisable until the Distribution Date and will expire upon the close of business on September 10, 2012 (the "Final Expiration Date") unless earlier redeemed or exchanged as described below. As soon as practicable after the Distribution Date, separate Rights Certificates will be mailed to holders of record of the Common Stock as of the close of business on the Distribution Date and, thereafter, the separate Rights Certificates alone will represent the Rights. Except as otherwise determined by the Board of Directors, and except for shares of Common Stock issued upon exercise, conversion or exchange of then outstanding options, convertible or exchangeable securities or other contingent obligations to issue shares or C-1
pursuant to any employee benefit plan or arrangement, only shares of Common Stock issued prior to the Distribution Date will be issued with Rights. In the event that any Person becomes an Acquiring Person, unless the event causing the 15% threshold to be crossed is a Permitted Offer (as defined in the Rights Agreement), then, promptly following the first occurrence of such event, each holder of a Right (except as provided below and in Section 7(e) of the Rights Agreement) shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon exercise, that number of shares of Common Stock of the Company (or, in certain circumstances, cash, property or other securities of the Company) which equals the exercise price of the Right divided by 50% of the Current Market Price (as defined in the Rights Agreement) per share of Common Stock at the date of the occurrence of such event. However, Rights are not exercisable following such event until such time as the Rights are no longer redeemable by the Company as described below. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, following the occurrence of such event, all Rights that are, or (under certain circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement) were, beneficially owned by any Acquiring Person will be null and void. The event summarized in this paragraph is referred to as a "Section 11(a)(ii) Event." For example, at an exercise price of $9 per Right, each Right not owned by an Acquiring Person (or by certain related parties) following a Section 11(a)(ii) Event would entitle its holder to purchase for $9 such number of shares of Common Stock (or other consideration, as noted above) as equals $9 divided by one-half of the Current Market Price of the Common Stock. Assuming that the Common Stock had a market price of $4.50 per share at such time, the holder of each valid Right would be entitled to purchase four shares of Common Stock, having a market value of 4 x $4.50, or $18, for $9. In the event that, at any time after any Person becomes an Acquiring Person, (i) the Company is consolidated with, or merged with and into, another entity and the Company is not the surviving entity of such consolidation or merger (other than a consolidation or merger which follows a Permitted Offer) or if the Company is the surviving entity, but shares of its outstanding Common Stock are changed or exchanged for stock or securities (of any other person) or cash or any other property, or (ii) more than 50% of the Company's assets or earning power is sold or transferred, each holder of a Right (except Rights which previously have been voided as set forth above) shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon exercise, that number of shares of common stock of the acquiring company which equals the exercise price of the Right divided by 50% of the current market price (as defined in the Rights Agreement) of such common stock at the date of the occurrence of the event. The events summarized in this paragraph are referred to as "Section 13 Events." A Section 11(a)(ii) Event and Section 13 Events are collectively referred to as "Triggering Events." For example, at an exercise price of $9 per Right, each valid Right following a Section 13 Event would entitle its holder to purchase for $9 such number of shares of common stock of the acquiring company as equals $9 divided by one-half of the current market price (as defined in the Rights Agreement) of such common stock. Assuming that such common stock had a market price of $4.50 per share at such time, the holder of each valid Right would be entitled to purchase C-2
four shares of common stock of the acquiring company, having a market value of 4 x $4.50, or $18, for $9. At any time after the occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) Event, when no person owns a majority of the Common Stock, the Board of Directors of the Company may exchange the Rights (other than Rights owned by such Acquiring Person which have become void), in whole or in part, at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock, or one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock (or of a share of a class or series of the Company's preferred stock having equivalent rights, preferences and privileges), per Right (subject to adjustment). The Purchase Price payable, and the number of units of Preferred Stock or other securities or property issuable, upon exercise of the Rights are subject to adjustment from time to time to prevent dilution (i) in the event of a stock dividend on, or a subdivision, combination or reclassification of, the Preferred Stock, (ii) if holders of the Preferred Stock are granted certain rights or warrants to subscribe for Preferred Stock or convertible securities at less than the then-current market price (as defined in the Rights Agreement) of the Preferred Stock, or (iii) upon the distribution to holders of the Preferred Stock of evidences of indebtedness or assets (excluding regular periodic cash dividends paid out of earnings or retained earnings) or of subscription rights or warrants (other than those referred to above). The number of Rights associated with each share of Common Stock is also subject to adjustment in the event of a stock split of the Common Stock or a stock dividend on the Common Stock payable in Common Stock or subdivisions, consolidations or combinations of the Common Stock occurring, in any such case, prior to the Distribution Date. With certain exceptions, no adjustment in the Purchase Price will be required until cumulative adjustments amount to at least 1% of the Purchase Price. No fractional shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock) will be issued and, in lieu thereof, an adjustment in cash will be made based on the market price of the Preferred Stock on the last trading date prior to the date of exercise. Preferred Stock purchasable upon exercise of the Rights will not be redeemable. Each share of Preferred Stock will be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors, a minimum preferential quarterly dividend payment of $10 per share or, if greater, an aggregate dividend of 1000 times the dividend declared per share of Common Stock. In the event of liquidation, the holders of the Preferred Stock will be entitled to a minimum preferential liquidation payment of $1000 per share, plus an amount equal to accrued and unpaid dividends, and will be entitled to an aggregate payment of 1000 times the payment made per share of Common Stock. Each share of Preferred Stock will have 1000 votes, voting together with the Common Stock. In the event of any merger, consolidation or other transaction in which Common Stock is changed or exchanged, each share of Preferred Stock will be entitled to receive 1000 times the amount received per share of Common Stock. These rights are protected by customary antidilution provisions. Because of the nature of the Preferred Stock's dividend, liquidation and voting rights, the value of one one-thousandth of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable upon exercise of each Right should approximate the value of one share of Common Stock. C-3
At any time prior to the earlier of the tenth Business Day (or such later date as may be determined by the Board of Directors of the Company) after the Stock Acquisition Date, the Company may redeem the Rights in whole, but not in part, at a price of $0.001 per Right (the "Redemption Price"), payable in cash or stock. Immediately upon the redemption of the Rights or such earlier time as established by the Board in the resolution ordering the redemption of the Rights, the Rights will terminate and the only right of the holders of Rights will be to receive the Redemption Price. The Rights may also be redeemable following certain other circumstances specified in the Rights Agreement. Until a Right is exercised, the holder thereof, as such, will have no rights as a stockholder of the Company, including, without limitation, the right to vote or to receive dividends. Although the distribution of the Rights should not be taxable to stockholders or to the Company, stockholders may, depending upon the circumstances, recognize taxable income in the event that the Rights become exercisable for Common Stock (or other consideration) of the Company or for common stock of the acquiring company as set forth above. Any provision of the Rights Agreement, other than the redemption price, may be amended by the Board prior to such time as the Rights are no longer redeemable. Once the Rights are no longer redeemable, the Board's authority to amend the Rights is limited to correcting ambiguities or defective or inconsistent provisions in a manner that does not adversely affect the interest of holders of Rights. The Rights are intended to protect the stockholders of the Company in the event of an unfair or coercive offer to acquire the Company and to provide the Board with adequate time to evaluate unsolicited offers. The Rights may have anti-takeover effects. The Rights will cause substantial dilution to a person or group that attempts to acquire the Company without conditioning the offer on a substantial number of Rights being acquired. The Rights, however, should not affect any prospective offeror willing to make an offer at a fair price and otherwise in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders, as determined by a majority of the Board. The Rights should not interfere with any merger or other business combination approved by the Board. A copy of the Rights Agreement has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission as an Exhibit to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K dated September 11, 2002. A copy of the Rights Agreement is available free of charge from the Company. This summary description of the Rights does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Rights Agreement, which is incorporated herein by reference. C-4

EXHIBIT 99.1 FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE CONTACTS: Jeff Young J.C. Raby Media Relations Investor Relations Akamai Technologies Akamai Technologies 617-444-3913 --or-- 617-444-2555 jyoung@akamai.com jraby@akamai.com AKAMAI ADOPTS SHAREHOLDER RIGHTS PLAN CAMBRIDGE, Mass., September 10, 2002 - Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NasdaqSC: AKAM) today announced that its Board of Directors has adopted a shareholder rights plan designed to ensure that all Akamai shareholders receive fair and equal treatment in the event of an unsolicited takeover proposal. The plan is intended to safeguard against abusive takeover tactics that limit the ability of all shareholders to realize the long-term value of their investment in Akamai. Akamai's shareholder rights plan is similar to plans adopted by many other publicly-traded companies, and was not adopted in response to any current effort to acquire control of the company. Under the rights plan, each holder of Akamai common stock as of the close of business on September 23, 2002, will receive one right for each share of common stock held. The rights will automatically trade with the underlying common stock and will not be exercisable. Unless the following type of transaction was approved by Akamai's Board of Directors, the rights will become exercisable upon the earlier to occur of (a) ten business days after the later of the first public announcement that a person has acquired beneficial ownership of 15% or more of Akamai's common stock or the first date on which an executive officer of Akamai has actual knowledge that a person has acquired beneficial ownership of 15% or more of Akamai's common stock or (b) ten business days following the commencement of a tender offer or exchange offer by a person for 15% or more of Akamai's common stock. If the rights become exercisable, the type and amount of securities receivable upon exercise of the rights would depend on the circumstances at the time of exercise. Initially, each right would entitle holders to purchase one one-thousandth of a share of Akamai's newly created Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock at an exercise price of $9.00. If a person acquires 15 percent or more of Akamai's common stock in a transaction that was not approved by Akamai's Board of Directors, each right, other than those owned by the acquiring person, would instead entitle the holder to purchase $18.00 worth of Akamai's common stock for the $9.00 exercise price. If Akamai is involved in a merger or other transaction with another company that is not approved by Akamai's Board of Directors, in which Akamai is not the surviving corporation, or which transfers more than 50 percent of Akamai's assets to another company, then each right, other than those owned by the acquiring person, would instead entitle the holder to purchase $18.00 worth of the acquiring company's common stock for the $9.00 exercise price. -more-
Akamai/2 Akamai's Board of Directors may redeem the rights for $0.001 per right at any time until ten business days after a person acquires 15 percent or more of Akamai's common stock, or on the date on which any executive officer of Akamai has actual knowledge of such acquisition, whichever is later. Unless the rights are redeemed or exchanged earlier, they will expire on September 10, 2012. A summary of the rights plan will be included in a Form 8-K to be filed by Akamai with the SEC and will also be mailed to shareholders of record of Akamai's common stock shortly after the September 23, 2002 record date. ABOUT AKAMAI Akamai is the leading provider of edge computing solutions, delivering secure content and distributed applications across the Internet, intranets, and extranets. These solutions enable customers to achieve optimal results from their e-business initiatives, thereby reducing the cost of ownership, improving return on investment, and creating new revenue streams. Akamai's globally distributed edge computing platform comprises more than 12,900 servers in more than 1,000 networks in 66 countries, ensuring the highest levels of availability, reliability, and performance. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai provides services and world-class customer care to hundreds of successful enterprises, government entities, and leading e-businesses worldwide. For more information, visit www.akamai.com. # # # AKAMAI STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements with respect to the distribution of the summary of the rights plan to shareholders of record. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, the timing of notices to be delivered in connection with the rights plan, the dependence on Akamai's Internet content delivery service, a failure of its network infrastructure, the complexity of its service and the networks on which the service is deployed, the failure to obtain access to transmission capacity, Akamai's ability to protect its intellectual property rights and inventions from third party challenges and other factors that are discussed in Akamai's Annual Report on Form 10-K and other documents periodically filed with the SEC. (C)2002 Akamai Technologies, Inc.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20030313170111.txt.gz
TIME:20030313170111
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 5. Other Events.
     On February 28, 2003, we settled a lawsuit filed against us in June 2001 by a former employee alleging breach of contract. Under the terms of the settlement, we agreed to make a $3.55 million payment, of which $1.75 million will be reimbursed by our insurance carriers. We have recorded the net amount of $1.8 million as general and administrative expenses, increased other current assets by $1.75 million and increased accrued expenses by $3.55 million as of December 31, 2002.
     On January 28, 2003, we issued a press release that included our unaudited condensed consolidated statement of operations for the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2002 and unaudited condensed consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2002. On that date, we also held a telephone conference with the investing public to review those financial results during which we announced that we had positive earnings before income taxes, depreciation and amortization, or EBITDA. Subsequent to the date of the press release and the telephone conference, the parties participated in a mediation that resulted in the settlement. Accordingly, we recorded adjustments to our consolidated financial statements as of December 31, 2002. Furthermore, as a result of the adjustments above, our EBITDA was materially reduced by $1.8 million. EBITDA is, however, an unaudited financial metric that could be subject to additional adjustments over time. A revised reconciliation of net loss calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America to normalized net loss and EBITDA, giving effect only to the adjustments related to settlement of this lawsuit, is available on our web site at www.akamai.com. We are not including the information contained on our web site as part of, or incorporating by reference into, this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     Set forth below is a reconciliation from our consolidated financial statements included in our press release on January 28, 2003 to the adjusted consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20030430155452.txt.gz
TIME:20030430155452
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (Information furnished pursuant to Item 12, "Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition").
     On April 30, 2003, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2003. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     In accordance with the procedural guidance in SEC Release No. 33-8216, the information in this Form 8-K and the Exhibit attached hereto is being furnished under "Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure" rather than under "Item 12. Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition." The information shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. The information in this Form 8-K and the Exhibit attached hereto is also being furnished under "Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure."
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), a provider of services that enable the world's leading enterprises and government agencies to extend and control their e-business infrastructure, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2003. Revenue for first quarter 2003 was $36.6 million, a 3.4 percent growth quarter-to-quarter  the first sequential quarterly revenue growth in a year.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 30, 2003
Net loss, in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) for first quarter 2003 was $8.6 million, or negative $0.07 per share, compared to a net loss for the fourth quarter 2002 of $55.6 million, or negative $0.48 per share.
Normalized net loss* for first quarter 2003 was $13.3 million, or negative $0.11 per share, compared to normalized net loss for the prior quarter of $20.1 million, or negative $0.17 per share, and First Call's consensus summary net loss of $0.15 per share. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definitions.)
EBITDA* for the first quarter was $6.3 million, up from $1.3 million in the prior quarter. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definitions.)
"We believe our first quarter results clearly demonstrate the steady improvement in our underlying business fundamentals, including the benefit of our company-wide effort to grow and improve the quality of our customer base, and to operate the business on a more cost effective structure," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai.
Included in the quarterly results is the impact of agreements and anticipated agreements to restructure all of Akamai's domestic impaired lease obligations, resulting in average annual cash
 
savings of approximately $8 million from 2004 through 2010. In restructuring the agreements, Akamai expects to eliminate approximately $50 million in net long-term lease obligations by agreeing to make one time cash payments totaling $15 million, which includes $7 million of restricted cash and long-term deposits. As a result of the expected settlements, net loss for the first quarter includes a one-time benefit of $9.8 million.
"We are taking the necessary steps to align our cost structure with today's reality and to position the company to take full advantage of the expanding market opportunity for our services," said Robert Cobuzzi, chief financial officer, Akamai. "For the second consecutive quarter, we reduced the rate at which we consumed cash, ending the quarter with $109.9 million in cash and cash equivalents, restricted cash and marketable securities. As a result, including the payments we expect to make in the second quarter to restructure real estate, we believe we are well-positioned to reach our goal of generating positive free cash flow* by year end." (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definitions.)
At March 31, 2003, the Company had 117.8 million shares of common stock outstanding. At March 31, 2003, common stock outstanding and unexercised stock options and warrants totaled 133.5 million shares.
Customers
At the end of the first quarter of 2003, Akamai had 346 EdgeSuite customers under recurring contract, compared to 269 at the end of the previous quarter, and up from 187 EdgeSuite clients at the end of first quarter of 2002. New EdgeSuite customers in the first quarter included Accenture plc, Australian Broadcasting Corporation, BMW Japan, Canadian Broadcasting Corporation, Chicago Sun-Times, Cirque Du Soleil, Inc., E.W. Scripps Company, Home Office Communication Directorate (United Kingdom), John Wiley & Sons, L'Oral, Lycos Asia, Norman Data Defense, Thomson Financial, among others. Resellers accounted for approximately 24 percent of first quarter revenue, as compared to approximately 26 percent in the fourth quarter of 2002.
"The market for our services is expanding, as evidenced by the dramatic increase in EdgeSuite accounts, as well as by our growing penetration of key verticals. EdgeSuite customers grew by 77 this quarter for an increase of almost 30 percent over the prior quarter. In addition, our total recurring customer count grew four percent to 994," said Conrades.
Network
The size, scale and functionality of Akamai's underlying global network remains key to the value proposition of all Akamai services. Akamai's global network at the end of the first quarter consisted of 15,307 servers in 1,134 networks, within 68 countries. This deployment has increased from 13,622 servers in 1,135 networks within 65 countries at the end of 2002. The geographic reach and capacity of Akamai's network is unprecedented in its ability to serve the needs of enterprise customers, government agencies and major Web-centric businesses.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
The Company has historically provided financial metrics, some of which are based on GAAP and others that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes encourage the use of GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
 
Akamai defines "EBITDA" as net loss, before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, and certain gains and losses on equity investments. Akamai considers EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and provides a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend. EBITDA eliminates items which are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses and net interest expense, do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets, or vary widely from quarter to quarter, such as restructuring activities. EBITDA also eliminates depreciation expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of a capital asset's useful life. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset and are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "normalized net loss" as net loss before amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, and certain gains and losses on equity investments. Akamai considers normalized net loss to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or non-cash.
Akamai defines "Free Cash Flow" as the net change in cash and cash equivalents, restricted cash and marketable securities quarter-over-quarter. Akamai considers Free Cash Flow to be an important indicator of the Company's ability to generate cash to maintain operations, service its debt and make strategic investments.
EBITDA, Free Cash Flow and normalized net loss should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating loss, net loss, and various cash flow measures (e.g., cash used in operations), as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Reconciliation of GAAP net loss to normalized net loss and EBITDA:
(dollar amounts in thousands)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents as reported on the consolidated statements of cash flow, which are prepared in accordance with GAAP is the financial measure most directly comparable to Free Cash Flow. This measure is not accessible on a forward-looking basis because it would include estimates that cannot be reasonably forecasted. These estimates include future changes in the balance of marketable securities and restricted cash, which may be significant.
 
 
 
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at www.akamai.com in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 9421350.
About Akamai
Akamaiprovides services that enable the world's leading enterprises and government agencies to extend and control their e-business infrastructure. Having deployed the world's largest, globally-distributed computing platform, Akamai ensures the highest levels of availability, reliability, security, and performance of networked information and application delivery. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai's industry-leading services, matched with world-class customer care, are used by hundreds of successful enterprises, government entities, and Web businesses around the globe. For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by hackers or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's network infrastructure, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20030730160406.txt.gz
TIME:20030730160406
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 12. Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On July 30, 2003, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2003. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
CONTACTS: Jeff Young --or-- J.C. Raby Media Relations Investor Relations Akamai Technologies Akamai Technologies 617-444-3913 617-444-2555 jyoung@akamai.com jraby@akamai.com AKAMAI REPORTS SECOND QUARTER 2003 RESULTS - REVENUE GROWS TO $37.8 MILLION - TOTAL EDGESUITE(R)CUSTOMERS INCREASES BY 88 TO 434 - NET LOSS OF $14.6 MILLION OR NEGATIVE $0.13 PER SHARE, DECLINES FROM A NET LOSS OF $42.2 MILLION, OR NEGATIVE $0.38 PER SHARE, IN THE SECOND QUARTER OF 2002 - CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, RESTRICTED CASH AND MARKETABLE SECURITIES OF $96.3 MILLION AT QUARTER END CAMBRIDGE, MASS. - JULY 30, 2003 - Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), a provider of services that enable the world's leading enterprises and government agencies to extend and control their e-business infrastructure, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2003. Revenue for second quarter 2003 was $37.8 million, a 3.3 percent increase over first quarter revenue of $36.6 million, and a 4.1 percent increase over second quarter 2002 revenue of $36.3 million. Net loss, in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) for second quarter 2003 was $14.6 million, or negative $0.13 per share, compared to a net loss for first quarter 2003 of $8.6 million, or negative $0.07 per share, and compared to a loss of $42.2 million, or negative $0.38 per share in second quarter 2002. The Company's net losses include a real estate restructuring charge of $1.3 million for the second quarter of 2003, and a real estate restructuring benefit of $9.8 million for the first quarter of 2003. Net loss for the six months ended June 30, 2003 was $23.3 million, or negative $0.20 per share, compared to a net loss of $101.3 million, or negative $0.91 per share, for the six months ended June 30, 2002. Normalized net loss* for second quarter 2003 was $10.1 million, or negative $0.09 per share, compared to normalized net loss for the prior quarter of $13.3 million, or negative $0.11 per share, and compared to First Call's consensus summary normalized net loss of $0.10 per share. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definition of normalized net loss.)
Normalized net loss* for second quarter 2003 also represents a 69 percent improvement as compared to normalized net loss of $32.8 million, or negative $0.29 per share in second quarter 2002. Normalized net loss* for the six months ended June 30, 2003 was $23.3 million, or negative $0.20 per share, compared to a normalized net loss of $62.2 million, or negative $0.56 per share, for the six months ended June 30, 2002. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definition of normalized net loss.) Adjusted EBITDA* for second quarter 2003 was $7.7 million, up 22 percent from $6.3 million in the prior quarter, and up 193 percent from an Adjusted EBITDA loss of $8.3 million in second quarter 2002. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definition of Adjusted EBITDA.) "In the second quarter, we improved our operating results year over year and grew revenue quarter over quarter and year over year, while building valuable relationships with a large and healthy base of enterprise and government clients," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai. Net cash consumption declined for the third consecutive quarter to $13.6 million, including cash payments of $16.1 million to settle real estate lease obligations, ending the quarter with $96.3 million in cash and cash equivalents, restricted cash and marketable securities. The settlement payments of $16.1 million to restructure real estate lease obligations will result in average annual cash savings of over $8 million per year starting in 2004, or over $50 million by the end of the original lease period in 2010. "We believe we are well-positioned to reach our goal of generating positive free cash flow* for the fourth quarter," said Robert Cobuzzi, chief financial officer of Akamai. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definition of free cash flow.) At June 30, 2003, the Company had 118.8 million shares of common stock outstanding. At June 30, 2003, common stock outstanding and unexercised stock options and warrants totaled 135.2 million shares. CUSTOMERS At the end of the second quarter of 2003, Akamai had 434 EdgeSuite customers under recurring contract, compared to 346 at the end of the previous quarter, and up from 211 EdgeSuite clients at the end of second quarter of 2002. New EdgeSuite customers in the second quarter included ATI Technologies Inc., BBC Technology, BearingPoint, Inc., The Dow Chemical Company, FUJI TV, Fuji Heavy Industries, Ltd. (Subaru), The Princeton Review, Inc., Red Hat Inc., Reebok International, Ltd, and Warner Music Group, among others. Resellers accounted for approximately 27 percent of second quarter revenue, as compared to approximately 24 percent in the first quarter of 2003. NETWORK The size, scale and functionality of Akamai's underlying global network remain key to the value proposition of all Akamai services. Akamai's global network at the end of the second quarter
consisted of 14,372 servers in 1,134 networks, in 70 countries. The geographic reach and capacity of Akamai's network is unprecedented in its ability to serve the needs of enterprise customers, government agencies and major Web-centric businesses. USE OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES The Company has historically provided financial metrics, some of which are based on GAAP and others that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes encourage the use of GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net loss, before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, and certain gains and losses on equity investments. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend. Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items which are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, net interest expense and restructuring activities, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also eliminates depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures. Akamai defines "normalized net loss" as net loss before amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, and certain gains and losses on equity investments. Akamai considers normalized net loss to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash. Akamai defines "free cash flow" as the net change in cash and cash equivalents, restricted cash and marketable securities quarter-over-quarter. Akamai considers free cash flow to be an important indicator of the Company's ability to generate cash to finance operations, service its debt and make strategic investments. Adjusted EBITDA, free cash flow and normalized net loss should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating loss, net loss, and various cash flow measures (e.g., cash used in operations), as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. RECONCILIATION OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
RECONCILIATION OF GAAP NET LOSS TO NORMALIZED NET LOSS AND ADJUSTED EBITDA (dollar amounts in thousands except per share data)
CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (dollar amounts in thousands) (unaudited) Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents as reported on the consolidated statements of cash flows, which are prepared in accordance with GAAP, is the financial measure most directly comparable to Free Cash Flow. This measure is not accessible on a forward-looking basis because it would include estimates that cannot be reasonably forecasted. These estimates include future changes in the balance of marketable securities and restricted cash, which may be significant. FREE CASH FLOW OR NET CASH CONSUMPTION (dollar amounts in thousands)
CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS (dollar amounts in thousands, except per share data) (unaudited)
QUARTERLY CONFERENCE CALL Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at www.akamai.com in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 1565261. ABOUT AKAMAI Akamai(R) provides services that enable the world's leading enterprises and government agencies to extend and control their e-business infrastructure. Having deployed the world's largest, globally-distributed computing platform, Akamai ensures the highest levels of availability, reliability, security, and performance of networked information and application delivery. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai's industry-leading services, matched with world-class customer care, are used by hundreds of successful enterprises, government entities, and Web businesses around the globe. For more information, visit www.akamai.com. # # # AKAMAI STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities
Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, lack of market acceptance of our services, failure to achieve incremental revenue growth, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by hackers or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's network infrastructure, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20031029155958.txt.gz
TIME:20031029155958
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 12.     Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On October 29, 2003, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2003. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
Exhibit 99.1
- - Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the world's largest on demand distributed computing platform for conducting profitable e-business, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2003. Revenue for third quarter 2003 was $41.8 million, a 10.6 percent increase over second quarter revenue of $37.8 million, and an 18.1 percent increase over third quarter 2002 revenue of $35.4 million. During the third quarter, Akamai achieved positive free cash flow*, generating $2.6 million of free cash flow. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definition of free cash flow.)
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
October 29, 2003
"These are our most successful financial results in the company's five-year history," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai. "I am very pleased to report that we achieved positive free cash flow in the third quarter, and believe that the company will continue to generate positive free cash flow in sequential quarters going forward."
Akamai ended the quarter with $99.0 million in cash and cash equivalents and marketable securities, a positive improvement of $2.6 million over the prior quarter.
Net loss, in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP) for the third quarter 2003 was $3.9 million, or negative $0.03 per share, compared to a net loss for second quarter 2003 of $14.6 million, or negative $0.13 per share, and compared to a loss of $47.5 million, or negative $0.42 per share in the third quarter of 2002.
Normalized net loss* for the third quarter of 2003 was $3.5 million, or negative $0.03 per share, compared to normalized net loss for the prior quarter of $10.1 million, or negative $0.09 per share, and compared to First Call's consensus summary normalized net loss of $0.07 per share, and a normalized net loss of $31.5 million, or negative $0.28 per share, in the third quarter of 2002. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definition of normalized net loss.)
 
"We believe the third quarter results continue to demonstrate our success in growing and improving the quality of the Akamai customer base, and our ability to effectively operate our business," continued Conrades.
Adjusted EBITDA* for the third quarter of 2003 was $11.7 million, up 52 percent from $7.7 million in the prior quarter, and an improvement from an Adjusted EBITDA loss of $6.7 million in the third quarter of 2002. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definition of Adjusted EBITDA.)
Customers
At the end of the third quarter of 2003, Akamai had 560 EdgeSuite customers under recurring contract, compared to 434 at the end of the previous quarter, and up from 243 EdgeSuite customers at the end of third quarter of 2002. In addition, the number of recurring customers grew in the third quarter by 55 net new accounts for a total of 1,056 customers under long-term services contracts.
New EdgeSuite customers in the third quarter included AIRBUS, AirTran Airways, a subsidiary of AirTran Holdings, Inc., Analog Devices Inc., BMW France, Defense Information Systems Agency of the Department of Defense, Drugstore.com, Food and Drug Administration, JCPenney, Red Bull GmbH, and Reuters, among others.
Network
The size, scale and functionality of Akamai's underlying global network remain key to the value proposition of all Akamai services. Akamai's global network at the end of the third quarter consisted of 14,488 servers in 1,108 networks, in 71 countries. The geographic reach and capacity of Akamai's network is unprecedented in its ability to serve the needs of enterprise customers, government agencies and major Web-centric businesses.
Financial Statements
Supplemental Financial Data (unaudited)
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing GAAP-based financial measurements, Akamai has historically provided financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes encourage use of and emphasis on GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net loss, before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, and certain gains and losses on equity investments. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items which are either not part of the company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, net interest expense and restructuring activities, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
 
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and the capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated statement of cash flows in the quarterly report on Form 10-Q.
Akamai defines "free cash flow" as the net change in cash and cash equivalents and marketable securities quarter-over-quarter. Akamai considers free cash flow to be an important indicator of the company's ability to finance operations, service its debt and make strategic investments.
Akamai defines "normalized net loss" as net loss before amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, and certain gains and losses on equity investments. Akamai considers normalized net loss to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA, free cash flow and normalized net loss should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the company's operating loss, net loss, and various cash flow measures (e.g., cash used in operating activities), as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G, the company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents as reported on the consolidated statements of cash flows, which are prepared in accordance with GAAP, is the financial measure most directly comparable to free cash flow. This measure is not accessible on a forward-looking basis because it would include estimates that cannot be reasonably forecasted. These estimates include future changes in the balance of marketable securities, which may be significant.
 
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at www.akamai.com in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 2737095.
About Akamai
Akamai  , is the world's largest on demand distributed computing platform for conducting profitable e-business. Overcoming the inherent limitations of the Internet, Akamai's services ensure a high-performing, scalable, and secure environment for organizations to cost effectively and their e-business infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai's industry-leading services, matched with world-class customer care, are used by hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet
extend
control
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements with respect to Akamai's expectations to continue to be free cash flow positive in future quarters. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, unexpected loss of key large customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to service and repay our outstanding debt, the effects of any attempts to
 
intentionally disrupt our services or network by hackers or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's network infrastructure, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20031208170653.txt.gz
TIME:20031208170653
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure
     On December 8, 2003, Akamai Technologies, Inc. issued a press release in which it affirmed certain financial guidance for the fourth quarter ending December 31, 2003 that was previously issued in connection with its third quarter investor conference call. The full text of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the world's largest on demand distributed computing platform for conducting profitable e-business, announced today that it expects that revenue for the fourth quarter 2003 will be in the range of $43.0-45.0 million, an increase of more than 20 percent over fourth quarter 2002 revenue of $35.4 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
December 8, 2003
The company also announced that based on the fourth quarter 2003 forecast, it expects annual 2003 revenue to be in the range of $159.0-161.0 million, compared with full-year 2002 results of $145.0 million.
This updates revenue guidance provided by the Company on October 29, 2003. At that time, the Company provided guidance that revenue for the fourth quarter was forecasted to be in a range of $42.0-$44.0 million, and that annual 2003 revenue would be in the range of $158.0  $160.0 million.
"We believe we are on track for another successful quarter of strong sequential revenue growth while keeping spending under tight control. This follows our third quarter's results, which were the best in the company's five-year history," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai. "In the fourth quarter to date, we are experiencing strong demand by our customers for our services in all areas, including an increase in holiday season e-commerce-related traffic."
About Akamai
Akamai  , is the world's largest on demand distributed computing platform for conducting profitable e-business. Overcoming the inherent limitations of the Internet, Akamai's services ensure a high-performing, scalable, and secure environment for organizations to cost effectively and their e-business infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai's industry-leading services, matched with world-class customer care, are used by hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet
extend
control
 
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements with respect to Akamai's expectations as to financial results. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected loss of key large customers or a significant number of other customers, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by hackers or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, unexpected limitations on our ability to recognize revenues, issues that arise in connection with the closing of Akamai's books and records and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20031209090531.txt.gz
TIME:20031209090531
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:   
(617) 444-3000
Table of Contents
Item 5. Other Events
     On December 9, 2003, we issued a press release in which we announced an offering of securities. The full text of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 7. Exhibits
99.1     Press release dated December 9, 2003 by Akamai Technologies, Inc.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 99.1 FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE CONTACTS: Jeff Young --or-- Sandy Smith Media Relations Investor Relations Akamai Technologies Akamai Technologies 617-444-3913 617-444-2804 jyoung@akamai.com ssmith@akamai.com AKAMAI ANNOUNCES OFFERING OF $175 MILLION IN 1.0% SENIOR CONVERTIBLE NOTES DUE IN 2033 CAMBRIDGE, MA, DECEMBER 9, 2003 -- Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced that it has offered and priced in a private placement a new issue of $175 million 1.0% Senior Convertible Notes due 2033. The notes will be issued at 100% of the principal amount. The offering is expected to close on December 12, 2003, subject to customary closing conditions. The notes are convertible into shares of Akamai common stock at a conversion price of $15.45. This represents a conversion premium of approximately 41% based on the closing price of $10.99 of Akamai common stock on December 8, 2003. However, holders of the notes may convert their notes only if: (1) the price of the Company's common stock issuable upon conversion of a note reaches a specified threshold, or (2) specified corporate transactions occur. In addition, holders of the notes will have certain rights to require Akamai to repurchase the notes prior to maturity on December 15, 2010, 2013, 2018, 2023 and 2028 as well as upon the occurrence of specified corporate transactions. Akamai will have rights to redeem the notes at 100% of the principal amount prior to their maturity starting on December 15, 2010. The notes accrue interest that will be payable semiannually. Akamai has granted the initial purchaser of the convertible notes an option to purchase up to an additional $25 million principal amount of notes. The company intends to use the net proceeds of the offering for working capital and general corporate purposes, which may include repayment or redemption of a portion of its current outstanding indebtedness. This announcement is neither an offer to sell nor a solicitation of an offer to buy any of these securities. This press release is being issued pursuant to and in accordance with Rule 135c under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act").
The convertible notes have been offered only to qualified institutional buyers in reliance on Rule 144A under the Securities Act, and outside the United States pursuant to Regulation S of the Securities Act. The notes and the common stock issuable upon conversion of the notes have not been registered under the Securities Act, or any state securities laws. Unless so registered, the notes and the common stock issuable upon conversion of the notes may not be offered or sold in the United States or any state or to any U.S. person except pursuant to an exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act and applicable state securities laws. ABOUT AKAMAI Akamai(R) - The Business Internet, is the world's largest on demand distributed computing platform for conducting profitable e-business. Overcoming the inherent limitations of the Internet, Akamai's services ensure a high-performing, scalable, and secure environment for organizations to cost effectively extend and control their e-business infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai's industry-leading services, matched with world-class customer care, are used by hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. For more information, visit www.akamai.com. # # # AKAMAI STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements with respect to Akamai's expectations to close the offering of notes and, if completed, to use the proceeds from the sale and issuance of the Notes to repurchase or redeem existing debt. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, a failure of any of the purchasers' conditions to close the purchase of the notes or other unexpected events that lead to a failure to complete the offering and sale described above and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC. In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20031216152244.txt.gz
TIME:20031216152244
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 5. Other Events
     Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced on December 12, 2003 the closing of our sale of $175,000,000 principal amount of 1.0% convertible senior notes due 2033, which we refer to as the Notes. A copy of the press release announcing the closing of the sale is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
     The material terms of the Notes are set forth in (i) an Indenture, dated as of December 12, 2003, by and between U.S. Bank National Association and us and (ii) a Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of December 12, 2003, by and between Credit Suisse First Boston LLC and us. Copies of those documents are filed as Exhibits 99.2 and 99.3 respectively, and are incorporated by reference herein.
Item 7. Exhibits
See Exhibit Index following the Signature Page of this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1 FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE CONTACTS: Jeff Young --or-- Sandy Smith Media Relations Investor Relations Akamai Technologies Akamai Technologies 617-444-3913 617-444-2804 jyoung@akamai.com ssmith@akamai.com AKAMAI COMPLETES SALE OF $175 MILLION IN 1.0% SENIOR CONVERTIBLE NOTES DUE IN 2033 CAMBRIDGE, MA, DECEMBER 12, 2003 -- Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced that it had completed the sale of $175 million principal amount of its 1.0% Senior Convertible Notes due 2033 in a previously announced private placement. In addition, Akamai has granted the initial purchaser of the convertible notes an option to purchase up to an additional $25 million principal amount of notes. The convertible notes were offered only to qualified institutional buyers in reliance on Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and outside the United States pursuant to Regulation S of the Securities Act. The notes and the common stock issuable upon conversion of the notes have not been registered under the Securities Act, or any state securities laws. Unless so registered, the notes and the common stock issuable upon conversion of the notes may not be offered or sold in the United States or any state or to any U.S. person except pursuant to an exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act and applicable state securities laws. ABOUT AKAMAI Akamai(R) - The Business Internet, is the world's largest on demand distributed computing platform for conducting profitable e-business. Overcoming the inherent limitations of the Internet, Akamai's services ensure a high-performing, scalable, and secure environment for organizations to cost effectively extend and control their e-business infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai's industry-leading services, matched with world-class customer care, are used by hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. For more information, visit www.akamai.com. # # # AKAMAI STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.

EXHIBIT 99.2 ================================================================================ AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC., Issuer, and U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, Trustee ------------------------ INDENTURE Dated as of December 12, 2003 ------------------------- 1.0% Convertible Senior Notes Due 2033 ================================================================================
TABLE OF CONTENTS
ARTICLE I DEFINITIONS; TRUST INDENTURE ACT...................................................................... 1 SECTION 1.01. DEFINITIONS.................................................................................... 1 SECTION 1.02. OTHER DEFINITIONS.............................................................................. 6 SECTION 1.03. INCORPORATION BY REFERENCE OF TRUST INDENTURE ACT.............................................. 7 SECTION 1.04. RULES OF CONSTRUCTION.......................................................................... 7 ARTICLE II THE NOTES ........................................................................................... 8 SECTION 2.01. FORM AND DATING................................................................................ 8 SECTION 2.02. EXECUTION AND AUTHENTICATION................................................................... 10 SECTION 2.03. REGISTRAR AND PAYING AGENT..................................................................... 10 SECTION 2.04. PAYING AGENT TO HOLD MONEY IN TRUST............................................................ 11 SECTION 2.05. HOLDER LISTS................................................................................... 11 SECTION 2.06. TRANSFER AND EXCHANGE.......................................................................... 11 SECTION 2.07. REPLACEMENT NOTES.............................................................................. 15 SECTION 2.08. OUTSTANDING NOTES.............................................................................. 15 SECTION 2.09. TREASURY NOTES................................................................................. 16 SECTION 2.10. TEMPORARY NOTES; GLOBAL NOTES.................................................................. 16 SECTION 2.11. CANCELLATION................................................................................... 17 SECTION 2.12. DEFAULTED INTEREST............................................................................. 17 SECTION 2.13. CUSIP NUMBERS.................................................................................. 17 ARTICLE III REDEMPTION ......................................................................................... 17 SECTION 3.01. NOTICES TO TRUSTEE............................................................................. 17 SECTION 3.02. SELECTION OF NOTES TO BE REDEEMED.............................................................. 17 SECTION 3.03. NOTICE OF REDEMPTION........................................................................... 18 SECTION 3.04. EFFECT OF NOTICE OF REDEMPTION................................................................. 19 SECTION 3.05. DEPOSIT OF REDEMPTION PRICE.................................................................... 19 SECTION 3.06. NOTES REDEEMED IN PART......................................................................... 19 SECTION 3.07. OPTIONAL REDEMPTION............................................................................ 19 SECTION 3.08. MANDATORY REDEMPTION........................................................................... 19 SECTION 3.09. PURCHASE OFFER................................................................................. 19 ARTICLE IV COVENANTS ........................................................................................... 21 SECTION 4.01. PAYMENT OF NOTES............................................................................... 22 SECTION 4.02. REPORTS........................................................................................ 22 SECTION 4.03. COMPLIANCE CERTIFICATE......................................................................... 22 SECTION 4.04. STAY, EXTENSION AND USURY LAWS................................................................. 23 SECTION 4.05. CORPORATE EXISTENCE............................................................................ 23 SECTION 4.06. TAXES.......................................................................................... 23 SECTION 4.07. [Reserved.].................................................................................... 23 SECTION 4.08. LIMITATION ON STATUS AS INVESTMENT COMPANY..................................................... 23 SECTION 4.09. SPECIAL INTEREST............................................................................... 24 ARTICLE V CONVERSION ........................................................................................... 24
-i-
SECTION 5.01. CONVERSION PRIVILEGE........................................................................... 24 SECTION 5.02. CONVERSION PROCEDURE........................................................................... 25 SECTION 5.03. FRACTIONAL SHARES.............................................................................. 25 SECTION 5.04. TAXES ON CONVERSION............................................................................ 26 SECTION 5.05. COMPANY TO PROVIDE STOCK....................................................................... 26 SECTION 5.06. ADJUSTMENT OF CONVERSION PRICE................................................................. 26 SECTION 5.07. NO ADJUSTMENT.................................................................................. 29 SECTION 5.08. OTHER ADJUSTMENTS.............................................................................. 29 SECTION 5.09. ADJUSTMENTS FOR TAX PURPOSES................................................................... 29 SECTION 5.10. NOTICE OF ADJUSTMENT........................................................................... 30 SECTION 5.11. NOTICE OF CERTAIN TRANSACTIONS................................................................. 30 SECTION 5.12. EFFECT OF RECLASSIFICATIONS, CONSOLIDATIONS, MERGERS OR SALES ON CONVERSION PRIVILEGE.......... 30 SECTION 5.13. TRUSTEE'S DISCLAIMER........................................................................... 31 ARTICLE VI REPURCHASES OF NOTES................................................................................. 32 SECTION 6.01. REPURCHASES OF NOTES AT THE OPTION OF THE HOLDER............................................... 32 SECTION 6.02. REPURCHASE OF NOTES UPON A CHANGE IN CONTROL................................................... 34 SECTION 6.03. EFFECT OF OPTION PURCHASE NOTICE............................................................... 34 SECTION 6.04. DEPOSIT OF PURCHASE PRICE...................................................................... 35 SECTION 6.05. SECURITIES PURCHASED IN PART................................................................... 35 SECTION 6.06. COVENANT TO COMPLY WITH SECURITIES LAWS........................................................ 35 SECTION 6.07. OTHER PROVISIONS SUBJECT HERETO................................................................ 35 ARTICLE VII SUCCESSORS ......................................................................................... 36 SECTION 7.01. LIMITATION ON MERGER, SALE OR CONSOLIDATION.................................................... 36 SECTION 7.02. SUCCESSOR CORPORATION SUBSTITUTED.............................................................. 36 ARTICLE VIII DEFAULTS AND REMEDIES.............................................................................. 37 SECTION 8.01. EVENTS OF DEFAULT.............................................................................. 37 SECTION 8.02. ACCELERATION................................................................................... 38 SECTION 8.03. OTHER REMEDIES................................................................................. 39 SECTION 8.04. WAIVER OF PAST DEFAULTS........................................................................ 39 SECTION 8.05. CONTROL BY MAJORITY............................................................................ 39 SECTION 8.06. LIMITATION ON SUITS............................................................................ 40 SECTION 8.07. RIGHTS OF HOLDERS TO RECEIVE PAYMENT........................................................... 40 SECTION 8.08. COLLECTION SUIT BY TRUSTEE..................................................................... 40 SECTION 8.09. TRUSTEE MAY FILE PROOFS OF CLAIM............................................................... 40 SECTION 8.10. PRIORITIES..................................................................................... 41 SECTION 8.11. UNDERTAKING FOR COSTS.......................................................................... 41 ARTICLE IX TRUSTEE ............................................................................................. 41 SECTION 9.01. DUTIES OF TRUSTEE.............................................................................. 41 SECTION 9.02. RIGHTS OF TRUSTEE.............................................................................. 42 SECTION 9.03. INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS OF TRUSTEE................................................................... 43 SECTION 9.04. TRUSTEE'S DISCLAIMER........................................................................... 43
-ii-
SECTION 9.05. NOTICE OF DEFAULTS............................................................................. 43 SECTION 9.06. REPORTS BY TRUSTEE TO HOLDERS.................................................................. 43 SECTION 9.07. COMPENSATION AND INDEMNITY..................................................................... 43 SECTION 9.08. REPLACEMENT OF TRUSTEE......................................................................... 44 SECTION 9.09. SUCCESSOR TRUSTEE BY MERGER, ETC............................................................... 45 SECTION 9.10. ELIGIBILITY; DISQUALIFICATION.................................................................. 45 SECTION 9.11. PREFERENTIAL COLLECTION OF CLAIMS AGAINST COMPANY.............................................. 45 ARTICLE X DISCHARGE OF INDENTURE................................................................................ 46 SECTION 10.01. TERMINATION OF COMPANY'S OBLIGATIONS.......................................................... 46 SECTION 10.02. REPAYMENT TO COMPANY.......................................................................... 46 ARTICLE XI AMENDMENTS, SUPPLEMENTS AND WAIVERS.................................................................. 46 SECTION 11.01. WITHOUT CONSENT OF HOLDERS.................................................................... 46 SECTION 11.02. WITH CONSENT OF HOLDERS....................................................................... 47 SECTION 11.03. COMPLIANCE WITH TRUST INDENTURE ACT........................................................... 47 SECTION 11.04. REVOCATION AND EFFECT OF CONSENTS............................................................. 48 SECTION 11.05. NOTATION ON OR EXCHANGE OF NOTES.............................................................. 48 SECTION 11.06. TRUSTEE PROTECTED............................................................................. 48 ARTICLE XII MISCELLANEOUS ...................................................................................... 49 SECTION 12.01. TRUST INDENTURE ACT CONTROLS.................................................................. 49 SECTION 12.02. NOTICES....................................................................................... 49 SECTION 12.03. COMMUNICATION BY HOLDERS WITH OTHER HOLDERS................................................... 49 SECTION 12.04. CERTIFICATE AND OPINION AS TO CONDITIONS PRECEDENT............................................ 49 SECTION 12.05. STATEMENTS REQUIRED IN CERTIFICATE OR OPINION................................................. 50 SECTION 12.06. RULES BY TRUSTEE AND AGENTS................................................................... 50 SECTION 12.07. LEGAL HOLIDAYS................................................................................ 50 SECTION 12.08. NO RECOURSE AGAINST OTHERS.................................................................... 50 SECTION 12.09. COUNTERPARTS AND FACSIMILE SIGNATURES......................................................... 51 SECTION 12.10. VARIABLE PROVISIONS........................................................................... 51 SECTION 12.11. GOVERNING LAW, SUBMISSION TO JURISDICTION..................................................... 51 SECTION 12.12. NO ADVERSE INTERPRETATION OF OTHER AGREEMENTS................................................. 52 SECTION 12.13. SUCCESSORS.................................................................................... 52 SECTION 12.14. SEVERABILITY.................................................................................. 52 SECTION 12.15. TABLE OF CONTENTS, HEADINGS, ETC.............................................................. 52 Exhibits Exhibit A Form of Legends and Notes.............................................................................. A1 Exhibit B Form of Transfer Certificate for Transfer From Restricted Note to Global Note.......................... B1
-iii-
INDENTURE, dated as of December 12, 2003, between Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "COMPANY"), and U.S. Bank National Association, a national banking association organized and existing under the laws of the United States, as trustee (the "TRUSTEE"). Each party agrees as follows for the benefit of the other party and for the equal and ratable benefit of the Holders (as defined in Section 1.01 hereof) of the Company's 1.0% Convertible Senior Notes due 2033 (the "NOTES"): ARTICLE I DEFINITIONS; TRUST INDENTURE ACT SECTION 1.01. DEFINITIONS. "AFFILIATE" of any specified Person means any other Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with such specified Person. For purposes of this definition, "control" (including, with correlative meanings, the terms "controlling," "controlled by" and "under common control with"), as used with respect to any Person, shall mean the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of such Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by agreement or otherwise. "AGENT" means any Registrar, Paying Agent, New York Presenting Agent or Conversion Agent. "BOARD OF DIRECTORS" means the Board of Directors of the Company or any authorized committee of the Board of Directors. "BOARD RESOLUTION" means a duly authorized resolution of the Board of Directors. "BUSINESS DAY" means any day that is not a Legal Holiday. "CAPITAL STOCK" means any and all shares, interests, participations, rights or other equivalents, however designated, of corporate stock, including, without limitation, partnership interests. "CHANGE IN CONTROL" means the occurrence of one or more of the following events: (1) any sale, lease, exchange or other transfer (in one transaction or a series of related transactions) of all or substantially all of the Company's assets to any Person or group of related Persons (a "Group") (whether or not otherwise in compliance with the provisions hereof), other than to any of the Company's Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries; (2) the approval by the holders of the Company's Capital Stock of any plan or proposal for liquidation or dissolution of the Company (whether or not otherwise in compliance with the provisions hereof); (3) any Person or Group shall become the beneficial owner of shares representing more than 50% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the Company's issued and outstanding voting stock; (4) 1
the first day on which a majority of the members of the Company's board of directors are not Continuing Directors; or (5) any consolidation by the Company with, or merger by the Company with or into, another Person or any consolidation by another Person with, or merger by another Person with or into, the Company, in any such event other than pursuant to a transaction in which the Persons that beneficially owned, directly or indirectly, the shares of the voting stock of the Company immediately prior to such transaction, beneficially own, directly or indirectly, immediately after such transaction, shares of voting stock of the continuing or surviving corporation representing at least a majority of the total voting power of all outstanding classes of voting stock of the continuing or surviving corporation in substantially the same proportion as such ownership immediately prior to the transaction. The term "beneficial owner" (including, with correlative meanings, the terms "beneficially own" and "beneficially owned") will be determined in accordance with Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 promulgated by the SEC under the Exchange Act or any successor provision, except that a Person shall be deemed to have "beneficial ownership" of all shares of Common Stock that the Person has the right to acquire, whether exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time. "CHANGE IN CONTROL OFFER" means a Purchase Offer. "COMMON STOCK" means the common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company as the same exists at the date of the execution of this Indenture or as such stock may be constituted from time to time. "COMPANY" means the party named as such above until a successor replaces it in accordance with Article VII and thereafter means the successor. "CONTINUING DIRECTORS" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Company's board of directors who: (1) was a member of such board of directors on the Issuance Date; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to such board of directors with the approval of: (A) a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such board at the time of such nomination or election or (B) a nominating committee, a majority of which committee shall be the Continuing Directors who were members of such board at the time of such nomination or election. "DEFAULT" means any event that is, or with the passage of time or the giving of notice or both would be, an Event of Default. "DEPOSITARY" shall mean The Depository Trust Company, its nominees and their respective successors. "EQUITY INTERESTS" means Capital Stock and all warrants, options or other rights to acquire Capital Stock, but excluding any Indebtedness that is convertible into, or exchangeable for, Capital Stock. "EXCESS PAYMENT" means the excess of (A) the aggregate of the cash and value of other consideration paid by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to shares of the Company acquired in a tender offer or other negotiated transaction over (B) the market value of 2
such acquired shares (by reference to the per share value of the shares remaining outstanding) after giving effect to the completion of a tender offer or other negotiated transaction. "EXCHANGE ACT" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. "EXCHANGE RATE CONTRACT" means, with respect to any Person, any currency swap agreements, forward exchange rate agreements, foreign currency futures or options, exchange rate collar agreements, exchange rate insurance and other agreements or arrangements, or combination thereof, the principal purpose of which is to provide protection against fluctuations in currency exchange rates. An Exchange Rate Contract may also include an Interest Rate Agreement. "GAAP" means generally accepted accounting principles set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statements by such other entity as approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession, which are in effect on the Issuance Date and are applied on a consistent basis. "GUARANTEE" means a guarantee, other than by endorsement of negotiable instruments for collection in the ordinary course of business, direct or indirect, in any manner, including, without limitation, letters of credit and reimbursement agreements in respect thereof, of all or any part of any Indebtedness. "HOLDER" means a Person in whose name a Note is registered in the register referred to in Section 2.03. "INDEBTEDNESS" means, with respect to any Person, any indebtedness of such Person, whether or not contingent, in respect of borrowed money or evidenced by bonds, notes, debentures or similar instruments or letters of credit, or reimbursement agreements in respect thereof, or representing the balance deferred and unpaid of the purchase price of any property (which purchase price is due more than six months after the placing into service or delivery of such property) including pursuant to capital leases and sale-and-leaseback transactions, or representing any hedging obligations under an Exchange Rate Contract or an Interest Rate Agreement, except any such balance that constitutes an accrued expense or trade payable, if and to the extent any of the foregoing indebtedness, other than obligations under an Exchange Rate Contract or an Interest Rate Agreement, would appear as a liability upon a balance sheet of such Person prepared in accordance with GAAP, and also includes, to the extent not otherwise included, the Guarantee of items which would be included within this definition if incurred directly by such Person. The amount of any Indebtedness outstanding as of any date shall be the accreted value thereof, in the case of any Indebtedness issued with original issue discount. Indebtedness shall not include liabilities for taxes of any kind. "INDENTURE" means this Indenture, as amended from time to time. "INITIAL PURCHASER" means Credit Suisse First Boston LLC. 3
"INTEREST RATE AGREEMENT" means, with respect to any Person, any interest rate swap agreement, interest rate cap agreement, interest rate collar agreement or other similar agreement the principal purpose of which is to protect the party indicated therein against fluctuations in interest rates. "ISSUANCE DATE" means the date on which the Notes are first authenticated and issued. "NOTES" has the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto. "OBLIGATIONS" means any principal, interest, penalties, fees, indemnifications, reimbursements, damages and other liabilities payable under the documentation governing any Indebtedness. "OFFICER" means the Chairman of the Board, the President, any Vice President, the Treasurer, the Secretary, any Assistant Treasurer or any Assistant Secretary of the Company. "OFFICERS' CERTIFICATE" means a certificate of the Company signed by two Officers, one of whom must be the Chairman of the Board, the President, the Treasurer or a Vice President of the Company. "OPINION OF COUNSEL" means a written opinion from legal counsel who is reasonably acceptable to the Trustee. The counsel may be an employee of or counsel to the Company or the Trustee. "PERSON" means any person within the meaning of Sections 13(d)(3) and 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act or any successor provision to either of the foregoing. "PURCHASE AGREEMENT" means the Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 8, 2003, among the Company and the Initial Purchaser. "REGISTRATION DEFAULT" has the meaning set forth in Section 2 of the Notes. "REGISTRATION RIGHTS AGREEMENT" means the Registration Rights Agreement relating to the Notes and the underlying Common Stock, dated December 12, 2003, among the Company and the Initial Purchaser. "SALE PRICE" means on any trading day the closing per share sale price of the Common Stock (or, if no closing sale price is reported, the average of the bid and ask prices or, if more than one in either case, the average of the average bid and the average asked prices) on such date as reported on the NASDAQ National Market or, if the shares of Common Stock are not listed on the NASDAQ National Market, as reported by the NASDAQ system. In the absence of such quotations, the Company shall be entitled to reasonably determine the Sale Price on the basis of such quotations as it considers appropriate. "SEC" means the Securities and Exchange Commission. 4
"SECURITIES ACT" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. "SHELF REGISTRATION STATEMENT" shall have the meaning set forth in the Registration Rights Agreement. "SIGNIFICANT SUBSIDIARY" means any Subsidiary of the Company which is a "significant subsidiary" as defined in Rule 1-02(w) of Regulation S-X under the Securities Act and the Exchange Act, as such Regulation is in effect on the date hereof. "SPECIAL INTEREST" has the meaning set forth in Section 2 of the Notes. "SUBSIDIARY" means any corporation, association or other business entity of which more than 50% of the total voting power of shares of Capital Stock entitled, without regard to the occurrence of any contingency, to vote in the election of directors, managers or trustees thereof is at the time owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by any Person or one or more of the other Subsidiaries of that Person or a combination thereof. "TIA" means the Trust Indenture Act of 1939 (15 U.S. Code Sections 77aaa-77bbbb) as in effect on the date of execution of this Indenture. "TRADING PRICE" of the Notes on any date of determination means the average of the secondary market bid quotations per $1,000 principal amount of Notes obtained by the Conversion Agent for $5,000,000 in principal amount of the Notes at approximately 3:30 p.m., New York City time, on such determination date from three independent nationally recognized securities dealers the Company selects, provided that if at least three such bids cannot reasonably be obtained by the Conversion Agent, but two such bids are obtained, then the average of the two bids shall be used, and if only one such bid can reasonably be obtained by the Conversion Agent, this one bid shall be used. If the Conversion Agent cannot reasonably obtain at least one bid for $5,000,000 in principal amount of the Notes from a nationally recognized securities dealer or, in the Company's reasonable judgment, the bid quotations are not indicative of the secondary market value of the Notes, then the trading price of the Notes will be deemed to be equal to the product of the number of shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of $1,000 principal amount of the Notes on such date of determination and the average of the Sale Prices for the 10 consecutive trading days ending on, and including such date of determination, which average shall be subject to adjustment to account for events requiring an adjustment to the Conversion Price. The Conversion Agent shall have no obligation to determine the Trading Price of the Notes unless the Company has requested such determination; and the Company shall have no obligation to make such request unless a Holder provides the Company with reasonable evidence that the trading price of the Notes is less than 95% of the product of the Sale Price of Common Stock and the number of shares issuable upon conversion of $1,000 principal amount of the Notes; at which time, the Company shall instruct the Conversion Agent to determine the trading price of the Notes beginning on the next trading day and on each successive trading day until the trading price is greater than or equal to 95% of the product of the Sale Price of the Common Stock and the number of shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of $1,000 principal amount of the Notes. 5
"TRUSTEE" means the party named as such above until a successor replaces it in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Indenture and thereafter means the successor. "TRUST OFFICER" means any officer or assistant officer of the Trustee assigned by the Trustee to administer its corporate trust matters. "WHOLLY-OWNED SUBSIDIARY" of any specified Person means a Subsidiary of such Person all of the outstanding Capital Stock or other ownership interests of which (other than directors' qualifying shares) shall at the time be owned by such Person or by one or more Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries of such Person or by one or more Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries of such Person and such Person. SECTION 1.02. OTHER DEFINITIONS. 6
"REGISTRAR"............................................................................. 2.03 "REGULATION S".......................................................................... 2.01 "RESTRICTED NOTES"...................................................................... 2.01 "RESTRICTED NOTES LEGEND"............................................................... 2.01 "RIGHTS"................................................................................ 5.06 "RULE 144A"............................................................................. 2.01 "TENDER PERIOD"......................................................................... 3.09
SECTION 1.03. INCORPORATION BY REFERENCE OF TRUST INDENTURE ACT. Whenever this Indenture refers to a provision of the TIA, the provision is incorporated by reference in and made a part of this Indenture. The following TIA terms used in this Indenture have the following meanings: "INDENTURE SECURITIES" means the Notes; "INDENTURE SECURITY HOLDER" means a Holder of a Note; "INDENTURE TO BE QUALIFIED" means this Indenture; "INDENTURE TRUSTEE" or "INSTITUTIONAL TRUSTEE" means the Trustee; and "OBLIGOR" on the Notes means the Company or any other obligor on the Notes. All other terms used in this Indenture that are defined by the TIA, defined by TIA reference to another statute or defined by SEC rule under the TIA have the meanings so assigned to them. SECTION 1.04. RULES OF CONSTRUCTION. Unless the context otherwise requires: (a) a term has the meaning assigned to it; (b) an accounting term not otherwise defined has the meaning assigned to it in accordance with GAAP consistently applied; (c) "OR" is not exclusive; (d) words in the singular include the plural, and in the plural include the singular; (e) provisions apply to successive events and transactions; (f) references to sections of or rules under the Securities Act shall be deemed to include substitute, replacement or successor sections or rules adopted by the SEC from time to time; and 7
(g) a reference to "$" or U.S. Dollars is to United States dollars. ARTICLE II THE NOTES SECTION 2.01. FORM AND DATING. (a) GENERAL. The Notes and the Trustee's certificate of authentication shall be substantially in the form of Exhibit A hereto, which is hereby incorporated by reference and expressly made a part of this Indenture. The Notes may have notations, legends or endorsements required by law, stock exchange rule, agreements to which the Company is subject, if any, or usage (provided that any such notation, legend or endorsement is in a form acceptable to the Company). The Company shall furnish any such legend not contained in Exhibit A to the Trustee in writing. Each Note shall be dated the date of its authentication. The Notes shall be in denominations of $1,000 and integral multiples thereof. The terms and provisions of the Notes set forth in Exhibit A are part of this Indenture and to the extent applicable, the Company and the Trustee, by their execution and delivery of this Indenture, expressly agree to such terms and provisions and to be bound thereby. However, to the extent any provision of any Note conflicts with the express provisions of this Indenture, the provisions of this Indenture shall govern and be controlling. The Notes represent "Designated Senior Debt" as defined under the Company's existing 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007. (b) GLOBAL NOTES. The Notes are being offered and sold by the Company pursuant to the Purchase Agreement. The Notes shall be offered and sold to Qualified Institutional Buyers ("QIBs") in reliance on Rule 144A under the Securities Act ("RULE 144A") or in transactions in reliance on Regulation S under the Securities Act ("REGULATION S"), as provided in the Purchase Agreement. The Notes shall be issued initially in the form of one or more permanent Global Notes in definitive, fully registered form without interest coupons with the Global Notes Legend ("GLOBAL NOTES LEGEND") and Restricted Notes Legend ("RESTRICTED NOTES LEGEND") set forth in Exhibit A hereto ("GLOBAL NOTE"), which shall be deposited on behalf of the purchasers of the Notes represented thereby with the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary, and registered in the name of the Depositary or a nominee of the Depositary, duly executed by the Company and authenticated by the Trustee as hereinafter provided. The aggregate principal amount of the Global Note may from time to time be increased or decreased by adjustments made on the records of the Trustee and the Depositary or its nominee as hereinafter provided. So long as any Global Note is outstanding, owners of beneficial interests therein may transfer their interests therein only in reliance on Regulation S or to QIBs in reliance on Rule 144A in accordance with Section 2.06. (c) BOOK-ENTRY PROVISIONS. 8
This Section 2.01(c) shall apply only to the Global Note deposited with or on behalf of the Depositary. The Company shall execute and the Trustee shall, in accordance with this Section 2.01(c), authenticate and deliver initially one or more Global Notes that (a) shall be registered in the name of the Depositary for such Global Note or Global Notes or the nominee of such Depositary and (b) shall be delivered by the Trustee to such Depositary or pursuant to such Depositary's instructions or held by the Trustee as custodian for the Depositary. Members of, or participants in, the Depositary ("AGENT MEMBERS") shall have no rights under this Indenture with respect to any Global Note held on their behalf by the Depositary or by the Trustee as the custodian of the Depositary or under such Global Note, and the Depositary may be treated by the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee as the absolute owner of such Global Note for all purposes whatsoever. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing herein shall prevent the Company, the Trustee or any agent of the Company or the Trustee from giving effect to any written certification, proxy or other authorization furnished by the Depositary or impair, as between the Depositary and its Agent Members, the operation of customary practices of such Depositary governing the exercise of the rights of an owner of a beneficial interest in any Global Note. (d) CERTIFICATED NOTES. So long as the Depositary or its nominee is the registered owner of a Note, the Depositary or such nominee, as the case may be, will be considered the sole owner or Holder of the Notes represented by the Global Notes for all purposes under the Indenture. Except as provided below, owners of beneficial interests in a Global Note will not be entitled to have Notes represented by such Global Note registered in their names, will not receive or be entitled to receive physical delivery of certificated Notes, and will not be considered the owners or holders thereof under the Indenture for any purpose, including with respect to the giving of any directions, instructions or approvals to the Trustee thereunder. Other than as set forth below in this Section, certificated Notes will be issued to owners of beneficial interests in Global Notes in exchange for their interests in Global Notes only if (1) the Depositary (x) notifies the Trustee in writing that the Depositary is no longer willing or able to act as a depositary and the Company is unable to locate a qualified successor within 90 days, or (y) has ceased to be a clearing agency registered under the Exchange Act, or (2) the Company, at its option, notifies the Trustee in writing that it elects to cause the issuance of Notes in definitive form under the Indenture. In either case, upon surrender by the Depositary of the Global Notes, certificated Notes will be issued to each Person that the Depositary identifies as the beneficial owner of the Notes represented by the Global Notes. In addition, the Company will issue certificated Notes in exchange for interests in Global Notes if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, in which case, upon receipt of necessary information from the Depositary in accordance with its procedures, the principal Registrar shall instruct the Depositary as to the corresponding reduction to be made in the principal amount of the relevant Global Note. Finally, at such time as all Global Notes cease to be outstanding pursuant to clause (1) or (2) above, certificated Notes may be issued in accordance with paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of Section 9
2.06(a). Upon any such issuance, the Trustee shall register such certificated Notes in the name of such Person or Persons (or the nominee of any thereof), and cause the same to be delivered thereto. All such certificated Notes shall bear the Restricted Notes Legend set forth in Exhibit A hereto (the "RESTRICTED NOTES") unless otherwise provided in this Section 2.01(d) and Section 2.06(b) hereof. After a transfer of any Notes during the period of the effectiveness of a Shelf Registration Statement with respect to the Notes and pursuant thereto, all requirements for Restricted Notes Legends on such Notes will cease to apply; and, in this case a certificated Note without a Restricted Notes Legend will be available to the Holder of such Restricted Notes upon request (and surrender of such Note bearing the Restricted Notes Legend for cancellation). The Company shall give written notice to the Trustee, in the form of an Officer's Certificate, of the effectiveness of the Shelf Registration Statement, on which the Trustee and Registrant may rely. SECTION 2.02. EXECUTION AND AUTHENTICATION. One Officer shall sign the Notes for the Company by manual or facsimile signature. If an Officer whose signature is on a Note no longer holds that office at the time the Note is authenticated, the Note shall nevertheless be valid. A Note shall not be valid until authenticated by the manual signature of an authorized officer of the Trustee. The signature shall be conclusive evidence that the Note has been authenticated under this Indenture. The Trustee shall, upon a written order of the Company signed by an Officer, authenticate one or more Notes for original issue up to an aggregate principal amount stated in Section 6 of the Notes. The aggregate principal amount of Notes outstanding at any time may not exceed $200,000,000 except as provided in Section 2.07; provided that Notes in excess of $175,000,000 shall not be issued other than pursuant to the option granted by the Company to the Initial Purchaser as provided in the Purchase Agreement. In the event thereof, the Company shall certify to the Trustee in an Officer's Certificate that such issuance is pursuant to such option granted to the Initial Purchaser under the Purchase Agreement. The Trustee may appoint an authenticating agent acceptable to the Company to authenticate Notes. An authenticating agent may authenticate Notes whenever the Trustee may do so. Each reference in this Indenture to authentication by the Trustee includes authentication by such agent. An authenticating agent has the same rights as an Agent to deal with Holders, the Company or an Affiliate. SECTION 2.03. REGISTRAR AND PAYING AGENT. The Company shall maintain in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York, State of New York, an office or agency where the Notes may be presented for registration of transfer or for exchange, payment and conversion (collectively, the "NEW YORK PRESENTING AGENT"). The Company initially designates U.S. Bank National Association, which is the Trustee, at its corporate trust offices in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York, State of 10
New York to act as New York Presenting Agent. The Trustee is initially appointed to act as Note registrar to maintain a register of transfers of the Notes (the "REGISTRAR"), to act as paying agent with respect to the Notes ("PAYING AGENT") and to act as agent for conversion of the Notes ("CONVERSION AGENT"). The Registrar shall keep a register of the Notes and of their transfer and exchange. The Company may appoint one or more co-Registrars, one or more additional Paying Agents and one or more additional Conversion Agents in such other locations as it shall determine. The term "Registrar" includes any co-Registrar, the term "Paying Agent" includes any additional Paying Agent and the term "Conversion Agent" includes any additional conversion agent. The Company may change any Paying Agent, Registrar, New York Presenting Agent or Conversion Agent without prior notice to any Holder. The Company shall notify the Trustee of the name and address of any Agent not a party to this Indenture. If the Company fails to appoint or maintain another entity as Registrar, Paying Agent, New York Presenting Agent or Conversion Agent, the Trustee shall act as such. The Company or any of its Affiliates may act as Paying Agent, Registrar, New York Presenting Agent or Conversion Agent. SECTION 2.04. PAYING AGENT TO HOLD MONEY IN TRUST. The Company shall require each Paying Agent other than the Trustee to agree in writing that the Paying Agent will hold in trust for the benefit of Holders or the Trustee all money held by the Paying Agent for the payment of principal or interest on the Notes, and will notify the Trustee of any default by the Company in making any such payment. While any such default continues, the Trustee may require a Paying Agent to pay all money held by it to the Trustee and to account for any money disbursed by it. The Company at any time may require a Paying Agent to pay all money held by it to the Trustee. Upon payment over to the Trustee, the Paying Agent (if other than the Company or an Affiliate of the Company) shall have no further liability for the money. If the Company or an Affiliate of the Company acts as Paying Agent, it shall segregate and hold in a separate trust fund for the benefit of the Holders all money held by it as Paying Agent. SECTION 2.05. HOLDER LISTS. The Trustee shall preserve in as current a form as is reasonably practicable the most recent list available to it of the names and addresses of Holders. If the Trustee is not the Registrar, the Company shall furnish to the Trustee on or before each interest payment date and at such other times as the Trustee may request in writing a list in such form and as of such date as the Trustee may reasonably require of the names and addresses of Holders. SECTION 2.06. TRANSFER AND EXCHANGE. Whenever Notes are presented to the Registrar or a co-Registrar with a request to register a transfer or to exchange them for an equal principal amount of Notes of other denominations, the Registrar shall register the transfer or make the exchange if its requirements for such transactions are met. To permit registrations of transfers and exchanges, the Company shall issue and the Trustee shall authenticate Notes at the Registrar's request. No service charge shall be made to a Holder for any registration of transfer or exchange (except as otherwise expressly permitted herein), but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any 11
transfer tax or similar governmental charge payable in connection therewith (other than any such transfer tax or similar governmental charge payable upon exchanges pursuant to Sections 2.10, 3.06 or 11.05 hereof). The Company shall not be required (i) to issue, register the transfer of or exchange any Note for a period beginning at the opening of business 15 days before the day of any selection of Notes to be redeemed under Section 3.02 hereof and ending at the close of business on the day of selection, or (ii) to register the transfer, or exchange, of any Note so selected for redemption in whole or in part, except the unredeemed portion of any Note being redeemed in part. (a) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary herein, so long as a Global Note remains outstanding and is held by or on behalf of the Depositary, transfers of a Global Note, in whole or in part, or of any beneficial interest therein, shall only be made in reliance on Regulation S or to QIBs in reliance on Rule 144A in accordance with Section 2.01(b), Section 2.01(d), Section 2.06(a) and Section 2.06(b); provided, however, that beneficial interests in a Global Note may be transferred to Persons who take delivery thereof in the form of a beneficial interest in the same Global Note in accordance with the transfer restrictions set forth in the Restricted Notes Legend and under the heading "Transfer Restrictions" in the Company's Offering Memorandum dated December 8, 2003 with respect to the Notes. (i) Transfer of Global Note to Depositary. Except for transfers or exchanges made in accordance with clauses (ii) through (iv) of this Section 2.06(a), transfers of a Global Note shall be limited to transfers of such Global Note in whole, but not in part, to nominees of the Depositary or to a successor of the Depositary or such successor's nominee. (ii) Restricted Note to Global Note. If an owner of a Restricted Note registered in the name of such owner wishes at any time to transfer such Restricted Note to a Person in reliance on Rule 144A, such Holder may, subject to the rules and procedures of the Depositary, exchange or cause the exchange of such Restricted Note for an equivalent beneficial interest in the Global Note. Upon receipt by the principal Registrar of (1) surrender of the Restricted Note to be transferred or exchanged, (2) instructions from the Company, directing the principal Registrar (A) to credit or cause to be credited a beneficial interest in the Global Note equal to the principal amount of the Restricted Note to be exchanged or transferred and (B) to cancel such Restricted Note to be exchanged or transferred, (3) a written (or electronic) order given in accordance with the Depositary's procedures containing information regarding the participant account of the Depositary to be credited and (4) a certificate in the form of Exhibit B attached hereto given by the Holder of such Restricted Note, then the principal Registrar will instruct the Trustee to cancel such Restricted Note and will instruct the Depositary to increase or cause to be increased the principal amount of the Global Note by the principal amount of the Restricted Note to be exchanged or transferred. 12
(iii) Global Note To Restricted Note. On and after such time as owners of beneficial interests in Global Notes are permitted under Section 2.01(d) to exchange their interests in Global Notes for certificated Notes, if an owner of a beneficial interest in a Global Note deposited with the Depositary or with the Trustee as custodian for the Depositary wishes to transfer its interest in such Global Note to a Person who is required to take delivery thereof in the form of a Restricted Note under Section 2.06(b), such owner may, subject to the rules and procedures of the Depositary, cause the transfer of such interest for one or more Restricted Notes of any authorized denomination or denominations and of the same aggregate principal amount. Subject to the terms of Section 2.01(d) regarding the circumstances under which owners of beneficial interests in Global Notes are entitled to exchange such interests for certificated Notes, upon receipt by the principal Registrar of (1) instructions from the Depositary directing the principal Registrar to authenticate and deliver one or more Restricted Notes of the same aggregate principal amount as the beneficial interest in the Global Note to be transfered, such instructions to contain the name or names of the designated transferee or transferees, the authorized denomination or denominations of the Restricted Notes to be so issued and appropriate delivery instructions, (2) a certificate in the form of Exhibit C attached hereto given by the owner of such beneficial interest to the effect set forth therein, and (3) such other certifications, legal opinions or other information as the Company may reasonably require to confirm that such transfer is being made pursuant to an exemption from, or in a transaction not subject to, the registration requirements of the Securities Act, then the principal Registrar will instruct the Depositary to reduce or cause to be reduced such Global Note by the aggregate principal amount of the beneficial interest therein to be exchanged and to debit or cause to be debited from the account of the Person making such transfer the beneficial interest in the Global Note that is being transferred, and concurrently with such reduction and debit the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, one or more Restricted Notes of the same aggregate principal amount in accordance with the instructions referred to above. In the event that certificated Notes are issued in place of beneficial interests in Global Notes pursuant to 2.01(d) prior to the effectiveness of a Shelf Registration Statement with respect to such Notes, such Notes may be exchanged only in accordance with such procedures as the Company may reasonably require to confirm that such transfer is being made pursuant to an exemption from, or in a transaction not subject to, the registration requirements of the Securities Act (including the certification requirements intended to ensure that such transfers comply with Rule 144A, Regulation S, Rule 144, or any other available exemption from registration, as the case may be). (iv) Restricted Note To Restricted Note. On and after such time as Holders of Restricted Notes are permitted to transfer such Notes other than in reliance on Regulation S or to QIBs in reliance on Rule 144A in certificated form pursuant to Section 2.01(d), if a Holder of a Restricted Note wishes to transfer such Restricted Note to a Person who is required to take delivery thereof in the form of a Restricted Note, such Holder may, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth 13
herein and in such Restricted Note, cause the exchange of such Restricted Note for one or more Restricted Notes of any authorized denomination or denominations and of the same aggregate principal amount. Upon receipt by the principal Registrar of (1) such Restricted Note, duly endorsed as provided herein, (2) instructions from such Holder directing the principal Registrar to authenticate and deliver one or more Restricted Notes of the same aggregate principal amount as the Restricted Note to be exchanged, such instructions to contain the name or authorized denomination or denominations of the Restricted Notes to be so issued and appropriate delivery instructions, (3) a certificate from the Holder of the Restricted Note to be exchanged in the form of Exhibit C attached hereto, and (4) such other certifications, legal opinions or other information as the Company may reasonably require to confirm that such transfer is being made pursuant to an exemption from, or in a transaction not subject to, the registration requirements of the Securities Act, then the Registrar shall cancel or cause to be canceled such Restricted Note and concurrently therewith, the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, one or more Restricted Notes of the same aggregate principal amount, in accordance with the instructions referred to above. (b) Upon any sale of a Note bearing the Restricted Notes Legend (or any interest in a Global Note subject to the Restricted Notes Legend) pursuant to Rule 144 under the Securities Act or an effective registration statement under the Securities Act: (i) (A) in the case of any Note that is a certificated Note or a beneficial interest in a Global Note, the Registrar shall permit the Holder thereof to exchange such Note or interest for a certificated Note or a beneficial interest in a Global Note, as the case may be, that does not bear or is subject to, as the case may be, the legend set forth above and rescind any restriction on the transfer of such Note or interest (1) in the case of a sale or transfer pursuant to Rule 144 under the Securities Act, upon delivery to the Company such satisfactory evidence, which may include an opinion of counsel licensed to practice law in the State of New York, as may be reasonably required by the Company, that neither the legend nor the restrictions on transfer set forth therein are required to ensure that transfers thereof comply with the provisions of Rule 144A, Rule 144, Regulation S or any other available exemption from registration under the Securities Act or, with respect to Restricted Notes, that such Notes are not "restricted" within the meaning of Rule 144 under the Securities Act or (2) in the case of a sale or transfer pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act; and (ii) any Global Note shall not be subject to the Restricted Notes Legend (such sales or transfers being subject only to the provisions of Section 2.06(a)(i) and Section 2.01(d)). Upon provision of such satisfactory evidence, the Trustee, at the direction of the Company, shall authenticate and deliver Notes that do not bear the Restricted Notes Legend. 14
(c) Neither the Company nor the Trustee shall have any responsibility for any actions taken or not taken by the Depositary and the Company shall have no responsibility for any actions taken or not taken by the Trustee as agent or custodian of the Depositary. (d) Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, neither the Trustee nor the Registrar shall be responsible for ascertaining whether any purchase or transfer complies with the registration provisions of or exemptions from the Securities Act, Rule 144A, Rule 144, Regulation S, or any applicable state securities laws; provided, that if a certificate or other written representation is specifically required by the express terms of this Section 2.06 to be delivered to the Registrar or Trustee by a transferee of a Note prior to registration of such transfer, the Trustee or Registrar, as the case may be, shall be under a duty to receive and examine the same to determine whether it conforms on its face to the requirements of this Section 2.06. (e) Transfers of any Notes in certificated form not bearing the Restricted Notes Legend shall not be subject to the restrictions and requirements set forth in Section 2.06(a)(iv). (f) Any transfer or exchange of a Note in certificated form shall be accompanied by surrender of the certificated Note, endorsed or accompanied by an instrument of transfer acceptable to the Registrar, executed by the Holder or an attorney in fact acting on its behalf. SECTION 2.07. REPLACEMENT NOTES. If the Holder of a Note claims that the Note has been lost, destroyed or wrongfully taken or if such Note is mutilated and is surrendered to the Trustee, the Company shall issue and the Trustee shall authenticate a replacement Note if the Trustee's and the Company's requirements are met. If required by the Trustee or the Company, an indemnity bond must be supplied by the Holder that is sufficient in the judgment of both to protect the Company, the Trustee, any Agent or any authenticating agent from any loss which any of them may suffer if a Note is replaced. The Company may charge for its expenses in replacing a Note. In case any such mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Note has become or is about to become due and payable, or is about to be purchased by the Company pursuant to Article III hereof, the Company in its discretion may, instead of issuing a new Note, pay or purchase such Note, as the case may be. Every replacement Note is an additional obligation of the Company and shall be entitled to all of the benefits of this Indenture equally and proportionately with all other Notes duly issued hereunder. SECTION 2.08. OUTSTANDING NOTES. The Notes outstanding at any time are all the Notes authenticated by the Trustee except for those canceled by it, those delivered to it for cancellation, and those described in this Section as not outstanding. 15
If a Note is replaced pursuant to Section 2.07 hereof, paid, purchased, redeemed, repurchased or converted, it ceases to be outstanding unless the Trustee receives proof satisfactory to it that the replaced, paid, purchased, redeemed, repurchased or converted Note is held by a bona fide purchaser. If the principal amount of any Note is considered paid under Section 4.01 hereof, it ceases to be outstanding and interest on it ceases to accrue. Except as set forth in Section 2.09 hereof, a Note does not cease to be outstanding because the Company or an Affiliate of the Company holds the Note. SECTION 2.09. TREASURY NOTES. In determining whether the Holders of the required principal amount of Notes have concurred in any direction, waiver or consent, Notes owned by the Company or an Affiliate of the Company shall be considered as though they are not outstanding, except that for the purposes of determining whether the Trustee shall be protected in relying on any such direction, waiver or consent, only Notes that the Trustee knows are so owned shall be so disregarded. SECTION 2.10. TEMPORARY NOTES; GLOBAL NOTES. (a) Until definitive Notes are ready for delivery, the Company may prepare and the Trustee shall authenticate temporary Notes. Temporary Notes shall be substantially in the form of definitive Notes but may have variations that the Company considers appropriate for temporary Notes. Without unreasonable delay, the Company shall prepare and the Trustee shall authenticate definitive Notes in exchange for temporary Notes. Holders of temporary Notes shall be entitled to all of the benefits of this Indenture. (b) A Global Note deposited with the Depositary or with the Trustee as custodian for the Depositary pursuant to Section 2.01 shall be transferred to the beneficial owners thereof in the form of certificated Notes only (i) in accordance with Section 2.01(d), and (ii) provided that such transfer complies with the applicable provisions of Section 2.06(b). (c) Any Global Note that is re-issued to the beneficial owners thereof in the form of certificated Notes pursuant to Section 2.01(d) and this Section 2.10 shall be surrendered by the Depositary to the Trustee to be so transferred without charge, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, upon such transfer of each portion of such Global Note, an equal aggregate principal amount of Notes of authorized denominations in the form of certificated Notes. Any portion of a Global Note transferred pursuant to this Section 2.10 shall be executed, authenticated and delivered as the Depositary shall direct. Any Note in the form of certificated Notes delivered in exchange for an interest in the Global Notes shall, except as otherwise provided by Section 2.06(b), bear the Restricted Notes Legend set forth in Exhibit A hereto. (d) Upon the occurrence of any of the events set forth in Section 2.01(d) requiring the issuance of certificated Notes in place of all beneficial interests in Global Notes then outstanding, the Company will promptly make available to the Trustee a reasonable supply of certificated Notes in definitive, fully registered form without interest coupons. 16
SECTION 2.11. CANCELLATION. The Company at any time may deliver Notes to the Trustee for cancellation. The Registrar, Paying Agent and Conversion Agent shall forward to the Trustee any Notes surrendered to them for registration of transfer, exchange or payment. The Trustee shall promptly cancel all Notes surrendered for registration of transfer, exchange, payment, conversion, replacement or cancellation and shall dispose of canceled Notes as the Company directs. The Company may not issue new Notes to replace Notes that it has paid or that have been delivered to the Trustee for cancellation. SECTION 2.12. DEFAULTED INTEREST. If the Company fails to make a payment of interest on the Notes, it shall pay such defaulted interest plus any interest payable on the defaulted interest, in any lawful manner. It may pay such defaulted interest, plus any such interest payable on it, to the Persons who are Holders on a subsequent special record date. The Company shall fix any such record date and payment date, provided that no such record date shall be less than 10 days prior to the related payment date for such defaulted interest. At least 15 days before any such record date, the Company shall mail to Holders a notice that states the special record date, the related payment date and amount of such interest to be paid. SECTION 2.13. CUSIP NUMBERS. The Company in issuing the Notes may use "CUSIP" numbers (if then generally in use), and, if so, the Trustee shall use "CUSIP" numbers in notices of redemption and other notices as a convenience to holders of Notes; provided, that any such notice may state that no representation is made as to the correctness of such numbers either as printed on the Notes or as contained in any notice of a redemption or notice of a Purchase Offer and that reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers printed on the Notes, and any redemption or Purchase Offer shall not be affected by any defect in or omission of such numbers. The Company will promptly notify the Trustee of any change in the "CUSIP" numbers. ARTICLE III REDEMPTION SECTION 3.01. NOTICES TO TRUSTEE. If the Company elects to redeem Notes pursuant to the optional redemption provisions of the Notes and Section 3.07 hereof, it shall notify the Trustee in writing of the redemption date and the principal amount of Notes to be redeemed. The Company shall give the notice provided for in this Section 3.01 at least 45 days before the redemption date, unless a shorter notice period shall be satisfactory to the Trustee. The Company may not give notice of any redemption if the Company has defaulted in payment of interest and the default is continuing. SECTION 3.02. SELECTION OF NOTES TO BE REDEEMED. 17
If less than all of the Notes are to be redeemed at any time, selection of Notes for redemption will be made by the Trustee in compliance with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Notes are listed. In the absence of any requirements of any securities exchange or if the Notes are not listed, selection of the Notes to be redeemed will be made by lot, on a pro rata basis or by any other method the Trustee considers fair and appropriate, provided that no Notes of $1,000 or less will be redeemed in part. The Trustee shall make the selection not more than 60 days and not less than 30 days before the redemption date from Notes outstanding not previously called for redemption. Notes and portions of Notes selected shall be in amounts of $1,000 or integral multiples of $1,000. Provisions of this Indenture that apply to Notes called for redemption also apply to portions of Notes called for redemption. The Trustee shall notify the Company promptly of the Notes or portions of Notes to be called for redemption. If any Note selected for partial redemption is converted in part after such selection, the converted portion of such Note shall be deemed (so far as may be) to be the portion to be selected for redemption. The Notes (or portions thereof) so selected shall be deemed duly selected for redemption for all purposes hereunder, notwithstanding that any such Note is converted in whole or in part before the mailing of the notice of redemption. Upon any redemption of less than all the Notes, the Company and the Trustee may treat as outstanding any Notes surrendered for conversion during the period 15 days next preceding the mailing of a notice of redemption and need not treat as outstanding any Note authenticated and delivered during such period in exchange for the unconverted portion of any Note converted in part during such period. SECTION 3.03. NOTICE OF REDEMPTION. At least 30 days but not more than 60 days before a redemption date, the Company shall mail, by first class mail, a notice of redemption to each Holder whose Notes are to be redeemed at its registered address. The notice shall identify the Notes to be redeemed and shall state: (a) the redemption date; (b) the redemption price; (c) if any Note is to be redeemed in part only, the portion of the principal amount thereof redeemed, and that, after the redemption date, upon surrender of such Note, a new Note in principal amount equal to the unredeemed portion thereof shall be issued in the name of the Holder thereof upon cancellation of the original Note; (d) the name and address of the Paying Agent; (e) that Notes called for redemption must be surrendered to the Paying Agent to collect the redemption price plus accrued interest, if any; (f) that interest on Notes called for redemption ceases to accrue on and after the redemption date; 18
(g) the paragraph of the Notes pursuant to which the Notes called for redemption are being redeemed; and (h) the "CUSIP" number of the Notes to be redeemed; and (i) the current Conversion Price and the date on which the right to convert such Notes or portions thereof into Common Stock of the Company will expire. At the Company's request, the Trustee shall give notice of redemption in the Company's name and at the Company's expense; provided that the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee, at least 45 days prior to the redemption date, an Officers' Certificate requesting that the Trustee give such notice and setting forth the information to be stated in such notice, as provided in the preceding paragraph. SECTION 3.04. EFFECT OF NOTICE OF REDEMPTION. Once notice of redemption is mailed in accordance with Section 3.03 hereof, Notes called for redemption become due and payable on the redemption date at the price set forth in the Note. A notice of redemption may not be conditional. SECTION 3.05. DEPOSIT OF REDEMPTION PRICE. On or before 1:00 pm (Boston time) on the redemption date, the Company shall deposit with the Trustee or with the Paying Agent money (in immediately available funds) sufficient to pay the redemption price of and accrued interest on all Notes to be redeemed on that date unless theretofore converted into Common Stock pursuant to the provisions hereof. The Trustee or the Paying Agent shall return to the Company any money not required for that purpose. SECTION 3.06. NOTES REDEEMED IN PART. Upon surrender of a Note that is redeemed in part, the Company shall issue and the Trustee shall authenticate for the Holder at the expense of the Company a new Note equal in principal amount to the unredeemed portion of the Note surrendered. SECTION 3.07. OPTIONAL REDEMPTION. The Company may redeem all or any portion of the Notes, upon the terms and at the redemption prices set forth in the Notes. Any redemption pursuant to this Section 3.07 shall be made pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.01 through 3.06 hereof. SECTION 3.08. MANDATORY REDEMPTION. Except as set forth in Section 6.01 and 6.02, the Company shall not be required to make mandatory redemption payments. The Company shall not be required to make sinking fund payments with respect to the Notes. SECTION 3.09. PURCHASE OFFER. 19
(a) In the event that, pursuant to Section 6.02 hereof, the Company shall commence an offer to all Holders of the Notes to purchase Notes (the "PURCHASE OFFER"), the Company shall follow the procedures in this Section 3.09. (b) The Purchase Offer shall remain open for a period specified by the Company which shall be no less than 30 calendar days and no more than 45 calendar days following its commencement (the "COMMENCEMENT DATE") (as determined in accordance with Section 6.02 hereof), except to the extent that a longer period is required by applicable law (the "TENDER PERIOD"). Upon the expiration of the Tender Period (the "PURCHASE DATE"), the Company shall purchase the principal amount of all of the Notes required to be purchased pursuant to Section 6.02 hereof (the "OFFER AMOUNT"). (c) If the Purchase Date is on or after an interest payment record date and on or before the related interest payment date, any accrued interest shall be paid to the Person in whose name a Note is registered at the close of business on such record date, and no additional interest will be payable to Holders who tender Notes pursuant to the Purchase Offer. (d) The Company shall provide the Trustee with written notice of the Purchase Offer at least 10 days before the Commencement Date. (e) On or before the 30th day after a Change in Control occurs, the Company or the Trustee (at the written request and expense of the Company, the Company having provided to the Trustee the requisite information therefor) shall send, by first class mail, a notice to the Trustee and each of the Holders, which shall govern the terms of the Purchase Offer and shall state: (i) that the Purchase Offer is being made pursuant to this Section 3.09 and Section 6.02 hereof, that all Notes validly tendered will be accepted for payment and the length of time the Purchase Offer will remain open; (ii) the purchase price (as determined in accordance with Section 6.02 hereof) and the Purchase Date, and that all Notes validly tendered will be accepted for payment; (iii) that any Note or portion thereof not validly tendered or accepted for payment will continue to accrue interest; (iv) that, unless the Company defaults in the payment of the purchase price, any Note or portion thereof accepted for payment pursuant to the Purchase Offer will cease to accrue interest after the Purchase Date; (v) that Holders electing to have a Note or portion thereof purchased pursuant to any Purchase Offer will be required to surrender the Note, with the form entitled "Option of Holder to Elect Purchase" on the reverse of the Note completed, to the Company, a depositary, if appointed by the Company, or a Paying Agent at the address specified in the notice prior to the close of business on the third Business Day preceding the Purchase Date; 20
(vi) that Holders will be entitled to withdraw their election if the Company, depositary or Paying Agent, as the case may be, receives, not later than the close of business on the second Business Day preceding the Purchase Date, or such longer period as may be required by law, a letter or a telegram, telex or facsimile transmission (receipt of which is confirmed and promptly followed by a letter) setting forth the name of the Holder, the principal amount of the Note or portion thereof the Holder delivered for purchase and a statement that such Holder is withdrawing his election to have the Note or portion thereof purchased; (vii) that Holders whose Notes were purchased only in part will be issued new Notes equal in principal amount to the unpurchased portion of the Notes surrendered, which unpurchased portion must be equal to $1,000 or an integral multiple thereof in principal amount, and (viii) the "CUSIP" number of the Notes to be purchased. (f) On or prior to 1:00 pm (Boston time) on the Purchase Date, the Company shall irrevocably deposit with the Trustee or a Paying Agent in immediately available funds an amount equal to the Offer Amount to be held for payment in accordance with the terms of this Section 3.09. On the Purchase Date, the Company shall, to the extent lawful, (i) accept for payment the Notes or portions thereof properly tendered pursuant to the Purchase Offer, (ii) deliver or cause the Depositary or Paying Agent to deliver to the Trustee Notes so accepted and (iii) deliver to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate stating such Notes or portions thereof have been accepted for payment by the Company in accordance with the terms of this Section 3.09. The Depositary, the Paying Agent or the Company, as the case may be, shall promptly (but in any case not later than ten (10) calendar days after the Purchase Date) mail or deliver to each tendering Holder an amount equal to the purchase price of the Notes tendered by such Holder and accepted by the Company for purchase, and the Trustee shall promptly authenticate and mail or deliver to such Holders a new Note equal in principal amount to any unpurchased portion of the Note surrendered, provided that each new Note will be in a principal amount of $1,000 or an integral multiple thereof. Any Notes not so accepted shall be promptly mailed or delivered by or on behalf of the Company to the Holder thereof. The Company will publicly announce in a newspaper of general circulation the results of the Purchase Offer on or as soon as practicable after the Purchase Date. The Purchase Offer shall be made by the Company in compliance with all applicable provisions of the Exchange Act, and all applicable tender offer rules promulgated thereunder, and shall include all instructions and materials necessary to enable such Holders to tender their Notes. The Company's obligation to make a Purchase Offer will be satisfied if a third party makes the Purchase Offer in the manner and at the times and otherwise in compliance in all material respects with the requirements applicable to a Purchase Offer made by us and purchases all Notes properly tendered and not withdrawn under the Purchase Offer. ARTICLE IV COVENANTS 21
SECTION 4.01. PAYMENT OF NOTES. The Company shall pay the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on, the Notes on the dates and in the manner provided in the Notes. Principal, premium, if any, and interest shall be considered paid on the date due if the Paying Agent (other than the Company or an Affiliate of the Company) holds on that date money designated for and sufficient to pay all principal, premium, if any, and interest then due. To the extent lawful, the Company shall pay interest (including post-petition interest in any proceeding under any Bankruptcy Law) on (i) overdue principal and premium, if any, at the rate borne by the Notes, compounded semiannually; and (ii) overdue installments of interest (without regard to any applicable grace period) at the same rate, compounded semiannually. Whenever in this Indenture or the Notes there is mentioned, in any context, the payment of principal (and premium, if any), Offer Amount, interest or any other amount payable under or with respect to any Note, such mention shall be deemed to include mention of the payment of Special Interest provided for in Section 2 of the Notes to the extent that, in such context, Special Interest is, was or would be payable in respect thereof pursuant to the provisions of Section 2 of the Notes, and express mention of the payment of Special Interest (if applicable) in any provisions hereof shall not be construed as excluding Special Interest in those provisions hereof where such express mention is not made (if applicable). SECTION 4.02. REPORTS. Whether or not required by the rules and regulations of the SEC, so long as any Notes are outstanding, the Company shall file with the SEC and furnish to the Trustee, all quarterly and annual financial information required to be contained in a filing with the SEC on Forms 10-Q and 10-K, including a "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Results of Operations and Financial Condition" and, with respect to the annual information only, a report thereon by the Company's certified independent accountants, in each case, as required by the rules and regulations of the SEC as in effect on the Issuance Date. The Trustee shall be under no obligation or duty to review such reports, such delivery to it being for the purpose of having the same on file with the Trustee and available for examination. SECTION 4.03. COMPLIANCE CERTIFICATE. The Company shall deliver to the Trustee, within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, an Officers' Certificate stating that a review of the activities of the Company and its subsidiaries during the preceding fiscal year has been made under the supervision of the signing Officers with a view to determining whether the Company has kept, observed, performed and fulfilled its obligations under, and complied with the covenants and conditions contained in, this Indenture, and further stating, as to each such Officer signing such certificate, that to the best of his knowledge the Company has kept, observed, performed and fulfilled each and every covenant, and complied with the covenants and conditions contained in this Indenture and is not in default in the performance or observance of any of the terms, provisions and conditions hereof (or, if a Default or Event of Default shall have occurred, describing all such Defaults or Events of Default of which he may have knowledge) and that to the best of his knowledge no event has 22
occurred and remains in existence by reason of which payments on account of the principal or of interest, if any, on the Notes are prohibited. One of the Officers signing such Officers' Certificate shall be either the Company's principal executive officer, principal financial officer or principal accounting officer. The Company will, so long as any of the Notes are outstanding, deliver to the Trustee forthwith upon becoming aware of any Default or Event of Default, an Officers' Certificate specifying such Default or Event of Default. Immediately upon the occurrence of any Registration Default giving rise to Special Interest or the cure of any such Registration Default, the Company shall give the Trustee written notice thereof and of the event giving rise to such Registration Default or the cure of any such Registration Default (such notice to be contained in an Officers' Certificate) and prior to receipt of such Officers' Certificate the Trustee shall be entitled to assume that no such Registration Default has occurred or been cured, as the case may be. SECTION 4.04. STAY, EXTENSION AND USURY LAWS. The Company covenants (to the extent that it may lawfully do so) that it will not at any time insist upon, plead, or in any manner whatsoever claim or take the benefit or advantage of, any stay, extension or usury law wherever enacted, now or at any time hereafter in force, which may affect the covenants or the performance of this Indenture; and the Company (to the extent it may lawfully do so) hereby expressly waives all benefit or advantage of any such law, and covenants that it will not, by resort to any such law, hinder, delay or impede the execution of any power herein granted to the Trustee, but will suffer and permit the execution of every such power as though no such law had been enacted. SECTION 4.05. CORPORATE EXISTENCE. Subject to Article VII hereof, to the extent permitted by law the Company will do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve and keep in full force and effect its corporate existence and the corporate, partnership or other existence of each subsidiary of the Company in accordance with the respective organizational documents of each subsidiary and the rights (charter and statutory), licenses and franchises of the Company; provided, however, that the Company shall not be required to preserve any such right, license or franchise, or the corporate, partnership or other existence of any subsidiary, if the preservation thereof is no longer desirable in the conduct of the business of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole. SECTION 4.06. TAXES. The Company shall, and shall cause each of its subsidiaries to, pay prior to delinquency all material taxes, assessments and governmental levies, except as contested in good faith and by appropriate proceedings. SECTION 4.07. [Reserved.]. SECTION 4.08. LIMITATION ON STATUS AS INVESTMENT COMPANY. 23
The Company shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to, conduct its business in a fashion that would cause the Company to be required to be registered as an "investment company" (as that term is defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended). SECTION 4.09. SPECIAL INTEREST. If Special Interest is payable by the Company pursuant to Section 2 of the Notes, the Company shall deliver to the Trustee a certificate to that effect stating (i) the amount of such Special Interest that is payable and (ii) the date on which such Special Interest is payable. Unless and until a Trust Officer of the Trustee receives such a certificate, the Trustee may assume without inquiry that no such Special Interest is payable. If the Company has paid Special Interest directly to the persons entitled to it, the Company shall deliver to the Trustee a certificate setting forth the particulars of such payment. ARTICLE V CONVERSION SECTION 5.01. CONVERSION PRIVILEGE. A Holder of a Note may convert it into fully paid and nonassessable shares of Common Stock as provided in Section 12 of the Note, except that, with respect to any Note called for redemption, such conversion right shall terminate at the close of business on the second Business Day immediately preceding the redemption date (unless the Company shall default in making the redemption payment when it becomes due, in which case the conversion right shall terminate on the date such default is cured). The number of shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of a Note is determined by dividing the principal amount of such Note by the conversion price in effect on the Conversion Date (the "CONVERSION PRICE"). The initial Conversion Price is stated in Section 12 of the Notes and is subject to adjustment as provided in this Article V. A Holder may convert a portion of a Note equal to any integral multiple of $1,000. Provisions of this Indenture that apply to conversion of all of a Note also apply to conversion of a portion of it. The Trustee shall have no duty to make the calculations described in Section 12(iv) of the Notes or to determine whether the Notes are convertible pursuant to such Section. For the avoidance of doubt, the Company shall make the calculations described in Section 12(iv) of the Note, using the Trading Price provided by the Trustee. The Trustee shall be entitled at its sole discretion to consult with the Company and to request the assistance of the Company in connection with the Trustee's duties and obligations pursuant to Section 12(iv) of the Note (including without limitation the calculation or determination of the Trading Price), and the Company agrees, if requested by the Trustee, to cooperate with, and provide assistance to, the Trustee in carrying out its duties under Section 24
12(iv) of the Note; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to relieve the Trustee of its duties pursuant to Section 12(iv) of the Note. SECTION 5.02. CONVERSION PROCEDURE. To convert a Note, a Holder must satisfy the requirements in Section 12 of the Notes. The date on which the Holder satisfies all of those requirements is the conversion date (the "CONVERSION DATE"). As soon as practicable after the Conversion Date, the Company shall deliver to the Holder through the Conversion Agent a certificate for the number of whole shares of Common Stock issuable upon the conversion and a check for any fractional share determined pursuant to Section 5.03 hereof. The Person in whose name the certificate is registered shall become the stockholder of record on the Conversion Date and, as of such date, such Person's rights as a Holder of Notes hereunder shall cease (such Person's rights as a Holder of Transfer Restricted Securities, if any, under the Registration Rights Agreement, however, shall continue so long as such Person holds such Transfer Restricted Securities); provided, however, that no surrender of a Note on any date when the stock transfer books of the Company shall be closed shall be effective to constitute the Person entitled to receive the shares of Common Stock upon such conversion as the stockholder of record of such shares of Common Stock on such date, but such surrender shall be effective to constitute the Person entitled to receive such shares of Common Stock as the stockholder of record thereof for all purposes at the close of business on the next succeeding day on which such stock transfer books are open; provided further, however, that such conversion shall be at the Conversion Price in effect on the date that such Note shall have been surrendered for conversion, as if the stock transfer books of the Company had not been closed. If any Notes are converted during the period after any record date but before the next interest payment date, interest on such Notes will be paid on the next interest payment date, notwithstanding such conversion, to the Holder on the record date of such Notes. However, any Notes that are delivered to the Company for conversion after any record date but before the next interest payment date must, except as described in the next sentence, be accompanied by a payment equal to the interest payable (but excluding Special Interest, if any) on such interest payment date on the principal amount of Notes being converted. Payment of such an amount to the Company will not be required if, during that period between a record date and the next interest payment date, the Notes are delivered for conversion on or after the date that the Company has issued a notice of redemption notice and prior to the date of redemption. If any Notes are converted after an interest payment date but on or before the next record date, no interest will be paid on those convertible notes. If a Holder converts more than one Note at the same time, the number of whole shares of Common Stock issuable upon the conversion shall be based on the total principal amount of Notes converted. Upon surrender of a Note that is converted in part, the Trustee shall authenticate for the Holder a new Note equal in principal amount to the unconverted portion of the Note surrendered. SECTION 5.03. FRACTIONAL SHARES. 25
The Company will not issue fractional shares of Common Stock upon conversion of a Note. In lieu thereof, the Company will pay an amount in cash based upon the Sale Price of the Common Stock on the trading day prior to the date of conversion. SECTION 5.04. TAXES ON CONVERSION. The issuance of certificates for shares of Common Stock upon the conversion of any Note shall be made without charge to the converting Holder for such certificates or for any tax in respect of the issuance of such certificates, and such certificates shall be issued in the respective names of, or in such names as may be directed by, the Holder or Holders of the converted Note; provided, however, that in the event that certificates for shares of Common Stock are to be issued in a name other than the name of the Holder of the Note converted, such Note, when surrendered for conversion, shall be accompanied by an instrument of transfer, in form satisfactory to the Company, duly executed by the registered Holder thereof or his duly authorized attorney; and provided further, however, that the Company shall not be required to pay any tax which may be payable in respect of any transfer involved in the issuance and delivery of any such certificates in a name other than that of the Holder of the converted Note, and the Company shall not be required to issue or deliver such certificates unless or until the Person or Persons requesting the issuance thereof shall have paid to the Company the amount of such tax or shall have established to the satisfaction of the Company that such tax has been paid or is not applicable. SECTION 5.05. COMPANY TO PROVIDE STOCK. The Company shall at all times reserve and keep available, free from preemptive rights, out of its authorized but unissued Common Stock, solely for the purpose of issuance upon conversion of Notes as herein provided, a sufficient number of shares of Common Stock to permit the conversion of all outstanding Notes for shares of Common Stock. All shares of Common Stock which may be issued upon conversion of the Notes shall be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable when so issued. Shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of a Restricted Note shall bear such restrictive legends as the Company shall provide in accordance with applicable law. If shares of Common Stock are to be issued upon conversion of a Restricted Note and they are to be registered in a name other than that of the holder of such Restricted Note, then the Person in whose name such shares of Common Stock are to be registered must deliver to the Trustee a certificate satisfactory to the Company and signed by such Person as to compliance with the restrictions on transfer contained in such restrictive legends. SECTION 5.06. ADJUSTMENT OF CONVERSION PRICE. The Conversion Price shall be subject to adjustment from time to time as follows: (a) In case the Company shall (1) pay a dividend in shares of Common Stock to holders of Common Stock, (2) make a distribution in shares of Common Stock to holders of Common Stock, (3) subdivide its outstanding shares of Common Stock into a greater number of shares of Common Stock or (4) combine its outstanding shares of Common Stock into a smaller number of shares of Common Stock, the Conversion Price in effect immediately prior to such action shall be adjusted so that the Holder of any Note thereafter surrendered for conversion shall 26
be entitled to receive the number of shares of Common Stock which he would have owned immediately following such action had such Notes been converted immediately prior thereto. Any adjustment made pursuant to this subsection (a) shall become effective immediately after the record date in the case of a dividend or distribution and shall become effective immediately after the effective date in the case of a subdivision or combination. (b) In case the Company shall issue rights or warrants to substantially all holders of Common Stock entitling them (for a period commencing no earlier than the record date for the determination of holders of Common Stock entitled to receive such rights or warrants and expiring not more than 45 days after such record date) to subscribe for or purchase shares of Common Stock (or securities convertible into Common Stock) at a price per share less than the Current Market Price (as determined pursuant to subsection (f) below) of the Common Stock on such record date, the Conversion Price shall be adjusted so that the same shall equal the price determined by multiplying the Conversion Price in effect immediately prior to such record date by a fraction of which the numerator shall be the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding on such record date, plus the number of shares of Common Stock which the aggregate offering price of the offered shares of Common Stock (or the aggregate conversion price of the convertible securities so offered) would purchase at such Current Market Price, and of which the denominator shall be the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding on such record date plus the number of additional shares of Common Stock offered (or into which the convertible securities so offered are convertible). Such adjustments shall become effective immediately after such record date. (c) In case the Company shall distribute to all holders of Common Stock shares of capital stock of the Company other than Common Stock, evidences of indebtedness or other assets (other than cash dividends out of current or retained earnings), or shall distribute to substantially all holders of Common Stock rights or warrants to subscribe for securities (other than those referred to in subsection (b) above), then in each such case the Conversion Price shall be adjusted so that the same shall equal the price determined by multiplying the Conversion Price in effect immediately prior to the date of such distribution by a fraction of which the numerator shall be the Current Market Price (determined as provided in subsection (f) below) of the Common Stock on the record date mentioned below less the then fair market value (as determined by the Board of Directors, whose determination shall be conclusive evidence of such fair market value and described in a Board Resolution) of the portion of the assets so distributed or of such subscription rights or warrants applicable to one share of Common Stock, and of which the denominator shall be such Current Market Price of the Common Stock. Such adjustment shall become effective immediately after the record date for the determination of the holders of Common Stock entitled to receive such distribution. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that the Company shall distribute rights or warrants (other than those referred to in subsection (b) above) ("RIGHTS") pro rata to holders of Common Stock, the Company may, in lieu of making any adjustment pursuant to this Section 5.06, make proper provision so that each Holder of a Note who converts such Note (or any portion thereof) after the record date for such distribution and prior to the expiration or redemption of the Rights shall be entitled to receive upon such conversion, in addition to the shares of Common Stock issuable upon such conversion (the "CONVERSION SHARES"), a number of Rights to be determined as follows: (i) if such conversion occurs on or prior to the date for the distribution to the holders of Rights of separate 27
certificates evidencing such Rights (the "DISTRIBUTION DATE"), the same number of Rights to which a holder of a number of shares of Common Stock equal to the number of Conversion Shares is entitled at the time of such conversion in accordance with the terms and provisions of and applicable to the Rights; and (ii) if such conversion occurs after the Distribution Date, the same number of Rights to which a holder of the number of shares of Common Stock into which the principal amount of the Note so converted was convertible immediately prior to the Distribution Date would have been entitled on the Distribution Date in accordance with the terms and provisions of and applicable to the Rights. (d) In case the Company shall, by dividend or otherwise, at any time distribute to all holders of its Common Stock cash (including any distributions of cash out of current or retained earnings of the Company but excluding any cash that is distributed as part of a distribution requiring a Conversion Price adjustment pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section 5.06) the Conversion Price shall be reduced so that the same shall equal the price determined by multiplying such Conversion Price in effect immediately prior to the effectiveness of the Conversion Price reduction contemplated by this paragraph (d) by a fraction of which the numerator shall be the Current Market Price per share (determined as provided in paragraph (f) of this Section 5.06) of the Common Stock on the date fixed for determining the stockholders entitled to such distribution (the "DISTRIBUTION RECORD DATE") less the amount of such cash so distributed applicable to one share (based on the pro rata portion of the aggregate amount of such cash, divided by the shares of Common Stock outstanding on the Distribution Record Date) of Common Stock and the denominator shall be such Current Market Price per share (determined as provided in paragraph (f) of this Section 5.06) of the Common Stock on the Distribution Record Date, such reduction to become effective immediately prior to the opening of business on the day following the Distribution Record Date. (e) In case a tender offer or other negotiated transaction made by the Company or any Subsidiary for all or any portion of the Common Stock shall be consummated, if an Excess Payment is made in respect of such tender offer or other negotiated transaction, the Conversion Price shall be reduced so that the same shall equal the price determined by multiplying such Conversion Price in effect immediately prior to the effectiveness of the Conversion Price reduction contemplated by this paragraph (e) by a fraction of which the numerator shall be the Current Market Price per share (determined as provided in paragraph (f) of this Section 5.06) of the Common Stock on the date of payment of such current negotiated transaction consideration or expiration of such current tender offer, as the case may be (the "ADJUSTMENT PURCHASE DATE") less the amount of such Excess Payments (based on the pro rata portion of the aggregate amount of such Excess Payments, divided by the shares of Common Stock outstanding on the Adjustment Purchase Date) of Common Stock and the denominator shall be such Current Market Price per share (determined as provided in paragraph (f) of this Section 5.06) of the Common Stock on the Adjustment Purchase Date, such reduction to become effective immediately prior to the opening of business on the day following the Adjustment Purchase Date. (f) The "Current Market Price" per share of Common Stock on any date shall be deemed to be the average of the Sale Prices for the shorter of (i) ten consecutive trading days ending on the last full trading day on the exchange or market referred to in determining 28
such Sale Prices prior to the time of determination or (ii) the period commencing on the date next succeeding the first public announcement of the issuance of such rights or such warrants or such other distribution or such negotiated transaction through such last full trading day on the exchange or market referred to in determining such Sale Prices prior to the time of determination. (g) In any case in which this Section 5.06 shall require that an adjustment be made immediately following a record date, the Company may elect to defer (but only until five Business Days following the filing by the Company with the Trustee of the certificate described in Section 5.10 hereof) issuing to the Holder of any Note converted after such record date the shares of Common Stock and other Capital Stock of the Company issuable upon such conversion over and above the shares of Common Stock and other Capital Stock of the Company issuable upon such conversion only on the basis of the Conversion Price prior to adjustment; and, in lieu of the shares the issuance of which is so deferred, the Company shall issue or cause its transfer agents to issue due bills or other appropriate evidence of the right to receive such shares. SECTION 5.07. NO ADJUSTMENT. No adjustment in the Conversion Price shall be required until cumulative adjustments amount to 1.0% or more of the Conversion Price as last adjusted; provided, however, that any adjustments which by reason of this Section 5.07 are not required to be made shall be carried forward and taken into account in any subsequent adjustment. All calculations under this Article V shall be made to the nearest cent or to the nearest one-hundredth of a share, as the case may be. No adjustment need be made for rights to purchase Common Stock pursuant to a Company plan for reinvestment of dividends or interest. No adjustment need be made for a change in the par value or no par value of the Common Stock. SECTION 5.08. OTHER ADJUSTMENTS. (a) In the event that, as a result of an adjustment made pursuant to Section 5.06 hereof, the Holder of any Note thereafter surrendered for conversion shall become entitled to receive any shares of Capital Stock of the Company other than shares of its Common Stock, thereafter the Conversion Price of such other shares so receivable upon conversion of any Note shall be subject to adjustment from time to time in a manner and on terms as nearly equivalent as practicable to the provisions with respect to Common Stock contained in this Article V. (b) In the event that shares of Common Stock are not delivered after the expiration of any of the rights or warrants referred to in Section 5.06(b) and Section 5.06(c) hereof, the Conversion Price shall be readjusted to the Conversion Price which would otherwise be in effect had the adjustment made upon the issuance of such rights or warrants been made on the basis of delivery of only the number of shares of Common Stock actually delivered. SECTION 5.09. ADJUSTMENTS FOR TAX PURPOSES. The Company may make such reductions in the Conversion Price, in addition to those required by Section 5.06 hereof, as it determines to be advisable in order that any stock dividend, subdivision of shares, distribution or rights to purchase stock or securities or distribution of 29
securities convertible into or exchangeable for stock made by the Company to its stockholders will not be taxable to the recipients thereof. SECTION 5.10. NOTICE OF ADJUSTMENT. Whenever the Conversion Price is adjusted, the Company shall promptly mail to Holders at the addresses appearing on the Registrar's books a notice of the adjustment and file with the Trustee an Officers' Certificate briefly stating the facts requiring the adjustment and the manner of computing it. The certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the correctness of such adjustment. Unless and until a Trust Officer of the Trustee shall receive written notice of an adjustment of the Conversion Price, the Trustee may assume without inquiry that the Conversion Price has not been adjusted and that the last Conversion Price of which it has knowledge remains in effect. SECTION 5.11. NOTICE OF CERTAIN TRANSACTIONS. In the event that: (1) the Company takes any action which would require an adjustment in the Conversion Price; (2) the Company takes any action that would require a supplemental indenture pursuant to Section 5.12; or (3) there is a dissolution or liquidation of the Company; the Company shall mail to Holders at the addresses appearing on the Registrar's books and the Trustee a notice stating the proposed record or effective date, as the case may be, to permit a Holder of a Note to convert such Note into shares of Common Stock prior to the record date for or the effective date of the transaction in order to receive the rights, warrants, securities or assets which a Holder of shares of Common Stock on that date may receive. The Company shall mail the notice at least 15 days before such date; however, failure to mail such notice or any defect therein shall not affect the validity of any transaction referred to in clause (1), (2) or (3) of this Section 5.11. SECTION 5.12. EFFECT OF RECLASSIFICATIONS, CONSOLIDATIONS, MERGERS OR SALES ON CONVERSION PRIVILEGE. If any of the following shall occur, namely: (i) any reclassification or change of outstanding shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of Notes (other than a change in par value, or from par value to no par value, or from no par value to par value, or as a result of a subdivision or combination), (ii) any consolidation or merger to which the Company is a party other than a merger in which the Company is the continuing corporation and which does not result in any reclassification of, or change (other than a change in name, or par value, or from par value to no par value, or from no par value to par value or as a result of a subdivision or combination) in, outstanding shares of Common Stock or (iii) any sale or conveyance of all or substantially all of the property or business of the Company as an entirety, then the Company, or 30
such successor or purchasing corporation, as the case may be, shall, as a condition precedent to such reclassification, change, consolidation, merger, sale or conveyance, execute and deliver to the Trustee a supplemental indenture in form reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee providing that the Holder of each Note then outstanding shall have the right to convert such Note into the kind and amount of shares of stock and other securities and property (including cash) receivable upon such reclassification, change, consolidation, merger, sale or conveyance by a holder of the number of shares of Common Stock deliverable upon conversion of such Note immediately prior to such reclassification, change, consolidation, merger, sale or conveyance. Such supplemental indenture shall provide for adjustments of the Conversion Price which shall be as nearly equivalent as may be practicable to the adjustments of the Conversion Price provided for in this Article V. The foregoing, however, shall not in any way affect the right a Holder of a Note may otherwise have, pursuant to clause (ii) of the last sentence of subsection (c) of Section 5.06 hereof, to receive Rights upon conversion of a Note. If in the case of any such consolidation, merger, sale or conveyance, the stock or other securities and property (including cash) receivable thereupon by a holder of Common Stock includes shares of stock or other securities and property of a corporation other than the successor or purchasing corporation, as the case may be, in such consolidation, merger, sale or conveyance, then such supplemental indenture shall also be executed by such other corporation and shall contain such additional provisions to protect the interests of the Holders of the Notes as the Board of Directors of the Company shall reasonably consider necessary by reason of the foregoing. The provision of this Section 5.12 shall similarly apply to successive consolidations, mergers, sales or conveyances. In the event the Company shall execute a supplemental indenture pursuant to this Section 5.12, the Company shall promptly file with the Trustee an Officers' Certificate briefly stating the reasons therefor, the kind or amount of shares of stock or securities or property (including cash) receivable by Holders of the Notes upon the conversion of their Notes after any such reclassification, change, consolidation, merger, sale or conveyance and any adjustment to be made with respect thereto. SECTION 5.13. TRUSTEE'S DISCLAIMER. The Trustee has no duty to determine when an adjustment under this Article V should be made, how it should be made or what such adjustment should be, but may accept as conclusive evidence of the correctness of any such adjustment, and shall be protected in relying upon the Officers' Certificate with respect thereto which the Company is obligated to file with the Trustee pursuant to Section 5.10 hereof. The Trustee makes no representation as to the validity or value of any securities or assets issued upon conversion of Notes, and the Trustee shall not be responsible for the Company's failure to comply with any provisions of this Article V. The Trustee shall not be under any responsibility to determine the correctness of any provisions contained in any supplemental indenture executed pursuant to Section 5.12, but may accept as conclusive evidence of the correctness thereof, and shall be protected in relying upon, the Officers' Certificate with respect thereto which the Company is obligated to file with the Trustee pursuant to Section 5.12 hereof. 31
ARTICLE VI REPURCHASES OF NOTES SECTION 6.01. REPURCHASES OF NOTES AT THE OPTION OF THE HOLDER. (a) Notes shall be purchased by the Company at the option of the Holder on December 15, 2010, December 15, 2013, December 15, 2018, December 15, 2023 and December 15, 2028 (each an "OPTION PURCHASE DATE") at a price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be purchased plus any accrued and unpaid interest to such Option Purchase Date (the "PURCHASE PRICE"). Purchases of Notes hereunder shall be made, at the option of the Holder thereof, upon: (1) delivery to the Paying Agent by the Holder of a written notice of purchase (an "OPTION PURCHASE NOTICE") during the period beginning at any time from the opening of business on the date that is 20 Business Days prior to the relevant Option Purchase Date until the close of business two Business Days prior to such Option Purchase Date stating: a. the certificate number of the Note which the Holder will deliver to be purchased or the appropriate Depositary procedures, as applicable, b. the portion of the principal amount of the Note which the Holder will deliver to be purchased, which portion must be in principal amount of $1,000 or an integral multiple thereof, if less than all of the Notes are being repurchased, c. that such Note shall be purchased by the Company as of the Option Purchase Date pursuant to the terms and conditions specified in Section 10 of the Note and in this Indenture, and (2) Delivery of such Note to the Paying Agent prior to, on or after the Option Purchase Date at the offices of the Paying Agent, such delivery being a condition to receipt by the Holder of the Purchase Price therefor; provided, however, that such Purchase Price shall be paid pursuant to this Section 6.01 only if the Note so delivered to the Paying Agent shall conform in all respects to the description thereof in the related Option Purchase Notice. The Company shall purchase from the Holder thereof, pursuant to this Section 6.01, a portion of a Note, only if the principal amount of such portion is $1,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000. Provisions of this Indenture that apply to the purchase of all of a Note also apply to the purchase of such portion of such Note. Any purchase by the Company contemplated pursuant to the provisions of this Section 6.01 shall be consummated by the delivery of the consideration to be received by the Holder promptly following the later of the Option Purchase Date and the time of delivery of the Note. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, any Holder delivering to the Paying Agent the Option Purchase Notice contemplated by this Section 6.01(a) shall have the right to 32
withdraw such Option Purchase Notice at any time prior to the close of business two Business Days prior to the Option Purchase Date by delivery of a written notice of withdrawal to the Paying Agent specifying (i) the certificate number, if any, of the Note in respect of which such notice of withdrawal is being submitted, (ii) the principal amount of the Note with respect to which such notice of withdrawal is being submitted or otherwise comply with the appropriate Depositary procedures, and (iii) the principal amount, if any, of such Note which remains subject to the original Option Purchase Notice and which has been or will be delivered for purchase by the Company. The Paying Agent shall promptly notify the Company of the receipt by it of any Option Purchase Notice or written notice of withdrawal thereof. (b) The Notes to be purchased on any Option Purchase Date pursuant to Section 6.01(a) shall be paid for in U.S. legal tender ("cash"). At least one Business Day before each Company Notice Date (as defined below), the Company shall deliver an Officers' Certificate to the Trustee specifying: (i) the information required by Section 6.01(d) in the Company Notice, (ii) whether the Company desires the Trustee to give the Company Notice required by Section 6.01(d), and (iii) the principal amount of the Notes plus accrued and unpaid interest. (c) The Company Notice, as provided in Section 6.01(d), shall be sent to Holders not less than 20 Business Days prior to such Option Purchase Date (the "COMPANY NOTICE DATE"). (d) In connection with any purchase of Notes pursuant to Section 10 of the Notes, the Company shall give notice to Holders setting forth information specified in this Section 6.01(d) (the "COMPANY NOTICE"). Each Company Notice shall include a form of Option Purchase Notice to be completed by a Holder and shall state: (i) the Purchase Price; (ii) the name and address of the Paying Agent and the Conversion Agent; (iii) that Notes as to which an Option Purchase Notice has been given may be converted, if they are otherwise convertible pursuant to Article V hereof and Section 12 of the Notes, if the applicable Option Purchase Notice has been withdrawn in accordance with the terms of this Indenture; (iv) that Notes must be surrendered to the Paying Agent to collect payment; 33
(v) that the Purchase Price for any security as to which an Option Purchase Notice has been given and not withdrawn will be paid promptly following the later of the Option Purchase Date and the time of surrender of such Note as described in clause (iv); (vi) the procedures the Holder must follow to exercise its rights under this Section 6.01 and a brief description of those rights; (vii) briefly, the conversion rights of the Notes; (viii) the procedures for withdrawing an Option Purchase Notice; (ix) that, unless the Company defaults in making payment on Notes for which an Option Purchase Notice has been submitted, interest, if any, on such Notes will cease to accrue on the Option Purchase Date; and (x) the CUSIP number and ISIN number of the Notes. At the Company's request, the Trustee shall give such Company Notice in the Company's name and at the Company's expense; provided, however, that, in all cases, the text of such Company Notice shall be prepared by the Company. (e) The Company shall deposit cash at the time and in the manner as provided in Section 6.04, sufficient to pay the aggregate Purchase Price of all Notes to be purchased pursuant to this Section 6.01. SECTION 6.02. REPURCHASE OF NOTES UPON A CHANGE IN CONTROL (a) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control, each Holder of Notes shall have the right to require the Company to repurchase all or any part (equal to $1,000 or an integral multiple thereof) of such Holder's Notes pursuant to the Purchase Offer at a purchase price equal to 100% of the principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest to the date of purchase (the "CHANGE IN CONTROL PAYMENT"). (b) On or before the 30th day following any Change in Control, the Company shall give written notice to the Trustee and shall mail to each Holder the notice provided by Section 3.09(e). SECTION 6.03. EFFECT OF OPTION PURCHASE NOTICE Upon receipt by the Paying Agent of the Option Purchase Notice specified in Section 6.01(a), the Holder of the Note in respect of which such Option Purchase Notice was given shall (unless such Option Purchase Notice is withdrawn) thereafter be entitled to receive solely the Purchase Price with respect to such Note. Such Purchase Price shall be paid to such Holder, subject to receipts of funds by the Paying Agent, as soon as practicable following the later of (x) the Option Purchase Date with respect to such Note (provided the conditions in Section 6.01(a) have been satisfied) and (y) the time of delivery of such Note to the Paying Agent by the Holder 34
thereof in the manner required by Section 6.01(a). Notes in respect of which an Option Purchase Notice has been given by the Holder thereof may not be converted pursuant to Article V hereof on or after the date of the delivery of such Option Purchase Notice unless such Option Purchase Notice has first been validly withdrawn. SECTION 6.04. DEPOSIT OF PURCHASE PRICE Prior to 10:00 a.m. (local time in the City of New York) on the Option Purchase Date, the Company shall deposit with the Trustee or with the Paying Agent (or, if the Company or a Subsidiary or an Affiliate of either of them is acting as the Paying Agent, shall segregate and hold in trust) an amount of cash (in immediately available funds if deposited on such Business Day) sufficient to pay the aggregate Option Purchase Price of all the Notes or portions thereof which are to be purchased as of the Option Purchase Date. SECTION 6.05. SECURITIES PURCHASED IN PART. Any certificated Note which is to be purchased only in part shall be surrendered at the office of the Paying Agent (with, if the Company or the Trustee so requires, due endorsement by, or a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Trustee duly executed by, the Holder thereof or such Holder's attorney duly authorized in writing) and the Company shall execute and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver to the Holder of such Note, without service charge, a new Note or Notes, of any authorized denomination as requested by such Holder in aggregate principal amount equal to, and in exchange for, the portion of the principal amount of the Note so surrendered which is not purchased. SECTION 6.06. COVENANT TO COMPLY WITH SECURITIES LAWS When complying with the provisions of Article VI hereof (provided that such offer or purchase constitutes an "issuer tender offer" for purposes of Rule 13e-4 (which term, as used herein, includes any successor provision thereto) under the Exchange Act at the time of such offer or purchase), the Company shall (i) comply with Rule 13e-4 and Rule 14e-1 (or any successor provision) under the Exchange Act, if applicable (ii) file the related Schedule TO (or any successor schedule, form or report) under the Exchange Act, if applicable, and (iii) otherwise comply with all Federal and state securities laws so as to permit the rights and obligations under Article VI to be exercised in the time and in the manner specified. SECTION 6.07. OTHER PROVISIONS SUBJECT HERETO The Trustee and the Paying Agent shall return to the Company any cash that remains unclaimed as provide in Section 5 of the Note, together with interest, if any, thereon (subject to the provisions of Section 9.01(f)), held by them for the payment of the Purchase Price; provided, however; that to the extent that the aggregate amount of cash deposited by the Company pursuant to Section 6.04 exceeds the aggregate Purchase Price of the Notes or portions thereof which the Company is obligated to purchase as of the Option Purchase Date, then, unless otherwise agreed in writing with the Company, promptly after the Business Day following the Option Purchase Date, the Trustee shall return any such excess to the Company together with interest, if any, thereon (subject to the provisions of Section 9.01(f)). 35
ARTICLE VII SUCCESSORS SECTION 7.01. LIMITATION ON MERGER, SALE OR CONSOLIDATION. The Company may not, directly or indirectly, consolidate with or merge with or into, or sell, lease or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its assets, on a consolidated basis, whether in a single transaction or a series of related transactions, to another person or group of affiliated persons, other than to its Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries, unless: (a) either: (i) in the case of a merger or consolidation, the Company is the surviving entity; or (ii) the resulting, surviving or transferee entity is a corporation organized under the laws of the United States, any state thereof or the District of Columbia and expressly assumes by supplemental indenture all of the Company's obligations in connection with the Notes and the Indenture; and (b) no Default or Event of Default shall exist immediately before or after giving effect on a pro forma basis to such transaction. Upon any permitted consolidation or merger or any permitted sale, lease or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company in accordance with the foregoing, the successor corporation formed by such consolidation or into which the Company is merged or to which such sale, lease or other disposition is made, shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under the Indenture with the same effect as if such successor corporation had been named therein in the same manner as the Company is named, and when a successor corporation duly assumes all of the obligations of the Company pursuant hereto and pursuant to the Notes, the Company will be released from its obligations under the Indenture and the Notes, except as to any obligations that arise from or as a result of such transaction. For purposes of the foregoing, the transfer, by lease, assignment, sale or otherwise, of all or substantially all of the properties and assets of one or more Subsidiaries, which properties and assets, if held by the Company instead of such Subsidiary, would constitute all or substantially all of the Company's properties and assets, shall be deemed to be the transfer of all or substantially all of the Company's properties and assets. This Section 7.01 will not apply to a sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance or other disposition of assets between or among the Company and any of its Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries. SECTION 7.02. SUCCESSOR CORPORATION SUBSTITUTED. Upon any consolidation or merger, or any sale, assignment, transfer, lease, conveyance or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company undertaken in accordance with Section 7.01 hereof, the successor corporation formed by such consolidation or into or with which the Company is merged or to which such sale, assignment, transfer, lease, conveyance or other disposition is made shall succeed to, and be substituted for and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under this Indenture with the same effect as if such successor Person has been named as the Company herein. 36
ARTICLE VIII DEFAULTS AND REMEDIES SECTION 8.01. EVENTS OF DEFAULT. An "EVENT OF DEFAULT" occurs if: (a) the Company defaults in the payment of interest on any Note when the same becomes due and payable and the Default continues for a period of 30 days after the date due and payable; (b) the Company defaults in the payment of the principal of any Note when the same becomes due and payable at maturity, upon optional redemption, in connection with a repurchase of Notes at the option of a Holder under Section 6.01 or 6.02 hereof, upon declaration or otherwise; (c) the Company fails to observe or perform for a period of 30 days after notice from the Trustee to the Company any covenant or agreement contained in Article VI and Section 7.01 hereof (other than, in the case of Sections 6.01 and 6.02, a failure to repurchase Notes at the option of a Holder) hereof; (d) the Company fails to observe or perform any other covenant or agreement contained in this Indenture or the Notes, required by it to be performed and the failure continues for a period of 60 days after notice from the Trustee to the Company or from the Holders of 25% in aggregate principal amount of the then outstanding Notes to the Company and the Trustee stating that such notice is a "Notice of Default"; (e) the failure by the Company or any Significant Subsidiary to make any payment at final stated maturity, including any applicable grace period, in respect of its Indebtedness (other than non-recourse obligations) in an amount in excess of $15 million, and continuance of such failure for 30 days after written notice is given to the Company by the Trustee or to the Company and the Trustee by the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of Notes outstanding stating that such notice is a "Notice of Default". (f) A default by the Company or any Significant Subsidiary with respect to any of the Company's Indebtedness (other than non-recourse obligations), which default results in the acceleration of Indebtedness in an amount in excess of $15 million. (g) failure by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that is a Significant Subsidiary or any group of two or more Subsidiaries that, taken as a whole, would constitute a Significant Subsidiary to pay final judgments for the payment of money (other than any judgment as to which a reputable insurance company has accepted liability subject to customary terms) aggregating in excess of $5.0 million, which judgments are not paid, discharged or stayed within 60 days after their entry; 37
(h) the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that is a Significant Subsidiary or any group of two or more Subsidiaries that, taken as a whole, would constitute a Significant Subsidiary pursuant to or within the meaning of any Bankruptcy Law: (i) commences a voluntary case; (ii) consents to the entry of an order for relief against it in an involuntary case in which it is the debtor; (iii) consents to the appointment of a Custodian of it or for all or substantially all of its property; (iv) makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors; or (v) generally is unable to pay its debts as the same become due; or (i) a court of competent jurisdiction enters an order or decree under any Bankruptcy Law that: a. is for relief against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that is a Significant Subsidiary or any group of two or more Subsidiaries that, taken as a whole, would constitute a Significant Subsidiary in an involuntary case; b. appoints a Custodian of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that is a Significant Subsidiary or any group of two or more Subsidiaries that, taken as a whole, would constitute a Significant Subsidiary or for all or substantially all of its property; c. orders the liquidation of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that is a Significant Subsidiary or any group of two or more Subsidiaries that, taken as a whole, would constitute a Significant Subsidiary, and the order or decree remains unstayed and in effect for 60 days after entry thereof. The term "BANKRUPTCY LAW" means Title 11, U.S. Code or any similar Federal, state or foreign law for the relief of debtors or the protection of creditors. The term "CUSTODIAN" means any receiver, trustee, assignee, liquidator or similar official under any Bankruptcy Law. SECTION 8.02. ACCELERATION. If an Event of Default (other than an Event of Default specified in clauses (h) or (i) of Section 8.01 hereof) occurs and is continuing, the Trustee by notice to the Company, or the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the then outstanding Notes by notice to the Company and the Trustee, may declare all the Notes to be due and payable. Upon such declaration, the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes shall be due and payable immediately. If an Event of Default specified in clause (h) or (i) of Section 8.01 hereof occurs, 38
such an amount shall ipso facto become and be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act on the part of the Trustee or any Holder. If the Notes have been declared due and payable as a result of the acceleration of Indebtedness prior to its express maturity pursuant to Section 8.01(f), such declaration shall be automatically rescinded if the holders of such Indebtedness have rescinded or annulled the declaration of acceleration in respect of that Indebtedness or such Indebtedness has been discharged within 30 days after such acceleration in accordance with the mortgage, indenture or instrument under which it was issued and if (i) the rescission would not conflict with any judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction and (ii) all existing Events of Default have been cured or waived except nonpayment of principal or interest on the Notes that has become due solely because of the acceleration of the Notes. Except as otherwise provided in the immediately preceding paragraph, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the then outstanding Notes by notice to the Trustee may rescind an acceleration and its consequences (i) if the rescission would not conflict with any judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction and (ii) if all existing Events of Default have been cured or waived except nonpayment of principal or interest on the Notes that has become due solely because of the acceleration of the Notes. SECTION 8.03. OTHER REMEDIES. If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may pursue any available remedy to collect the payment of principal or interest on the Notes or to enforce the performance of any provision of the Notes or this Indenture. The Trustee may maintain a proceeding even if it does not possess any of the Notes or does not produce any of them in the proceeding. A delay or omission by the Trustee or any Holder in exercising any right or remedy accruing upon an Event of Default shall not impair the right or remedy or constitute a waiver of or acquiescence in the Event of Default. All remedies are cumulative to the extent permitted by law. SECTION 8.04. WAIVER OF PAST DEFAULTS. The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes by notice to the Trustee may on behalf of all of the Holders of the Notes waive an existing Default or Event of Default and its consequences except a continuing Default or Event of Default in the payment of the principal of or interest on any Note. When a Default or Event of Default is waived, it is cured and ceases; but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other Default or impair any right consequent thereon. SECTION 8.05. CONTROL BY MAJORITY. The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes may direct the time, method and place of conducting any proceeding for any remedy available to the Trustee or exercising any trust or power conferred on it. However, the Trustee may refuse to follow any 39
direction that conflicts with law or this Indenture, is unduly prejudicial to the rights of other Holders, or would involve the Trustee in personal liability. SECTION 8.06. LIMITATION ON SUITS. A Holder may pursue a remedy with respect to this Indenture or the Notes only if: (a) the Holder gives to the Trustee notice of a continuing Event of Default; (b) the Holders of at least 25% in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes make a request to the Trustee to pursue the remedy; (c) such Holder or Holders offer to the Trustee indemnity satisfactory to the Trustee against any loss, liability or expense; (d) the Trustee does not comply with the request within 60 days after receipt of the request and the offer of indemnity; and (e) during such 60-day period the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes do not give the Trustee a direction inconsistent with the request. A Holder may not use this Indenture to prejudice the rights of another Holder or to obtain a preference or priority over another Holder. SECTION 8.07. RIGHTS OF HOLDERS TO RECEIVE PAYMENT. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Indenture, the right of any Holder of a Note to receive payment of principal, and interest on the Note, on or after the respective due dates expressed in the Note, or to bring suit for the enforcement of any such payment on or after such respective dates, shall not be impaired or affected without the consent of the Holder. SECTION 8.08. COLLECTION SUIT BY TRUSTEE. If an Event of Default specified in Section 8.01(a) or (b), hereof occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may recover judgment in its own name and as trustee of an express trust against the Company for the whole amount of principal and interest remaining unpaid on the Notes and interest on overdue principal and interest and such further amount as shall be sufficient to cover the costs and, to the extent lawful, expenses of collection, including the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel. SECTION 8.09. TRUSTEE MAY FILE PROOFS OF CLAIM. The Trustee may file such proofs of claim and other papers or documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Trustee and the Holders allowed in any judicial proceedings relative to the Company, its creditors or its property. Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to authorize the Trustee to authorize or consent to or accept or adopt on behalf of any Holder any plan of reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition 40
affecting the Notes or the rights of any Holder thereof, or to authorize the Trustee to vote in respect of the claim of any Holder in any such proceeding. SECTION 8.10. PRIORITIES. If the Trustee collects any money pursuant to this Article, it shall pay out the money in the following order: First: to the Trustee for amounts due under Section 9.07 hereof; Second: to Holders for amounts due and unpaid on the Notes for principal and interest (and Special Interest, if applicable), ratably, without preference or priority of any kind, according to the amounts due and payable on the Notes for principal and interest, respectively; and Third: to the Company. The Trustee may fix a record date and payment date for any payment to Holders made pursuant to this Section 8.10. SECTION 8.11. UNDERTAKING FOR COSTS. In any suit for the enforcement of any right or remedy under this Indenture or in any suit against the Trustee for any action taken or omitted by it as a Trustee, a court in its discretion may require the filing by any party litigant in the suit of an undertaking to pay the costs of the suit, and the court in its discretion may assess reasonable costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, against any party litigant in the suit, having due regard to the merits and good faith of the claims or defenses made by the party litigant. This Section 8.11 does not apply to a suit by the Trustee, a suit by a Holder pursuant to Section 8.07 hereof, or a suit by Holders of more than 10% in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes. ARTICLE IX TRUSTEE SECTION 9.01. DUTIES OF TRUSTEE. (a) If an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Trustee shall exercise such of the rights and powers vested in it by this Indenture, and use the same degree of care and skill in their exercise, as a prudent man would exercise or use under the circumstances in the conduct of his own affairs. (b) Except during the continuance of an Event of Default: (i) the Trustee need perform only those duties that are specifically set forth in this Indenture and no others and (ii) in the absence of bad faith on its part, the Trustee may conclusively rely, as to the truth of the statements and the correctness of the opinions expressed therein, upon certificates or opinions furnished to the Trustee and conforming to the requirements of this Indenture. However, the Trustee shall examine the certificates and opinions to determine whether or not they conform on their face to the requirements of this Indenture. 41
(c) The Trustee may not be relieved from liability for its own negligent action, its own negligent failure to act, or its own willful misconduct, except that: (i) this paragraph does not limit the effect of paragraph (b) of this Section 9.01; (ii) the Trustee shall not be liable for any error of judgment made in good faith by a Trust Officer, unless it is proved that the Trustee was negligent in ascertaining the pertinent facts and (iii) the Trustee shall not be liable with respect to any action it takes or omits to take in good faith in accordance with a direction received by it pursuant to Section 8.05 hereof. (d) Every provision of this Indenture that in any way relates to the Trustee is subject to paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this Section 9.01. (e) The Trustee may refuse to perform any duty or exercise any right or power (including, without limitation, as requested or directed by a Holder) unless it receives indemnity satisfactory to it against any loss, liability or expense. (f) The Trustee shall not be liable for interest on any money received by it except as the Trustee may agree in writing with the Company. Money held in trust by the Trustee need not be segregated from other funds except to the extent required by law. SECTION 9.02. RIGHTS OF TRUSTEE. (a) The Trustee may rely on any document believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper Person. The Trustee need not investigate any fact or matter stated in the document. (b) Before the Trustee acts or refrains from acting, it may require an Officers' Certificate or an Opinion of Counsel, or both. The Trustee shall not be liable for any action it takes or omits to take in good faith in reliance on such Officers' Certificate or Opinion of Counsel. (c) The Trustee may act through agents and shall not be responsible for the misconduct or negligence of any agent appointed with due care. (d) The Trustee shall not be liable for any action it takes or omits to take in good faith which it believes to be authorized or within its rights or powers. (e) The Trustee shall not be charged with knowledge of any Event of Default under subsections (c), through (i) (and subsection (a) or (b) if the Trustee does not act as Paying Agent) of Section 8.01 or of the identity of any Significant Subsidiary or of any group of two or more Subsidiaries that, taken as a whole, would constitute a Significant Subsidiary unless either (1) a Trust Officer of the Trustee assigned to its corporate trust department shall have actual knowledge thereof, or (2) the Trustee shall have received written notice thereof in accordance with Section 12.02 hereof from the Company or any Holder. (f) The grant of any permissive rights, power or authority hereunder to the Trustee shall not be construed to be a duty. 42
SECTION 9.03. INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS OF TRUSTEE. The Trustee in its individual or any other capacity may become the owner or pledgee of Notes and may otherwise deal with the Company or an Affiliate with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee. Any Agent may do the same with like rights. However, the Trustee is subject to Sections 9.10 and 9.11 hereof. SECTION 9.04. TRUSTEE'S DISCLAIMER. The Trustee makes no representation as to the validity or adequacy of this Indenture or the Notes, it shall not be accountable for the Company's use of the proceeds from the Notes, and it shall not be responsible for any statement of the Company in the Indenture or any statement in the Notes other than its authentication or for compliance by the Company with the Registration Rights Agreement. SECTION 9.05. NOTICE OF DEFAULTS. If a Default or Event of Default occurs and is continuing and if it is known to the Trustee, the Trustee shall mail to Holders a notice of the Default or Event of Default within 90 days after it occurs. Except in the case of a Default or Event of Default in payment on any Note, the Trustee may withhold the notice if and so long as a committee of its Trust Officers in good faith determines that withholding the notice is in the interests of Holders. SECTION 9.06. REPORTS BY TRUSTEE TO HOLDERS. Within 60 days after the reporting date stated in Section 12.10, the Trustee shall mail to Holders a brief report dated as of such reporting date that complies with TIA Section 313(a) if and to the extent required by such Section 313(a). The Trustee also shall comply with TIA Section 313(b)(2). The Trustee shall also transmit by mail all reports as required by TIA Section 313(c). A copy of each report at the time of its mailing to Holders shall be filed with the SEC and each stock exchange on which the Notes are listed. The Company shall notify the Trustee when the Notes are listed on any stock exchange. SECTION 9.07. COMPENSATION AND INDEMNITY. The Company shall pay to the Trustee from time to time reasonable compensation for its services hereunder as to which the Company and the Trustee shall from time to time mutually agree in writing. The Trustee's compensation shall not be limited by any law on compensation of a trustee of an express trust. The Company shall reimburse the Trustee upon request for all reasonable disbursements, expenses and advances incurred or made by it. Such disbursements and expenses may include the reasonable disbursements, compensation and expenses of the Trustee's agents and counsel. The Company shall indemnify the Trustee against any claims, demands, expenses (including but not limited to reasonable compensation, fees, disbursements and expenses of the 43
Trustee's agents and counsel), losses, damages or liabilities incurred by it, except as set forth in the next paragraph, arising out of, related to, or in connection with the acceptance or administration of this trust and its rights or duties hereunder, including the reasonable costs and expenses, and the costs and expenses of enforcing this Indenture (including this Section 9.07) against the Company and of defending itself against any claim (whether asserted by the Company, or any Holder or any other person) or liability in connection with the exercise or performance of any of its powers or duties hereunder. The Trustee shall notify the Company promptly of any claim for which it may seek indemnity. The Company shall defend the claim and the Trustee shall cooperate in the defense. The Trustee may have separate counsel and the Company shall pay the reasonable fees, disbursements and expenses of such counsel. The Company need not pay for any settlement made without its consent, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. The Company need not reimburse any expense or indemnify against any loss or liability incurred by the Trustee through the Trustee's negligence or bad faith. To secure the Company's payment obligations in this Section 9.07, the Trustee shall have a lien prior to the Notes on all money or property held or collected by the Trustee, except money or property held in trust to pay principal and interest on particular Notes. Without prejudice to any other rights available to the Trustee under applicable law, when the Trustee incurs expenses or renders services after an Event of Default specified in Section 8.01(h) or (i) hereof occurs, the expenses and the compensation for the services are intended to constitute expenses of administration under any Bankruptcy Law. All amounts owing to the Trustee under this Section 9.07 shall be payable by the Company in United States dollars. SECTION 9.08. REPLACEMENT OF TRUSTEE. A resignation or removal of the Trustee and appointment of a successor Trustee shall become effective only upon the successor Trustee's acceptance of appointment as provided in this Section 9.08. The Trustee may resign by so notifying the Company. The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes may remove the Trustee by so notifying the Trustee and the Company. The Company may remove the Trustee if: (a) the Trustee fails to comply with Section 9.10 hereof, unless the Trustee's duty to resign is stayed as provided in TIA Section 310(b); (b) the Trustee is adjudged a bankrupt or an insolvent or an order for relief is entered with respect to the Trustee under any Bankruptcy Law; (c) a Custodian or public officer takes charge of the Trustee or its property; or (d) the Trustee becomes incapable of acting. 44
If the Trustee resigns or is removed or if a vacancy exists in the office of Trustee for any reason, the Company shall promptly appoint a successor Trustee. Within one year after the successor Trustee takes office, the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes may appoint a successor Trustee to replace the successor Trustee appointed by the Company. If a successor Trustee does not take office within 60 days after the retiring Trustee resigns or is removed, the retiring Trustee, the Company or the Holders of at least 10% in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Trustee. If the Trustee fails to comply with Section 9.10 hereof, unless the Trustee's duty to resign is stayed as provided in TIA Section 310(b), any Holder who has been a bona fide Holder of a Note for at least six months may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the removal of the Trustee and the appointment of a successor Trustee. A successor Trustee shall deliver a written acceptance of its appointment to the retiring Trustee and to the Company. Thereupon the resignation or removal of the retiring Trustee shall become effective, and the successor Trustee shall have all the rights, powers and duties of the Trustee under this Indenture. The successor Trustee shall mail a notice of its succession to Holders. The retiring Trustee shall promptly transfer all property held by it as Trustee to the successor Trustee, subject to the lien provided for in Section 9.07 hereof. Notwithstanding replacement of the Trustee pursuant to this Section 9.08 hereof, the Company's obligations under Section 9.07 hereof shall continue for the benefit of the retiring trustee with respect to expenses and liabilities incurred by it prior to such replacement. SECTION 9.09. SUCCESSOR TRUSTEE BY MERGER, ETC. If the Trustee consolidates, merges or converts into, or transfers all or substantially all of its corporate trust business (including the administration of this Indenture) to, another corporation, the successor corporation without any further act shall be the successor Trustee. SECTION 9.10. ELIGIBILITY; DISQUALIFICATION. This Indenture shall always have a Trustee who satisfies the requirements of TIA Section 310(a)(1) and (5). The Trustee shall always have a combined capital and surplus as stated in Section 12.10 hereof. The Trustee is subject to TIA Section 310(b). SECTION 9.11. PREFERENTIAL COLLECTION OF CLAIMS AGAINST COMPANY. The Trustee is subject to TIA Section 311(a), excluding any creditor relationship listed in TIA Section 311(b). A Trustee who has resigned or been removed shall be subject to TIA Section 311(a) to the extent indicated therein. 45
ARTICLE X DISCHARGE OF INDENTURE SECTION 10.01. TERMINATION OF COMPANY'S OBLIGATIONS. This Indenture shall cease to be of further effect (except that the Company's obligations under Sections 9.07 and 10.02 hereof shall survive) when all outstanding Notes theretofore authenticated and issued have been delivered to the Trustee for cancellation and the Company has paid all sums payable hereunder. SECTION 10.02. REPAYMENT TO COMPANY. The Trustee and the Paying Agent shall promptly pay to the Company upon request any excess money or securities held by them at any time. The Trustee and the Paying Agent shall pay to the Company upon request any money held by them for the payment of principal or interest that remains unclaimed for two years after the date upon which such payment shall have become due (subject to the requirements of any abandoned property laws that may be applicable); provided, however, that the Company shall have first caused notice of such payment to the Company to be mailed to each Holder entitled thereto no less than 30 days prior to such payment. After payment to the Company, the Trustee and the Paying Agent shall have no further liability with respect to such money and Holders entitled to the money must look to the Company for payment as general creditors unless any applicable abandoned property law designates another Person. ARTICLE XI AMENDMENTS, SUPPLEMENTS AND WAIVERS SECTION 11.01. WITHOUT CONSENT OF HOLDERS. The Company and the Trustee may amend or supplement this Indenture or the Notes without the consent of any Holder: (a) to cure any ambiguity, defect or inconsistency; (b) to comply with Sections 5.12 and 7.01 hereof; (c) to provide for uncertificated Notes in addition to or in place of certificated Notes; (d) to make any change that provides additional rights or benefits to the Holders of the Notes; (e) to make any change that does not adversely affect the legal rights hereunder of any Holder; or (f) to qualify the Indenture under the TIA or to comply with the requirements of the SEC in order to maintain the qualification of the Indenture under the TIA. 46
SECTION 11.02. WITH CONSENT OF HOLDERS. Subject to Section 8.07 hereof, the Company and the Trustee may amend or supplement this Indenture or the Notes with the written consent of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes. Subject to Sections 8.04 and 8.07 hereof, the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Notes then outstanding may also waive noncompliance in a particular instance by the Company with any provision of this Indenture or the Notes. However, without the consent of each Holder affected, an amendment, supplement or waiver under this Section 11.02 may not: (a) reduce the principal amount of Notes whose Holders must consent to an amendment, supplement or waiver; (b) reduce the principal of or change the fixed maturity of any Note or alter the provisions of Section 7 of the Notes in a manner adverse to the Holders; (c) reduce the rate of or change the time for payment or accrual of interest on any Note; (d) waive a continuing default or Event of Default in the payment of the principal of or interest on any Note, except a rescission of acceleration of the Notes by the Holders of at least a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes and a waiver of the payment default that resulted from such acceleration; (e) make any Note payable in money other than that stated in the Note; (f) make any change in Section 8.04 or 8.07 hereof; (g) waive a redemption payment with respect to any Note; (h) impair the right to convert the Notes into Common Stock or to require the Company to repurchase the Notes at the option of the Holders; (i) modify Article V or VI in a manner adverse to the Holders of Notes; and (j) make any change in the foregoing amendment and waiver provisions of this Article XI. To secure a consent of the Holders under this Section 11.02, it shall not be necessary for the Holders to approve the particular form of any proposed amendment, supplement or waiver, but it shall be sufficient if such consent approves the substance thereof. After an amendment, supplement or waiver under this Section 11.02 becomes effective, the Company shall mail to Holders a notice briefly describing the amendment or waiver. SECTION 11.03. COMPLIANCE WITH TRUST INDENTURE ACT. 47
Every amendment to this Indenture or the Notes shall be set forth in a supplemental indenture that complies with the TIA as then in effect. SECTION 11.04. REVOCATION AND EFFECT OF CONSENTS. Until an amendment, supplement or waiver becomes effective, a consent to it by a Holder of a Note is a continuing consent by the Holder and every subsequent Holder of a Note or portion of a Note that evidences the same debt as the consenting Holder's Note, even if notation of the consent is not made on any Note. However, any such Holder or subsequent Holder may revoke the consent as to his Note or portion of a Note if the Trustee receives the notice of revocation before the date on which the Trustee receives an Officers' Certificate certifying that the Holders of the requisite principal amount of Notes have consented to the amendment, supplement or waiver. The Company may, but shall not be obligated to, fix a record date for the purpose of determining the Holders entitled to consent to any amendment, supplement or waiver. If a record date is fixed, then notwithstanding the provisions of the immediately preceding paragraph, those Persons who were Holders at such record date (or their duly designated proxies), and only those Persons, shall be entitled to consent to such amendment, supplement or waiver or to revoke any consent previously given, whether or not such Persons continue to be Holders after such record date. No consent shall be valid or effective for more than 90 days after such record date unless consents from Holders of the principal amount of Notes required hereunder for such amendment or waiver to be effective shall have also been given and not revoked within such 90-day period. After an amendment, supplement or waiver becomes effective it shall bind every Holder, unless it is of the type described in any of clauses (a) through (j) of Section 11.02 hereof. In such case, the amendment or waiver shall bind each Holder who has consented to it and every subsequent Holder that evidences the same debt as the consenting Holder's Note. SECTION 11.05. NOTATION ON OR EXCHANGE OF NOTES. The Trustee may place an appropriate notation about an amendment or waiver on any Note thereafter authenticated. The Company in exchange for all Notes may issue and the Trustee shall authenticate new Notes that reflect the amendment or waiver. Failure to make such notation on a Note or to issue a new Note as aforesaid shall not affect the validity and effect of such amendment or waiver. SECTION 11.06. TRUSTEE PROTECTED. The Trustee shall sign all supplemental indentures, except that the Trustee may, but need not, sign any supplemental indenture that adversely affects its rights, obligations or protections. Upon request by the Company to sign any amendment or supplement, the Trustee shall be entitled to request and receive from the Company, and to rely upon, an Opinion of Counsel and Officer's Certificate to the effect that such supplement or amendment is authorized or permitted under this Article XI. 48
ARTICLE XII MISCELLANEOUS SECTION 12.01. TRUST INDENTURE ACT CONTROLS. This Indenture is subject to the provisions of the TIA that are required to be incorporated into this Indenture (or, prior to the registration of the Notes pursuant to the Registration Rights Agreement, would be required to be incorporated into this Indenture if it were qualified under the TIA), and shall, to the extent applicable, be governed by such provisions. If any provision of this Indenture limits, qualifies, or conflicts with another provision which is required (or would be so required) to be incorporated in this Indenture by the TIA, the incorporated provision shall control. SECTION 12.02. NOTICES. Any notice or communication by the Company or the Trustee to the other is duly given if in writing and delivered in Person or mailed by first class mail to the other's address stated in Section 12.10 hereof. The Company or the Trustee by notice to the other may designate additional or different addresses for subsequent notices or communications. Any notice or communication to a Holder shall be mailed by first class mail to his address shown on the register kept by the Registrar. Failure to mail a notice or communication to a Holder or any defect in it shall not affect its sufficiency with respect to other Holders. If a notice or communication is mailed in the manner provided above within the time prescribed, it is duly given, whether or not the addressee receives it. If the Company mails a notice or communication to Holders, it shall mail a copy to the Trustee and each Agent at the same time. All other notices or communications shall be in writing. In case by reason of the suspension of regular mail service, or by reason of any other cause, it shall be impossible to mail any notice as required by the Indenture, then such method of notification as shall be made with the approval of the Trustee shall constitute a sufficient mailing of such notice. SECTION 12.03. COMMUNICATION BY HOLDERS WITH OTHER HOLDERS. Holders may communicate pursuant to TIA Section 312(b) with other Holders with respect to their rights under this Indenture or the Notes. The Company, the Trustee, the Registrar and anyone else shall have the protection of TIA Section 312(c). SECTION 12.04. CERTIFICATE AND OPINION AS TO CONDITIONS PRECEDENT. Upon any request or application by the Company to the Trustee to take any action under this Indenture, the Company shall furnish to the Trustee: 49
(a) an Officers' Certificate stating that, in the opinion of the signers, all conditions precedent, if any, provided for in this Indenture relating to the proposed action have been complied with; and (b) an Opinion of Counsel stating that, in the opinion of such counsel, all such conditions precedent have been complied with. SECTION 12.05. STATEMENTS REQUIRED IN CERTIFICATE OR OPINION. Each certificate or opinion with respect to compliance with a condition or covenant provided for in this Indenture (other than pursuant to Section 4.03) shall include: (a) a statement that the Person signing such certificate or rendering such opinion has read such covenant or condition; (b) a brief statement as to the nature and scope of the examination or investigation upon which the statements or opinions contained in such certificate or opinion are based; (c) a statement that, in the opinion of such Person, such Person has made such examination or investigation as is necessary to enable such Person to express an informed opinion as to whether or not such covenant or condition has been complied with; and (d) a statement as to whether or not, in the opinion of such Person, such condition or covenant has been complied with. SECTION 12.06. RULES BY TRUSTEE AND AGENTS. The Trustee may make reasonable rules for action by, or a meeting of, Holders. The Registrar or Paying Agent may make reasonable rules and set reasonable requirements for its functions. SECTION 12.07. LEGAL HOLIDAYS. A "LEGAL HOLIDAY" is a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which banking institutions in the State of New York or St. Paul, Minnesota are not required to be open. If a payment date is a Legal Holiday at a place of payment, payment may be made at that place on the next succeeding day that is not a Legal Holiday, and no interest shall accrue for the intervening period. If any other operative date for purposes of this Indenture shall occur on a Legal Holiday then for all purposes the next succeeding day that is not a Legal Holiday shall be such operative date. SECTION 12.08. NO RECOURSE AGAINST OTHERS. A director, officer, employee, incorporator or shareholder of the Company, as such, shall not have any liability for any Obligations of the Company under the Notes or this Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by reason of such Obligations or their creation. Each 50
Holder by accepting a Note waives and releases all such liability. The waiver and release are part of the consideration for the issue of the Notes. SECTION 12.09. COUNTERPARTS AND FACSIMILE SIGNATURES. This Indenture may be executed by manual or facsimile signature in any number of counterparts and by the parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement. SECTION 12.10. VARIABLE PROVISIONS. The first certificate pursuant to Section 4.03 hereof shall be for the fiscal year ended on December 31, 2003. The reporting date for Section 9.06 hereof is September 15, of each year. The first reporting date is September 15, 2004. The Trustee shall always have a combined capital and surplus of at least $100,000,000 as set forth in its most recent published annual report of condition. The Company's address is: Akamai Technologies, Inc. 8 Cambridge Center Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142 Attention: General Counsel The Trustee's address is: U.S. Bank National Association Corporate Trust Services 225 Asylum Street, 23rd Floor Hartford, CT 06103 Attn: Akamai Technologies, Inc. -- $175,000,000 Convertible Senior Notes due 2033 SECTION 12.11. GOVERNING LAW, SUBMISSION TO JURISDICTION. THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK SHALL GOVERN THIS INDENTURE AND THE NOTES. To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Company irrevocably submits to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any federal or state court in the Borough of Manhattan, City and State of New York, United States of America, in any suit or proceeding based on or arising under this Indenture and the Notes and irrevocably agrees that all claims in respect of such suit or proceeding may be determined in any such court. The Company irrevocably and fully waives 51
the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such suit or proceeding. The Company hereby irrevocably designates and appoints Corporation Service Company as the authorized agent of the Company upon whom process may be served in any such suit or proceeding (the "PROCESS AGENT"), it being understood that the designation and appointment of the Process Agent as such authorized agent shall become effective immediately without any further action on the part of the Company. The Company represents to the Trustee that it has notified the Process Agent of such designation and appointment and that the Process Agent has accepted the same. The Company hereby irrevocably authorizes and directs the Process Agent to accept such service. The Company further agrees that service of process upon the Process Agent shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon the Company in any such suit or proceeding. Nothing herein shall affect the right of the Trustee or any Holder to serve process in any other manner permitted by law. In the event that Corporation Service Company ceases to be the Process Agent, the Company agrees that it will take any and all action, including the execution and filing of any and all such documents and instruments as may be necessary to validly designate and appoint an alternate agent as Process Agent, and to maintain such designation and appointment in full force and effect so long as the Company has any outstanding obligations under this Indenture or the Notes, on terms that are reasonably acceptable to the Trustee. To the extent that the Company has or hereafter may acquire any immunity from jurisdiction of any court or from any legal process (whether through service of notice, attachment prior to judgment, attachment in aid of execution, execution or otherwise) with respect to itself or its property, the Company hereby irrevocably waives such immunity in respect of its obligations hereunder and thereunder, to the extent permitted by law. SECTION 12.12. NO ADVERSE INTERPRETATION OF OTHER AGREEMENTS. This Indenture may not be used to interpret another indenture, loan or debt agreement of the Company or an Affiliate. Any such indenture, loan or debt agreement may not be used to interpret this Indenture. SECTION 12.13. SUCCESSORS. All agreements of the Company in this Indenture and the Notes shall bind its successor. All agreements of the Trustee in this Indenture shall bind its successor. SECTION 12.14. SEVERABILITY. In case any provision in this Indenture or in the Notes shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby. SECTION 12.15. TABLE OF CONTENTS, HEADINGS, ETC. The Table of Contents, Cross-Reference Table, and headings of the Articles and Sections of this Indenture have been inserted for convenience of reference only, are not to be considered a part hereof, and shall in no way modify or restrict any of the terms or provisions hereof. 52
SIGNATURES IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Indenture to be duly executed, all as of the date first written above. AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC., as Company By: /s/ Robert Cobuzzi --------------------------------- Name: Robert Cobuzzi Title: Chief Financial Officer U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Trustee By: /s/ Chi C. Ma --------------------------------- Name: Chi C. Ma Title: Vice President 53
EXHIBIT A AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. [GLOBAL NOTES LEGEND] UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION ("DTC"), NEW YORK, NEW YORK, TO THE COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC (AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO., OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC) ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL INASMUCH AS THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN. TRANSFERS OF THIS GLOBAL NOTE SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS IN WHOLE, BUT NOT IN PART, TO NOMINEES OF DTC OR TO A SUCCESSOR THEREOF OR SUCH SUCCESSOR'S NOMINEE AND TRANSFERS OF PORTIONS OF THIS GLOBAL NOTE SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RESTRICTIONS SET FORTH IN THE INDENTURE REFERRED TO ON THE REVERSE HEREOF. [RESTRICTED NOTES LEGEND] THIS SECURITY (OR ITS PREDECESSOR) WAS ORIGINALLY ISSUED IN A TRANSACTION EXEMPT FROM REGISTRATION UNDER THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "SECURITIES ACT"), AND THIS SECURITY AND THE COMMON STOCK ISSUABLE UPON CONVERSION THEREOF MAY NOT BE OFFERED, SOLD OR OTHERWISE TRANSFERRED IN THE ABSENCE OF REGISTRATION OR AN APPLICABLE EXEMPTION THEREFROM. EACH PURCHASER OF THIS SECURITY IS HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT THE SELLER OF THIS SECURITY MAY BE RELYING ON THE EXEMPTION FROM THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 5 OF THE SECURITIES ACT PROVIDED BY RULE 144A THEREUNDER. THE HOLDER OF THIS SECURITY AGREES FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE COMPANY THAT (A) THIS SECURITY AND THE COMMON STOCK ISSUABLE UPON CONVERSION THEREOF MAY BE OFFERED, RESOLD, PLEDGED OR OTHERWISE TRANSFERRED, ONLY (I) IN THE UNITED STATES TO A PERSON WHOM THE SELLER REASONABLY BELIEVES IS A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER (AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A UNDER THE A-1
SECURITIES ACT) IN A TRANSACTION MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF RULE 144A, (II) OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES IN AN OFFSHORE TRANSACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH RULE 904 UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (III) PURSUANT TO AN EXEMPTION FROM REGISTRATION UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT PROVIDED BY RULE 144 THEREUNDER (IF AVAILABLE) OR (IV) PURSUANT TO AN EFFECTIVE REGISTRATION STATEMENT UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, IN EACH OF CASES (I) THROUGH (IV) IN ACCORDANCE WITH ANY APPLICABLE SECURITIES LAWS OF ANY STATE OF THE UNITED STATES, AND (B) THE HOLDER WILL, AND EACH SUBSEQUENT HOLDER IS REQUIRED TO, NOTIFY ANY PURCHASER OF THIS SECURITY FROM IT OF THE RESALE RESTRICTIONS REFERRED TO IN (A) ABOVE. IN ANY CASE, THE HOLDER HEREOF WILL NOT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, ENGAGE IN ANY HEDGING TRANSACTIONS WITH REGARD TO THIS SECURITY EXCEPT AS PERMITTED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT. AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. 1.0% CONVERTIBLE SENIOR NOTE DUE 2033 GLOBAL NOTE No. R-1 CUSIP No. ________ ISIN No. _________ $ _______________________ Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (hereinafter called the "Company", which term includes any successors under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of ___________________ dollars ($___________), on December 15, 2033. Interest Payment Dates: June 15 and December 15: commencing June 15, 2004. Record Dates: June 1 and December 1. Reference is made to the further provisions of this Note hereinafter set forth, which will, for all purposes, have the same effect as if set forth at this place. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this Instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal. A-2
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC., a Delaware corporation [Seal] By: ____________________________ Name: Title: Attest: ____________ Secretary A-3
TRUSTEE'S CERTIFICATE OF AUTHENTICATION This is one of the Notes described in the within-mentioned Indenture. U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee By: _______________________________________ Name: Authorized Signatory Dated: ___________________ A-4
1.0% CONVERTIBLE SENIOR NOTE DUE 2033 GLOBAL NOTE 1. INTEREST. AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC., a Delaware corporation (the "COMPANY"), is the issuer of 1.0% Convertible Senior Notes due 2033 (the "Notes"). The Notes will accrue interest at a rate of 1.0% per annum. The Company promises to pay interest on the Notes in cash semiannually on each June 15 and December 15, commencing on June 15, 2004, to Holders of record on the immediately preceding June 1 and December 1, respectively. Interest on the Notes will accrue from the most recent date to which interest has been paid, or if no interest has been paid, from December 12, 2003. Interest will be computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months. The Company will pay interest on overdue principal at the interest rate borne by the Notes, compounded semiannually, and, to the extent permitted by law, it shall pay interest on overdue installments of interest (without regard to any applicable grace period) at the same interest rate compounded semiannually. 2. REGISTRATION RIGHTS. The holder of this Note (and the Common Stock issuable upon conversion hereof) is entitled to the benefits of a Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of December 12, 2003, among the Company and the Initial Purchaser (the "REGISTRATION RIGHTS AGREEMENT"). Pursuant to the Registration Rights Agreement the Company has agreed for the benefit of the holders of Transfer Restricted Securities (as defined in the Registration Rights Agreement), that (i) it will, at its cost, within 90 days after the closing of the sale of the Notes (the "CLOSING"), file a shelf registration statement (the "SHELF REGISTRATION STATEMENT") with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "COMMISSION") with respect to resales of the Notes and the Common Stock issuable upon conversion thereof, (ii) it will use its reasonable best efforts to cause such Shelf Registration Statement to be declared effective within 210 days after the Closing, and (iii) it will use its reasonable best efforts to keep such Shelf Registration Statement continuously effective under the Securities Act, subject to certain exceptions specified in the Registration Rights Agreement, until the second anniversary of the date of the Closing. If (a) the Company fails to file the Shelf Registration Statement required by the Registration Rights Agreement on or before the date specified above for such filing, (b) such Shelf Registration Statement is not declared effective by the Commission on or prior to the date specified above for such effectiveness, or (c) the Shelf Registration Statement is declared effective but thereafter ceases to be effective or useable in connection with resales of Transfer Restricted Securities during the periods specified in the Registration Rights Agreement without being succeeded immediately by a post-effective amendment to such Shelf Registration Statement that cures such failure and is itself declared effective immediately (each such event referred to in clauses (a) through (c) above a "REGISTRATION DEFAULT"), then the Company will pay special interest to each Holder of Transfer Restricted Securities as described below. Notwithstanding the foregoing, as set forth in the Registration Rights Agreement, the Company will be permitted to suspend use of the prospectus that is part of the Shelf Registration Statement during certain periods of time and in certain circumstances relating to pending corporate developments and public filings with the A-5
SEC and similar events, and such a suspension shall not be deemed a Registration Default provided it does not last in excess of 60 days in the aggregate during any 12-month period. With respect to the first 90-day period immediately following the occurrence of a Registration Default, the Company shall pay special interest to each Holder of Transfer Restricted Securities in an amount equal to an increase in the annual interest rate on the Notes of 0.25% ("SPECIAL INTEREST") and with respect to any subsequent period, additional amounts equal to an increase in the annual interest rate on the Notes of 0.25% until all Registration Defaults have been cured. In the event that this Note, or any portion thereof, shall have been converted into shares of Common Stock pursuant to Section 12 hereof, the amount payable under this Section 2 per share of Common Stock shall be determined by dividing (x) the amount that would have been payable hereunder on the aggregate principal amount so converted by (y) the number of shares of Common Stock issued upon such conversion. All accrued Special Interest shall be paid by the Company on each Interest Payment Date for which Special Interest is owed to the holders of Transfer Restricted Securities by wire transfer of immediately available funds or by federal funds check. Following the cure of all Registration Defaults, the application of Special Interest will cease. THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION 2 SHALL SURVIVE ANY CONVERSION OF THE NOTES INTO SHARES OF COMMON STOCK PURSUANT TO SECTION 12 HEREOF, AND MAY BE ENFORCED BY THE HOLDER OF COMMON STOCK ISSUED UPON CONVERSION OF THIS NOTE. 3. PAYMENTS. All payments made by the Company on this Note shall be made without deduction or withholding for or on account of, any and all present or future taxes, duties, assessments, or governmental charges of whatever nature unless the deduction or withholding of such taxes, duties, assessments or government charges is then required by law. 4. METHOD OF PAYMENT. The Company will pay interest on the Notes (except defaulted interest) to the Persons who are registered Holders of Notes at the close of business on the record date for the next interest payment date even though Notes are canceled after the record date and on or before the interest payment date. Holders must surrender Notes to a Paying Agent to collect principal and premium payments. The Company will pay principal, premium, if any, interest, and Special Interest, if any, in money of the United States that at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts. However, the Company may pay principal, premium, if any, interest and Special Interest, if any, by check payable in such money. It may mail an interest or Special Interest check to a Holder's registered address. Upon the request of a Holder who holds an aggregate principal amount of at least $5.0 million, principal, premium, if any, interest, and Special Interest, if any, shall be paid by wire transfer of immediately available funds to an account previously specified in writing by such Holder to the Company and the Trustee. 5. PAYING AGENT, CONVERSION AGENT AND REGISTRAR. The Trustee will act as Paying Agent, Conversion Agent and Registrar and will maintain an office or agency in the City of New York, New York at which the notes may be presented for payment, transfer or exchange. The Company may change any Paying Agent, Conversion Agent or Registrar without prior notice. The Company or any of its Affiliates may act in any such capacity. A-6
6. INDENTURE. The Company issued the Notes under an Indenture, dated as of December 12, 2003 (the "INDENTURE"), between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee. Capitalized terms herein are used as defined in the Indenture unless otherwise defined herein. The terms of the Notes include those stated in the Indenture and those made part of the Indenture by the Trust Indenture Act of 1939 (15 U.S. Code Sections 77aaa-77bbbb) (the "TIA") as in effect on the date of the Indenture. The Notes are subject to, and qualified by, all such terms, certain of which are summarized hereon, and Holders are referred to the Indenture and such Act for a statement of such terms. The Notes are unsubordinated and unsecured general obligations of the Company limited to $200,000,000 in aggregate principal amount. 7. REDEMPTION. At any time on or after December 15, 2010, the Company may redeem any portion of the Notes, in whole, or in part, on at least 30 days' but no more than 60 days' notice, for cash at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount, together with accrued and unpaid interest and Special Interest thereon, to, but excluding, the redemption date. In the event the Company redeems less than all of the outstanding Notes, the Notes to be redeemed shall be selected by the Trustee in accordance with Section 3.02 of the Indenture. The Company may not give notice of any redemption if the Company has defaulted in payment of interest and the default is continuing. 8. NOTICE OF REDEMPTION. Notice of redemption will be mailed at least 30 days but not more than 60 days before the redemption date to each Holder of the Notes to be redeemed at his address of record. The Notes in denominations larger than $1,000 may be redeemed in part but only in integral multiples of $1,000. In the event of a redemption of less than all of the Notes, the Notes will be chosen for redemption by the Trustee in accordance with the Indenture. On and after the redemption date, interest ceases to accrue on the Notes or portions of them called for redemption. If this Note is redeemed subsequent to a record date with respect to any interest payment date specified above and on or prior to such interest payment date, then any accrued interest will be paid to the Person in whose name this Note is registered at the close of business on such record date. 9. RANKING. The Notes represent "Designated Senior Debt" as defined under the Company's existing 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007. 10. REPURCHASE AT OPTION OF HOLDER. Subject to the terms and conditions of the Indenture, the Company shall become obligated to repurchase, at the option of the Holder, all or any portion of the Notes held by such Holder on any Option Purchase Date in integral multiples of $1,000, if less than all of the Notes are being redeemed, at a Purchase Price in cash equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Note, plus accrued and unpaid interest and Special Interest, if any, to the Option Purchase Date. To exercise such right, a Holder shall deliver to the Company an Option Purchase Notice containing the information set forth in the Indenture at any time from the opening of business on the date that is 20 Business Days prior to such Option A-7
Purchase Date until the close of business two Business Days prior to such Option Purchase Date, and shall deliver the Notes to the Paying Agent as set forth in the Indenture. Holders have the right to withdraw any Option Purchase Notice by delivering to the Paying Agent a written notice of withdrawal in accordance with the provisions of the Indenture. If cash sufficient to pay the Purchase Price of all Notes or portions thereof to be purchased on the Option Purchase Date is deposited with the Paying Agent on the Option Purchase Date, interest ceases to accrue on such Notes or portions thereof immediately after such Option Purchase Date, and the Holder thereof shall have no other rights as such other than the right to receive the Purchase Price upon surrender of such Note. 11. REPURCHASE UPON A CHANGE IN CONTROL. If there is a Change in Control, the Company shall be required to offer to repurchase on the Purchase Date all outstanding Notes at a purchase price equal to 100% of the aggregate principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest and Special Interest, if any, to the Purchase Date. Holders of Notes that are subject to an offer to purchase will receive a Change in Control Offer from the Company in accordance with Section 3.09 of the Indenture and may elect to have such Notes or portions thereof in authorized denominations purchased by completing the form entitled "Option of Holder to Elect Purchase" appearing below. Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control, Holders may also have the right to surrender Notes for conversion to Common Stock pursuant to Section 12 hereof. 12. CONVERSION. The holder of any Note has the right, exercisable at any time following the Issuance Date and prior to the close of business (New York time) on the date of the Note's maturity, to convert the principal amount thereof (or any portion thereof that is an integral multiple of $1,000) into shares of Common Stock at the initial Conversion Price of $15.45 per share, subject to adjustment, under certain circumstances as set forth in the Indenture, except that if a Note is called for redemption, the conversion right will terminate at the close of business on the second Business Day immediately preceding the date fixed for redemption. Holders may surrender Notes for conversion into Common Stock as follows: i. Conversion Based on Sales Price of Common Stock. Commencing after March 31, 2004, Holders may surrender Notes in integral multiples of $1,000 principal amount for conversion into shares of the Company's Common Stock, on any Business Day during any calendar quarter if the Sale Price of the Common Stock for at least 20 trading days in the period of 30 consecutive trading days ending on the last trading day of the previous quarter is more than 120% of the Conversion Price per share of the Common Stock on such last trading day. ii. Conversion Upon Redemption. A Holder may surrender for conversion any Note called for redemption as specified in Section 7 of the Notes and in the Indenture at any time prior to the close of business two Business Days prior to the redemption date, even if it is not otherwise convertible at such time. A-8
iii. Conversion Upon Occurrence of Certain Corporate Transactions. If the Company elects to: (a) distribute to all holders of Common Stock certain rights entitling them to purchase shares of Common Stock at less than the Current Market Price of the Common Stock as of the Business Day prior to the date of declaration for such distribution or (b) distribute to all holders of Common Stock, assets, debt securities or certain rights to purchase the Company's securities, which distribution has a per share value exceeding 15% of the Sale Price of the Common Stock on the trading day preceding the declaration date for such distribution, the Company must notify the Holders of the Notes at least 20 days prior to the ex-dividend date for such distribution. Once the Company has given such notice, Holders may surrender their Notes for conversion at any time until the earlier of the close of business on the Business Day prior to the ex-dividend date or the Company's announcement that such distribution will not take place, even if the Notes are not otherwise convertible at such time; provided that a Holder may not exercise this right to convert if the Holder will otherwise participate in the distribution without conversion. If the Company is a party to a consolidation, merger or binding share exchange pursuant to which Common Stock would be converted into cash, securities or other property (other than if such property consists of shares of voting common stock of the surviving person that are, or upon issuance will be, traded on a United States national securities exchange or approved for trading on an established automated over-the-counter trading market in the United States, and such shares represent at least 95% of the aggregate fair market value (as determined by the Company's board of directors) of such property), a Holder may surrender Notes for conversion at any time from and after the date which is 15 days prior to the anticipated effective date of the transaction until 15 days after the actual effective date of such transaction. If the Company is a party to a consolidation, merger or binding share exchange pursuant to which Common Stock is converted into cash, securities or other property, then at the effective time of the transaction, the right to convert a Note into Common Stock will be changed into a right to convert such Note into the kind and amount of cash, securities or other property which the Holder would have received if the Holder had converted its Notes immediately prior to the transaction. iv. Conversion Upon Satisfaction of Trading Price Condition. A Holder may surrender any of its Notes for conversion into Common Stock during the five trading day period immediately following any ten consecutive trading day period in which the Trading Price per $1,000 principal amount of the Notes (as determined following a request by a Holder of the Notes in accordance with the procedures described in the Indenture) for each day of such ten day period was less than 95% of the product of the Sale Price per share of the Common Stock on that day multiplied by the number of shares of Common Stock issuable upon conversion of $1,000 principal amount of the Notes; provided, however, that if, on the day before any conversion pursuant to this Section 12(iv) that is on or after December 15, 2028, the Sale Price per share of the Company's Common Stock is greater than 100%, but less than 120%, of the Conversion Price, then a Holder surrendering Notes for such conversion will receive, in lieu of a number of shares A-9
of Common Stock based on the Conversion Price, Common Stock equal to the principal amount of such Holder's Notes so surrendered, plus accrued and unpaid interest, as of the Conversion Date. Any shares of Common Stock delivered will be valued at the greater of (x) the Conversion Price on the Conversion Date and (y) the average Sale Price of the Company's Common Stock for a five trading day period commencing on the third trading day after the Conversion Date. The Company will deliver such shares of Common Stock to such Holder on the ninth trading day following the Conversion Date. To convert a Note, a holder must (1) complete and sign a conversion notice substantially in the form set forth below, (2) surrender the Note to a Conversion Agent, (3) furnish appropriate endorsements or transfer documents if required by the Registrar or Conversion Agent and (4) pay any transfer or similar tax, if required. No payment or adjustment will be made for accrued and unpaid interest on a converted Note, but if any holder surrenders a Note for conversion after the close of business on the record date for the payment of an installment of interest and prior to the opening of business on the next interest payment date, then, notwithstanding such conversion, the interest payable on such interest payment date shall be paid to the holder of such Note on such record date. Any Notes that are, however, delivered to the Company for conversion after any record date but before the next interest payment date must, except as described in the next sentence, be accompanied by a payment equal to the interest payable on such interest payment date on the principal amount of such Notes being converted. Payments to the Company described in the preceding sentence shall not be required if, during that period between a record date and the next interest payment date, a conversion occurs on or after the date that the Company has issued a redemption notice and prior to the date of redemption stated in such notice. If any Notes are converted after an interest payment date but on or before the next record date, no interest will be paid on those Notes. The number of shares issuable upon conversion of a Note is determined by dividing the principal amount of the Note converted by the Conversion Price in effect on the Conversion Date. No fractional shares will be issued upon conversion but a cash adjustment will be made for any fractional interest. A note in respect of which a holder has delivered an "Option of Holder to Elect Purchase" form appearing below exercising the option of such holder to require the Company to purchase such Note may be converted only if the notice of exercise is withdrawn as provided above and in accordance with the terms of the Indenture. The above description of conversion of the Notes is qualified by reference to, and is subject in its entirety by, the more complete description thereof contained in the Indenture. 13. DENOMINATIONS, TRANSFER, EXCHANGE. The notes are in registered form, without coupons, in denominations of $1,000 and integral multiples of $1,000. The transfer of Notes may be registered, and Notes may be exchanged, as provided in the Indenture. The Registrar may require a Holder, among other things, to furnish appropriate endorsements and transfer documents and to pay any taxes and fees required by law or permitted by the Indenture. The Registrar need not exchange or register the transfer of any Note or portion of a Note selected for redemption (except the unredeemed portion of any Note being redeemed in part). Also, it need not exchange or register the transfer of any Note for a period of 15 days before a selection of Notes to be redeemed. A-10
14. PERSONS DEEMED OWNERS. The registered Holder of a Note may be treated as its owner for all purposes. 15. UNCLAIMED MONEY. If money for the payment of principal or interest remains unclaimed for two years, the Trustee and the Paying Agent shall pay the money back to the Company at its written request. After that, Holders of Notes entitled to the money must look to the Company for payment unless an abandoned property law designates another Person and all liability of the Trustee and such Paying Agent with respect to such money shall cease. 16. DEFAULTS AND REMEDIES. The Notes shall have the Events of Default set forth in Section 8.01 of the Indenture. Subject to certain limitations in the Indenture, if an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee by notice to the Company or the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the then outstanding Notes by notice to the Company and the Trustee may declare all the Notes to be due and payable immediately, except that in the case of an Event of Default arising from certain events of bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization, all unpaid principal and interest accrued on the Notes shall become due and payable immediately without further action or notice. The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Notes then outstanding by written notice to the Trustee may rescind an acceleration and its consequences if the rescission would not conflict with any judgment or decree and if all existing Events of Default have been cured or waived except nonpayment of principal or interest that has become due solely because of the acceleration. Holders may not enforce the Indenture or the Notes except as provided in the Indenture. Subject to certain limitations, Holders of a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes issued under the Indenture may direct the Trustee in its exercise of any trust or power. The Company must furnish annually compliance certificates to the Trustee. The above description of Events of Default and remedies is qualified by reference, and subject in its entirety, to the more complete description thereof contained in the Indenture. 17. AMENDMENTS, SUPPLEMENTS AND WAIVERS. Subject to certain exceptions, the Indenture or the Notes may be amended or supplemented with the consent of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes (including consents obtained in connection with a tender offer or exchange offer for Notes), and any existing default may be waived with the consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes. Without the consent of any Holder, the Indenture or the Notes may be amended, among other reasons, to cure any ambiguity, defect or inconsistency, to provide for uncertificated Notes in addition to or in place of certificated Notes, to provide for assumption of the Company's obligations to Holders, to make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of any Holder or to qualify the Indenture under the TIA or to comply with the requirements of the SEC in order to maintain the qualification of the Indenture under the TIA. 18. TRUSTEE DEALINGS WITH THE COMPANY. The Trustee, in its individual or any other capacity may become the owner or pledgee of the Notes and may otherwise deal with the Company or an Affiliate with the same rights it would have, as if it were not Trustee, A-11
subject to certain limitations provided for in the Indenture and in the TIA. Any Agent may do the same with like rights. 19. NO RECOURSE AGAINST OTHERS. A director, officer, employee, incorporator or shareholder of the Company, as such, shall not have any liability for any obligations of the Company under the Notes or the Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by reason of such obligations or their creation. Each Holder of the Notes by accepting a Note waives and releases all such liability. The waiver and release are part of the consideration for the issue of the Notes. 20. GOVERNING LAW. THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK SHALL GOVERN THE INDENTURE AND THE NOTES WITHOUT REGARD TO CONFLICT OF LAW PROVISIONS THEREOF. 21. AUTHENTICATION. The Notes shall not be valid until authenticated by the manual signature of an authorized officer of the Trustee or an authenticating agent. 22. ABBREVIATIONS. Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as: TEN COM (= tenants in common), TEN ENT (= tenants by the entireties), JT TEN (= joint tenants with right of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (= Custodian), and UGMA (= Uniform Gifts to Minors Act). The Company will furnish to any Holder of the Notes upon written request and without charge a copy of the Indenture. Request may be made to: Akamai Technologies, Inc. 8 Cambridge Center Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142 Attention: General Counsel A-12
ASSIGNMENT FORM TO ASSIGN THIS NOTE, FILL IN THE FORM BELOW: I. ASSIGNMENT I, or we, assign this Note to: ________________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________________ (Print or type name, address and zip code of assignee) ________________________________________________________________________________ (Please insert Social Security or other identifying number of assignee) ________________________________________________________________________________ and irrevocably appoint _______________ agent to transfer this Note on the books of the Company. The agent may substitute another to act for him. Dated: _______________________ Signed: _________________________________________ (Sign exactly as your name appears on the other side of this Note) Print Name:______________________________________ Signature Guarantee:*______________________________ *Signatures must be guaranteed by a commercial bank, trust company or member firm of the New York Stock Exchange. _____________________________ A-13
II. TRANSFEROR REPRESENTATIONS In connection with any transfer of any of the Notes evidenced by this certificate occurring prior to the date that is two years after the later of the date of original issuance of such Notes and the last date, if any, on which such Notes were owned by the Company or any Affiliate of the company, the undersigned confirms that such Notes are being transferred: CHECK ONE BOX BELOW (1) [ ] to the Company or any Subsidiary thereof; or (2) [ ] pursuant to and in compliance with Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended; or (3) [ ] pursuant to the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended; or (4) [ ] pursuant to the exemption from registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, other than under Rule 144A or Rule 144; or (5) [ ] pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. Unless one of the items is checked, the Trustee will refuse to register any of the Notes evidenced by this certificate in the name of any person other than the registered Holder thereof; provided, however, that if item (3) or (4) is checked, the Company or the Trustee may require, prior to registering any such transfer of the Notes, in their sole discretion, such written legal opinions, certifications and other information as the Trustee or the Company have reasonably requested to confirm that such transfer is being made pursuant to an exemption from, or in a transaction not subject to, the registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. ________________________________ CHECK IF APPLICABLE [ ] The undersigned represents and warrants that it is, or at some time during which it held this Security was, an Affiliate of the Company. If (A) above is checked and if the undersigned was not an Affiliate of the Company at all times during which it held this Note, indicate the periods during which the undersigned was an Affiliate of the Company: If (A) above is checked and if the Transferee will not pay the full purchase price for the transfer of this Note on or prior to the date of transfer, indicate when such purchase price will be paid: A-14
THE UNDERSIGNED HEREBY AGREES THAT, UNLESS THE BOX ABOVE UNDER ITEM (A) IS CHECKED, THE UNDERSIGNED SHALL BE DEEMED TO HAVE REPRESENTED THAT IT IS NOT NOR HAS IT BEEN AT ANY TIME DURING WHICH IT HELD THIS NOTE AN AFFILIATE, AS DEFINED IN RULE 144 UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, OF THE COMPANY. _____________________________________________ (Signature) Signature Guarantee* ______________________ *Signatures must be guaranteed by a commercial bank, trust company or member firm of the New York Stock Exchange. _________________________________ III. TRANSFEREE REPRESENTATIONS TO BE COMPLETED BY PURCHASER IF (2) ABOVE IS CHECKED. The undersigned represents and warrants that it is purchasing this Note for its own account or an account with respect to which it exercises sole investment discretion and that it and any such account is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, and is aware that the sale to it is being made in reliance on Rule 144A and acknowledges that it has received such information regarding the company as the undersigned has requested pursuant to Rule 144A or has determined not to request such information and that it is aware that the transferor is relying upon the undersigned's foregoing representations in order to claim the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A. Dated:___________________ Signed:_____________________________ Name: NOTICE:To be executed by an executive Officer A-15
TO BE COMPLETED BY PURCHASER IF (3) ABOVE IS CHECKED The undersigned represents and warrants that it is not a "U.S. Person" (as defined in Regulation S under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended). Dated:___________________ Signed:_____________________________ Name: NOTICE: To be executed by an executive officer A-16
OPTION OF HOLDER TO ELECT PURCHASE If you want to elect to have this Note purchased by the Company pursuant to Section 3.09 or Section 6.02 of the Indenture, check the box: [ ] If you want to elect to have only part of this Note purchased by the Company pursuant to Section 3.09 or Section 6.02 of the Indenture, state the amount you want to be purchased (in denominations of $1,000 or any integral multiple thereof): $__________________ Dated: _______________________ Signed: ______________________________________ (Sign exactly as your name appears on the other side of this Note) Signature Guarantee:*__________________ *Signatures must be guaranteed by a commercial bank, trust company or member firm of the New York Stock Exchange. A-17
ELECTION TO CONVERT To: Akamai Technologies, Inc. The undersigned owner of this Note hereby irrevocably exercise the option to convert this Note, or the portion below designated, into Common Stock of Akamai Technologies, Inc. in accordance with the terms of the Indenture referred to in this Note, and directors that the shares issuable and deliverable upon conversion, together with any check in payment for fractional shares, be issued in the name of and delivered to the undersigned, unless a different name has been indicated in the assignment below. If the shares are to be issued in the name of a person other than the undersigned, the undersigned will pay all transfer taxes payable with respect thereto. Any holder of Notes, upon the exercise of its conversion rights in accordance with the terms of the Indenture and the Note, agrees to be bound by the terms of the Registration Rights Agreement relating to the Common Stock issuable upon conversion of the Notes. Date: In Whole In Part as follows: [ ] [ ] Portions of Note to be converted ($1,000 or integral multiples thereof): $____________ ___________________________ Signature Please print or Typewrite Name and Address, Including Zip code, and Social Security or Other Identifying Number: Signature Guarantee:*__________________ * Signature must be guaranteed by a commercial bank, trust company or member firm of the New York Stock Exchange A-18
SCHEDULE A SCHEDULE OF PRINCIPAL AMOUNT The initial principal amount of this Global Note shall be $ ________________ . The following increases or decreases in the principal amount of this Global Note have been made: A-19
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. 1.0% CONVERTIBLE SENIOR NOTE DUE 2033 No. D-1 CUSIP No. _______ ISIN No. ___________ $_________________ Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (hereinafter called the "Company", which term includes any successors under the Indenture hereinafter referred to), for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of ___________________ dollars ($___________), on December 15, 2033. Interest Payment Dates: June 15 and December 15: commencing June 15, 2004. Record Dates: June 1 and December 1. Reference is made to the further provisions of this Note hereinafter set forth, which will, for all purposes, have the same effect as if set forth at this place. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this Instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal. AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC., a Delaware corporation [Seal] By: ____________________________________ Name: Title: Attest: ____________ Secretary A-20
TRUSTEE'S CERTIFICATE OF AUTHENTICATION This is one of the Notes described in the within-mentioned Indenture. U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee By: _______________________ Name: Authorized Signatory Dated: ___________________ A-21
EXHIBIT B FORM OF TRANSFER CERTIFICATE FOR TRANSFER FROM RESTRICTED NOTE TO GLOBAL NOTE RULE 144A TRANSFER CERTIFICATE U.S. Bank National Association Corporate Trust Services 225 Asylum Street, 23rd Floor Hartford, CT 06103 Attn: Corporate Trust Administration Re:______Akamai Technologies, Inc. 1.0% Convertible Senior Notes due 2033 (the "NOTES") Reference is hereby made to the Indenture, dated of December 12, 2003 (the "INDENTURE"), between Akamai Technologies, Inc., as Issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the respective meanings given them in the Indenture. This letter relates to $[___________] principal amount of Restricted Note (CUSIP No. ________; ISIN No.__________) registered, in either case, in the name of [name of transferor] (the "TRANSFEROR") to effect the transfer of the Notes in exchange for an equivalent beneficial interest in the Global Note. In connection with such request, and in respect of such Notes the Transferor does hereby certify that such Notes are being transferred in accordance with (i) the transfer restrictions set forth in the Notes and (ii) Rule 144A under the United States Securities Act of 1933, as amended, to a transferee that the Transferor reasonably believes is purchasing the Notes for its own account or an account with respect to which the transferee exercises sole investment discretion and the transferee and any such account is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of Rule 144A, in a transaction meeting the requirements of Rule 144A and in accordance with applicable securities laws of any state of the United States or any other jurisdiction. [Name of Transferor], By:____________________________ Name: Title: Dated: cc: Akamai Technologies, Inc. 8 Cambridge Center Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142 Attention: General Counsel C-1
EXHIBIT C FORM OF TRANSFER CERTIFICATE FOR TRANSFER FROM GLOBAL NOTE OR RESTRICTED NOTE TO RESTRICTED NOTE RESTRICTED NOTE TRANSFER CERTIFICATE U.S. Bank National Association Corporate Trust Services 225 Asylum Street, 23rd Floor Hartford, CT 06103 Re:______Akamai Technologies, Inc. 1.0% Convertible Senior Notes due 2033 (the "NOTES") Reference is hereby made to the Indenture, dated as of December 12, 2003 (the "INDENTURE"), between Akamai Technologies, Inc., as Issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the respective meanings given them in the Indenture. This letter relates to $[___________] aggregate principal amount of Notes which are [held in the form of the [Global] [Restricted] Note (CUSIP No. [________] ISIN No. [__________]) [with the Depositary] in the name of [name of transferor] (the "TRANSFEROR") to effect the transfer of the Notes. In connection with such request, and in respect of such Notes, the Transferor does hereby certify that such Notes are being transferred (i) in accordance with the transfer restrictions set forth in the Notes and (ii) in accordance with applicable securities laws of any state of the United States or any other jurisdiction. [Name of Transferor], By:____________________________ Name: Title: Dated: cc: Akamai Technologies, Inc. 8 Cambridge Center Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142 Attention: General Counsel

EXHIBIT 99.3 1.0% CONVERTIBLE SENIOR NOTES DUE 2033 REGISTRATION RIGHTS AGREEMENT Dated as of December 12, 2003 by and among Akamai Technologies, Inc. and Credit Suisse First Boston LLC ================================================================================
This Registration Rights Agreement (this "AGREEMENT") is made and entered into as of December 12, 2003, by and among Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "COMPANY"), and Credit Suisse First Boston LLC (the "INITIAL PURCHASER"), who has agreed to purchase the Company's 1.0% Convertible Senior Notes due 2033 (the "NOTES") pursuant to the Purchase Agreement (as defined below). This Agreement is made pursuant to the Purchase Agreement, dated December 8, 2003, (the "PURCHASE AGREEMENT"), by and among the Company and the Initial Purchaser. In order to induce the Initial Purchaser to purchase the Notes, the Company has agreed to provide the registration rights set forth in this Agreement. The execution and delivery of this Agreement is a condition to the obligations of the Initial Purchaser set forth in Section 2 of the Purchase Agreement. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined shall have the meaning assigned to them in the Indenture, dated December 12, 2003, between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee, relating to the Notes (the "INDENTURE"). The parties hereby agree as follows: SECTION 1. DEFINITIONS As used in this Agreement, the following capitalized terms shall have the following meanings: ACT: The Securities Act of 1933, as amended. AFFILIATE: As defined in Rule 144 of the Act. CERTIFICATED SECURITIES: Definitive Notes, as defined in the Indenture. CLOSING DATE: The date hereof. COMMON STOCK: Common Stock, $.01 par value per share, of the Company. COMMISSION: The Securities and Exchange Commission. EFFECTIVENESS DEADLINE: As defined in Section 3(a) hereof. EXCHANGE ACT: The Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. FILING DEADLINE: As defined in Section 3(a) hereof. HOLDERS: As defined in Section 2 hereof. NOTES: The up to $200,000,000 aggregate principal amount of 1.0% Convertible Senior Notes being issued pursuant to the Purchase Agreement. PROSPECTUS: The prospectus included in a Registration Statement at the time such Registration Statement is declared effective, as amended or 1
supplemented by any prospectus supplement and by all other amendments thereto, including post-effective amendments, all material incorporated by reference into such Prospectus and any information previously omitted in reliance upon Rule 430A of the Act. QUESTIONNAIRE: The written notice delivered to the Company containing the information called for by the Selling Securityholder Notice and Questionnaire attached as Exhibit A to the Offering Memorandum dated December 12, 2003 relating to the Notes. RECOMMENCEMENT DATE: As defined in Section 5(b) hereof. REGULATION S: Regulation S promulgated under the Act. RULE 144: Rule 144 promulgated under the Act. SHELF REGISTRATION STATEMENT: As defined in Section 3 hereof. SUSPENSION NOTICE: As defined in Section 5(b) hereof. TIA: The Trust Indenture Act of 1939 (15 U.S.C. Section 77aaa-77bbbb) as in effect on the date of the Indenture. TRANSFER RESTRICTED SECURITIES: The Notes and the shares of Common Stock into which the Notes are convertible, upon original issuance thereof, and at all times subsequent thereto, until, in the case of any such Notes or shares of Common Stock, (a) the date on which such Notes or shares of Common Stock have been registered under the Act and disposed of in accordance with the Shelf Registration Statement, (b) the date on which such Notes or shares of Common Stock are distributed to the public pursuant to Rule 144 or are saleable pursuant to Rule 144(k) (or similar provisions then in effect) under the Act or (c) the date on which such Notes or shares of Common Stock cease to be outstanding. SECTION 2. HOLDERS A Person is deemed to be a holder of Transfer Restricted Securities (each, a "HOLDER") whenever such Person owns of record Transfer Restricted Securities. SECTION 3. SHELF REGISTRATION (a) Shelf Registration. As soon as practicable after the Closing Date but in no event later than 90 days after the Closing Date (such 90th day, "FILING DEADLINE"), the Company shall file with the Commission a shelf registration statement pursuant to Rule 415 under the Act (the "SHELF REGISTRATION 2
STATEMENT"), relating to all Transfer Restricted Securities, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause such Shelf Registration Statement to become effective on or prior to 210 days after the Closing Date (such 210th day, the "EFFECTIVENESS DEADLINE"). The Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to keep any Shelf Registration Statement required by this Section 3(a) continuously effective, supplemented and amended as required by and subject to the provisions of Section 5(a) hereof to the extent necessary to ensure that it is available for sales of Transfer Restricted Securities by the Holders thereof entitled to the benefit of this Section 3(a), and to ensure that it conforms with the requirements of this Agreement, the Act and the policies, rules and regulations of the Commission as announced from time to time, for the shorter of (i) two years or (ii) the date on which all Transfer Restricted Securities covered by such Shelf Registration Statement have been sold pursuant thereto. Under Section 2 of the Notes, the Company will pay Special Interest with respect to the first 90-day period immediately following the occurrence of a Registration Default (as defined therein) in an amount equal to an increase in the annual interest rate on the Notes of 0.25% and, with respect to any subsequent periods, additional amounts equal to an increase in the annual interest rate on the Notes of 0.25% until all Registration Defaults have been cured. (b) Provision by Holders of Certain Information in Connection with the Shelf Registration Statement. No Holder of Transfer Restricted Securities may include any of its Transfer Restricted Securities in any Shelf Registration Statement pursuant to this Agreement unless and until such Holder furnishes to the Company in writing a Questionnaire prior to any intended distribution. Each selling Holder agrees to promptly furnish additional information required to be disclosed in order to make the information previously furnished to the Company by such Holder not materially misleading. SECTION 4. [INTENTIONALLY OMITTED] SECTION 5. SHELF REGISTRATION PROCEDURES (a) Procedures. In connection with the Shelf Registration Statement, the Company shall: (i) use its reasonable best efforts to effect such registration to permit the sale of the Transfer Restricted Securities being sold in accordance with the intended method or methods of distribution thereof (as indicated in the information furnished to the Company pursuant to Section 3(b) hereof), and pursuant thereto the Company will prepare and file with the Commission a Shelf Registration Statement relating to the registration on any appropriate form under the Act, which form shall be available for the sale of the Transfer Restricted Securities in accordance with the intended method or methods of distribution thereof (including, without limitation, one or more underwritten offerings) within the time periods and otherwise in accordance with the provisions hereof. The Company shall not be permitted to include in the Shelf Registration Statement any securities other than the Transfer Restricted Securities. (ii) use its reasonable best efforts to keep such Shelf Registration Statement continuously effective and provide all requisite financial statements for the period specified in Section 3 of this Agreement. Upon the occurrence of any event (including, without limitation, pending negotiations relating to, or the consummation of, a transaction or the occurrence of any event which would require additional 3
disclosure of material non-public information by the Company in the Shelf Registration Statement as to which the Company has a bona fide business purpose for preserving confidential or which renders the Company unable to comply with Commission requirements) that would cause any such Shelf Registration Statement or the Prospectus contained therein (A) to contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or (B) not to be effective and usable for resale of Transfer Restricted Securities during the period required by this Agreement, the Company shall file promptly an appropriate amendment to such Shelf Registration Statement curing such defect, and, if Commission review is required, use its best efforts to cause such amendment to be declared effective as soon as practicable; provided that in the event of a material business transaction or other prospective corporate development (including, without limitation, pending negotiations relating to such a transaction) which would, in the reasonable discretion of the Company, make it appropriate to suspend the availability of the Shelf Registration Statement, then for so long as such circumstances exist, the Company shall not be required to prepare and file a supplement or post-effective amendment hereunder. (iii) prepare and file with the Commission such amendments and post-effective amendments to the Shelf Registration Statement as may be necessary to keep such Shelf Registration Statement effective for the applicable period set forth in Section 3 hereof, cause the Prospectus to be supplemented by any required Prospectus supplement, and as so supplemented to be filed pursuant to Rule 424 under the Act, and to comply fully with Rules 424, 430A and 462, as applicable, under the Act in a timely manner; and comply with the provisions of the Act with respect to the disposition of all Transfer Restricted Securities covered by such Shelf Registration Statement during the applicable period in accordance with the intended method or methods of distribution by the sellers thereof set forth in such Shelf Registration Statement or supplement to the Prospectus; (iv) advise the Holders and underwriters, if any, promptly and, if requested by such Persons, confirm such advice in writing, (A) when the Prospectus or any Prospectus supplement or post-effective amendment has been filed, and, with respect to any Shelf Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto, when the same has become effective, (B) of any request by the Commission for amendments to the Shelf Registration Statement or amendments or supplements to the Prospectus or for additional information relating thereto, (C) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Shelf Registration Statement under the Act or of the suspension by any state securities commission of the qualification of the Transfer Restricted Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or the initiation of any proceeding for any of the preceding purposes, and (D) of the existence of any fact or the happening of any event (including, without limitation, pending negotiations relating to, or the consummation of, a transaction or the occurrence of any event which would require additional disclosure of material non-public information by the Company in the Shelf Registration Statement as to which the Company has a bona fide business purpose for preserving confidential or which renders the Company unable to comply with Commission requirements) that makes any statement of a material fact made in the Shelf Registration Statement, the Prospectus, any amendment or supplement thereto or any document incorporated by reference therein untrue, or that requires the making of any additions to or changes in the Shelf Registration Statement so that the statements therein are not misleading and do not omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein, or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. If at any time the Commission shall issue any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Shelf Registration Statement, or any state securities commission or other regulatory authority shall issue an order suspending the qualification or exemption from qualification of the Transfer Restricted Securities under state securities or Blue Sky laws, the Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to obtain the withdrawal or lifting of such order at the earliest possible time; 4
(v) subject to Section 5(a)(ii), if any fact or event contemplated by Section 5(iv)(D) above shall exist or have occurred, prepare a supplement or post-effective amendment to the Shelf Registration Statement or related Prospectus or any document incorporated therein by reference or file any other required document so that, as thereafter delivered to the purchasers of Transfer Restricted Securities, the Prospectus will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; (vi) furnish to each Holder named in any Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus and underwriter, if any, in connection with such sale before filing with the Commission, copies of any Shelf Registration Statement or any Prospectus included therein or any amendments or supplements to any such Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus (other than documents incorporated by reference after the initial filing of such Shelf Registration Statement), which documents will be subject to the review and comment of such Persons in connection with such sale, if any, for a period of at least five (5) Business Days, and the Company will not file any such Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus or any amendment or supplement to any such Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus (other than documents incorporated by reference) to which such Persons shall reasonably object within five (5) Business Days after the receipt thereof. Any such Person shall be deemed to have reasonably objected to such filing if such Registration Statement, amendment, Prospectus or supplement, as applicable, as proposed to be filed, contains an untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or fails to comply with the applicable requirements of the Act; (vii) if requested by any Holders or underwriters, if any, in connection with such sale, promptly include in any Shelf Registration Statement or Prospectus, pursuant to a supplement or post-effective amendment if necessary, such information as such Holders or underwriters, if any, may reasonably request to have included therein, including, without limitation, information relating to the "Plan of Distribution" of the Transfer Restricted Securities, so that the Holder is named as a selling security holder in a Shelf Registration Statement and the related Prospectus in such a manner as to permit such Holder to deliver such Prospectus to purchasers of Transfer Restricted Securities in accordance with the Act; and make all required filings of such Prospectus supplement or post-effective amendment as soon as practicable after the Company is notified of the matters to be included in such Prospectus supplement or post-effective amendment; provided, however, that (i) any supplement to a Prospectus filed pursuant to this Section 5(a)(vii) shall be filed within five (5) Business Days after receipt of a duly completed and executed Questionnaire (provided, that with respect to any Questionnaire received by the Company after the date that is thirty (30) days after the date the Shelf Registration Statement becomes effective under the Act, the Company shall not be required to file more than one (1) such supplement during any twenty (20) day period) and (ii) if a post-effective amendment is required by the rules and regulations of the Commission in order to permit resales by Holders who were not named as selling security holders in the initial Shelf Registration Statement as of the time it became effective under the Act, the Company shall not be required to file more than one (1) post-effective amendment for such purpose in any three (3) month period. If the Company shall file a post-effective amendment to the Shelf Registration Statement, it shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause such post-effective amendment to become effective under the Act as promptly as is practicable. (viii) make available to each Holder and underwriter, if any, without charge, at least one copy of the Shelf Registration Statement, as first filed with the Commission, and of each amendment thereto, including all documents incorporated by reference therein and all exhibits (including exhibits incorporated therein by reference); 5
(ix) deliver to each Holder and underwriter, if any, without charge, as many copies of the Prospectus (including each preliminary prospectus) and any amendment or supplement thereto as such Persons reasonably may request; the Company hereby consents to the use (in accordance with law) of the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto by each Holder and each underwriter, if any, in connection with the offering and the sale of the Transfer Restricted Securities covered by the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto; (x) upon the request of any Holder or underwriter, if any, enter into such agreements (including underwriting agreements) and make such representations and warranties and take all such other actions in connection therewith in order to expedite or facilitate the disposition of the Transfer Restricted Securities pursuant to any Shelf Registration Statement contemplated by this Agreement as may be reasonably requested by such Person in connection with any sale or resale pursuant to any applicable Shelf Registration Statement and in such connection, the Company shall: (A) upon request of any Holder or underwriter, if any, furnish (or in the case of paragraphs (2) and (3) below, use its reasonable best efforts to cause to be furnished) to each Holder or underwriter, if any, upon the effectiveness of the Shelf Registration Statement: (1) a certificate, dated such date, signed on behalf of the Company by (x) the President or any Vice President and (y) a principal financial or accounting officer of the Company, confirming, as of the date thereof, the matters set forth in Sections 6(dd), 9(a) and 9(b) of the Purchase Agreement and such other similar matters as the Holders may reasonably request; (2) make available at reasonable times for inspection by the Holders and underwriters, if any, and any attorney or accountant retained by such Holders, or underwriters, if any, all financial and other records, pertinent corporate documents of the Company and cause the Company's officers, directors and employees to supply all information reasonably requested by any such Holder, underwriters, if any, attorney or accountant in connection with such Shelf Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto subsequent to the filing thereof and prior to its effectiveness, provided, however, that the foregoing inspection and information gathering shall be coordinated by one counsel designated by the Holders and that such persons shall first agree in writing with the Company that any information that is designated in writing by the Company, in good faith, as confidential at the time of delivery of such information shall be kept confidential by such person, unless such disclosure is made in connection with a court proceeding or required by law, or such information becomes available to the public generally or through a third party without an accompanying obligation of confidentiality; (3) in the case of an underwritten offering, an opinion, dated the date effectiveness of the Shelf Registration Statement and addressed to the underwriters, of counsel for the Company covering matters similar to those set forth in paragraph (e) of Section 9 of the Purchase Agreement and such other matter as the selling Holders may reasonably request, and in any event including a statement to the effect that such counsel has participated in conferences with officers and other representatives of the Company, representatives of the independent public accountants for the Company and have 6
considered the matters required to be stated therein and the statements contained therein, although such counsel has not independently verified the accuracy, completeness or fairness of such statements; and that such counsel advises that, on the basis of the foregoing (relying as to materiality to the extent such counsel deems appropriate upon the statements of officers and other representatives of the Company), no facts came to such counsel's attention that caused such counsel to believe that the Shelf Registration Statement, at the time such Shelf Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto became effective, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or that the Prospectus contained in such Shelf Registration Statement as of its date, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Without limiting the foregoing, such counsel may state further that such counsel assumes no responsibility for, and has not independently verified, the accuracy, completeness or fairness of the financial statements, notes and schedules and other financial data included in any Registration Statement contemplated by this Agreement or the related Prospectus; and (4) in the case of an underwritten public offering, a customary comfort letter, dated as of the date of effectiveness of the Shelf Registration Statement and addressed to the underwriters, from the Company's independent accountants, in the customary form and covering matters of the type customarily covered in comfort letters to underwriters in connection with underwritten offerings, and affirming the matters set forth in the comfort letters delivered pursuant to Section 9(g) of the Purchase Agreement; and (B) deliver such other documents and certificates as may be reasonably requested by the Holders and underwriters, if any, to evidence compliance with the matters set forth in clause (A) above and with any customary conditions contained in any agreement entered into by the Company pursuant to this clause (x); (xi) prior to any public offering of Transfer Restricted Securities, cooperate with the Holders, underwriters, if any, and their respective counsel in connection with the registration and qualification of the Transfer Restricted Securities under the securities or Blue Sky laws of such jurisdictions, if any, as such Persons may request and do any and all other acts or things necessary or advisable to enable the disposition in such jurisdictions of the Transfer Restricted Securities covered by the applicable Registration Statement; provided, however, that the Company shall not be required to register or qualify as a foreign corporation where it is not now so qualified or to take any action that would subject it to the service of process in suits or to taxation, other than as to matters and transactions relating to the Shelf Registration Statement, in any jurisdiction where it is not now so subject; (xii) in connection with any sale of Transfer Restricted Securities that will result in such securities no longer being Transfer Restricted Securities, cooperate with the Holders to facilitate the timely preparation and delivery of certificates representing Transfer Restricted Securities to be sold and not bearing any restrictive legends; and to register such Transfer Restricted Securities in such denominations and such names as the Holders may request at least two Business Days prior to such sale of Transfer Restricted Securities; 7
(xiii) (A) list all shares of Common Stock covered by such Shelf Registration Statement on any securities exchange on which the Common Stock is then listed or (B) authorize for quotation on the National Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotation System ("Nasdaq") or the National Market System of Nasdaq all shares of Common Stock covered by such Shelf Registration Statement if the Common Stock is then so authorized for quotation. (xiv) use its reasonable best efforts to cause the disposition of the Transfer Restricted Securities covered by the Shelf Registration Statement to be registered with or approved by such other governmental agencies or authorities as may be necessary to enable the seller or sellers thereof to consummate the disposition of such Transfer Restricted Securities, subject to the proviso contained in clause (xi) above; (xv) provide a CUSIP number for all Transfer Restricted Securities not later than the effective date of a Shelf Registration Statement covering such Transfer Restricted Securities and provide the Trustee under the Indenture with certificates for the Transfer Restricted Securities which are in a form eligible for deposit with the Depository Trust Company; (xvi) otherwise use its best efforts to comply with all applicable rules and regulations of the Commission, and make generally available to its security holders with regard to any applicable Registration Statement, as soon as practicable, a consolidated earnings statement meeting the requirements of Rule 158 (which need not be audited) covering a twelve-month period beginning after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as such term is defined in paragraph (c) of Rule 158 under the Act); (xvii) if underwritten, make appropriate officers of the Company available to the underwriters for meetings with prospective purchasers of the Transfer Restricted Securities and prepare and present to potential investors customary "road show" material in a manner consistent with other new issuances of other securities similar to the Transfer Restricted Securities; and (xiii) cause the Indenture to be qualified under the TIA not later than the effective date of the Shelf Registration Statement required by this Agreement and, in connection therewith, cooperate with the Trustee and the Holders to effect such changes to the Indenture as may be required for such Indenture to be so qualified in accordance with the terms of the TIA; and execute and use its best efforts to cause the Trustee to execute, all documents that may be required to effect such changes and all other forms and documents required to be filed with the Commission to enable such Indenture to be so qualified in a timely manner; and (xix) provide promptly to each Holder upon request each document filed with the Commission pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange Act. (b) Restrictions on Holders. Each Holder agrees by acquisition of a Transfer Restricted Security that, upon receipt of the notice referred to in Section 5(a)(iv)(C) or any notice from the Company of the existence of any fact of the kind described in Section 5(a)(iv)(D) hereof (in each case, a "SUSPENSION NOTICE"), such Holder will forthwith discontinue disposition of Transfer Restricted Securities pursuant to the applicable Registration Statement until (i) such Holder's has received copies of the supplemented or amended Prospectus contemplated by Section 5(a)(v) hereof, or (ii) such Holder is advised in writing by the Company that the use of the Prospectus may be resumed, and has received copies of any additional or supplemental filings that are incorporated by reference in the Prospectus (in each case, the "RECOMMENCEMENT DATE"). Each Holder receiving a Suspension Notice hereby agrees that it will either (i) 8
destroy any Prospectuses, other than permanent file copies, then in such Holder's possession which have been replaced by the Company with more recently dated Prospectuses or (ii) deliver to the Company (at the Company's expense) all copies, other than permanent file copies, then in such Holder's possession of the Prospectus covering such Transfer Restricted Securities that was current at the time of receipt of the Suspension Notice. SECTION 6. REGISTRATION EXPENSES (a) All expenses incident to the Company's performance of or compliance with this Agreement will be borne by the Company, regardless of whether a Shelf Registration Statement required by this Agreement becomes effective, including without limitation: (i) all registration and filing fees and expenses; (ii) all fees and expenses of compliance with federal securities and state Blue Sky or securities laws; (iii) all expenses of printing (including printing certificates for the Common Stock to be issued upon conversion of the Notes and printing of Prospectuses), messenger and delivery services and telephone; (iv) all fees and disbursements of counsel for the Company (subject to clause (b) below); (v) all application and filing fees in connection with listing the Common Stock on a national securities exchange or automated quotation system pursuant to the requirements hereof; and (vi) all fees and disbursements of independent certified public accountants of the Company (including the expenses of any special audit and comfort letters required by or incident to such performance). The Company will, in any event, bear its internal expenses (including, without limitation, all salaries and expenses of its officers and employees performing legal or accounting duties), the expenses of any annual audit and the fees and expenses of any Person, including special experts, retained by the Company. (b) In connection with any Shelf Registration Statement required by this Agreement, the Company will pay, on behalf of the Initial Purchaser and the Holders selling Transfer Restricted Securities pursuant to the "Plan of Distribution" contained in the Shelf Registration Statement, the reasonable fees and disbursements of not more than one counsel, who shall be Ropes & Gray LLP, unless another firm shall be chosen by the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Transfer Restricted Securities (provided that holders of Common Stock issued upon conversion of the Notes shall be deemed to be holders of the aggregate principal amount of Notes from which such Common Stock was converted) for whose benefit such Shelf Registration Statement is being prepared. SECTION 7. INDEMNIFICATION (a) The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Holder, its partners, its directors, its officers and each Person, if any, who controls such Holder (within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act and Section 20 of the Exchange Act), from and against any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities, judgments, (including without limitation, any legal or other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending any matter, including any action that could give rise to any such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or judgments) caused by any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Shelf Registration Statement, preliminary prospectus or Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) provided by the Company to any Holder or any prospective purchaser of registered Notes or registered shares of Common Stock or caused by any omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, except insofar as such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or judgments are caused by an untrue statement or 9
omission or alleged untrue statement or omission that is based upon information relating to any of the Holders furnished in writing to the Company by any of the Holders. (b) Each Holder of Transfer Restricted Securities agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify and hold harmless the Company and its directors and officers, and each person, if any, who controls (within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act) the Company, to the same extent as the foregoing indemnity from the Company set forth in Section 7(a) above, but only with reference to information relating to such Holder furnished in writing to the Company by such Holder expressly for use in any Registration Statement. In no event shall any Holder, its partners, its directors, its officers or any Person, if any, who controls such Holder be liable or responsible for any amount in excess of the amount by which the total amount received by such Holder with respect to its sale of Transfer Restricted Securities pursuant to a Shelf Registration Statement exceeds the amount of any damages that such Holder, its partners, its directors, its officers or any Person, if any, who controls such Holder has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. (c) In case any action shall be commenced involving any person in respect of which indemnity may be sought pursuant to Section 7(a) or 7(b) (the "INDEMNIFIED PARTY"), the indemnified party shall promptly notify the person against whom such indemnity may be sought (the "INDEMNIFYING PERSON") in writing and the indemnifying party shall assume the defense of such action, including the employment of counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party and the payment of all fees and expenses of such counsel, as incurred (except that in the case of any action in respect of which indemnity may be sought pursuant to both Sections 7(a) and 7(b), a Holder shall not be required to assume the defense of such action pursuant to this Section 7(c), but may employ separate counsel and participate in the defense thereof, but the fees and expenses of such counsel, except as provided below, shall be at the expense of the Holder). Any indemnified party shall have the right to employ separate counsel in any such action and participate in the defense thereof, but the fees and expenses of such counsel shall be at the expense of the indemnified party unless (i) the employment of such counsel shall have been specifically authorized in writing by the indemnifying party, (ii) the indemnifying party shall have failed to assume the defense of such action or employ counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party or (iii) the named parties to any such action (including any impleaded parties) include both the indemnified party and the indemnifying party, and the indemnified party shall have been advised by such counsel that there may be one or more legal defenses available to it which are different from or additional to those available to the indemnifying party (in which case the indemnifying party shall not have the right to assume the defense of such action on behalf of the indemnified party). In any such case, the indemnifying party shall not, in connection with any one action or separate but substantially similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances, be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one separate firm of attorneys (in addition to any local counsel) for all indemnified parties and all such fees and expenses shall be reimbursed as they are incurred. Such firm shall be designated in writing by a majority of the Holders, in the case of the parties indemnified pursuant to Section 7(a), and by the Company, in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 7(b). The indemnifying party shall indemnify and hold harmless the indemnified party from and against any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and judgments by reason of any settlement of any action effected with its written consent. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement or compromise of, or consent to the entry of judgment with respect to, any pending or threatened action in respect of which the indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity or contribution may be or could have been sought hereunder by the indemnified party, unless such settlement, compromise or judgment (i) includes an unconditional release of the indemnified party from all liability on claims that are or could have been the subject matter of such action and (ii) does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability 10
or a failure to act, by or on behalf of the indemnified party. (d) To the extent that the indemnification provided for in this Section 7 is unavailable to an indemnified party in respect of any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or judgments referred to therein, then each indemnifying party, in lieu of indemnifying such indemnified party, shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or judgments (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company, on the one hand, and the Holders, on the other hand, from their sale of Transfer Restricted Securities or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause 7(d)(i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause 7(d)(i) above but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand, and of the Holders, on the other hand, in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or judgments, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative fault of the Company, on the one hand, and of the Holders, on the other hand, shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company, on the one hand, or by the Holders, on the other hand, and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The Company and each Holder agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 7(d) were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Holders were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in the immediately preceding paragraph. The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages, liabilities or judgments referred to in the immediately preceding paragraph shall be deemed to include, subject to the limitations set forth above, any legal or other expenses incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any matter, including any action that could have given rise to such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or judgments. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, no Holder or its related Indemnified Holders shall be required to contribute, in the aggregate, any amount in excess of the amount by which the total received by such Holder with respect to the sale of its Transfer Restricted Securities pursuant to a Registration Statement exceeds the amount of any damages which such Holder has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Holders' obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 7(d) are several in proportion to the respective principal amount of Transfer Restricted Securities held by each of the Holders hereunder and not joint. 11
SECTION 8. RULE 144A AND RULE 144 The Company agrees with each Holder, for so long as any Transfer Restricted Securities remain outstanding and during any period in which the Company (i) is not subject to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, to make available, upon request of any Holder of Transfer Restricted Securities, to any Holder or beneficial owner of Transfer Restricted Securities in connection with any sale thereof and any prospective purchaser of Transfer Restricted Securities designated by such Holder or beneficial owner, the information required by Rule 144A(d)(4) under the Act in order to permit resales of such Transfer Restricted Securities pursuant to Rule 144A, and (ii) is subject to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, to make all filings required thereby in a timely manner in order to permit resales of such Transfer Restricted Securities pursuant to Rule 144. SECTION 9. UNDERWRITTEN REGISTRATIONS (a) If any of the Transfer Restricted Securities covered by any Shelf Registration Statement are to be sold in an underwritten offering, the investment banker or investment bankers and manager or managers that will administer the offering will be selected by the Company, subject to the approval by the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of such Transfer Restricted Securities (provided that holders of Common Stock issued upon conversion of the Notes shall be deemed to be holders of the aggregate principal amount of Notes from which such Common Stock was converted), such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed, and the terms of such underwritten offering will be approved by the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of such Transfer Restricted Securities (provided that holders of Common Stock issued upon conversion of the Notes shall be deemed to be holders of the aggregate principal amount of Notes from which such Common Stock was converted), subject to the consent of the Company, such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed. No Holder of Transfer Restricted Securities may participate in any underwritten registration hereunder unless such Holder (i) agrees to sell its Transfer Restricted Securities on the basis reasonably provided in any underwriting arrangements approved by the Persons entitled hereunder to approve such arrangements and (ii) completes and executes all questionnaires, powers of attorney, indemnities, underwriting agreements and other documents required under the terms of such underwriting arrangements. (b) Each Holder of Transfer Restricted Securities agrees, if requested (pursuant to a timely written notice) by the managing underwriters in an underwritten offering made pursuant to a Shelf Registration Statement, not to effect any private sale or distribution (including a sale pursuant to Rule 144(k) and Rule 144A, but excluding non-public sales to any of its affiliates, officers, directors, employees and controlling persons) of any of the Notes, in the case of an underwritten offering of the Notes, or the Common Stock, in the case of an underwritten offering of shares of Common Stock constituting Transfer Restricted Securities, during the period beginning not more than 20 days prior to, and ending 90 days after, the closing date of such underwritten offering. The foregoing provisions of Section 9(b) shall not apply to any Holder of Transfer Restricted Securities if such Holder is prevented by applicable statute or regulation from entering into any such agreement. 12
(c) If any of the Transfer Restricted Securities covered by any Shelf Registration are to be sold in an underwritten offering, the underwriters, their controlling persons and their respective officers, directors, employees, representatives and agents shall be entitled to indemnity (substantially similar to the indemnity set forth in Section 7 of the Agreement) from the Company and the Holders, which indemnity may be set forth in an underwriting agreement. SECTION 10. MISCELLANEOUS (a) Remedies. The Company acknowledges and agrees that any failure by the Company to comply with its obligations under Section 3 hereof may result in material irreparable injury to the Initial Purchaser or the Holders for which there is no adequate remedy at law, that it will not be possible to measure damages for such injuries precisely and that, in the event of any such failure, the Initial Purchaser or any Holder may obtain such relief as may be required to specifically enforce the Company's obligations under Section 3 hereof. The Company further agrees to waive the defense in any action for specific performance that a remedy at law would be adequate. Other than the equitable remedy of specific enforcement, the sole damages payable for a violation of the terms of this Agreement for which Special Interest is expressly provided in Section 2 of the Notes shall be such Special Interest. (b) No Inconsistent Agreements. The Company will not, on or after the date of this Agreement, enter into any agreement with respect to its securities that is inconsistent with the rights granted to the Holders in this Agreement or otherwise conflicts with the provisions hereof. Except pursuant to the agreements listed on Annex A, the Company has not previously entered into any agreement (which has not expired or been terminated) granting any registration rights with respect to its securities to any Person. The rights granted to the Holders hereunder do not in any way conflict with and are not inconsistent with the rights granted to the holders of the Company's securities under any agreement in effect on the date hereof that has not been waived. (c) No Piggybacks on Shelf Registration Statement. The Company shall not grant to any of its security holders (other than the holders of Transfer Restricted Securities in such capacity) the right to include any of its securities in any Shelf Registration Statement provided for in this Agreement other than the Transfer Restricted Securities. (d) Amendments and Waivers. The provisions of this Agreement may not be amended, modified or supplemented, and waivers or consents to or departures from the provisions hereof may not be given unless (I) in the case of this Section 10(d)(I), the Company has obtained the written consent of all outstanding Transfer Restricted Securities and (II) in the case of all other provisions hereof, the Company has obtained the written consent of Holders of a majority of the outstanding principal amount (provided that holders of Common Stock issued upon conversion of the Notes shall be deemed to be holders of the aggregate principal amount of Notes from which such Common Stock was converted) of Transfer Restricted Securities (excluding Transfer Restricted Securities held by the Company or its Affiliates). (e) Third Party Beneficiary. The Holders shall be third party beneficiaries to the agreements made hereunder between the Company, on the one hand, and the Initial Purchaser, on the other hand, and shall have the right to enforce such agreements directly to the extent they may deem such enforcement necessary or advisable to protect its rights or the rights of Holders hereunder. (f) Notices. All notices and other communications provided for or permitted hereunder shall be 13
made in writing by hand-delivery, first-class mail (registered or certified, return receipt requested), telex, telecopier, or air courier guaranteeing overnight delivery: (i) if to a Holder, at the address set forth on the records of the Registrar under the Indenture, with a copy to the Registrar under the Indenture; and (ii) if to the Company: Akamai Technologies, Inc. 8 Cambridge Center Cambridge, MA 02142 Telecopier No.: (617) 444-3695 Attention: General Counsel With a copy to: Hale and Dorr LLP 60 State Street Boston, MA 02109 Telecopier No.: 617-526-5000 Attention: Susan Murley All such notices and communications shall be deemed to have been duly given: at the time delivered by hand, if personally delivered; five (5) Business Days after being deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, if mailed; when receipt acknowledged, if telecopied; and on the next business day, if timely delivered to an air courier guaranteeing overnight delivery. Copies of all such notices, demands or other communications shall be concurrently delivered by the Person giving the same to the Trustee at the address specified in the Indenture. (g) Successors and Assigns. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the successors and assigns of each of the parties, including, without limitation and without the need for an express assignment, subsequent Holders of Transfer Restricted Securities; provided, that nothing herein shall be deemed to permit any assignment, transfer or other disposition of Transfer Restricted Securities in violation of the terms hereof or of the Purchase Agreement or the Indenture. If any transferee of any Holder shall acquire Transfer Restricted Securities in any manner, whether by operation of law or otherwise, such Transfer Restricted Securities shall be held subject to all of the terms of this Agreement, and by taking and holding such Transfer Restricted Securities such Person shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed to be bound by and to perform all of the terms and provisions of this Agreement, including the restrictions on resale set forth in this Agreement and, if applicable, the Purchase Agreement, and such Person shall be entitled to receive the benefits hereof. (h) Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and by the parties hereto in separate counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same agreement. (i) Headings. The headings in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall 14
not limit or otherwise affect the meaning hereof. (j) Governing Law. THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, WITHOUT REGARD TO THE CONFLICT OF LAW RULES THEREOF. (k) Severability. In the event that any one or more of the provisions contained herein, or the application thereof in any circumstance, is held invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of any such provision in every other respect and of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not be affected or impaired thereby. (l) Entire Agreement. This Agreement is intended by the parties as a final expression of their agreement and intended to be a complete and exclusive statement of the agreement and understanding of the parties hereto in respect of the subject matter contained herein. There are no restrictions, promises, warranties or undertakings, other than those set forth or referred to herein with respect to the registration rights granted with respect to the Transfer Restricted Securities. This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings between the parties with respect to such subject matter. (The remainder of this page has been intentionally left blank) 15
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Registration Rights Agreement as of the date first written above. AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: /s/ Robert Cobuzzi --------------------------------- Name: Robert Cobuzzi Title: Chief Financial Officer
CREDIT SUISSE FIRST BOSTON LLC By: /s/ Joseph D. Fashano ---------------------------- Name: Joseph D. Fashano Title: Director
ANNEX A AGREEMENTS AS TO REGISTRATION RIGHTS Fourth Amended and Restated Registration Rights Agreement dated September 20, 1999


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20040108172105.txt.gz
TIME:20040108172105
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
Item 5. Other Events
     Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced on January 7, 2004 that the initial purchaser of $175.0 million in principal amount of our 1.0% Convertible Senior Notes due December 15, 2033, which we refer to as the 1.0% Senior Notes, has exercised its option to purchase an additional $25.0 million in principal amount of the 1.0% Senior Notes. A copy of the press release announcing the exercise of the option is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
     In addition, we announced on January 8, 2004 that we have repurchased, in several individually negotiated transactions, an aggregate of $99.0 million in principal amount of our 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007 for a total of $98.9 million in cash. A copy of the press release announcing the repurchases is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.2.
Item 7. Exhibits
See Exhibit Index following the Signature Page of this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced that the initial purchaser of its $175 million in principal amount of 1.0% Senior Convertible Notes due December 15, 2033 has exercised its option to purchase an additional $25 million aggregate principal amount of the convertible notes. The Company expects the closing of the sale of the additional convertible notes to occur on January 9, 2004.
CAMBRIDGE, MA, January 7, 2004
The convertible notes were offered only to qualified institutional buyers in reliance on Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and outside the United States pursuant to Regulation S of the Securities Act. The convertible notes and the common stock issuable upon conversion of the notes have not been registered under the Securities Act, or any state securities laws. Unless so registered, the convertible notes and the common stock issuable upon conversion of the notes may not be offered or sold in the United States or any state or to any U.S. person except pursuant to an exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act and applicable state securities laws.
About Akamai
Akamai  , is the world's largest on demand distributed computing platform for conducting profitable e-business. Overcoming the inherent limitations of the Internet, Akamai's services ensure a high-performing, scalable, and secure environment for organizations to cost effectively and their e-business infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai's industry-leading services, matched with world-class customer care, are used by hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet
extend
control
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management, including the expected closing of the sale of the additional purchase of the convertible notes, that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including any failure to close the sale of the notes referenced above and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act

 
EXHIBIT 99.2
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced that it has repurchased, in several individually negotiated transactions, an aggregate of $99 million in principal amount of its 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007. Following these repurchases, an aggregate of $201 million in principal amount of the 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007 remains outstanding.
CAMBRIDGE, MA, January 8, 2004
The Company paid a total of $98.9 million in cash to certain institutional investors to repurchase and retire the Notes. As a result of the repurchases, the Company expects to realize interest savings of $5.45 million annually through June 2007.
About Akamai
Akamai  , is the world's largest on demand distributed computing platform for conducting profitable e-business. Overcoming the inherent limitations of the Internet, Akamai's services ensure a high-performing, scalable, and secure environment for organizations to cost effectively and their e-business infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai's industry-leading services, matched with world-class customer care, are used by hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet
extend
control
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning expectations as to interest savings as a result of the repurchase of a portion of the Company's 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20040202171107.txt.gz
TIME:20040202171107
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
Item 5. Other Events
     On January 29, 2004, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an amendment with EquiServe Trust Company, N.A. ("Amendment No. 1") to the Rights Agreement, dated as of September 10, 2002 (the "Rights Agreement"), between the Company and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A., as Rights Agent, whereby the Company amended the Rights Agreement to provide (i) that each Right (as defined in the Rights Agreement) would entitle the registered holder to purchase from the Company one one-thousandth of a share of Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock, $.01 par value per share, at a price of $65.00 in cash, subject to adjustment, (ii) that in the event the transfer agency relationship in effect between the Company and the Rights Agent terminates pursuant to the Company's termination of such relationship, the Rights Agent will be deemed to resign automatically on the effective date of such termination; and any required notice will be sent by the Company, (iii) the address of the Company is updated for notices under the Rights Agreement, (iv) any supplement or amendment that the Rights Agent is required to sign shall be effective upon execution by the Company (whether or not then executed by the Rights Agent or the certificate referred to in the immediately preceding sentence has been delivered) and (v) a force majeure provision.
     Amendment No. 1 is attached hereto as Exhibit 4.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. The foregoing description of Amendment No. 1 does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to such Exhibit.
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Exhibit 4.1
     THIS AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO RIGHTS AGREEMENT is entered into as of January 29, 2004 by and between Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") and EquiServe Trust Company, N.A., a national banking association, as Rights Agent (the "Rights Agent").
     WHEREAS, the Company and the Rights Agent are parties to that certain Rights Agreement dated September 10, 2002 (the "Rights Agreement");
     WHEREAS, the Rights (as defined in the WHEREAS clause at the beginning of the Rights Agreement) are still redeemable; and
     WHEREAS, the Company has directed the Rights Agent to enter into this Amendment No. 1 pursuant to Section 27 of the Rights Agreement;
     NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and mutual agreements set forth herein, the parties agree as follows:
     1. Section 7(b) of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by deleting such section in its entirety and substituting therefor the following:
     2. Section 21 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the following sentence immediately after the first sentence thereof:
     3. Section 26 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the first sentence thereof in its entirety and substituting therefor the following:
 
     4. Section 27 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by deleting such section in in its entirety and substituting therefor the following:
     5. The Rights Agreement is hereby amended to insert the following section in its entirety:
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have duly executed this Amendment No. 1 to Rights Agreement, intending that it be executed under seal, as of the date first written above.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20040204160420.txt.gz
TIME:20040204160420
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 12. Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On February 4, 2004, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the year ended December 31, 2003. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
     
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2003. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2003 was $45.2 million, an 8.1 percent increase over third quarter revenue of $41.8 million, and a 27.7 percent increase over fourth quarter 2002 revenue of $35.4 million. Total revenue for 2003 was $161.3 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 4, 2004
Net loss, in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP), for the fourth quarter 2003 was $2.1 million, or $0.02 per share, compared to a net loss for the third quarter 2003 of $3.9 million, or $0.03 per share, and compared to a net loss of $55.6 million, or $0.48 per share, in the fourth quarter of 2002. Included in the fourth quarter 2003 net loss is $2.1 million of expenses associated with the retirement of debt.
For the first time in its history, the Company also achieved positive earnings per share of $0.01 on a normalized basis*, generating $1.5 million positive net income for the fourth quarter, compared to a normalized net loss* for the prior quarter of $0.03 per share, or $3.5 million, and compared to First Call's consensus estimate for the fourth quarter of a normalized net loss of $0.01 per share.
Akamai ended the year with $208.4 million in cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash, marketable securities and restricted marketable securities, including $95.8 million in net debt proceeds and redemptions, an increase from $99.0 million at the end of the third quarter.
 
"The fourth quarter of 2003 was our best quarter to date," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai. "We achieved the most revenue of any quarter; the most cash flow from operations in any quarter; and, marking the most important improvement in our five-year history, we generated positive earnings per share on a normalized basis. All of this capped a year of consistent revenue growth and rapidly declining losses."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2003 was $14.2 million, a 21 percent increase from $11.7 million in the prior quarter, and over a ten fold increase over Adjusted EBITDA of $1.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2002. (* See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures for definition of Adjusted EBITDA.)
"With revenue growth in 2003 of 11 percent year-over-year, improvement in gross margins, and a decrease in cash operating expenses of 25 percent year-over-year, we're clearly seeing the leverage in our model," continued Conrades.
The number of recurring customers grew in the fourth quarter by 70 net new accounts for a total of 1,126 customers under long-term services contracts, the highest level in more than two years. For the full year, the Company's customer count increased almost 18 percent.
Customers
New Akamai EdgeSuite customers in the fourth quarter included Americanas (Brazil's leading e-retailer), AUDI AG, Bayer AG, Brylane, Christian Dior, Knight Ridder Digital, Learning.com, Muze Inc., OfficeMax Inc., Overstock.com, ScanAlert and Tourism New Zealand, among others.
Resellers accounted for approximately 25 percent of 2003 fourth quarter revenue, as compared to approximately 22 percent in the prior quarter and 26 percent in the fourth quarter of 2002.
Network
Akamai's global network at the end of the fourth quarter consisted of 14,733 servers in 1,072 networks, in 71 countries. The geographic reach and capacity of Akamai's network is unprecedented in its ability to serve the needs of enterprise customers, government agencies and major Web-centric businesses.
 
Financial Statements
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing GAAP-based financial measurements, Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes encourage use of and emphasis on GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net loss, before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items which are either not part of the company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, early debt extinguishment, net interest expense and restructuring activities, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
 
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and the capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated statement of cash flows in the company's most recent quarterly report on Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income (loss)" as net income (loss) before amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income (loss) to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net loss should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the company's operating loss and net loss, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G, the company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
 
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at www.akamai.com in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 4766875.
Quarterly Conference Call
About Akamai
Akamai is the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, making the Internet predictable, scalable, and secure for conducting profitable e-business. The Akamai on demand platform enables customers to easily extend their Web operations  with full control  anywhere, anytime, without the cost of building out infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai serves hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. Akamai is . For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, unexpected loss of key large customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's network infrastructure, inability to service and repay our outstanding debt and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20040323175055.txt.gz
TIME:20040323175055
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
 
 
Item 5.      Other Events.
     On March 23, 2004, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") issued a press release in which the Company announced that Michael Ruffolo had resigned as its Chief Operating Officer and was leaving the Company. The full text of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 7.      Exhibits
99.1      Press release dated March 23, 2004 issued by Akamai Technologies, Inc.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
99.1      Press release dated March 23, 2004 issued by Akamai Technologies, Inc.

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Contacts:
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, today announced that Michael A. Ruffolo, the company's Chief Operating Officer, will be leaving Akamai, effective April 9th. No replacement will be named, and members of Akamai's senior management team, including George H. Conrades, Chairman and CEO, Paul Sagan, President, and Robert Hughes, Vice President of Global Sales and Services, will assume Ruffolo's responsibilities.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  March 23, 2004 
In addition to remaining very active on technology company boards, Ruffolo will focus on investing in early stage companies and provide consulting for companies that need turnaround and restructuring expertise.
"While we are sorry to see Mike go, we are deeply grateful for his strong leadership and operational skills during a very critical business transformation at Akamai," Conrades said. "Akamai is well-positioned for success and we appreciate Mike's many contributions. We wish him well in his new endeavors and thank him for helping establish Akamai as a market-driven, technology leader."
"Akamai is a strong company getting stronger every day," Ruffolo said. "I am proud of our tremendous progress over the past three years and leave confident about the company's future prospects."
About Akamai
Akamai is the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, making the Internet predictable, scalable, and secure for conducting profitable e-business. The Akamai on demand platform enables customers to easily extend their Web operations  with full control  anywhere, anytime, without the cost of building out infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai serves hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. Akamai is . For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20040428161038.txt.gz
TIME:20040428161038
EVENTS:		Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 5. Other Events
     On April 27, 2004, we announced that we have repurchased, in several individually negotiated transactions, an aggregate of $56.4 million in principal amount of our 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007 for a total of $58.5 million in cash, including amounts used for payments of accrued interest. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 7. Exhibits
     See Exhibit Index following the Signature Page of this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 12. Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On February 4, 2004, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the year ended December 31, 2003. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is attached as Exhibit 99.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced that it has repurchased, in several individually negotiated transactions, an additional aggregate $56.4 million in principal amount of its 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007 ("the 5 1/2% Notes").
CAMBRIDGE, MA, April 27, 2004
In total, the Company has repurchased $193.2 million in principal amount of its 5 1/2% Notes, leaving an aggregate of $106.8 million in principal amount of the notes outstanding.
The Company used the proceeds from its recent $200 million 1% Senior Convertible Notes ("the 1% Notes") offering to fund the repurchase of almost two-thirds of its original principal balance of the 5 1/2% Notes. As a result of the repurchases, the Company has extended the effective maturity date of approximately two-thirds of its long-term debt from June 2007 to December 2010, and reduced its annualized interest expense by $8.6 million.
"We set out to significantly improve our balance sheet and to reduce our annual interest expense," said Robert Cobuzzi, chief financial officer at Akamai. "We have accomplished our objective through a combination of the extremely favorable terms on our new 1% Notes and our repurchases of the 5 1/2% Notes. Akamai's financial position is now the strongest it has been in years."
Previously, the Company repurchased $37.8 million in principal amount of the 5 1/2% Notes as part of a tender offer, which closed on March 24, 2004, and another $99.0 million in principal amount in individually negotiated transactions prior to the tender offer. To effect the most recent individual repurchases, Akamai paid a total of $58.5 million in cash, including amounts used for payment of accrued interest, to certain institutional investors.
 
About Akamai
Akamai is the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, making the Internet predictable, scalable, and secure for conducting profitable e-business. The Akamai on demand platform enables customers to easily extend their Web operations  with full control  anywhere, anytime, without the cost of building out infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai serves hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. Akamai is . For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning expectations as to interest savings as a result of the repurchase of a portion of the Company's 5 1/2% Notes. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.

 
Exhibit 99.2
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2004. Revenue for the first quarter 2004 was $48.4 million, a 7 percent increase over fourth quarter 2003 revenue of $45.2 million, and a 32 percent increase over first quarter 2003 revenue of $36.6 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 28, 2004
For the first time in its history, the Company achieved net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP), generating $2.9 million in net income for the first quarter of 2004.
"This was the best quarter in Akamai's history, and represents our fifth consecutive quarter of revenue growth," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai. "By almost any measure, we are off to a great start this year, as we continued our momentum from 2003 and delivered on our commitment to become profitable in early 2004. This is a major milestone for Akamai, and we are excited about our prospects to build upon this achievement in the future."
Net income for the first quarter of 2004 was $2.9 million, or $0.02 per share, including a charge of $2.0 million relating to early extinguishment of debt, compared to a net loss in accordance with GAAP, for the fourth quarter 2003 of $2.1 million, or $0.02 per share, and a net loss in accordance with GAAP for the first quarter of 2003 of $8.6 million, or $0.07 per share. On a normalized basis, the Company generated net income of $0.04 per share* in the first quarter 2004, in line with First Call's consensus estimates. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
 
Adjusted EBITDA* for the first quarter of 2004 was $14.8 million, up from $14.2 million in the prior quarter, and more than twice Adjusted EBITDA of $6.3 million in the first quarter of 2003. Adjusted EBITDA as a percent of revenue was 31 percent, consistent with the prior quarter. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"Akamai has delivered on its promise to achieve profitability this quarter, forming the foundation of a long-term, viable business that generates shareholder value. Reaching profitability this quarter underscores the strength of our recurring revenue services model, and we are in our best position ever to take advantage of the growing adoption of the Internet for mission-critical business processes," continued Conrades.
Customers
The number of total customers under long-term services contracts increased by 4 percent to 1,172, the highest level in more than two years.
New customers in the first quarter included Crabtree & Evelyn Ltd, DHL International, Ltd., Indianapolis Motor Speedway, LLC, National Center for Missing & Exploited Children, Portugal Telecom Multimedia, United Nations Development Program, University of Pennsylvania, XM Satellite Radio, and Zone Labs Inc., among others.
Resellers and international accounted for 27 percent and 19 percent of 2004 first quarter revenue, respectively.
Network
Akamai's global network at the end of the first quarter of 2004 consisted of 14,434 servers in 1,044 networks, in 69 countries. The geographic reach and capacity of Akamai's network is unprecedented in its ability to serve the needs of enterprise customers, government agencies and major Web-centric businesses.
 
Financial Statements
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing GAAP-based financial measurements, Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes encourage use of and emphasis on GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income (loss), before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items which are either not part of the company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, early debt extinguishment, net interest expense and restructuring activities, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and the capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated statement of cash flows in the company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Akamai defines "normalized net income (loss)" as net income (loss) before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income (loss) to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income (loss) should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the company's operating income (loss) and net income (loss), as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G, the company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at www.akamai.com in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 6513887.
About Akamai
Akamai is the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, making the Internet predictable, scalable, and secure for conducting profitable e-business. The Akamai on demand platform enables customers to easily extend their Web operations  with full control  anywhere, anytime, without the cost of building out infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai serves hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. Akamai is . For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, unexpected loss of key large customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's network infrastructure, inability to service and repay our outstanding debt and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20040727160310.txt.gz
TIME:20040727160310
EVENTS:		Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 5.    Other Events
     On June 17, 2004, we repurchased, in a negotiated transaction, $12.2 million in principal amount of our 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007, our 5% Notes, for a total of $12.7 million in cash, including payment of accrued interest. In addition, on July 26, 2004, we entered into a negotiated agreement with one of the holders of our 5% Notes to repurchase approximately $13.1 million in principal amount of such notes for approximately $13.5 million, including accrued interest.
Item 7.    Exhibits
     See Exhibit Index following the Signature Page of this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 12.    Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On July 27, 2004, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2004. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the global leader of distributed computing solutions and services, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2004. Revenue for the second quarter 2004 was $50.8 million, a 5 percent increase over first quarter 2004 revenue of $48.4 million, and a 35 percent increase over second quarter 2003 revenue of $37.8 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
July 27, 2004
"We have benefited from the increased adoption of our platform by leading enterprises and government agencies to make mission-critical applications predictable, scalable and secure," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai. "We saw continued growth in such markets as online commerce, electronic software and music downloads, streaming for media and entertainment, news and information portals, and the public sector."
Net income in accordance with GAAP for the second quarter of 2004 was $6.8 million, or $0.06 per share, a 133 percent increase over first quarter of 2004 net income of $2.9 million, or $0.02 per share, and a $21.4 million improvement over second quarter 2003 net loss in accordance with GAAP of $14.6 million, or a loss of $0.13 per share. The Company generated normalized net income* of $10.4 million, or $0.08 per share* in the second quarter 2004, exceeding First Call consensus estimate of $0.07 per share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the second quarter of 2004 was $17.7 million, up from $14.9 million, a 19 percent increase over the prior quarter, and an increase of 133 percent over the Adjusted EBITDA of $7.6 million in the second quarter of 2003. Adjusted EBITDA as a percent of revenue was 35 percent. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
 
Cash from operations increased 44 percent quarter-over-quarter to $12.5 million in the second quarter. Also during the quarter, the Company further reduced long-term debt by retiring an aggregate $68.5 million in principal amount of its 5 1/2 percent convertible subordinated notes due in 2007 and recently signed a definitive agreement to repurchase another $13.1 million of its 5 1/2% notes. The Company's diligent efforts to reduce long-term debt have resulted in a decrease of annual interest payments of nearly $10 million since 2003.
At June 30, 2004, the Company had 125.5 million shares of common stock outstanding.
The number of total customers under long-term services contracts increased by 4 percent from first quarter 2004 to 1,214, the highest level in three years.
Customers
New customers in the second quarter included ArcSoft, Inc., Business Week, Inc., Canadian Tourism Commission, Carlsberg, Carlson Companies, Inc., Christopher Little Literary Agency, Emory University, Expedia, Inc., Finish Line Inc., Frictionless Commerce, Gallup Organization, OneTravel, RONA Inc., State of Arizona, Under Armour, United States Department of Labor, USDA Forest Service, and Verity, among others.
Resellers and international accounted for 26 percent and 17 percent of 2004 second quarter revenue, respectively.
Akamai's global network at the end of the second quarter of 2004 consisted of 14,916 servers in 1,016 networks, in 69 countries. The geographic reach and capacity of Akamai's network is unprecedented in its ability to serve the needs of enterprise customers, government agencies and major Web-centric businesses.
Network
 
Financial Statements
 
 
 
In addition to providing GAAP-based financial measurements, Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes encourage use of and emphasis on GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income (loss), before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items which are either not part of the company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment, net interest expense and restructuring activities, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and the capitalization of internal- use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statements of cash flows in the company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Akamai defines "normalized net income (loss)" as net income (loss) before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income (loss) to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income (loss) should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the company's operating income (loss) and net income (loss), as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G, the company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at www.akamai.com in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 8279556.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai is the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, making the Internet predictable, scalable, and secure for conducting profitable e-business. The Akamai on demand platform enables customers to easily extend their Web operations  with full control  anywhere, anytime, without the cost of building out infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai serves hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. Akamai is . For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
About Akamai
The Business Internet
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues , the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, inability to service and repay our outstanding debt and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20041004161847.txt.gz
TIME:20041004161847
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
     On September 29, 2004, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") and Microsoft Corporation ("Microsoft") executed an amendment (the "Amendment") to the Akamai Services Customer Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2003, between Akamai and Microsoft (the "Microsoft Agreement"). The Microsoft Agreement was previously filed as Exhibit 10.28 to Akamai's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") on November 13, 2003. In addition to being an Akamai customer, Microsoft was an early investor in Akamai.
     The material terms and conditions of the Amendment relate to changes to the pricing applicable to Microsoft's usage of Akamai services and its minimum monthly and quarterly usage commitment for such services. Akamai will be seeking confidential treatment from the Commission of the pricing and commitment provisions of the Amendment in connection with Akamai's filing of the Amendment as an exhibit to its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2004.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20041027160945.txt.gz
TIME:20041027160945
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
Table of Contents
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On October 27, 2004, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2004. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the global leader of distributed computing solutions and services, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2004. Revenue for the third quarter 2004 was $53.3 million, a 5 percent increase over second quarter 2004 revenue of $50.8 million, and a 28 percent increase over third quarter 2003 revenue of $41.8 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
October 27, 2004
"We continue to benefit from increased utilization of Akamai services by businesses and government agencies to deliver more of their business processes, Web applications and content over the Internet," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai. "By helping customers overcome Internet bottlenecks and achieve their demanding online objectives, our business continues to expand with existing accounts while we add new customers to our platform."
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the third quarter of 2004 was $11.2 million, or $0.08 per diluted share, a 65 percent increase over previous quarter net income of $6.8 million, or $0.05 per diluted share, and a $15.1 million improvement over third quarter 2003 net loss of $3.9 million, or negative $0.03 per share. The Company generated normalized net income* of $12.2 million, or $0.09 per diluted share in the third quarter 2004, matching the First Call consensus estimate of $0.09 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the third quarter of 2004 was $17.9 million, up from $17.7 million in the prior quarter, and an increase of 53 percent over the Adjusted EBITDA of $11.7 million in the third quarter of 2003. Adjusted EBITDA as a percent of revenue was 34 percent. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
 
Cash from operations increased 17 percent to $14.5 million in the third quarter as compared to the second quarter of 2004 and is up significantly from $1.1 million generated in the third quarter of 2003. Also during the quarter, the Company further reduced long-term debt by retiring $13.1 million in principal amount of its 5 1/2 percent convertible subordinated notes due in 2007. The Company's diligent efforts to reduce long-term debt have resulted in a decrease of annual interest payments by nearly $10 million since 2003.
At September 30, 2004, the Company had approximately 125.9 million shares of common stock outstanding, and had approximately $120 million of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Customers
The number of total customers under long-term services contracts increased by 4 percent from second quarter 2004 to 1,258, the highest level in three years, and the seventh consecutive quarter of net customer growth.
New customers in the third quarter included Apple Vacations, California Lottery Commission, CanWest Interactive (Canada.com), Cox Newspapers, Inc., Ford, Lincoln and Mercury Divisions of Ford Motor Company, MSN Music, National Archives and Records Administration (NARA), National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), Visa USA, and Vonage, among others.
Sales through resellers and outside the United States accounted for 26 percent and 18 percent of revenue for the third quarter of 2004, respectively.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at www.akamai.com in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 1100790.
About Akamai
Akamai is the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, making the Internet predictable, scalable, and secure for conducting profitable e-business. The Akamai on demand platform enables customers to easily extend their Web operations  with full control  anywhere, anytime, without the cost of building out infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai serves hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. Akamai is . For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet
 
Financial Statements
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes encourage use of and emphasis on GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income (loss), before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the company's historical operating trend.
 
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment, net interest expense and restructuring activities, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and the capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statement of cash flows in the company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income (loss)" as net income (loss) before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income (loss) to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income (loss) should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the company's operating income (loss) and net income (loss), as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result
 
of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services , inability to service and repay our outstanding debt and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20041220163745.txt.gz
TIME:20041220163745
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
Table of Contents
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
Table of Contents
Item 8.01. Other Events
     On December 20, 2004, the Registrant announced that it repurchased, in an individually negotiated transaction, $24.9 million in principal amount of its 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007 for a total of $26.1 million in cash, including accrued interest. A copy of the press release announcing the repurchase is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced that on December 17, 2004 it repurchased an additional $24.9 million in principal amount of its 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due 2007 ("the 5 1/2% Notes").
CAMBRIDGE, MA, December 20, 2004
In total, the Company has repurchased $243.4 million in principal amount of its 5 1/2% Notes, leaving an aggregate of $56.6 million in principal amount of the 5 1/2% Notes outstanding. To effect the most recent repurchase, the Company paid a total of $26.1 million in cash to an institutional investor, including accrued interest as of the closing date.
About Akamai
Akamai is the global leader of distributed computing solutions and services, making the Internet predictable, scalable, and secure for conducting profitable e-business. The Akamai on-demand platform enables customers to easily extend their Web operations with full control anywhere, anytime, without the cost of building out infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai serves hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. Akamai is . For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Business Internet
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning expectations as to interest savings as a result of the repurchase of a portion of the Company's 5 1/2% Notes. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050104191415.txt.gz
TIME:20050104191415
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Other Events
Table of Contents
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On January 4, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") entered into an employment agreement (the "Agreement") with Paul Sagan who will become its President and Chief Executive Officer effective as of April 1, 2005 (see Item 5.02 below). Under the Agreement, Mr. Sagan is entitled to an annual salary of $400,000 effective as of January 4, 2005 and is to receive a grant of options to purchase 250,000 shares of Akamai common stock at an exercise price equal to the fair market value of Akamai's common stock on January 4, 2005. The options vest according to the following schedule: 25% on January 4, 2006 with the remaining 75% vesting in equal installments of 6.25% each quarter thereafter. If the Akamai Board of Directors approves a senior executive bonus plan for fiscal year 2005, Mr. Sagan will be eligible for an annual incentive bonus award of up to 100% of his annualized base salary based on achievement of specified individual and corporate performance goals. Mr. Sagan will also be eligible to participate in any long-term incentive plan for senior executives that the Akamai Board of Directors may adopt in 2005. If such a plan is not adopted, or if it does not include the Chief Executive Officer, then the Compensation Committee of the Akamai Board of Directors will consider an additional stock option grant to Mr. Sagan of an additional 250,000 shares of Akamai common stock at a purchase price equal to the fair market value on the date of such grant. If Mr. Sagan terminates his employment under certain circumstances following a change in control of Akamai, vesting of a portion of his options shall accelerate and he shall be entitled to lump sum cash payments equal to: two (2) years of his then-current base salary and an award equal to two (2) times his then-applicable annual incentive bonus at target (defined as fifty percent (50%) of his then-current annual base salary). If Mr. Sagan is involuntarily terminated for any reason other than cause, he shall be entitled to lump sum cash payments equal to: one year of his then-current base salary; an amount equal to 12 times the monthly premium for continued health and dental insurance coverage paid by Akamai on his behalf in the month preceding termination; and an award of his then-applicable annual incentive bonus at target. In addition, if Mr. Sagan is involuntarily terminated in 2005 for any reason other than cause, Akamai will accelerate the number of shares which will be deemed vested as though the grant date of his options was the date eighteen (18) months prior to the grant date; if he is so terminated in 2006, Akamai will accelerate the number of shares which will be deemed vested as though the grant date of his options was the date twelve (12) months prior to the Grant Date; and if he is so terminated in 2007, Akamai will accelerate the number of shares which will be deemed vested as though the grant date of his options was the date six (6) months prior to the grant date.
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
     Akamai announced today that George H. Conrades, its Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, has resigned as Chief Executive Officer of Akamai effective as of April 1, 2005 and will become the Executive Chairman of the Akamai Board of Directors on that date. In addition, the Board of Directors voted to elect Paul Sagan, currently President of Akamai, to succeed Mr. Conrades as Chief Executive Officer effective on April 1, 2005. Mr. Sagan will retain the title of President.
     The Akamai Board of Directors also voted today, January 4, 2005, to increase the size of Akamai's Board of Directors to 10 persons and elected Mr. Sagan to fill the vacancy created thereby.
Item 8.01 Other Events
     On January 4, 2005, Akamai issued a press release announcing the appointments of George H. Conrades as its Executive Chairman and Paul Sagan as its Chief Executive Officer effective on April 1, 2005.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced that George Conrades, 65, will become Executive Chairman of Akamai, effective April 1, 2005, the sixth anniversary of his tenure as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer. The Akamai Board of Directors has elected Paul Sagan, 45, currently President of Akamai, to succeed Conrades as CEO. Sagan, who will continue to hold the title of President, also was elected to the Company's Board of Directors, which has been expanded to 10 members.
CAMBRIDGE, MA, January 4, 2005 
"We've made significant progress since our founding in 1998, developing unique technology and a global infrastructure, and then reaching profitability and positive cash flow," said Conrades. "I'm very proud of what we've accomplished, and I'm even more excited about the opportunities ahead. We've built an enviable customer base, developed an industry-leading platform for the delivery of content and applications, and attracted the best and the brightest employees from around the world."
Conrades continued, "This is the right time to transition to the next generation of Akamai leadership. We have a great management team in place, and I join in the Board's unanimous support and confidence in Paul's ability to continue driving Akamai's growth. As my partner over the last six years, Paul has made many critical contributions to Akamai's success. The Company is extremely fortunate to have such an outstanding executive who has earned the respect of Akamai's customers, employees, and shareholders."
Conrades' tenure at Akamai is notable for the Company's emergence as a pioneer in the development of the Internet as a crucial medium for conducting business. Joining Akamai in 1999, Conrades' executive management experience and leadership have been instrumental to the commercial success of Akamai's content delivery service. Conrades spearheaded Akamai's rapid rise as the market leader in content and application delivery, taking the Company public in October of 1999. Since then, Conrades has managed Akamai's growth, navigating the Company through a market recession in 2001 and 2002, and building Akamai's customer base to over 1,200 enterprises and government agencies.
"Under George's leadership, Akamai successfully leveraged its industry-leading technology to revolutionize how companies utilize the Internet for competitive advantage," said Martin Coyne II, Lead Director of the Akamai Board. "This transition is a natural and long-planned evolution of management responsibility by the Board. Our objective is to have the best possible leadership team in place for continued growth while providing certainty about Akamai's succession plan for the years ahead. We are delighted that George will continue in an active role as Executive Chairman supporting Paul and his seasoned team in the execution of the company's business plan."
 
As a senior executive since Akamai's founding, first as Chief Operating Officer in 1998 and then as President beginning in 1999, Sagan has been a member of the executive team for the company's entire history. In these roles, he helped chart the course for many of Akamai's strategic accomplishments. Most recently, he was responsible for the development of Akamai's multi-year business strategy and plan.
Prior to joining Akamai, Sagan was Senior Advisor to the World Economic Forum, consulting to the Geneva-based organization on information technologies issues. He has also held executive management positions as President and Editor of Time Inc. New Media, and Senior Vice President of Time Warner Cable Programming. Sagan was a co-founder of Road Runner, the first cable modem service, and Pathfinder, one of the first Web properties that pioneered Internet advertising. He is a three-time Emmy Award winner for broadcast journalism.
Akamai is the global leader in distributed computing solutions and services, making the Internet predictable, scalable, and secure for conducting profitable e-business. The Akamai on demand platform enables customers to easily extend their Web operations  with full control  anywhere, anytime, without the cost of building out infrastructure. Headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts, Akamai serves hundreds of today's most successful enterprises and government agencies around the globe. Akamai is . For more information, visit .
About Akamai
The Business Internet
www.akamai.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050131170122.txt.gz
TIME:20050131170122
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Table of Contents
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On January 25, 2004, the Compensation Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") adopted cash incentive plans for the following executive officers: Paul Sagan, Lisa Arthur, Robert Cobuzzi, Melanie Haratunian and Chris Schoettle (collectively, the "Executives"). Each of these plans provides for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, each Executive's bonus is weighted as follows: 50% based on Akamai achievement of revenue targets; 25% on Akamai's achievement of earnings per share targets; and 25% on achievement of individual or departmental performance goals. For Mr. Sagan, the target cash bonus is equal to 50% of his base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 100% of his base salary. For Ms. Arthur, the target cash bonus is equal to 25% of her base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 50% of her base salary. For Mr. Cobuzzi, the target cash bonus is equal to 47.6% of his base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 95.2% of his base salary. For Ms. Haratunian, the target cash bonus is equal to 25% of her base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 50% of her base salary. For Mr. Schoettle, the target cash bonus is equal to 33% of his base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 66.7% of his base salary. The form of cash incentive plan is attached hereto, and incorporated by reference herein, as Exhibit 99.1.
     On January 25, 2004, the Compensation Committee adopted the Executive Severance Pay Plan (the "Severance Plan") for members of Akamai's executive management group, currently referred to as the Office of the CEO. Eligible participants under the plan who are terminated for any reason other than "cause" (as defined in the Severance Plan) and have signed a mutually acceptable separation agreement shall be entitled to a lump sum payment equal to one year of the participant's then-current base salary, less applicable withholdings for taxes and other required deductions, plus an amount equal to 12 times the monthly premium for continued health and dental insurance coverage paid by Akamai on the participant's behalf in the month preceding the participant's termination. The Executive Severance Pay Plan and Summary Plan Description are attached hereto, and incorporated by reference herein, as Exhibit 99.2. The foregoing description of the Severance Plan is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the Executive Severance Pay Plan set forth in Exhibit 99.2.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
This 2005 incentive plan sets forth your annual compensation for 2005 based on the achievement of certain corporate and individual performance objectives. In order to receive your annual incentive bonus, you must be an employee and a member of the Office of the CEO throughout all of 2005 and the corporate and individual objectives must be met, as described more thoroughly below. The Compensation Committee will resolve all questions arising in the administration, interpretation and application of this plan, and the Compensation Committee's determination will be final and binding on all concerned. Where permitted by applicable law, the Compensation Committee reserves the right to modify, at its discretion and at any time, the terms of this plan, including, but not limited to, the performance objectives, targets, and payouts.
Performance Objectives/Targets
     The following are the corporate and individual performance objectives for your 2005 Incentive:
Payment of the annual incentive bonus is contingent upon, and will be paid following, the achievement of these objectives. The Compensation Committee of Akamai's Board of Directors retains the right and sole discretion to determine whether the corporate and individual objectives have been met, after consideration of any recommendation by the Chief Executive Officer. The Compensation Committee's determination will be final and binding on all concerned. No incentive will be paid under a specific incentive criteria for performance below the associated threshold listed for that criteria. Performance that falls between the target and either the threshold or maximum will be interpolated on a straight line basis to determine the incentive amount. Performance above the maximum may result in higher reward at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee.
 
The payment of any annual incentive bonus will be made within thirty (30) days following the filing of Akamai's SEC 10-K filing for FY 2005.

 
Exhibit 99.2
1. . Akamai Technologies, Inc. (referred to herein collectively with its United States subsidiaries as "Akamai" or the "Company") hereby establishes an unfunded "Executive Severance Pay Plan" (the "Plan") which is intended to be a welfare benefit plan within the meaning of Section 3(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA"). The Plan is in effect for Akamai executives who are members of the Office of the CEO (or its successor group) ("Executives") at the time that they are terminated.
Establishment of the Plan
2. . The Plan is for the purpose of assisting Executives of Akamai who are involuntarily terminated for reasons other than "cause" and to resolve fully and finally all potential issues arising out of their employment. This Plan does not supersede, or in any way alter or amend, the provisions of any agreement(s) an Executive may have regarding the acceleration of stock options, restricted stock, and/or lump sum payment you may receive in the event of termination following a Change of Control, as that term is defined in such agreement(s).
Purpose
3. . Eligibility to participate in the Plan, which is to be determined in the sole discretion of the Plan Administrator, is limited to regular full-time Executives who are involuntarily terminated by Akamai or any of its United States based subsidiaries on or after January 1, 2005 and who have signed a separation agreement acceptable to and provided by the Company that contains, among other things, a release and a non-compete agreement (agreeing not to compete with the Company for one year following such termination) in such forms and within such times as may be reasonably determined by the Company.
Eligibility
     The following are eligible for severance pay under this Plan:
NOT
 
     For the purpose of this Plan, "cause" is defined as (a) any act or omission by an Executive which has an adverse effect on Akamai's business or on the Executive's ability to perform services for Akamai, including, without limitation, the commission of any crime (other than ordinary traffic violations), or (b) refusal or failure to perform assigned duties, serious misconduct, or excessive absenteeism, or (c) refusal or failure to comply with Akamai's Code of Business Ethics. Whether an Executive has been terminated for "cause" shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Plan Administrator after consultation with appropriate members of Akamai's management..
4. . Any Executive terminated for any reason other than "cause" as defined above shall be entitled to a lump sum payment equal to one year of the Executive's then-current base salary, less applicable withholdings for taxes and other required deductions, plus an amount equal to 12 times the monthly premium for continued health and dental insurance coverage paid by the Company on the Executive's behalf in the month preceding the Executive's termination. The lump sum severance pay benefit shall be paid within thirty (30) days of the Executive's receipt of notice of termination, provided that the Executive has signed a separation and a non-compete agreement acceptable to and provided by the Company.
Severance Pay Benefit
5. . All cash payments under the Plan shall be funded solely from Akamai's general assets.
Funding
6. . The initial term of the Plan shall commence effective January 1, 2005 through December 31, 2005 and shall automatically renew for successive one year periods unless either party notifies the other of its intent not to renew at least thirty days prior to the expiration of the then-current term. The Plan may be amended at Akamai's discretion without prior notice at any time.
Duration of Plan
7. . The general administration of the Plan herein set forth and the responsibility for carrying out its provisions shall be vested in the Plan Administrator. The Plan Administrator shall be the "Administrator" within the meaning of section 3(16) of ERISA and shall have all the responsibilities and duties contained therein. Akamai is the Plan Administrator of the Plan. The Board of Directors of Akamai may delegate to an Administrative Committee the day-to-day operation and administration of the Plan.
Plan Administration
     The Plan Administrator shall discharge its duties with respect to the Plan solely in the interest of the participants and their beneficiaries, with the care, skill, prudence and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like objectives. However, the inclusion of this language in the Plan is for the sole purpose of informing the Plan Administrator of the applicable standard of care under ERISA. It is not intended that this provision impose any additional duties, responsibilities, or liabilities than would otherwise apply under ERISA.
     The Plan Administrator shall have such powers as are necessary to discharge its duties, including, but not limited to, interpretation and construction of the Plan, sole discretion to determine all questions of
 
eligibility, participation and benefits and all other related or incidental matters. The Plan Administrator shall decide all such questions in accordance with the terms of the controlling legal documents and applicable law, and its decision will be binding on Akamai, the participant, the participant's spouse or other dependent or beneficiary and all other interested parties.
     The Plan Administrator may adopt rules and procedures of uniform applicability in its interpretation and implementation of the Plan.
     The Plan Administrator may require each participant to submit, in such form as it shall deem reasonable and acceptable, proof of any information which the Plan Administrator finds necessary or desirable for the proper administration of the Plan.
     The Plan Administrator shall maintain such records as are necessary to carry out the provisions of the Plan. The Plan Administrator shall also make all disclosures which are required by ERISA and any subsequent amendments thereto.
8. . Any questions concerning eligibility to participate in the Plan and the payment of any severance pay or benefits hereunder should be directed to the Administrative Committee. The Plan will comply with the Claims Procedure set forth in ERISA regulations at Title 29 C.F.R.  2560.503-1.
Questions and Claims Procedure
     8.1. .
Claim for Benefits
     8.2 . In the case of a denial of the Claimant's Application, the written notice will set forth:
Content of Denial
 
     8.3 .
Appeals
     If the Claimant does not file the appeal within this time period (or request in writing an extension from the Administrative Committee), the Claimant will be precluded from appealing the decision at a later time.
9. . Akamai may withhold from any payment under the Plan any federal, state, or local taxes required by law to be withheld with respect to such payment and such sum as Akamai may reasonably estimate is necessary to cover any taxes for which Akamai may be liable and which may be assessed with regard to such payment. Akamai may also withhold sums to cover an Executive's share of any applicable group health insurance premiums. Akamai may also withhold sums owed to Akamai by an Executive which have not been repaid in full before the time for payment of any benefits due under this Plan.
Tax and Other Withholdings
10. . Legal process with respect to claims under the Plan may be served on the Plan Administrator.
Agent for Service of Legal Process
11. . All costs and expenses incurred in administering the Plan, including the expenses of the Plan Administrator, shall be borne by Akamai.
Expenses
12. . The Plan is not a contract between Akamai and any Executive, nor is it a condition of employment of any Executive. Nothing contained in the Plan gives, or is intended to give, any Executive the right to be retained in the service of Akamai, or to interfere with the
Plan Not an Employment Contract
 
right of Akamai to discharge or terminate the employment of any Executive at any time and for any reason. Except as provided in paragraph 2 above, no Executive shall have the right or claim to benefits beyond those expressly provided in this Plan. All rights and claims are limited as set forth in the Plan.
13. . To the extent permitted by law, the Plan Administrator and all Executives, agents and representatives of the Plan Administrator shall be indemnified by Akamai and saved harmless against any claim and the expenses of defending against such claims, resulting from any action or conduct relating to the administration of the Plan except to the extent that such claims arise from gross negligence, willful neglect, or willful misconduct. However, Akamai will have the right to select counsel and to control the prosecution or defense of any lawsuit. Additionally, Akamai will not be required to indemnify any person for any amount incurred through any settlement unless Akamai consents to the settlement.
Indemnification
14. . In case any one or more of the provisions of this Plan (or part thereof) shall be held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability shall not affect the other provisions hereof, and this Plan shall be construed as if such invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions (or part thereof) never had been contained herein.
Separability
15. . No right or interest of any participant in the Plan shall be assignable or transferable in whole or in part either directly or by operation of law or otherwise, including, but not limited to, execution, levy, garnishment, attachment, pledge or bankruptcy, provided, however, that this provision shall not be applicable in the case of obligations of a participant to Akamai.
Non-Assignability
16. . Akamai reserves the right, through its Board of Directors, to amend, modify or terminate this Plan at any time.
Amendment or Termination
17. . The pay and benefits provided for in the Plan are the maximum benefits that Akamai will pay. To the extent that any federal, state or local law, including, without limitation, so-called "plant closing" laws, requires Akamai to make a payment of any kind to an Executive because of that Executive's involuntary termination due to a Layoff, Reduction in Force, Plant or Facility Closing, Sale of Business, or similar event, the benefits provided under this Plan shall be reduced in an amount equal to any such payment(s). Akamai intends for the benefits provided under this Plan to satisfy any and all statutory obligations which may arise out of an Executive's involuntary termination for the foregoing reasons and the Plan Administrator shall so construe and implement the terms of the Plan.
Integration with Other Pay or Benefits Requirements
18. . The Plan and the rights of all persons under the Plan shall be construed in accordance with and under applicable provisions of ERISA, and the regulations thereunder, and the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts to the extent not pre-empted by federal law.
Governing Law
19. . Except where otherwise indicated by the context, any masculine gender used herein shall also include the feminine and vice versa, and the definition of any term herein in the singular shall also include the plural, and vice versa.
Gender and Number
20. . Participants in the Plan are entitled to certain rights and protections under ERISA. ERISA provides that all Plan participants shall be entitled to:
Statement of ERISA Rights
 
     The Plan Administrator may make a reasonable charge for the copies.
     In addition to creating rights for Plan participants, ERISA imposes duties upon the people who are responsible for the operation of the Plan. The people who operate the Plan, called "fiduciaries" of the Plan, have a duty to do so prudently and in the interest of all Plan participants and beneficiaries. No one, including Akamai or any other person, may fire a participant or otherwise discriminate against the participant in any way for the purpose of preventing the participant from obtaining a benefit or exercising his or her rights under ERISA. If a participant's claim for a benefit is denied in whole or in part, the participant must receive a written explanation of the reason for the denial. The participant has the right to have the Plan Administrator review and reconsider the claim. Under ERISA, there are steps a participant can take to enforce the above rights. For instance, if the participant requests materials from the Plan Administrator and does not receive them within 30 days, the participant may file suit in a federal court. In such a case, the court may require the Plan Administrator to provide the materials and pay the participant up to $100 a day until the participant receives the materials, unless the materials were not sent because of reasons beyond the control of the Plan Administrator. If a participant has a claim for benefits which is denied or ignored, in whole or in part, the participant may file suit in a state or federal court. If it should happen that Plan fiduciaries misuse the Plan's money, or if a participant is discriminated against for asserting his or her rights, the participant may seek assistance from the United States Department of Labor, or may file suit in a federal court. The court will decide who should pay court costs and legal fees. If the participant is successful, the court may order the person whom the participant sued to pay these costs and fees. If the participant loses, the court may order the participant to pay these costs and fees, if, for example, it finds the claim is frivolous. If the participant has any questions about this Plan, the participant should contact the Plan Administrator. If a participant has any questions about this statement or about his or her rights under ERISA, the participant should contact the nearest Area Office of Pension and Welfare Benefits, United States Department of Labor.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050217160434.txt.gz
TIME:20050217160434
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On February 17, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the year and quarter ended December 31, 2004. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
     (c) Exhibits
     The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2004. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2004 was $57.6 million, an 8 percent increase over the previous quarter's revenue of $53.3 million, and a 27 percent increase over fourth quarter 2003 revenue of $45.2 million. Total revenue for 2004 was $210.0 million, a 30 percent increase over 2003 revenue of $161.3 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 17, 2005
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the fourth quarter of 2004 was $13.4 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, a 19 percent increase over previous quarter net income of $11.2 million, or $0.08 per diluted share, and a $15.5 million improvement over 2003's fourth quarter net loss of $2.1 million, or a loss of $0.02 per share. Full year net income for 2004 was $34.4 million, or $0.25 per diluted share, a significant improvement over the 2003 net loss of $27.3 million, or a loss of $0.25 per share.
"These quarterly and full-year financial results were the most successful in the company's six-year history," said George Conrades, chairman and CEO of Akamai. "In 2004, we demonstrated the power of the Akamai business model by delivering strong revenue growth, high profit margins, sustainable cash flow, and increasing profitability. The market opportunity for our on-demand platform, our growing customer base, and our demonstrated ability to innovate will continue to drive our success."
 
The Company generated normalized net income* of $14.5 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2004, a 19 percent increase over the prior quarter normalized net income of $12.2 million, or $0.09 per diluted share. Full year normalized net income for 2004 was $42.5 million, or $0.31 per diluted share, an improvement of $67.8 million over 2003. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
As a result of a December 2004 accounting pronouncement (EITF 04-08) regarding the inclusion of contingent convertible debt for calculation of diluted earnings per share, the Company's GAAP and normalized diluted earnings per share results for the fourth quarter and 2004 include 12.9 million shares that underlie the Company's outstanding 1% Senior Convertible Notes.
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2004 was $18.6 million, up from $17.9 million in the prior quarter, and $14.1 million in the fourth quarter of 2003. Adjusted EBITDA was $69.1 million for the full year up from $39.9 million in 2003. Adjusted EBITDA margins improved to 33 percent in 2004 from 25 percent in 2003. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations increased 7 percent to $15.6 million in the fourth quarter as compared to third quarter cash from operations of $14.5 million, and more than doubled fourth quarter 2003 cash from operations of $7.7 million. Also during the quarter, the Company further reduced long-term debt by retiring $24.9 million in principal amount of its 5 1/2% Convertible Subordinated Notes due in 2007 (the "5 1/2% Notes"). As a result of the repurchase of a portion of its outstanding 5 1/2% Notes throughout 2004, the Company has decreased annual net interest expense by almost $9 million year-over-year.
At December 31, 2004, the Company had approximately 126.8 million shares of common stock outstanding, and had approximately $108.4 million of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Customers
Total customers under long-term services contracts increased by 16 percent year-over-year to 1,310. New customers in the fourth quarter included CondeNet, Inc., European Space Agency, Golden Village, Marks & Spencer, Maven Networks, Northern Tool & Equipment Co., SKF International, and Spirent Communications, among others.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 28 percent and 20 percent, respectively, of revenue for the fourth quarter of 2004.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 3348508.
www.akamai.com
 
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,300 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
* Includes depreciation (see supplemental tables for figures)
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income (loss), before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment, net interest expense and restructuring activities, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA
 
also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statement of cash flows in the company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income (loss)" as net income (loss) before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income (loss) to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income (loss) should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the company's operating income (loss) and net income (loss), as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services , inability to service and repay our outstanding debt and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050318092916.txt.gz
TIME:20050318092916
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On March 16, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Akamai"), entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement") by and among Akamai, Aquarius Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Akamai ("Sub"), Speedera Networks, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Speedera") and a representative of certain equity holders of Speedera to purchase all of the outstanding equity of Speedera for approximately 12,000,000 shares of Akamai's common stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Merger Shares"). The closing of the merger (the "Closing") is subject to customary closing conditions including obtaining necessary regulatory approvals and the approval of Speedera's stockholders.
     Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, Sub will merge with and into Speedera, with Speedera continuing as the surviving corporation (the "Merger"). Upon the Closing, Speedera's stockholders, option and warrant holders and certain members of the management of Speedera (collectively, the "Equity Holders") will be issued the Merger Shares, subject to certain adjustments. In addition, the parties have agreed that fifteen percent of the Merger Shares to be issued in the Merger will be deposited in an escrow account on Closing to secure certain obligations of the Equity Holders to Akamai under the Merger Agreement. Accordingly, the Merger Shares that will be issued to the Equity Holders at the Closing will be less the escrow amount, which such amount, if any, will be payable to the Equity Holders upon termination of the escrow account.
     The Merger Agreement provides for a stay of all existing litigation between Akamai and Speedera until the Closing or any earlier termination of the Merger Agreement. Uponthe Closing, the Merger Agreement provides that all lawsuits between Akamai and Speedera would be released.
     Akamai and Speedera intend to file an application for a permit from, and a fairness hearing with, the California Commission of Corporations pursuant to Section 25121 of the California Corporate Securities Law of 1968 so that the issuance of the Merger Shares in the Merger shall be exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act") by virtue of the exemption from registration provisions contained in Section 3(a)(10) of the Securities Act.
     The foregoing description of the transactions contemplated by the Merger Agreement does not purport to be a complete statement of the parties' rights under the Merger Agreement and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Merger Agreement, a copy of which is filed with this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
     On March 16, 2005, Akamai and Speedera issued a joint press release announcing the signing of the Merger Agreement. A copy of the press release is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.2.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1 AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER BY AND AMONG AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC., AQUARIUS ACQUISITION CORP., SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. AND THE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE EQUITY HOLDERS (NAMED HEREIN) March 16, 2005
TABLE OF CONTENTS -i-
2.26 Permits................................................................. 32 2.27 Certain Business Relationships With Affiliates.......................... 32 2.28 Brokers' Fees........................................................... 32 2.29 Books and Records....................................................... 32 2.30 Prepayments, Prebilled Invoices and Deposits............................ 32 2.31 Government Contracts.................................................... 33 2.32 Disclosure.............................................................. 33 ARTICLE III REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE BUYER AND THE TRANSITORY SUBSIDIARY......................................................................... 34 3.1 Organization and Corporate Power........................................ 34 3.2 Authorization of Transaction............................................ 34 3.3 Noncontravention........................................................ 34 3.4 Broker's Fees........................................................... 34 3.5 Investment Representation............................................... 34 3.6 Litigation.............................................................. 35 3.7 SEC Filings............................................................. 35 3.8 Merger Shares and Management Shares Validly Issued...................... 35 3.9 Disclosure.............................................................. 35 3.10 Actions Consistent With Reorganization Treatment........................ 35 ARTICLE IV COVENANTS................................................................ 36 4.1 Closing Efforts......................................................... 36 4.2 Treatment of the Merger as a Reorganization for Tax Purposes............ 36 4.3 Governmental and Third-Party Notices and Consents....................... 36 4.4 Stockholder Approval.................................................... 37 4.5 Operation of Business................................................... 39 4.6 Stay of Litigation...................................................... 42 4.7 Access to Information................................................... 42 4.8 Notice of Breaches...................................................... 42 4.9 Exclusivity............................................................. 43 4.10 Listing Notifications................................................... 44 4.11 Expenses................................................................ 44 4.12 Company 401(k) Plan..................................................... 44 4.13 280G Covenant........................................................... 44 4.14 FIRPTA.................................................................. 44 4.15 Silicon Valley Bank Registration Rights................................. 44 4.16 Option Acceleration..................................................... 44 ARTICLE V CONDITIONS TO CONSUMMATION OF MERGER...................................... 45 5.1 Conditions to Obligations of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary.... 45 5.2 Conditions to Obligations of the Company................................ 47 ARTICLE VI INDEMNIFICATION.......................................................... 48 6.1 Indemnification by the Equity Holders................................... 48 6.2 Indemnification Claims.................................................. 49 6.3 Survival of Representations and Warranties.............................. 51 6.4 Limitations............................................................. 51 ARTICLE VII REGISTRATION OF SHARES.................................................. 52 7.1 California Permit; Registered Offering.................................. 52 7.2 Lock-up Agreements...................................................... 54 ARTICLE VIII TAX MATTERS............................................................ 54 8.1 Preparation and Filing of Tax Returns; Payment of Taxes................. 54 8.2 Tax Indemnification by the Equity Holders............................... 55 8.3 Allocation of Certain Taxes............................................. 55
-ii-
8.4 Termination of Tax-Sharing Agreements............................... 55 8.5 Scope of Article VIII............................................... 55 ARTICLE IX INDEMNIFICATION OF DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS OF THE COMPANY............. 56 9.1 Indemnification and Insurance....................................... 56 ARTICLE X TERMINATION........................................................... 56 10.1 Termination of Agreement............................................ 56 10.2 Effect of Termination............................................... 57 ARTICLE XI DEFINITIONS.......................................................... 57 ARTICLE XII MISCELLANEOUS....................................................... 71 12.1 Press Releases and Announcements.................................... 71 12.2 No Third Party Beneficiaries........................................ 71 12.3 Entire Agreement.................................................... 71 12.4 Succession and Assignment........................................... 72 12.5 Counterparts and Facsimile Signature................................ 72 12.6 Headings............................................................ 72 12.7 Notices............................................................. 72 12.8 Governing Law....................................................... 73 12.9 Amendments and Waivers.............................................. 73 12.10 Severability...................................................... 73 12.11 Submission to Jurisdiction........................................ 73 12.12 Construction...................................................... 74
Exhibit A - Stockholder Agreement Exhibit B - Management Participant Agreement Exhibit C - Form of Notice and Transmittal Exhibit D - Form of Indemnification Escrow Agreement Exhibit E - Form of Contingent Settlement Agreement and Partial Release Exhibit F - Form of Opinion of Counsel to the Company Exhibit G - Form of Opinion of Counsel to the India Subsidiary Exhibit H - Form of Opinion of Counsel to the Buyer Schedule I - Management Participants Schedule 12.1 - Press Releases and Announcements Disclosure Schedule -iii-
AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER This Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Agreement") is entered into as of March 16, 2005, by and among Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Buyer"), Aquarius Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Buyer (the "Transitory Subsidiary"), Speedera Networks, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and, solely for the purposes of Section 1.14 hereof and carrying out its resulting responsibilities hereunder as representative of the Company Stockholders, the Management Participants and the holders of Options, the Representative specified in Article XI. The Buyer, the Transitory Subsidiary and the Company are sometimes referred to herein individually as a "Party" and collectively as the "Parties". This Agreement contemplates a merger of the Transitory Subsidiary into the Company. In such merger, (a) the Company Stockholders will receive Buyer Common Shares in exchange for their capital stock of the Company, (b) options and warrants to acquire common stock of the Company will become options and warrants to acquire Buyer Common Shares and (c) Management Participants will receive Buyer Common Shares in satisfaction of certain obligations of the Company to such Management Participants, as set forth in the Management Participant Agreement. The Representative will have the authority to act, with binding effect, on behalf of the Equity Holders according to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement. For federal income tax purposes, it is intended that the Merger shall qualify as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code. Simultaneously with the execution of this Agreement, in order to induce the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary to enter into the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the Principal Stockholders have executed the Stockholder Agreement and the Management Participants have executed the Management Participant Agreement. Now, therefore, in consideration of the representations, warranties and covenants herein contained, the Parties hereby agree as follows. ARTICLE I THE MERGER 1.1 The Merger. Upon and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Transitory Subsidiary shall merge with and into the Company at the Effective Time. From and after the Effective Time, the separate corporate existence of the Transitory Subsidiary shall cease and the Company shall continue as the Surviving Corporation. The Merger shall have the effects set forth in Section 259 of the Delaware General Corporation Law. 1.2 The Closing. The Closing shall take place at the offices of Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP, 60 State Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02109, commencing at 9:00 a.m. local time on the Closing Date. 1.3 Actions at the Closing. At the Closing: (a) the Company shall deliver to the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary the various certificates, instruments and documents referred to in Section 5.1; (b) the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary shall deliver to the Company the various certificates, instruments and documents referred to in Section 5.2;
(c) the Surviving Corporation shall file with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware the Certificate of Merger; (d) the Buyer or the Surviving Co the Exchange Agent to establish a reserve account for the distribution of certificates representing the Initial Merger Shares to the Company Stockholders in accordance with Sections 1.5(d) and 1.8(a); (e) the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation shall deliver instructions to the Exchange Agent to distribute certificates representing the Initial Merger Shares to the Management Participants in accordance with Sections 1.6(b) and 1.9; and (f) the Buyer, the Representative and the Escrow Agent shall execute and deliver the Indemnification Escrow Agreement, and the Buyer shall deliver to the Escrow Agent certificates for the Indemnification Escrow Shares being placed in escrow on the Closing Date pursuant to Section 1.13. 1.4 Additional Action. The Surviving Corporation may, at any time from and after the Effective Time, take any action, including executing and delivering any document, in the name and on behalf of either the Company or the Transitory Subsidiary, in order to consummate and give effect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 1.5 Conversion of Shares. At the Effective Time, by virtue of the Merger and without any action on the part of any Party or the holder of any of the following securities: (a) Each Outstanding Common Share shall be converted into and represent the right to receive (subject to the provisions of Section 1.13) a fraction of a share (the "Common Conversion Ratio") of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the Adjusted Merger Consideration, minus the Management Shares, minus the Preferred Consideration, by (ii) the Adjusted Total Company Shares. (b) Each Outstanding Series A Preferred Share shall be converted into and represent the right to receive (subject to the provisions of Section 1.13) a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares equal to the Series A Conversion Ratio; each Outstanding Series B Preferred Share shall be converted into and represent the right to receive (subject to the provisions of Section 1.13) a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares equal to the Series B Conversion Ratio; and each Outstanding Series C Preferred Share shall be converted into and represent the right to receive (subject to the provisions of Section 1.13) a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares equal to the Series C Conversion Ratio. (c) The Company shall take all steps necessary to ensure that all outstanding convertible promissory notes issued by the Company, if any, shall be converted into Common Shares immediately prior to the Closing, pursuant to the conversion terms thereof. (d) The Buyer Common Shares into which each Company Stockholder's Company Shares shall be converted at the Effective Time pursuant to Section 1.5(a) shall be delivered as follows: (i) On the Closing Date the Buyer shall (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13 the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Closing Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Company Stockholders in accordance with Section 1.8 the remainder of such Closing Buyer Common Shares, subject to the provisions of Section 1.10, not deposited into escrow (the "Initial Merger Shares"). -2-
(ii) On the date specified in Section 1.12(f) (the "Asset Value Adjustment Date"), if the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is positive, the Buyer shall (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13 the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Company Stockholders in accordance with Section 1.8 the remainder of such Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, subject to the provisions of Section 1.10, not deposited into escrow. (iii) On the date which is 18 months after Closing Date and is before the payment on any claims under the Escrow Agreement, the Buyer shall (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13 the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Company Stockholders in accordance with Section 1.8 the remainder of such Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, subject to the provisions of Section 1.10, not deposited into escrow. (e) Each Company Share held in the Company's treasury immediately prior to the Effective Time and each Company Share owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary shall be cancelled and retired without payment of any consideration therefor. (f) Each share of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Transitory Subsidiary issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be converted into and thereafter evidence one share of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Surviving Corporation. (g) Each Preferred Warrant outstanding and not exercised as of the Effective Time shall be converted into a warrant to acquire such number of shares of Buyer Common Shares equal to the number of shares of Buyer Common Shares that would be issusable pursuant to Section 1.5(b), if the warrant were exercised immediately before the Effective Time for Preferred Shares. The exercise price per Buyer Common Share shall equal the aggregate exercise price of such warrant divided by the number of Buyer Common Shares subject to such Preferred Warrants. The aggregate Option Value of the Preferred Warrants outstanding and not exercised as of the Effective Time (whether vested or exercisable) shall be added to the Preferred Consideration for all purposes of this Agreement. 1.6 Management Shares. (a) Each member of the Company's management named in Schedule I attached hereto (each a "Management Participant" and collectively the "Management Participants") shall have the right to receive as of the Effective Time (subject to Sections 1.13 and 1.6(b)) the number of Buyer Common Shares which have a Market Value equal to the excess, if any, of (x) such Management Participant's Bonus Pool Percentage of the Bonus Pool minus, (y) such Management Participant's Stockholder Payment (the "Management Shares"), it being understood that such calculation is dependent on the Common Conversion Ratio which is dependent on the definition of Management Shares and is an iterative calculation. (b) Of the Management Shares which each Management Participant shall have the right to receive as of the Effective Time pursuant to Section 1.6(a): (i) On the Closing Date the Buyer shall (A) deposit with the Escrow Agent the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of such Management Shares, calculated using the Closing Common Conversion Ratio, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares and deposited in escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a) and (B) deliver the -3-
remainder of such Management Shares, calculated using the Closing Common Conversion Ratio, not deposited into escrow (the "Initial Management Shares") to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Management Participants in accordance with 1.9. (ii) On the Asset Value Adjustment Date, if the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is positive, the Buyer shall (A) deposit with the Escrow Agent the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of such Management Shares, calculated using the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares and deposited in escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a), and (B) deliver the remainder of such Management Shares not deposited into escrow to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Management Participants in accordance with 1.9; in each case, less any Management Shares delivered to the Escrow Agent and the Management Participants, as the case may be, pursuant to Section 1.6(b)(i). (iii) On the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date, the Buyer shall (A) deposit with the Escrow Agent the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of any Management Shares not delivered pursuant to Section 1.6(b)(i) or 1.6(b)(ii), rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares and deposited in escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a), and (B) deliver the remainder of any such Management Shares not deposited into escrow (or delivered to the Management Participants pursuant to Sections 1.6(b)(i) or 1.6(b)(ii)) to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Management Participants in accordance with Section 1.9; provided, however, that if any Management Participant has received (or has had deposited into Escrow) Buyer Common Shares pursuant to this Section 1.6(b) which exceeds such Management Participants' Management Shares, the Management Participant shall promptly return any such excess shares to the Buyer. 1.7 Dissenting Shares. (a) Dissenting Shares shall not be converted into or represent the right to receive Buyer Common Shares, unless the Company Stockholder holding such Dissenting Shares shall have forfeited his, her or its right to appraisal under each of the Delaware General Corporation Law and the California Corporations Code or properly withdrawn, his, her or its demand for appraisal. If such Company Stockholder has so forfeited or withdrawn his, her or its right to appraisal of Dissenting Shares, then as of the occurrence of such event, such holder's Dissenting Shares shall cease to be Dissenting Shares and shall be converted into and represent the right to receive the Buyer Common Shares issuable in respect of such Company Shares pursuant to Section 1.5, which Buyer Common Shares shall be either deposited with the Escrow Agent or distributed to the Company Stockholder holding Dissenting Shares as provided in Section 1.5(d). (b) The Company shall give the Buyer (i) prompt notice of any written demands for appraisal of any Company Shares, withdrawals of such demands, and any other instruments that relate to such demands received by the Company and (ii) the opportunity to direct all negotiations and proceedings with respect to demands for appraisal under the Delaware General Corporation Law or the California Corporations Code, as applicable. The Company shall not, except with the prior written consent of the Buyer, make any payment with respect to any demands for appraisal of Company Shares or offer to settle or settle any such demands. 1.8 Exchange of Shares. (a) At or prior to the Effective Time, the Buyer shall appoint the Exchange Agent to effect the issuance of Initial Merger Shares in exchange for Certificates. On the Closing Date, the Buyer shall deliver instructions to the Exchange Agent to establish a reserve account for the distribution of -4-
certificates representing the Initial Merger Shares issuable to the Company Stockholders, as described in Section 1.5, and cash for any fractional shares as described in Section 1.10 (the "Exchange Fund"). Within five (5) business days after the Effective Time, provided that the Company has delivered to the Buyer at least five (5) business days prior to the Effective Time a list setting forth (i) the name of each holder of a Certificate, (ii) the mailing address of each such holder, (iii) the number of Company Shares represented by each Certificate held by each holder prior to the Effective Time and (iv) the total number of shares of Buyer Common Stock represented by such Certificate following the Effective Time, the Buyer shall cause the Exchange Agent to send to each holder of a Certificate a notice and a transmittal in substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit C advising such holder of the effectiveness of the Merger and the procedure for surrendering to the Exchange Agent such Certificate in exchange for the Initial Merger Shares issuable to such holder pursuant to Section 1.5. Each holder of a Certificate, upon proper surrender thereof to the Exchange Agent in accordance with the instructions in such notice, shall be entitled to receive in exchange therefor (subject to any Taxes required to be withheld) the Initial Merger Shares issuable pursuant to Section 1.5 plus cash in lieu of any fractional shares, as provided in Section 1.10 below. The Buyer shall instruct the Exchange Agent to distribute the Initial Merger Shares and cash in lieu of fractional shares to such holder as soon as practicable after receipt of such Certificate and such other documents required by such notice. Until properly surrendered, each such Certificate shall be deemed for all purposes to evidence only the right to receive a certificate for the Initial Merger Shares issuable pursuant to Section 1.5. Holders of Certificates shall not be entitled to receive certificates for the Initial Merger Shares to which they would otherwise be entitled until such Certificates are properly surrendered. (b) If any Initial Merger Shares are to be issued in the name of a person other than the person in whose name the Certificate surrendered in exchange therefor is registered, it shall be a condition to the issuance of such Initial Merger Shares that (i) the Certificate so surrendered shall be transferable, and shall be properly assigned, endorsed or accompanied by appropriate stock powers, (ii) such transfer shall otherwise be proper and (iii) the person requesting such transfer shall pay to the Exchange Agent any transfer or other Taxes payable by reason of the foregoing or establish to the satisfaction of the Exchange Agent that such Taxes have been paid or are not required to be paid. Notwithstanding the foregoing, neither the Exchange Agent nor any Party shall be liable to a holder of Company Shares for any Initial Merger Shares issuable to such holder pursuant to Section 1.5 that are delivered to a public official pursuant to applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar laws. (c) In the event any Certificate shall have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming such Certificate to be lost, stolen or destroyed, the Exchange Agent shall issue in exchange for such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate the Initial Merger Shares issuable in exchange therefor pursuant to Section 1.5. The Exchange Agent may, in its discretion and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate to give the Exchange Agent and the Buyer a bond in such sum as it may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the Exchange Agent or the Buyer with respect to the Certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed. (d) No dividends or other distributions that are payable to the holders of record of Buyer Common Shares as of a date on or after the Closing Date shall be paid to former Company Stockholders entitled by reason of the Merger to receive Initial Merger Shares until such holders surrender their Certificates for certificates representing the Merger Shares. Upon such surrender, the Buyer shall pay or deliver to the persons in whose name the certificates representing such Initial Merger Shares are issued any dividends or other distributions that are payable to the holders of record of Buyer Common Shares as of a date on or after the Closing Date and which were paid or delivered between the Effective Time and the time of such surrender; provided that no such person shall be entitled to receive any interest on such dividends or other distributions. -5-
(e) By demand, at any time after the first anniversary of the Effective Time, the Buyer may require that any portion of the Exchange Fund which remains undistributed to the Company Stockholders or Management Participants at such time shall be delivered to the Buyer and any Company Stockholder or Management Participant who has not previously complied with this Section 1.8 shall thereafter look only to the Buyer, as a general unsecured creditor, for payment of its claim for Buyer Common Shares, any cash in lieu of fractional Buyer Common Shares and any dividends or distributions with respect to Buyer Common Shares. (f) To the extent permitted by applicable law, none of the Buyer, the Transitory Subsidiary, the Company, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent shall be liable to any Company Stockholder or any Management Participant, as the case may be, for any Buyer Common Shares (or dividends or distributions with respect thereto) delivered to a public official pursuant to any applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar law. If any Certificate or required letter of transmittal shall not have been surrendered or delivered prior to the third anniversary of the Effective Time (or immediately prior to such earlier date on which any Buyer Common Shares, and any cash payable to any Company Stockholder or Management Participant or any dividends or distributions payable to the holder of such Buyer Common Shares pursuant to this Article I would otherwise escheat to or become the property of any Governmental Entity), any such Buyer Common Shares or cash, dividends or distributions in respect thereof shall, to the extent permitted by applicable law, become the property of the Surviving Corporation, free and clear of all claims or interest of any person previously entitled thereto. 1.9 Issuance of Management Shares. The Buyer shall deliver instructions to the Exchange Agent to distribute certificates representing the Management Shares to the Management Participants, as described in Section 1.6(b). As soon as practicable after the applicable date on which the Buyer is required to deliver the Management Shares pursuant to Section 1.6(b), the Exchange Agent shall deliver to the Management Participants the Management Shares issuable pursuant to Section 1.6(b). 1.10 Fractional Shares. No certificates or scrip representing fractional Merger Shares shall be issued to Company Stockholders upon the surrender for exchange of Certificates, and such Company Stockholders shall not be entitled to any voting rights, rights to receive any dividends or distributions or other rights as a stockholder of the Buyer with respect to any fractional Merger Shares that would have otherwise been issued to such Company Stockholders. In lieu of any fractional Merger Shares that would have otherwise been issued, each Company Stockholder that would have been entitled to receive a fractional Merger Share shall, upon proper surrender of such person's Certificates, receive a cash payment equal to the closing price of the Buyer Common Shares on the NASDAQ Stock Market on the day immediately preceding the Closing multiplied by the fraction of a share that such Company Stockholder would otherwise be entitled to receive. 1.11 Options and Warrants. (a) As of the Effective Time, all Options, whether vested or unvested, and the Option Plan, insofar as it relates to Options outstanding under such Plan as of the Closing, shall be assumed by the Buyer. Immediately after the Effective Time, each Option outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be deemed to constitute an option to acquire, on the same terms and conditions as were applicable under such Option at the Effective Time, such number of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the number of Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of such Option multiplied by the Common Conversion Ratio (with any fraction resulting from such multiplication to be rounded down to the nearest whole number) (each such Option an "Assumed Option"). The exercise price per share of each Assumed Option shall be equal to the exercise price of such Option immediately prior to the Effective Time, divided by the Common Conversion Ratio (rounded up to the nearest whole cent). The term, exercisability, vesting schedule, status as an "incentive stock option" under Section 422 of the -6-
Code, if applicable, and all of the other terms of the Options shall otherwise remain unchanged, except as provided in Section 1.11(f) below, and except that by virtue of the Merger each Option shall be amended to the extent set forth in Section 4 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement with respect to the deposit of Indemnification Escrow Shares and the forfeiture of unexercised portions of any Assumed Options. (b) Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain the agreement of each holder of a Warrant or Preferred Warrant to exercise, no later than immediately prior to the Effective Time, all vested Warrants and to terminate, as of such time, all unvested Warrants. As of the Effective Time, all Warrants, whether vested or unvested, not so exercised shall be assumed by the Buyer. Immediately after the Effective Time, each Warrant outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be deemed to constitute a warrant to acquire, on the same terms and conditions as were applicable under such Warrant at the Effective Time, such number of shares of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the number of Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of such Warrant multiplied by the Common Conversion Ratio (with any fraction resulting from such multiplication to be rounded down to the nearest whole number) (each such Warrant an "Assumed Warrant"). The exercise price per share of each such Assumed Warrant shall be equal to the exercise price of such Warrant immediately prior to the Effective Time, divided by the Common Conversion Ratio (rounded up to the nearest whole cent). The term, exercisability, vesting schedule, and all of the other terms of the Warrant shall otherwise remain unchanged, except as provided in Section 1.11(f) below, and except that by virtue of the Merger each Warrant shall be amended to the extent set forth in Section 4 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement with respect to the deposit of Indemnification Escrow Shares and the forfeiture of unexercised portions of any Assumed Warrants. (c) As soon as practicable after the Effective Time, the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation shall deliver to the holders of Options and Warrants appropriate notices setting forth such holders' rights pursuant to such Options or Warrants, as applicable, as amended by this Section 1.11, and the agreements evidencing such Options or Warrants, as applicable, and that such Options or Warrants shall continue in effect on the same terms and conditions (subject to the amendments provided for in this Section 1.11, the Indemnification Escrow Agreement and such notice). (d) The Buyer shall take all corporate action necessary to reserve for issuance a sufficient number of shares of Buyer Common Shares for delivery upon exercise of the Options and Warrants assumed in accordance with this Section 1.11. As promptly as practicable after the Effective Time, but in no event later than the date on which the Buyer has filed pursuant to Form 8-K the financial statements required to be filed by the Buyer in connection with the Merger pursuant to Regulation S-X of the Securities Act in connection with the Merger, the Buyer shall file a Registration Statement on Form S-8 (or any successor form) under the Securities Act with respect to all shares of Buyer Common Shares subject to the Options that may be registered on a Form S-8, and shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to maintain the effectiveness of such Registration Statement for so long as such Options remain outstanding. The Buyer Common Shares subject to the Warrants will be tradeable at such time as they become eligible for resale pursuant to Rule 144 under the Securities Act. (e) The Company shall obtain, prior to the Closing, the consent from each holder of an Option (other than holders of Options representing, in the aggregate, less than 3% of the Total Company Shares) or a Warrant to the amendment of such Option or Warrant pursuant to the Indemnification Escrow Agreement and Sections 1.11 and 1.13(a) and Article VI of this Agreement (unless such consent is not required under the terms of the applicable agreement, instrument or plan). (f) Each Assumed Option and Assumed Warrant (collectively, the "Assumed Convertible Securities" and individually an "Assumed Convertible Security") shall be subject to the following provisions: -7-
(i) Upon the exercise of an Assumed Convertible Security after the Closing Date and before the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date, the Buyer shall (A) deliver to the Escrow Agent a certificate representing the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Buyer Common Shares acquired in such exercise, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares and deposited in escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a), and (B) deliver to the holder of such Assumed Convertible Security a certificate representing the remainder of the Buyer Common Shares acquired in such exercise and not deposited into escrow, which Buyer Common Shares shall be considered Initial Merger Shares for all purposes of this Agreement. (ii) At any time before the Asset Value Adjustment Date, each Assumed Convertible Security shall (x) only be exercisable for a number of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the number of Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of such corresponding Option or Warrant multiplied by the Closing Common Conversion Ratio (with any fraction resulting from such multiplication to be rounded down to the nearest whole number) and (y) have an exercise price per share equal to the exercise price of such corresponding Option or Warrant immediately prior to the Effective Time, divided by the Closing Common Conversion Ratio (rounded up to the nearest whole cent). (iii) On the Asset Value Adjustment Date, if the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is positive, the Buyer shall with respect to each Exercised Share (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a) the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the person who exercised the Assumed Convertible Security related to such Exercised Shares the remainder of such Adjusted Buyer Common Shares not deposited into escrow. (iv) At any time after the Asset Value Adjustment Date and before the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date, each Assumed Convertible Security shall (x) only be exercisable for a number of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the number of Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of such corresponding Option or Warrant multiplied by the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio (with any fraction resulting from such multiplication to be rounded down to the nearest whole number) and (y) have an exercise price per share equal to the exercise price of such corresponding Option or Warrant immediately prior to the Effective Time, divided by the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio (rounded up to the nearest whole cent). (v) On the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date and immediately before the payment of any claims under the Escrow Agreement, the Buyer shall with respect to each Exercised Share (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a) the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the person who exercised the Assumed Convertible Security related to such Exercised Shares the remainder of such Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares not deposited into escrow. (vi) Assumed Convertible Securities shall be amended to reduce the number of Buyer Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of any Assumed Convertible Security by such Assumed Convertible Security's percentage share of any Damages subject to indemnification, as follows: (A) Immediately prior to any distributions made pursuant to Section 3 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement, each Assumed Convertible Security shall be split into two securities, the "Escrow Assumed Convertible Security" and the "Free Assumed Convertible Security". The Escrow Assumed Convertible Security shall have an Option Merger Value equal to 15% of the Option Merger Value of the Assumed Convertible Security, and the remaining Assumed Convertible -8-
Security shall be the Free Assumed Convertible Security, which shall no longer be subject to the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. If, after any forfeiture is made pursuant to clause (B) below of the unexercised portion of such Escrow Assumed Convertible Security attributable to Damages distributed to the Buyer in respect of any claims for indemnification by the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof, the Escrow Assumed Convertible Security has an Option Merger Value in excess of the 5% of the Option Merger Value of the Assumed Convertible Security before any amounts in respect of Damages were paid, then the Escrow Assumed Convertible Security shall be reduced by the amount of such excess Option Merger Value and the Free Assumed Convertible Security shall be increased by a like amount. If an Escrow Assumed Convertible Security is exercised after the Initial Distribution Date, 100% of the Buyer Common Shares acquired upon exercise of such option shall be deposited into escrow and held in trust for the holder of such exercised Escrow Assumed Convertible Security. (B) Upon any determination that the Buyer is entitled to receive some or all of the Indemnification Escrow Shares through a distribution in respect of Damages made pursuant to Section 3 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement, each holder of an Escrow Assumed Convertible Security shall forfeit that amount of the unexercised portion of such Escrow Assumed Convertible Security equal in value to such holder's "pro rata share" of such Damages. Such holder's pro rata share of such Damages shall be determined by dividing (x) the Option Merger Value of such holder's Escrow Assumed Convertible Security immediately before the distribution in respect of Damages is made by (y) the Aggregate Escrow Value immediately before such distribution is made. Any forfeitures hereunder shall be applied against the Assumed Convertible Security on a pro rata basis against the vested and unvested portion of the Assumed Convertible Security. 1.12 Adjustment Before and After the Closing. The Base Purchase Price shall be subject to adjustment as follows: (a) Not later than three business days prior to the Closing Date, the Company shall prepare and deliver to the Buyer a balance sheet of the Company as of a date (the "Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet Date") within five business days of the Closing Date (the "Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet"). The Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet shall be prepared in accordance with the provisions relating to the preparation of the Closing Balance Sheet set forth in this Section 1.12. The Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet shall be accompanied by (i) all relevant backup materials and schedules, in detail reasonably acceptable to the Buyer, and (ii) a statement setting forth the amount, if any, by which the estimated Net Asset Value is greater than, or less than, the Target Amount (the "Preliminary Net Asset Value"). In calculating the Preliminary Net Asset Value, the Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet shall include (A) as liabilities the full amount of the transaction fees and expenses payable by the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including legal and accounting fees, to the extent such transaction fees and expenses have not been paid prior to the date of the Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet; and (B) reserves in respect of Taxes due with respect to periods ending (or deemed to end pursuant to Section 8.3(b) hereof) at or prior to the Effective Time determined in accordance with GAAP. The Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet shall be accompanied by a statement setting forth the calculations showing the basis for the determination of such sums. If the Preliminary Net Asset Value on the Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet is (i) greater than the Target Amount, then the difference shall be added to the Base Purchase Price, or (ii) less than the Target Amount, then the difference shall be deducted from the Base Purchase Price (the Base Purchase Price, as so adjusted, is referred to as the "Preliminary Base Purchase Price"). (b) Not later than 60 calendar days after the Closing Date, the Buyer shall deliver to the Representative the Closing Balance Sheet. The Closing Balance Sheet shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP applied consistently with the Company's past practices (to the extent such past -9-
practices are consistent with GAAP), except that the Closing Balance Sheet may exclude all footnotes, subject to the adjustments set forth in this Section 1.12 (which shall be in addition to and not in lieu of those required by GAAP) and shall be certified as such by the Buyer. (c) The Closing Balance Sheet delivered pursuant to paragraph (a) above shall be accompanied by (i) all relevant backup materials and schedules, in detail reasonably acceptable to the Representative, and (ii) a statement setting forth the amount, if any, by which the Net Asset Value (plus the amount of Covered Costs in excess of the Cost Cap to be borne by the Buyer pursuant to Section 10.1(g), if applicable) is greater than, or less than, the Preliminary Net Asset Value. In calculating the Net Asset Value, the Closing Balance Sheet shall include (A) as liabilities the full amount of the transaction fees and expenses payable by the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including legal and accounting fees, to the extent such transaction fees and expenses were not paid prior to the Effective Time; and (B) reserves in respect of Taxes due with respect to periods ending (or deemed to end pursuant to Section 8.3(b) hereof) at or prior to the Effective Time determined in accordance with GAAP. The Closing Balance Sheet shall be accompanied by a statement setting forth the calculations showing the basis for the determination of such sums. (d) In the event that the Representative disputes the Closing Balance Sheet or the calculation of the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment, the Representative shall notify the Buyer in writing (the "Dispute Notice") of the amount, nature and basis of such dispute, within 30 calendar days after delivery of the Closing Balance Sheet. In the event of such a dispute, the Buyer and the Representative shall first use his, her or its diligent good faith efforts to resolve such dispute among themselves. If the Buyer and the Representative are unable to resolve the dispute within 30 calendar days after delivery of the Dispute Notice, then any remaining items in dispute shall be submitted to an independent nationally recognized accounting firm selected in writing by the Representative and the Buyer or, if the Representative and the Buyer fail or refuse to select a firm within 10 calendar days after written request therefor by the Representative or the Buyer, such an independent nationally recognized accounting firm shall be selected in accordance with the rules of the Boston, Massachusetts office of the AAA (the "Neutral Accountant"). All determinations pursuant to this paragraph (d) shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the Buyer and the Representative. The determination of the Neutral Accountant as to the resolution of any dispute shall be binding and conclusive upon all Parties. A judgment on the determination made by the Neutral Accountant pursuant to this Section 1.12 may be entered in and enforced by any court having jurisdiction thereover. (e) The fees and expenses of the Neutral Accountant in connection with the resolution of disputes pursuant to paragraph (c) above shall be shared equally by the Equity Holders, on the one hand, and the Buyer, on the other hand; provided that if the Neutral Accountant determines that one such party has adopted a position or positions with respect to the Closing Balance Sheet or the calculation of the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment that is frivolous or clearly without merit, the Neutral Accountant may, in its discretion, assign a greater portion of any such fees and expenses to such party. Any such fees and expenses that are the responsibility of the Equity Holders pursuant to this paragraph (e) shall be funded from the Indemnification Escrow Shares. (f) Immediately upon the expiration of the 30-day period for giving the Dispute Notice, if no such notice is given, or upon notification by the Representative to the Buyer, that no such notice will be given, or immediately upon the resolution of disputes, if any, pursuant to this Section 1.12, the Preliminary Base Purchase Price shall be adjusted as follows (as so adjusted, the "Adjusted Base Purchase Price"): (i) If the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is negative, such deficiency shall be deducted from the Preliminary Base Purchase Price to obtain the Adjusted Base Purchase Price, -10-
and the Buyer shall be entitled to recover such deficiency pursuant to the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement; (ii) If the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is zero, the Adjusted Base Purchase Price shall be equal to the Preliminary Base Purchase Price; and (iii) If the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is positive, such surplus shall be added to the Preliminary Base Purchase Price to obtain the Adjusted Base Purchase Price, and the Buyer shall deliver to the Exchange Agent Buyer Common Shares as provided in Section 1.5(d)(ii) hereof. 1.13 Escrow Arrangements. (a) On the Closing Date, the Buyer shall deliver to the Escrow Agent a certificate (issued in the name of the Escrow Agent or its nominee) representing the Indemnification Escrow Shares issuable pursuant to Sections 1.5(d) and 1.6(b)(i). The Indemnification Escrow Shares will be held in escrow for the purpose of (i) providing security for any adjustment to the amount of the Preliminary Base Purchase Price pursuant to Section 1.12 and (ii) securing the indemnification obligations of the Equity Holders set forth in Section 6.1. The Indemnification Escrow Shares shall be held by the Escrow Agent under the Indemnification Escrow Agreement pursuant to the terms thereof. The Indemnification Escrow Shares shall be held as a trust fund and shall not be subject to any lien, attachment, trustee process or any other judicial process of any creditor of any party, and shall be held and disbursed solely for the purposes and in accordance with the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. Equity Holders shall have the right to receive cash dividends (in conjunction with any general distribution of cash dividends made by the Buyer with respect to all Buyer Common Shares) with respect to any issued Indemnification Escrow Shares held on their behalf. The Representative shall have the right to vote any issued Indemnification Escrow Shares by instructing the Escrow Agent in accordance with the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. (b) The execution of this Agreement by the Representative and the adoption of this Agreement and approval of the Merger by the Company Stockholders shall constitute approval of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement and of all of the arrangements relating thereto, including the placement of the Indemnification Escrow Shares in escrow. 1.14 Representative. (a) In order to efficiently administer the transactions contemplated hereby, including (i) the determination of the Net Asset Value and Adjusted Base Purchase Price and (ii) the defense and/or settlement of any claims for which the Equity Holders may be required to indemnify the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof, the Company Stockholders, by the approval of the Merger and adoption of this Agreement, the holders of Options or Warrants by executing amendments to such Options or Warrants, as applicable, pursuant to Section 1.11(f) hereof, the Principal Stockholders, by their execution of the Stockholder Agreement, and the Management Participants, by their execution of the Management Participant Agreement, shall each be deemed to have designated the Representative as their representative. (b) The Company Stockholders, by the approval of the Merger and adoption of this Agreement, and the holders of Options or Warrants by executing amendments to such Options or Warrants, as applicable, pursuant to Section 1.11(f) hereof, shall each be deemed to have authorized the Representative (i) to make all decisions relating to the determination of the Net Asset Value and the Adjusted Base Purchase Price, (ii) to take all action necessary in connection with the defense and/or -11-
settlement of any claims for which the Company Stockholders may be required to indemnify the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof, (iii) after the Effective Time, to give and receive all notices required to be given under the Agreement, and (iv) to take any and all additional action as is contemplated or permitted by this Agreement or the Indemnification Escrow Agreement to be taken by or on behalf of the Equity Holders. (c) The Buyer shall be able to rely conclusively on the instructions and decisions of the Representative as to the determination of the Net Asset Value and the Adjusted Base Purchase Price, the settlement of any claims for indemnification by the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof or any other actions required or contemplated or permitted to be taken by the Representative hereunder, and no party shall have any cause of action against the Buyer for any action taken by the Buyer in reliance upon the instructions or decisions of the Representative. (d) The Representative will have the right to act as the representative of the Equity Holders, and to act on behalf of the Equity Holders and to take any and all actions required or permitted to be taken by the Representative under this Agreement, with respect to any claims (including payment thereof) made pursuant to Section 6.1 and with respect to any actions to be taken by the Representative pursuant to the terms of the Escrow Agreement. All decisions and actions by the Representative, including without limitation any agreement between the Representative and the Buyer relating to the determination of the Net Asset Value and the Adjusted Base Purchase Price or the defense or settlement of any claims for which the Equity Holders may be required to indemnify the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof, shall be binding upon all of the Equity Holders, and no Equity Holder shall have the right to object, dissent, protest or otherwise contest the same. (e) The Representative (or any of the directors, officers, agents, employees or Affiliates thereof) shall incur no liability to the Equity Holders with respect to any action taken or suffered by the Representative in reliance upon any notice, direction, instruction, consent, statement, or other document believed by the Representative to be genuinely and duly authorized, nor for any other action or inaction with respect to distributions of the Indemnification Escrow Shares, any defense or settlement of any claims, and the making of payments with respect thereto, nor with respect to voting or failing to vote the Indemnification Escrow Shares, except to the extent resulting from the Representative's own willful misconduct or gross negligence. The Representative may, in all questions arising under this Agreement, rely on the advice of counsel, and for anything done, omitted, or suffered in good faith by the Representative in reliance on such advice, shall not be liable to the Equity Holders. (f) In the event that the Representative dies or becomes unable to perform his, her or its responsibilities as the Representative or resigns from such position, Trinity Ventures shall appoint a new Representative, and if within 30 days of such death, inability to perform his, her or its responsibilities or resignation of the Representative, Trinity Ventures fails to appoint a new Representative, the Equity Holders receiving an aggregate of greater than 50% of the Adjusted Merger Consideration shall select another representative to fill such vacancy and such substituted representative shall be deemed to be the Representative for all purposes of this Agreement. (g) The Buyer and the Surviving Corporation shall be entitled to rely conclusively on a certificate from the Representative with respect to any action taken by the Representative, and no party shall have any cause of action against the Buyer for any action taken by the Buyer in reliance upon such a certificate from the Representative. (h) The Company Stockholders, by the approval of the Merger and adoption of this Agreement, and the holders of Options or Warrants by executing amendments to such Options or Warrants, as applicable, pursuant to Section (a) hereof, shall -12-
each be deemed to (i) agree and authorize the Escrow Agent to withhold from the Indemnification Escrow Shares, if any, otherwise payable to the Equity Holders under the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement a number of shares having a value (using a price of $12.50 per share) equal to the reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable professional fees) incurred by, or reasonably anticipated by the Representative to be incurred by, the Representative in connection with the representation of the Equity Holders in any proceeding arising out of this Agreement (including all matters concerning claims for indemnification under Article VI or Article VIII of this Agreement) or the transactions or agreements related hereto (the "Representative Fees"); (ii) agree and authorize the Representative to withhold Buyer Common Shares (valued at $12.50 per share) evidencing the Representative Fees from any shares otherwise issuable to the Equity Holders pursuant to Section 1.12 hereof (to the extent such fees are not withheld from the Escrow Shares); and (iii) agree to reimburse the Representative for the Representative Fees. (i) The provisions of this Section 1.14 are independent and severable, are irrevocable and coupled with an interest and shall be enforceable notwithstanding any rights or remedies that any Equity Holder may have in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Remedies available at law for any breach of the provisions of this Section 1.14 are inadequate; therefore, the Buyer and the Surviving Corporation shall be entitled to temporary and permanent injunctive relief without the necessity of proving damages if either the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation brings an action to enforce the provisions of this Section 1.14. The provisions of this Section 1.14 shall be binding upon the executors, heirs, legal representatives, personal representatives, successors and permitted assigns of each Equity Holder, and any references in this Agreement to a Equity Holder or the Equity Holders shall mean and include the successors to the Equity Holder's rights hereunder, whether pursuant to testamentary disposition, the laws of descent and distribution or otherwise. 1.15 Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws (a) The Certificate of Incorporation of the Surviving Corporation immediately following the Effective Time shall be the same as the Certificate of Incorporation of the Transitory Subsidiary immediately prior to the Effective Time, except that (i) the name of the corporation set forth therein shall be changed to the name of the Company and (ii) the identity of the incorporator shall be deleted. (b) The By-laws of the Surviving Corporation immediately following the Effective Time shall be the same as the By-laws of the Transitory Subsidiary immediately prior to the Effective Time, except that the name of the corporation set forth therein shall be changed to the name of the Company. 1.16 No Further Rights. From and after the Effective Time, no Company Shares shall be deemed to be outstanding, and holders of Certificates shall cease to have any rights with respect thereto, except as provided herein or by law. 1.17 Closing of Transfer Books. At the Effective Time, the stock transfer books of the Company shall be closed and no transfer of Company Shares shall thereafter be made. If, after the Effective Time, Certificates are presented to the Buyer, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent, they shall be cancelled and exchanged for Initial Merger Shares in accordance with Section 1.5, subject to Section 1.12 and to applicable law in the case of Dissenting Shares. 1.18 Withholding Obligations. Each of the Buyer and the Surviving Corporation shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from the consideration otherwise payable pursuant to any provision of this Agreement to any Equity Holders such amounts as it reasonably determines that it is required to deduct -13-
and withhold with respect to the making of such payment under the Code, or any other applicable U.S. or foreign law, rule or regulation. The Buyer or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, shall timely pay over such withheld amounts to the appropriate Governmental Entity on behalf of the Equity Holders from whom such amounts are withheld in accordance with the Code or such other applicable U.S. or foreign law, rule, or regulation. To the extent that amounts are so withheld by the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, such withheld amounts shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the Equity Holders in respect of which such deduction and withholding was made by the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be. The Buyer shall also have the right to collect Forms W-8 or W-9, or such other forms relating to United States federal withholding obligations as may be applicable, from the Equity Holders. Each Equity Holder from whom the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation is required to withhold shall indemnify and hold harmless the Buyer, the Surviving Corporation and their respective Affiliates from and against any and all Taxes (but, for the purposes of this Section 1.18, the term "Taxes" shall not include any penalty or interest) incurred or suffered by any of them as a result of or relating to the calculation or payment (including without limitation any errors in the calculation or failure to make any payment) of any amounts required to be withheld from such Equity Holder and/or paid to any Governmental Entity in respect of payment of the Merger Consideration or Management Shares to such Equity Holder or in respect of the exercise of any Options or Warrants held by such Equity Holder and the payment of the Option/Warrant Consideration in connection with the Merger. ARTICLE II REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE COMPANY The Company represents and warrants to the Buyer that, except as set forth in the Disclosure Schedule, the statements contained in this Article II are true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and will be true and correct as of the Closing as though made as of the Closing, except to the extent such representations and warranties are specifically made as of a particular date (in which case such representations and warranties will be true and correct as of such date). The Disclosure Schedule shall be arranged in sections and paragraphs corresponding to the numbered and lettered sections and paragraphs contained in this Article II, and the disclosures in any section or paragraph of the Disclosure Schedule shall qualify only (a) the corresponding section or paragraph in this Article II and (b) other sections or paragraphs in this Article II to the extent that it is reasonably clear from a reading of the disclosure that such disclosure also qualifies or applies to such other section or paragraph. 2.1 Organization, Qualification and Corporate Power. The Company is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in corporate and Tax good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware. The Company is duly qualified to conduct business and is in corporate and Tax good standing under the laws of each jurisdiction listed in Section 2.1 of the Disclosure Schedule, which jurisdictions constitute the only jurisdictions in which the nature of the Company's businesses or the ownership or leasing of its properties requires such qualification. The Company has all requisite power and authority to carry on the businesses in which it is engaged and to own and use the properties owned and used by it. The Company has furnished to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of its charter and by-laws, each as amended to date. The Company is not in default under or in violation of any provision of its charter or by-laws. 2.2 Capitalization. (a) The authorized capital stock of the Company consists of (i) 400,000,000 Common Shares, of which, as of the date of this Agreement, 38,645,605 shares were issued and outstanding and 3,729,109 shares were held in the treasury of the Company, and (ii) 222,824,205 Preferred Shares, of which (A) 7,523,366 shares have been designated as Series A Convertible Preferred -14-
Stock, of which, as of the date of this Agreement, 7,433,330 shares were issued and outstanding, (B) 122,463,448 shares have been designated as Series B Convertible Preferred Stock, of which, as of the date of this Agreement, 110,189,329 shares were issued and outstanding, and (C) 92,837,391 shares have been designated as Series C Convertible Preferred Stock, of which, as of the date of this Agreement, 86,866,934 shares were issued and outstanding. (b) Section 2.2(b) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list, as of the date of the Agreement, of the holders of Company Shares, showing the number of shares and the class or series of such shares held by each Company Stockholder and (for shares other than Common Shares) the number of Common Shares (if any) into which such shares are convertible. Section 2.2(b) of the Disclosure Schedule also indicates all outstanding Company Shares that constitute restricted stock or that are otherwise subject to a repurchase or redemption right, indicating the name of the applicable stockholder, the vesting schedule (including any acceleration provisions with respect thereto), and the repurchase price payable by the Company. All of the issued and outstanding Company Shares have been and on the Closing Date will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable and free of all preemptive rights. All of the issued and outstanding Company Shares have been offered, issued and sold by the Company in compliance with all applicable federal and state securities laws. (c) Section 2.2(c) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list, as of the date of this Agreement, of: (i) all Company Stock Plans, indicating for each Company Stock Plan the number of Company Shares issued to date under such Plan, the number of Company Shares subject to outstanding options under such Plan and the number of Company Shares reserved for future issuance under such Plan, (ii) all holders of outstanding Options, indicating with respect to each Option the Company Stock Plan under which it was granted, the number of Company Shares subject to such Option, the exercise price, the date of grant, and the vesting schedule (including any acceleration provisions with respect thereto), and (iii) all holders of outstanding Warrants, indicating with respect to each Warrant the agreement or other document under which it was granted, the number of shares of capital stock, and the class or series of such shares, subject to such Warrant, the exercise price, the date of issuance and the expiration date thereof. The Company has provided to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of all Company Stock Plans and forms of all stock option agreements evidencing Options and all agreements evidencing Warrants. All of the Company Shares subject to Options and Warrants will be, upon issuance pursuant to the exercise of such instruments, duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable and free of all preemptive rights. (d) Except as set forth in Section 2.2(c) or 2.2(d) of the Disclosure Schedule, (i) no subscription, warrant, option, convertible security or other right (contingent or otherwise) to purchase or acquire any shares of capital stock of the Company is authorized or outstanding, (ii) the Company has no obligation (contingent or otherwise) to issue any subscription, warrant, option, convertible security or other such right, or to issue or distribute to holders of any shares of its capital stock any evidences of indebtedness or assets of the Company, (iii) the Company has no obligation (contingent or otherwise) to purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Company Shares or any interest therein or to pay any dividend or to make any other distribution in respect thereof, and (iv) there are no outstanding or authorized stock appreciation, phantom stock or similar rights with respect to the Company. (e) Except as set forth in Section 2.2(e) of the Disclosure Schedule, there is no agreement, written or oral, between the Company and any holder of its securities, or, to the Company's knowledge, among any holders of its securities, relating to the sale or transfer (including agreements relating to rights of first refusal, co sale rights or "drag along" rights), registration under the Securities Act, or voting, of the capital stock of the Company. -15-
(f) There are no claims by any stockholder or former stockholder of the Company, or any other person or entity (including any officer or director of the Company or any Subsidiary), seeking to assert, or based upon, any rights under the charter, by-laws or comparable organizational documents of the Company. 2.3 Authorization. The Company has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and to perform its respective obligations hereunder. The execution and delivery by the Company of this Agreement and the agreements provided for herein, and, subject to obtaining the Requisite Stockholder Approval, the performance by the Company of this Agreement and the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate and other action on the part of the Company. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Board of Directors of the Company, at a meeting duly called and held, by the unanimous vote of all directors (i) determined that the Merger is fair and in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders, (ii) adopted this Agreement in accordance with the provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law, and (iii) directed that this Agreement and the Merger be submitted to the stockholders of the Company for their adoption and approval and resolved to recommend that the stockholders of the Company vote in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger. This Agreement and all other agreements provided for herein have been or will be as of the Closing Date duly and validly executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes or will constitute a valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by general equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses. 2.4 Noncontravention. Subject to the filing of the Certificate of Merger as required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, to the filing requirements of the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, to the regulatory approvals, if any, required under Indian laws, and to the filing or other regulatory requirements of any other applicable U.S. or foreign regulatory body, neither the execution and delivery by the Company of this Agreement or any other agreement provided for herein, nor the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, will (a) conflict with or violate any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of the Company each as amended or restated to date, or the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws (or comparable organizational documents) of any Subsidiary each as amended or restated to date , (b) require on the part of the Company, any Subsidiary or any Company Stockholder or Management Participant any notice to or filing with, or any permit, authorization, consent or approval of, any Governmental Entity, (c) except as set forth in Section 2.4 of the Disclosure Schedule, conflict with, result in a breach of, constitute (with or without due notice or lapse of time or both) a default under, result in the acceleration of obligations under, create in any party the right to accelerate, terminate, modify or cancel, or require any notice, consent or waiver under, any contract, lease, sublease, license, sublicense, franchise, permit, indenture, agreement or mortgage for borrowed money, instrument of indebtedness, Security Interest or other arrangement to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the assets of the Company or any Subsidiary are subject, (d) result in the imposition of any Security Interest upon any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary or (e) violate any order, writ, injunction, decree, statute, rule or regulation applicable to the Company, any Subsidiary, any Company Stockholder or Management Participant or any of their respective properties or assets. Section 2.4 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true, correct and complete list of all consents and approvals of third parties and Governmental Entities, and all filings and notices, that are required in connection with the consummation by the Company, the Company Stockholders and the Management Participants of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. -16-
2.5 Subsidiaries. (a) Section 2.5 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth: (i) the name of each Subsidiary; (ii) the number and type of outstanding equity securities of each Subsidiary and a list of the holders thereof; (iii) the jurisdiction of organization of each Subsidiary; (iv) the names of the officers and directors of each Subsidiary; and (v) the jurisdictions in which each Subsidiary is qualified or holds licenses to do business as a foreign corporation or other entity. (b) Each Subsidiary is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in corporate and Tax good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation. Each Subsidiary is duly qualified to conduct business and is in corporate and Tax good standing under the laws of each jurisdiction in which the nature of its businesses or the ownership or leasing of its properties requires such qualification. Each Subsidiary has all requisite power and authority to carry on the businesses in which it is engaged and to own and use the properties owned and used by it. The Company has delivered to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of each Subsidiary. No Subsidiary is in default under or in violation of any provision of its charter, by-laws or other organizational documents. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of each Subsidiary are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable and free of preemptive rights. All shares of each Subsidiary that are held of record or owned beneficially by either the Company or any Subsidiary are held or owned free and clear of any restrictions on transfer (other than restrictions under the Securities Act and state securities laws), claims, Security Interests, options, warrants, rights, contracts, calls, commitments, equities and demands. There are no outstanding or authorized options, warrants, rights, agreements or commitments to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or which are binding on any of them providing for the issuance, disposition or acquisition of any capital stock of any Subsidiary. There are no outstanding stock appreciation, phantom stock or similar rights with respect to any Subsidiary. There are no voting trusts, proxies or other agreements or understandings with respect to the voting of any capital stock of any Subsidiary. (c) The Company does not control directly or indirectly or have any direct or indirect equity participation or similar interest in any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust or other business association or entity which is not a Subsidiary. 2.6 Financial Statements. (a) The Company has provided to the Buyer the Financial Statements and the Current India Financial Statements. The Financial Statements have been prepared in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods covered thereby; provided, however, that the Financial Statements referred to in clause (b) of the definition of such term are subject to normal recurring year-end adjustments (which, individually and in the aggregate, will not be material) and do not include footnotes. (b) Each of the Financial Statements fairly presents the assets, liabilities, business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the Company as of the date thereof and for the period referred to therein, and is consistent with the books and records of the Company. The accruals for vacation expenses, severance payments and Taxes are accounted for on the Most Recent Balance Sheet and are adequate and properly reflect the expenses associated therewith in accordance with GAAP. The Current India Financial Statements fairly present the assets, liabilities, business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the India Subsidiary as of the date thereof and for the period referred to therein, and are consistent with the books and records of the India Subsidiary. -17-
(c) The Company maintains accurate books and records reflecting its assets and liabilities and maintains a system of internal accounting controls which provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed with management's authorization, (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of the financial statements of the Company and to maintain accountability for the Company's assets, (iii) access to assets of the Company is permitted only in accordance with management's authorization, (iv) the reporting of assets of the Company is compared with existing assets at regular intervals, and (v) accounts, notes and other receivables and inventory were recorded accurately, and proper and adequate procedures are implemented to effect the collection thereof on a current and timely basis. (d) Section 2.6(d) of the Disclosure Schedule lists, and the Company has delivered to the Buyer copies of the documentation creating or governing, all securitization transactions and "off-balance sheet arrangements" (as defined in Item 303 (a)(4) of Regulation S-K of the Securities and Exchange Commission) effected by the Company since June 30, 2001. Section 2.6(d) of the Disclosure Schedule lists all non-audit services performed by the Company's auditors for the Company since June 30, 2001. 2.7 Absence of Certain Changes. Since the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date, (a) there has occurred no event or development which, individually or in the aggregate, has had, or would, based on information then known to the Company, reasonably be expected to have in the future, a Company Material Adverse Effect, and (b) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has taken any of the actions set forth in paragraphs (a) through (t) of Section 4.5. 2.8 Undisclosed Liabilities. The Company does not have any liability (whether absolute or contingent, whether liquidated or unliquidated and whether due or to become due), except for (a) liabilities shown on the Most Recent Balance Sheet, a copy of which is attached to Section 2.8 of the Disclosure Schedule, (b) liabilities which have arisen since the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date in the Ordinary Course of Business and (c) contractual and other liabilities incurred in the Ordinary Course of Business which are not required by GAAP to be reflected on a balance sheet and that are not in the aggregate material. 2.9 Tax Matters. (a) The Company has filed on a timely basis all Tax Returns that it was required to file, and all such Tax Returns were complete and accurate. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is or has ever been a member of a group of corporations with which it has filed (or been required to file) consolidated, combined, unitary or similar Tax Returns, other than a group of which only the Company and the Subsidiaries are or were members. Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries has paid on a timely basis all Taxes that were due and payable whether or not shown on any Tax Return. The unpaid Taxes of the Company and the Subsidiaries for Tax periods through the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date do not exceed the accruals and reserves for Taxes (excluding accruals and reserves for deferred Taxes established to reflect timing differences between book and Tax income) set forth on the Most Recent Balance Sheet. All unpaid Taxes of the Company or any Subsidiary attributable to periods commencing after the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date arose in the Ordinary Course of Business and are similar in nature and amount to Taxes which arose during the comparable period of time in the immediate preceding fiscal year. All Taxes that the Company or any Subsidiary is or was required by law to withhold or collect have been duly withheld or collected and, to the extent required, have been paid to the proper Governmental Entity. (b) The Company has delivered or made available to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of all federal income Tax Returns, examination reports and statements of deficiencies -18-
assessed against or agreed to by the Company or any Subsidiary with respect to all taxable periods commencing on or after June 30, 2001 (or such earlier taxable periods with respect to which the applicable statute of limitations does not preclude the assessment of additional Tax). The U.S. federal income Tax Returns of the Company and each Subsidiary and the Tax Returns of the India Subsidiary under the Indian Income Tax Act, 1961, have been audited by the Internal Revenue Service or comparable Indian Governmental Entity or are closed by the applicable statute of limitations for all taxable years through the taxable year specified in Section 2.9(b) of the Disclosure Schedule. The Company has delivered or made available to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of all other Tax Returns of the Company and the Subsidiaries together with all related examination reports and statements of deficiency for all periods for which the applicable period for the assessment of the Tax has not been closed by any applicable statute of limitations. No examination or audit of any Tax Return of the Company or any Subsidiary by any Governmental Entity is currently in progress or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened or contemplated. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has been informed by any jurisdiction that the jurisdiction believes that the Company or Subsidiary was required to file any Tax Return that was not filed. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has waived any statute of limitations with respect to Taxes or agreed to an extension of time with respect to a Tax assessment or deficiency. (c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary: (i) has ever been a United States real property holding corporation within the meaning of Section 897(c)(2) of the Code during the applicable period specified in Section 897(c)(l)(A)(ii) of the Code; (ii) has made any payments, is obligated to make any payments, or is a party to any agreement that could obligate it to make any payments that may be treated as an "excess parachute payment" under Section 280G of the Code (determined without regard to Section 280G(b)(4) of the Code); (iii) has any actual or potential liability for any Taxes of any person (other than the Company or any Subsidiary) under Treasury Regulation Section 1.1502-6 (or any similar provision of federal, state, local, or foreign law), or as a transferee or successor, by contract, or otherwise; and (iv) is not or has never been required to make a basis reduction pursuant to Treasury Regulation Section 1.1502-20(b) or Treasury Regulation Section 1.337(d)-2(b). (d) None of the assets of the Company or any Subsidiary: (i) is "tax-exempt use property" within the meaning of Section 168(h) of the Code; or (ii) directly or indirectly secures any debt the interest on which is Tax exempt under Section 103(a) of the Code. (e) There are no adjustments under Section 481 of the Code (or any similar adjustments under any provision of the Code or the corresponding foreign, state or local Tax laws) that are required to be taken into account by the Company or any Subsidiary in any period ending after the Closing Date by reason of a change in method of accounting in any taxable period ending on or before the Closing Date. (f) Section 2.9(f) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the amount of any net operating loss, net capital loss, unused investment, foreign Tax or other credit, and excess charitable contribution allocable to the Company and each Subsidiary as of the most recent practicable date. (g) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has ever participated in an international boycott as defined in Section 999 of the Code. (h) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has distributed to its stockholders or security holders stock or securities of a controlled corporation, nor has stock or securities of the Company been distributed, in a transaction to which Section 355 of the Code applies (i) in the two years prior to the date of this Agreement or (ii) in a distribution that could otherwise constitute part of a "plan" or "series of -19-
related transactions" (within the meaning of Section 355(e) of the Code) that includes the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. (i) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is or has been a passive foreign investment company within the meaning of Sections 1291-1297 of the Code. (j) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has incurred (or been allocated) an "overall foreign loss" as defined in Section 904(f)(2) of the Code which has not been previously recaptured in full as provided in Sections 904(f)(1) and/or 904(f)(3) of the Code. (k) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to a gain recognition agreement under Section 367 of the Code. (l) Section 2.9 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list of any Subsidiaries for which a "check-the-box" election under Section 7701 has been made. (m) To the knowledge of the Company and any Subsidiary, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is or ever has been a party to a transaction or agreement that is in conflict with the Tax rules on transfer pricing in any relevant jurisdiction. (n) Section 2.9 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list of all material agreements, rulings, settlements or other Tax documents relating to Tax incentives between the Company or any Subsidiary and a Governmental Entity. (o) Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries has delivered or made available to the Buyer all payroll and other compensation records in respect of the Management Participants, Company Stockholders and Option and Warrant holders, necessary for the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation to fulfill their respective withholding obligations as described in Section 1.18 of this Agreement and, to the extent known to the Company or any Subsidiary, such other information as may be necessary to (i) identify any other Equity Holder for whom the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation may have a withholding obligation under Section 1.18 and (ii) fulfill their withholding obligations under Section 1.18 with respect to such Equity Holders. 2.10 Assets. (a) Except as disclosed in Section 2.10(a) of the Disclosure Schedule, the Company or the applicable Subsidiary is the true and lawful owner, and has good title to, all of the assets (tangible or intangible) purported to be owned by the Company or the Subsidiaries, free and clear of all Security Interests. Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries owns or leases all tangible assets necessary or desirable for the conduct of its businesses as presently conducted, which tangible assets are reflected in the Financial Statements (other than to the extent disposed of in the Ordinary Course of Business). Each such tangible asset is free from defects, has been maintained in accordance with normal industry practice, is in good operating condition and repair (subject to normal wear and tear) and is suitable for the purposes for which it presently is used. (b) Section 2.10(b) of the Disclosure Schedule lists individually (i) all fixed assets (within the meaning of GAAP) of the Company or the Subsidiaries, indicating the cost, accumulated book depreciation (if any) and the net book value of each such fixed asset as of December 31, 2004, and (ii) all other assets of a tangible nature (other than inventories) of the Company or the Subsidiaries. -20-
(c) Each item of equipment, motor vehicle and other asset that the Company or a Subsidiary has possession of pursuant to a lease agreement or other contractual arrangement is in such condition that, upon its return to its lessor or owner in its present condition at the end of the relevant lease term or as otherwise contemplated by the applicable lease or contract, the obligations of the Company or such Subsidiary to such lessor or owner will have been discharged in full. 2.11 Owned Real Property(a) . Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary does own, or has ever owned, any real property. 2.12 Real Property Leases. Section 2.12 of the Disclosure Schedule lists all Leases and lists the term of such Lease, any extension and expansion options, and the rent payable thereunder. The Company has delivered to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of the Leases. With respect to each Lease: (a) such Lease is legal, valid, binding, enforceable and in full force and effect; (b) such Lease will continue to be legal, valid, binding, enforceable against the Company and, to the Company's knowledge, against each other party thereto and in full force and effect immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect immediately prior to the Closing; (c) neither the Company, any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party to the Lease is in breach or violation of, or default under, any such Lease, and no event has occurred, is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, is threatened, which, after the giving of notice, with lapse of time, or otherwise, would constitute a breach or default by the Company or any Subsidiary or, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party under such Lease; (d) there are no disputes, oral agreements or forbearance programs in effect as to such Lease; (e) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has assigned, transferred, conveyed, mortgaged, deeded in trust or encumbered any interest in the leasehold or subleasehold; (f) the Company is not aware of any Security Interest, easement, covenant or other restriction applicable to the real property subject to such lease which would reasonably be expected to impair the current uses or the occupancy by the Company or a Subsidiary of the property subject thereto; (g) no construction, alteration or other leasehold improvement work with respect to the Lease remains to be paid for or performed by the Company or any Subsidiary; (h) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is obligated to pay any leasing or brokerage commission relating to such Lease and will not have any obligation to pay any leasing or brokerage commission upon the renewal of the Lease; and (i) the Financial Statements contain adequate reserves to provide for the restoration of the property subject to the Lease at the end of the respective Lease term, to the extent required by the Lease. -21-
2.13 Intellectual Property. (a) Company Owned Intellectual Property. The Company or a Subsidiary is the sole and exclusive owner of all Company Owned Intellectual Property, free and clear of any Security Interests. No other person or business entity has any joint ownership interest, royalty interest, or license right to any of the Company Owned Intellectual Property, and, to the knowledge of the Company, no other person or business entity is infringing, violating or misappropriating any of the Company Owned Intellectual Property. Section 2.13(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists each agreement, contract, assignment or other instrument pursuant to which the Company or any Subsidiary has at any time since the date of its incorporation obtained any ownership interest in or to each item of Company Owned Intellectual Property. (b) Company Intellectual Property. The Company Intellectual Property constitutes all Intellectual Property (i) used in the operation of the business of the Company or any Subsidiary or necessary for the operation of such business as presently conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries, (ii) necessary to develop, test, modify, make, use, sell, have made, used and sold, import, reproduce, market and distribute the Customer Deliverables in the manner currently done by the Company and its Subsidiaries, and (iii) necessary to operate and use the Internal Systems as they are currently used by the Company and its Subsidiaries. Each item of Company Intellectual Property will be owned or available for use by the Company or the applicable Subsidiary immediately following the Closing on substantially identical terms and conditions as it was immediately prior to the Closing. (c) Customer Deliverables. Except as set forth in the Disclosure Schedule or as alleged in a Lawsuit, none of the Customer Deliverables, or the development, manufacture, importation, marketing, sale, distribution, provision or use thereof by the Company, any Subsidiary or any reseller, distributor, customer or user thereof, or the conduct by the Company or any Subsidiary of its business, infringes, violates or constitutes a misappropriation of (or in the past infringed, violated or constituted a misappropriation of) any Intellectual Property rights of any other person or business entity. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any complaint, claim or notice alleging any such infringement, violation or misappropriation (including any notification that a license under any patent is or may be required). Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has agreed to indemnify any person against any infringement, violation or misappropriation of any Intellectual Property rights with respect to any Customer Deliverables, other than as required by customers in the Ordinary Course of Business pursuant to (i) the Company's and each Subsidiary's standard terms and conditions of sale, a copy of which has previously been delivered to the Buyer and (ii) such customers' standard terms and conditions of sale, where the annual amounts payable by or to the Company and its Subsidiaries under all such standard terms and conditions of sale does not exceed $250,000 per contract. (d) Intellectual Property Registrations. Section 2.13(d) of the Disclosure Schedule identifies each Intellectual Property Registration that is registered or filed in the name of the Company or any Subsidiary, alone or jointly with others, in each case enumerating specifically the applicable filing or registration number, title, subject matter, jurisdiction in which the filing was made or from which registration issued, date of filing or issuance, names of current registered owners (if other than the Company), and status of any required issuance, renewal, maintenance or other payments due within one year following the date of this Agreement. All assignments of Intellectual Property Registrations have been properly executed and recorded. To the knowledge of the Company, all Intellectual Property Registrations to the Company are valid and enforceable and all issuance, renewal, maintenance and other payments that are or have become due with respect thereto have been timely paid by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary, as applicable. -22-
(e) Grant of Rights With Respect to Company Intellectual Property. Section 2.13(e) of the Disclosure Schedule identifies each license, covenant or other agreement pursuant to which the Company has assigned, transferred, licensed, distributed or otherwise granted any right or access to any other person or business entity, or covenanted not to assert any right, with respect to any Company Intellectual Property other than non-exclusive licenses entered into with customers of the Company or any Subsidiary in the Ordinary Course of Business. (f) Company Licensed Intellectual Property. Section 2.13(f) of the Disclosure Schedule identifies each item of Company Licensed Intellectual Property that the Company or any Subsidiary currently licenses that is owned by a party other than the Company or such Subsidiary, and the license agreement pursuant to which the Company or such Subsidiary licenses such Intellectual Property (other than commercially available, off-the-shelf software programs that are part of the Internal Systems and are licensed by the Company or such Subsidiary pursuant to standard "shrink-wrap" licenses, with respect to which, although not listed in Section 2.13(f) of the Disclosure Schedule, the representations set forth in this Section 2.13(f) are true). Each license agreement referenced in this clause (f) and in Section 2.13(a) above is legal, valid, binding and enforceable against the Company or the applicable Subsidiary, and, to the knowledge of the Company, against each other party thereto, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses, and is in full force and effect. Each such license agreement will continue to be legal, valid, binding and enforceable against the Company or such Subsidiary and, to the knowledge of the Company, each other party thereto, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses, and will continue to be in full force and effect, immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect prior to the Closing. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party to such license agreement is in breach or default, and no event has occurred which with notice or lapse of time would constitute a breach or default or permit termination, modification or acceleration thereunder. (g) Company Source Code. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has licensed, distributed or disclosed, and knows of no distribution or disclosure by others (including its employees and contractors) of, the source code for any Software ("Company Source Code") to any other person or business entity, other than the Company and its Subsidiaries, and the Company and the Subsidiaries have taken reasonable physical and electronic security measures to prevent disclosure of such Company Source Code. To the knowledge of the Company, no event has occurred, and no circumstance or condition exists, that (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) will, or would reasonably be expected to, nor will the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, result in the disclosure or release of such Company Source Code by the Company, any Subsidiary or any escrow agent(s) or any other person to any third party. (h) Software. None of the Software includes "shareware", "freeware" or other code that was developed by or obtained by the Company or any Subsidiary from third parties. Except as set forth in Section 2.13(h) of the Disclosure Schedule, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has incorporated Open Source Materials into, or combined Open Source Materials with, the Software. To the extent Open Source Materials are used in any way to provide the Customer Deliverables, such use has not caused any Software to become subject to GNU General Public License ("GPL") requirements. -23-
2.14 Inventory. Other than general office supplies, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary maintains any inventory. 2.15 Contracts. (a) Section 2.15(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists the following agreements to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party as of the date of this Agreement (each a "Contract"): (i) any agreement (or group of related agreements) for the lease of personal property from or to third parties; (ii) any agreement (or group of related agreements): (A) with (1) any customer of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries (other than agreements with any such customer that is not among the top 70 customers by revenue of the Company or any Subsidiary during the three-month period ended December 31, 2004 (the "Top Customers"), which agreements are not listed in Section 2.15(a) of the Disclosure Schedule but with respect to which the representations set forth in this Section 2.15 are true; Section 2.15(a)(ii)(A)(1) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the customer name and corresponding redacted contract number for each Top Customer Contract provided by the Company to the Buyer), (2) any network service provider that was in effect at any time since January 1, 2004, and (3) the top 20 vendors (by payment amount) to the Company for the twelve-month period ended December 31, 2004, and the eight-month period ended February 28, 2005; (B) which involves more than the sum of $50,000 over the term of the agreement (other than customer agreements, agreements with network service providers and vendor agreements); or (C) in which the Company or any Subsidiary has granted manufacturing rights, "most favored nation" pricing provisions or exclusive marketing or distribution rights relating to any services, products or territory or has agreed to purchase a minimum quantity of goods or services or has agreed to purchase goods or services exclusively from a certain party; (iii) any agreement concerning the establishment or operation of a partnership, joint venture or limited liability company; (iv) any agreement (or group of related agreements) under which it has created, incurred, assumed or guaranteed (or may create, incur, assume or guarantee) indebtedness (including capitalized lease obligations but excluding trade payables to vendors incurred in the Ordinary Course of Business) or under which it has imposed (or may impose) a Security Interest on any of its assets, tangible or intangible; (v) any agreement for the disposition of any significant portion of the assets or business of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than sales of products and disposition of obsolete equipment in the Ordinary Course of Business) or any agreement for the acquisition of the assets or business of any other entity (other than purchases of inventory or components in the Ordinary Course of Business); (vi) any agreement concerning confidentiality, noncompetition or non-solicitation (other than confidentiality agreements with customers or employees of the Company or any Subsidiary set forth in the Company's or the applicable Subsidiary's standard terms and conditions of sale -24-
or standard form of employment agreement, copies of which have previously been delivered to the Buyer); (vii) any employment or consulting agreement (other than agreements that are terminable at will without any cost, penalty or other obligation to the Company or any Subsidiary); (viii) any agreement involving any current or former officer, director or stockholder of the Company or any Subsidiary; (ix) any agency, distributor, sales representative, franchise or similar agreements to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any Subsidiary is bound; (x) any agreement which contains any provisions requiring the Company or any Subsidiary to indemnify any other party (excluding indemnities contained in agreements for the provision, purchase, sale or license of Customer Deliverables entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business); and (xi) any other agreement (or group of related agreements) (A) not entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business or (B) the termination or modification of which would have a Company Material Adverse Effect. (b) The Company has delivered to the Buyer a complete and accurate copy of each Contract (as amended to date). With respect to each Contract: (i) the Contract is legal, valid, binding and enforceable against the Company or applicable Subsidiary and, to the Company's knowledge, against each other party thereto, and in full force and effect, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by general equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses; (ii) the Contract will continue to be legal, valid, binding and enforceable against the Company or applicable Subsidiary and, to the Company's knowledge, against each other party thereto immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect immediately prior to the Closing, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by general equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses; and (iii) neither the Company, any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party, is in breach or violation of, or default under, any such Contract, and no event has occurred, is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, is threatened, which, after the giving of notice, with lapse of time, or otherwise, would constitute a breach or default by the Company, any Subsidiary or, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party under such Contract. (c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to any oral contract, agreement or other arrangement which, if reduced to written form, would be required to be listed in Section 2.15(a) of the Disclosure Schedule under the terms of Section 2.15(a). Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to any written or oral arrangement (i) to perform services or sell products which is expected to be performed at, or to result in, a loss or (ii) for which the customer has already been billed or paid that have not been fully accounted for on the Most Recent Balance Sheet. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is restricted by any Contract from carrying on business anywhere in the world. -25-
2.16 Accounts Receivable. All accounts receivable of the Company and its Subsidiaries reflected on the Most Recent Balance Sheet (other than those paid since such date) are valid receivables subject to no setoffs or counterclaims and are current and collectible (within 90 days after the date on which it first became due and payable), net of the applicable reserve for bad debts on the Most Recent Balance Sheet. A complete and accurate list of the accounts receivable as of December 31, 2004, showing the aging thereof, is included in Section 2.16 of the Disclosure Schedule. All accounts receivable of the Company and the Subsidiaries that have arisen since the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date are valid receivables subject to no setoffs or counterclaims and are collectible (within 90 days after the date on which it first became due and payable), net of a reserve for bad debts in an amount proportionate to the reserve shown on the Most Recent Balance Sheet. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any written notice from an account debtor stating that any account receivable in an amount in excess of $5,000 is subject to any contest, claim or setoff by such account debtor. 2.17 Powers of Attorney. There are no outstanding powers of attorney executed on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary. 2.18 Insurance. Section 2.18 of the Disclosure Schedule lists each insurance policy (including fire, theft, casualty, comprehensive general liability, workers compensation, business interruption, environmental, product liability and automobile insurance policies and bond and surety arrangements) to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party, a named insured or otherwise the beneficiary of coverage, all of which are in full force and effect. Except as set forth in Section 2.18 of the Disclosure Schedule, there is no claim pending under any such policy as to which coverage has been questioned, denied or disputed by the underwriter of such policy. All premiums due and payable under all such policies have been paid, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary will be liable for retroactive premiums or similar payments, and the Company and its Subsidiaries are otherwise in compliance with the terms of such policies. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any knowledge of any threatened termination of, or pending premium increase with respect to, any such policy. Each such policy will continue to be enforceable and in full force and effect immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect immediately prior to the Closing. Section 2.18 of the Disclosure Schedule identifies all claims asserted by the Company pursuant to any insurance policy since January 1, 2001 and describes the nature and status of each such claim. 2.19 Litigation. Section 2.19 of the Disclosure Schedule identifies and contains a brief description of (a) any unsatisfied judgment, order, decree, stipulation or injunction, and (b) any claim, complaint, action, suit, proceeding, hearing or investigation of or in any Governmental Entity or by a private party or before any arbitrator, in the case of each of clauses (a) and (b) to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or, to the knowledge of the Company, is threatened to be made a party. None of the complaints, actions, suits, proceedings, hearings and investigations set forth in Section 2.19 of the Disclosure Schedule, individually or collectively, could have a Company Material Adverse Effect. 2.20 Warranties. (a) No service or product provided, manufactured, sold, leased, licensed or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary is subject to any guaranty, warranty, right of return, right of credit or other indemnity other than (i) the applicable standard terms and conditions of sale of each Customer Deliverable, which are set forth in Section 2.20(a) of the Disclosure Schedule, and (ii) manufacturers' warranties for which the Company has no liability. Section 2.20(a) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the aggregate expenses incurred and credits issued in fulfilling the Company's obligations under service-level agreements and similar guarantees with respect to the Company's services that were incurred or issued during the Company's most recent fiscal year and the interim period covered by the Financial -26-
Statements; and the Company does not know of any reason why such expenses should significantly increase as a percentage of sales in the future. (b) The reserve for warranty claims set forth on the Most Recent Balance Sheet and any reserves for warranty claims created by the Company in the Ordinary Course of Business subsequent to the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date are adequate and were calculated in accordance with GAAP consistently applied. (c) The Company has no liability to any customer in connection with any service provided or product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company to provide the customer with any other services or products of the Company on pre-negotiated terms, including without limitation for upgrades to other services or products at prices below the Company's published price for such services or products. The Company has no liability to any customer in connection with any service provided or product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company other than those arising in the Ordinary Course of Business. 2.21 Employees. (a) Section 2.21(a) of the Disclosure Schedule contains a list of all employees of the Company and each Subsidiary, along with the position, date of hire, annual rate of compensation (or with respect to employees compensated on an hourly, commission, piece rate or per diem basis, the hourly, commission, piece rate or per diem rate of compensation) and estimated or target annual incentive compensation of each such person. With the exception of employees listed in Section 2.21(a) of the Disclosure Schedule, each of such employees is retained at-will and none of such employees is a party to an employment agreement, compensation agreement or contract with the Company or any Subsidiary. Each such employee has entered into the Company's or a Subsidiary's standard form of invention assignment and confidentiality agreement with the Company, a copy of which has previously been delivered to the Buyer. All of the agreements referenced in the preceding sentence will continue to be legal, valid, binding and enforceable to the fullest extent under applicable laws against the Company or the applicable Subsidiary and, to the Company's knowledge, against each other party thereto and in full force and effect immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect immediately prior to the Closing. Each employee of the Company and each Subsidiary who has at any time in the past four years been classified as exempt from state and federal overtime requirements was properly classified as exempt at all such times. Section 2.21(a) of the Disclosure Schedule contains a list of all employees of the Company or any Subsidiary who are not citizens of the United States. To the knowledge of the Company, no key employee or group of employees has, as of the date of this Agreement, any plans to terminate employment with the Company or any Subsidiary. (b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to or bound by any collective bargaining agreement, nor has any of them experienced any strikes, grievances, claims of unfair labor practices or other collective bargaining disputes. The Company has no knowledge of any organizational effort made or threatened, either currently or within the past two years, by or on behalf of any labor union with respect to employees of the Company or any Subsidiary. (c) None of (i) the Company, any Subsidiary, any of the Principal Stockholders or Management Participants or any director or officer of the Company, (ii) to the Company's knowledge, any Affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary or (iii) to the Company's knowledge, any Affiliate of any Principal Stockholder, Management Participant or director or officer of the Company, has any existing contractual relationship with the Company that has not been disclosed in Section 2.21(c) of the Disclosure Schedule, or, to the Company's knowledge, owns, directly or indirectly, any interest in any entity which is in a business similar or competitive to the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries. -27-
(d) Section 2.21(d) of the Disclosure Schedule contains a list of all independent contractors currently engaged by the Company and the Subsidiaries, along with the position, date of retention and rate of remuneration for each such person or entity. Except as set forth in Section 2.21(d) of the Disclosure Schedule, none of such independent contractors is a party to a written agreement or contract with the Company or any Subsidiary. Each such independent contractor has entered into the Company's or the applicable Subsidiary's standard form of invention assignment and confidentiality agreement with the Company or the applicable Subsidiary, a copy of which has previously been delivered to the Buyer. (e) Each individual who has received compensation for the performance of services on behalf of the Company, the Subsidiaries or the ERISA Affiliates has been properly classified as an employee or independent contractor in accordance with applicable law. (f) Section 2.21(f) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of each employee of the Company or any Subsidiary who is providing services in the United States and who holds a temporary work authorization ("Work Permit"), including H-1B, TN, E-1, E-2, L-1, F-1 or J-1 visa status or Employment Authorization Document ("EAD") work authorizations, setting forth the name of such employee, the type of Work Permit and the length of time remaining on such Work Permit. With respect to each Work Permit, all of the information that the Company or any Subsidiary provided to the Department of Labor ("DOL") and the Department of Homeland Security (collectively with its predecessor and subsidiary entities, the "DOHS") in the applications for such Work Permit was, to the knowledge of the Company, true and complete at the time of filing such applications. The Company or applicable Subsidiary received the appropriate notice of approval or other evidence of authorized employment from the DOHS, the DOL, the Department of State or other relevant Governmental Entity with respect to each such Work Permit. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any notice from the DOHS or any other Governmental Entity that any Work Permit has been revoked. There is no action pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened to revoke or adversely modify the terms of any of the Work Permits. (g) The Company and the Subsidiaries have obtained the necessary prevailing wage documentation for each H-1B worker and has paid and continues to pay each H-1B worker the prevailing wage according to the regulations of the DOL. The Company and the Subsidiaries have complied with all terms of the Labor Condition Applications for all H-1B workers and has maintained all documentation required by the DOL regulations. The Company has provided the Buyer with a written statement which summarizes the compliance of the Company with the DOL regulations governing labor condition applications. Since December 1, 2004, neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has incurred any liability under the Worker Adjustment Retraining and Notification Act (the "WARN Act") (29 U.S.C. Sections 2101, et seq.) or any similar state law or statute (such as California Labor Code Section 1400 et seq.) and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not give rise to any such liability. Section 2.21(g) of the Disclosure Schedule will set forth, as of the Closing, all employee actions that could be aggregated with any employment action on or after the Closing to result in any liability under such laws. (h) Except as set forth in Section 2.21(h) of the Disclosure Schedule, there have been no federal or state or other claims based on sex, sexual or other harassment, age, disability, race or other discrimination or other claims, whether statutory or common law, including claims of wrongful termination, by any Governmental Entity, employee or former employee or by any individual who is or was performing work for the Company or any Subsidiary but provided by an outside employment agency, and there are no facts or circumstances that could reasonably be expected to give rise to such complaint or claim. The Company and each Subsidiary have complied with all legal requirements related to the employment of employees including, without limitation, any legal requirement relating to wages, hours, collective bargaining, the payment of Social Security and similar Taxes, equal employment opportunity, -28-
employment discrimination, employee health and safety (including without limitation, those promulgated under the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 and similar state laws). Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any notice of any claim that it has not complied with any legal requirement, or that it is liable for any arrearages of wages or any Taxes or penalties for failure to comply with any of the foregoing. 2.22 Employee Benefits. (a) Section 2.22(a) of the Disclosure Schedule contains a complete and accurate list of all Company Plans. Complete and accurate copies of (i) all Company Plans which have been reduced to writing, together with all amendments thereto (ii) written summaries of all unwritten Company Plans, (iii) all related trust agreements, insurance contracts, summary plan descriptions and material employee communications, (iv) all employee handbooks, employment manuals and policies, and (v) all annual reports filed on IRS Form 5500 series (including all schedules, financial statements and any other attachments thereto) have been delivered to the Buyer. All Company Plans comply (and at all times have complied) with applicable California law, to the extent not preempted by ERISA, the Code or other federal law. (b) Each Company Plan has been administered in accordance with its terms and each of the Company, the Subsidiaries and the ERISA Affiliates has met its obligations with respect to each Company Plan and has timely made all required contributions thereto. The Company, each ERISA Affiliate and each Company Plan are in compliance with the currently applicable provisions of ERISA and the Code and the regulations thereunder (including Section 4980B of the Code, Subtitle K, Chapter 100 of the Code and Sections 601 through 608 and Section 701 et seq. of ERISA). All filings and reports as to each Company Plan required to have been submitted to the Internal Revenue Service or to the United States Department of Labor have been timely submitted. (c) There are no Legal Proceedings (except claims for benefits payable in the normal operation of the Company Plans and proceedings with respect to qualified domestic relations orders) against or involving any Company Plan or asserting any rights or claims to benefits under any Company Plan that could give rise to any liability. No Company Plan is or within the last three calendar years has been the subject of, or has received notice that it is the subject of, examination by a government agency or a participant in a government sponsored amnesty, voluntary compliance or similar program. (d) All the Company Plans that are intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code have received determination letters from the Internal Revenue Service to the effect that such Company Plans are qualified and the plans and the trusts related thereto are exempt from federal income Taxes under Sections 401(a) and 501(a), respectively, of the Code, or, if reliance is permitted under IRS Announcement 2001-77, the Company relies on the favorable opinion letter or advisory letter of the master and prototype or volume submitter plan sponsor of such Company Plan, no such determination letter or opinion or advisory letter has been revoked and revocation has not been threatened, and no such Company Plan has been amended since the date of its most recent determination letter, opinion or advisory letter, or application therefor in any respect, and no act or omission has occurred, that would adversely affect its qualification or increase its cost. There has been no termination or partial termination of such a Company Plan. Each Company Plan that is required to satisfy Section 401(k)(3) or Section 401(m)(2) of the Code has been tested for compliance with, and satisfies the requirements of Section 401(k)(3) and Section 401(m)(2) of the Code for each plan year ending prior to the Closing Date. (e) Neither the Company, any Subsidiary nor any ERISA Affiliate has ever maintained or contributed to an Employee Benefit Plan subject to Section 412 of the Code or Title IV of -29-
ERISA. At no time has the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate been obligated to contribute to any "multiemployer plan" (as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA). (f) No Company Plan has assets that include securities issued by the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate. (g) With respect to the Company Plans, there are no benefit obligations for which contributions have not been made or properly accrued and there are no benefit obligations that have not been accounted for by reserves, or otherwise properly footnoted in accordance with GAAP, on the Financial Statements. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any liability for benefits (contingent or otherwise) under any Company Plan, except as set forth on the Financial Statements. The assets of each Company Plan that is funded are reported at their fair market value on the books and records of such Employee Benefit Plan. There are no unfunded obligations under any Company Plan providing benefits after termination of employment to any employee of the Company or any Subsidiary (or to any beneficiary of any such employee), including but not limited to retiree health coverage and deferred compensation, but excluding continuation of health coverage required to be continued under Section 4980B of the Code or other applicable law and insurance conversion privileges under state law, but only to the extent that such continuation of coverage is provided solely at the participant's or beneficiary's expense. (h) No act or omission has occurred and no condition exists with respect to any Company Plan that would subject the Buyer, the Company, any Subsidiary, any ERISA Affiliate, or any plan participant to (i) any fine, penalty, Tax or liability of any kind imposed under ERISA or the Code or (ii) any contractual indemnification or contribution obligation protecting any fiduciary, insurer or service provider with respect to any Company Plan, nor will the transactions contemplated by this Agreement give rise to any such liability. (i) No Company Plan is funded by, associated with or related to a "voluntary employee's beneficiary association" within the meaning of Section 501(c)(9) of the Code. (j) Each Company Plan is amendable and terminable unilaterally by the Company at any time without liability or expense other than administrative and legal expenses related to such amendment or termination to the Company or such Company Plan as a result thereof (other than for benefits accrued through the date of termination or amendment and reasonable administrative expenses related thereto) and no Company Plan, plan documentation or agreement, summary plan description or other written communication distributed generally to employees by its terms prohibits the Company from amending or terminating any such Company Plan, or in any way limit such action. (k) Section 2.22(k) of the Disclosure Schedule discloses each: (i) agreement with any stockholder, director, executive officer or other key employee of the Company or any Subsidiary (A) the benefits of which are contingent, or the terms of which are altered, upon the occurrence of a transaction involving the Company or any Subsidiary of the nature of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (B) providing any term of employment or compensation guarantee or (C) providing severance benefits or other benefits after the termination of employment of such director, executive officer or key employee and (ii) agreement or plan binding the Company or any Subsidiary, including any stock option plan, stock appreciation right plan, restricted stock plan, stock purchase plan, severance benefit plan or Company Plan, any of the benefits of which will be increased, or the vesting of the benefits of which will be accelerated, by the occurrence of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or the value of any of the benefits of which will be calculated on the basis of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. -30-
(l) Section 2.22(l) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the policy of the Company and each Subsidiary with respect to accrued vacation, accrued sick time and earned time off for the past four years (and indicates whether the Company or Subsidiary cashes (and has cashed) out such vacation, accrued sick time and earned time off at termination of employment) and the amount of such liabilities as of December 31, 2004. (m) Section 2.22(m) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth all bonuses earned by the Company's employees through the Closing Date that are expected to be accrued on the Closing Balance Sheet but unpaid as of the Closing Date. (n) There are no loans or extension of credit from the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate to any employee of or independent contractor to the Company or any Subsidiary. (o) There is no plan or commitment, whether legally binding or not, to create any additional Company Plans or to modify any existing Company Plans with respect to employees of the Company or any Subsidiary. (p) There is no corporate-owned life insurance (COLI), split-dollar life insurance policy or any other life insurance policy on the life of any employee of the Company, any Subsidiary or on any Company Stockholder. 2.23 Environmental Matters. (a) The Company and the Subsidiaries have complied with all applicable Environmental Laws. There is no pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened civil or criminal litigation, written notice of violation, formal administrative proceeding, or investigation, inquiry or information request by any Governmental Entity, relating to any Environmental Law involving the Company or any Subsidiary. (b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any liabilities or obligations arising from the release of any Materials of Environmental Concern into the environment. (c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to or bound by any court order, administrative order, consent order or other agreement between the Company or any Subsidiary and any Governmental Entity entered into in connection with any legal obligation or liability arising under any Environmental Law. (d) Set forth in Section 2.23(d) of the Disclosure Schedule is a list of all documents (whether in hard copy or electronic form) that contain any environmental reports, investigations and audits relating to premises currently or previously owned or operated by the Company or any Subsidiary (whether conducted by or on behalf of the Company, the Subsidiaries or a third party, and whether done at the initiative of the Company or a Subsidiary or directed by a Governmental Entity or other third party) which the Company has possession of or access to. A complete and accurate copy of each such document has been provided to the Buyer. (e) The Company is not aware of any environmental liability of any solid or hazardous waste transporter or treatment, storage or disposal facility that has been used by the Company or any Subsidiary. -31-
2.24 Legal Compliance. Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries is currently conducting, and has at all times since January 1, 2002, conducted, its business in compliance with each applicable law (including rules and regulations thereunder) of any federal, state, local or foreign government, or any Governmental Entity. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any notice or communication from any Governmental Entity alleging noncompliance with any applicable law, rule or regulation. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has violated any law concerning the export or re-export of any products or services or the prohibited boycott of any country. 2.25 Customers and Suppliers. Section 2.25 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of (a) each customer during the last full fiscal year or the interim period through December 31, 2004 (identifying only the Top Customers by name), and the amount of revenues accounted for by such customer during each such period and (b) each supplier that is the sole supplier of any significant product or service to the Company or any Subsidiary. No such customer or supplier has indicated within the past year that it will stop, or decrease the rate of, buying materials, products or services or supplying materials, products or services, as applicable, to the Company or any Subsidiary. No purchase order or commitment of the Company or any Subsidiary is for the exchange or barter of any products or services. 2.26 Permits. Section 2.26 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of all Permits issued to or held by the Company or any Subsidiary. Such listed Permits are the only Permits that are required for the Company and the Subsidiaries to conduct their business as presently conducted. Each such Permit is in full force and effect; the Company or the applicable Subsidiary is in compliance with the terms of each such Permit; and, to the knowledge of the Company, no suspension or cancellation of such Permit is threatened and there is no basis for believing that such Permit will not be renewable upon expiration. Each such Permit will continue in full force and effect immediately following the Closing. 2.27 Certain Business Relationships With Affiliates. No Affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary (a) owns any property or right, tangible or intangible, which is used in the business of the Company or any Subsidiary, (b) to the Company's knowledge, has any claim or cause of action against the Company or any Subsidiary, (c) owes any money to, or is owed any money by, the Company or any Subsidiary, or (d) is a party to any contract or other arrangement (written or oral) with the Company or any Subsidiary. Section 2.27 of the Disclosure Schedule describes any transactions or relationships between the Company or a Subsidiary and any Affiliate thereof which occurred or have existed since the beginning of the time period covered by the Financial Statements. 2.28 Brokers' Fees. Except as set forth in Section 2.28 of the Disclosure Schedule, none of the Company, any Subsidiary nor any of the Principal Stockholders has any liability or obligation to pay any fees or commissions to any broker, finder or agent with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 2.29 Books and Records. The minute books and other similar records of the Company and each Subsidiary contain complete and accurate records of all actions taken at any meetings of the Company's or such Subsidiary's stockholders, Board of Directors or any committee thereof and of all written consents executed in lieu of the holding of any such meeting. The books and records of the Company and each Subsidiary accurately reflect the assets, liabilities, business, financial condition and results of operations of the Company or such Subsidiary and have been maintained in accordance with good business and bookkeeping practices. Section 2.29 of the Disclosure Schedule contains a list of all bank accounts and safe deposit boxes of the Company and the Subsidiaries and the names of persons having signature authority with respect thereto or access thereto. 2.30 Prepayments, Prebilled Invoices and Deposits. -32-
(a) Section 2.30(a) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth (i) all prepayments, prebilled invoices and deposits that have been received by the Company and the Subsidiaries as of January 31, 2005 from customers for products to be shipped, or services to be performed, after the Closing Date, and (ii) with respect to each such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit, (A) the party and contract credited, (B) the date received or invoiced, (C) the products and/or services to be delivered and (D) the conditions for the return of such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit. All such prepayments, prebilled invoices and deposits are properly accrued for on the Most Recent Balance Sheet, and will be properly accrued for on the Closing Balance Sheet, in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis with the past practice of the Company. (b) Section 2.30(b) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth (i) all prepayments, prebilled invoices and deposits that have been made or paid by the Company and the Subsidiaries as of January 31, 2005 for products to be purchased, services to be performed or other benefits to be received after the Closing Date, and (ii) with respect to each such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit, (A) the party to whom such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit was made or paid, (B) the date made or paid, (C) the products and/or services to be delivered and (D) the conditions for the return of such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit. All such prepayments, prebilled invoices and deposits are properly accrued for on the Most Recent Balance Sheet, and will be properly accrued for on the Closing Balance Sheet, in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis with the past practice of the Company. 2.31 Government Contracts. (a) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has been suspended or debarred from bidding on contracts or subcontracts with any Governmental Entity; no such suspension or debarment has been initiated or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened; and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not result in any such suspension or debarment of the Company or any Subsidiary. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has been or is now being audited or investigated by the United States Government Accounting Office, the United States Department of Defense or any of its agencies, the Defense Contract Audit Agency, the contracting or auditing function of any Governmental Entity with which it is contracting, the United States Department of Justice, the Inspector General of the United States Governmental Entity, or any prime contractor with a Governmental Entity; nor, to the knowledge of the Company, has any such audit or investigation been threatened. To the knowledge of the Company, there is no valid basis for (i) the suspension or debarment of the Company or any Subsidiary from bidding on contracts or subcontracts with any Governmental Entity or (ii) any claim (including any claim for return of funds to the Government) pursuant to an audit or investigation by any of the entities named in the foregoing sentence. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any agreements, contracts or commitments which require it to obtain or maintain a security clearance with any Governmental Entity. (b) To the knowledge of the Company, no basis exists for any of the following with respect to any of its contracts or subcontracts with any Governmental Entity: (i) a Termination for Default (as provided in 48 C.F.R. Ch.1 Section 52.249-8, 52.249-9 or similar sections), (ii) a Termination for Convenience (as provided in 48 C.F.R. Ch.1 Section 52.241-1, 52.249-2 or similar sections), or a Stop Work Order (as provided in 48 C.F.R. Ch.1 Section 52.212-13 or similar sections); and the Company has no reason to believe that funding may not be provided under any contract or subcontract with any Governmental Entity in the upcoming federal fiscal year. 2.32 Disclosure. No representation or warranty by the Company contained in this Agreement, and no statement contained in the Disclosure Schedule or any other document, certificate or other instrument delivered or to be delivered by or on behalf of the Company or any Company Stockholder -33-
pursuant to this Agreement, contains or will contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omits or will omit to state any material fact necessary, in light of the circumstances under which it was or will be made, in order to make the statements herein or therein not misleading. ARTICLE III REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE BUYER AND THE TRANSITORY SUBSIDIARY Each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary represents and warrants to the Company that the statements contained in this Article III are true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and will be true and correct as of the Closing as though made as of the Closing. 3.1 Organization and Corporate Power. Each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the state of its incorporation. The Buyer has all requisite power and authority (corporate and other) to carry on the businesses in which it is engaged and to own and use the properties owned and used by it. 3.2 Authorization of Transaction. Each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary has all requisite power and authority (corporate and other) to execute and deliver this Agreement and to perform its obligations hereunder. The execution and delivery by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary of this Agreement and the consummation by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Buyer and Transitory Subsidiary, respectively. This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary and constitutes a valid and binding obligation of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary, enforceable against them in accordance with its terms. 3.3 Noncontravention. Subject to the filing of the Certificate of Merger as required by the Delaware General Corporation Law and to the filing requirements of the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, neither the execution and delivery by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary of this Agreement or any other agreement provided for herein, nor the consummation by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, will (a) conflict with or violate any provision of the charter or By-laws of the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, (b) require on the part of the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary any filing with, or permit, authorization, consent or approval of, any Governmental Entity, (c) conflict with, result in breach of, constitute (with or without due notice or lapse of time or both) a default under, result in the acceleration of obligations under, create in any party any right to accelerate, terminate, modify or cancel, or require any notice, consent or waiver under, any contract, lease, sublease, license, sublicense, franchise, permit, indenture, agreement or mortgage for borrowed money, instrument of indebtedness, Security Interest or other arrangement to which the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary is a party or by which either is bound or to which any of their assets are subject, or (d) violate any order, writ, injunction, decree, statute, rule or regulation applicable to the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary or any of their properties or assets. 3.4 Broker's Fees. The Buyer has no liability or obligation to pay any fees or commissions to any broker, finder or agent with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 3.5 Investment Representation. The Buyer is acquiring the Company Shares from each Company Stockholder for its own account for investment and not with a view to, or for sale in connection with, any distribution thereof, nor with any present intention of distributing or selling the same; and, except as contemplated by this Agreement and the agreements contemplated herein, the Buyer has no -34-
present or contemplated agreement, undertaking, arrangement, obligation, indebtedness or commitment providing for the disposition thereof. 3.6 Litigation. Except for matters disclosed in the Buyer SEC Documents, there is no claim, complaint, action, suit, proceeding, hearing or investigation pending against the Buyer or any of its subsidiaries in any Governmental Entity or before any arbitrator that is required to be disclosed in the Buyer SEC Documents pursuant to Item 103 of Regulation S-K under the Securities Act. 3.7 SEC Filings. (a) SEC Reports. The Buyer has filed with the SEC all registration statements, prospectuses, reports, forms, statements, schedules, certifications and other documents (including exhibits and all other items incorporated by reference) required to be filed by the Buyer since January 1, 2004 (all such required registration statements, prospectuses, reports, forms, statements, schedules, certifications and other documents, including those that the Buyer may file subsequent to the date of this Agreement, are referred to herein as the "Buyer SEC Documents"). As of their respective dates, Buyer SEC Documents (i) complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, the Sarbanes Act (to the extent then applicable), and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder applicable to such Buyer SEC Documents and (ii) did not at the time they were filed (or if amended or superseded by a filing prior to the date of this Agreement, then on the date of such filing) contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except to the extent corrected prior to the date hereof by a subsequently filed Buyer SEC Document. (b) Financial Statements. Each of the consolidated financial statements (including, in each case, any related notes thereto) contained in the Buyer SEC Documents (the "Buyer Financial Statements"), including each Buyer SEC Document filed after the date of this Agreement until the Closing, (i) complied, as of their respective dates of filing with the SEC, as to form in all material respects with the published rules and regulations of the SEC with respect thereto, (ii) was prepared in accordance with GAAP (except in the case of unaudited interim financial statements, as may be permitted by the SEC on Form 10-Q or Form 8-K) applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto), and (iii) fairly presented in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Buyer and its subsidiaries as at the respective dates thereof and the consolidated results of Buyer's and its subsidiaries' operations and cash flows for the periods indicated (except that the unaudited interim financial statements were subject to normal and recurring year-end and quarter-end adjustments which were not material). 3.8 Merger Shares and Management Shares Validly Issued. The Merger Shares and Management Shares to be issued pursuant to the Agreement have been duly authorized and, when issued and delivered in accordance with the Agreement, will have been validly issued and will be fully paid and nonassessable and the issuance thereof is not subject to any preemptive or other similar right. 3.9 Disclosure. No representation or warranty by the Buyer contained in this Agreement, and no statement contained in any other document, certificate or other instrument delivered or to be delivered by or on behalf of the Buyer pursuant to this Agreement, contains or will contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omits or will omit to state any material fact necessary, in light of the circumstances under which it was or will be made, in order to make the statements herein or therein not misleading. 3.10 Actions Consistent With Reorganization Treatment. To their knowledge, neither the Buyer nor the Transitory Subsidiary has taken any action that (alone or in combination with other events) -35-
would cause the Merger to fail to qualify as a "reorganization" within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code. ARTICLE IV COVENANTS 4.1 Closing Efforts. Each of the Parties shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to take all actions and to do all things necessary, proper or advisable to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including using its or his Reasonable Best Efforts to ensure that (a) its or his representations and warranties remain true and correct through the Closing Date, except to the extent expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement and (b) the conditions to the obligations of the other Parties to consummate the Merger are satisfied. 4.2 Treatment of the Merger as a Reorganization for Tax Purposes. (a) To the extent permitted by applicable law, each of the Parties shall file all of its Tax Returns on the basis that the Merger qualifies as a "reorganization" as defined in Section 368(a) of the Code. No party shall knowingly take any action that (alone or in combination with other of its actions) would reasonably be interpreted to likely cause the Merger to fail to qualify as a "reorganization." (b) The Buyer presently intends that, following the Merger, it will cause the Surviving Corporation to continue the Company's historic business or will use a significant portion of the Company's historic business assets in a business. 4.3 Governmental and Third-Party Notices and Consents. (a) Subject to Section 4.3(c) below, the Company shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain, at its expense, all waivers, permits, consents, approvals or other authorizations from third parties and Governmental Entities, and effect all registrations, filings and notices with or to third parties and Governmental Entities, as may be necessary or desirable to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and to otherwise comply with all applicable laws and regulations in connection with the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Company shall promptly file any Notification and Report Forms and related material that it may be required to file with the Federal Trade Commission and the Antitrust Division of the United States Department of Justice under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act or other applicable U.S. or foreign antitrust laws, shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain an early termination of the applicable waiting period, and shall make any further filings or information submissions pursuant thereto and take such actions that may be necessary, proper or advisable, including, but not limited to: (A) responding to formal requests for additional information or documentary material pursuant to 16 C.F.R. 803.20 under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, (B) negotiating in good faith to resolve any questions or concerns raised in the course of investigation by such Governmental Entities; and (C) defending against any action by such Governmental Entities seeking to enjoin the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. (b) Subject to Section 4.3(c) below, the Buyer shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain, at its expense, all waivers, permits, consents, approvals or other authorizations from third parties and Governmental Entities, and effect all registrations, filings and notices with or to third parties and Governmental Entities, as may be necessary or desirable to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and to otherwise comply with all applicable laws and regulations in -36-
connection with the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Buyer shall promptly file any Notification and Report Forms and related material that it may be required to file with the Federal Trade Commission and the Antitrust Division of the United States Department of Justice under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act or other applicable U.S. or foreign antitrust laws, shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain an early termination of the applicable waiting period, and shall make any further filings or information submissions pursuant thereto and take such actions that may be necessary, proper or advisable, including, but not limited to: (A) responding to formal requests for additional information or documentary material pursuant to 16 C.F.R. 803.20 under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, (B) negotiating in good faith to resolve any questions or concerns raised in the course of investigation by such Governmental Entities; and (C) defending against any action by such Governmental Entities seeking to enjoin the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; provided, however, that notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, the Buyer shall not be obligated to sell or dispose of or hold separately (through a trust or otherwise) any assets or businesses of the Buyer or its Affiliates. (c) The Buyer and the Company shall be equally responsible for the payment of the filing fees required to be paid in connection with filings to be made under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act; provided, however, that if the Merger is consummated, such filing fees paid or accrued by the Company shall be added to the total assets of the Company on the Closing Balance Sheet for the purposes of determining the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment pursuant to Section 1.12. 4.4 Stockholder Approval. (a) Subject to Section 4.4(c), the Company shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain, as promptly as practicable following receipt of the California Permit or, if not received, the effective date of the Registration Statement (as hereinafter defined), the Requisite Stockholder Approval, either at a special meeting of stockholders or pursuant to a written stockholder consent, all in accordance with the applicable requirements of both the Delaware General Corporation Law and California General Corporation Law. In connection with such special meeting of stockholders or written stockholder consent, the Company shall provide to its stockholders the Disclosure Statement, which shall include (A) a summary of the Merger and this Agreement (which summary shall include a summary of the terms relating to the indemnification obligations of the Company Stockholders, the escrow arrangements and the authority of the Representative, subject to Section 4.4(c), the unanimous recommendation of the Board of Directors of the Company that the Company's stockholders adopt and approve this Agreement and the Merger and, subject to Section 4.4(c), the conclusion of the Board of Directors that the Merger is fair and in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders, and a statement that the adoption of this Agreement by the stockholders of the Company shall constitute approval of such terms) and (B) a statement that appraisal rights are available for the Company Shares pursuant to Section 262 of the Delaware General Corporation Law and a copy of such Section 262. Each of the Company and the Buyer agrees to cooperate with the other in the preparation of the Disclosure Statement, including, without limitation, providing promptly to the other such information concerning its business and financial statements and affairs as, in the reasonable judgment of the providing party or its counsel, may be required or appropriate for inclusion in the Disclosure Statement, and to cause its counsel and auditors to cooperate with the other's counsel and auditors in the preparation of the Disclosure Statement. The Buyer and the Company shall each use Reasonable Best Efforts to cause the Disclosure Statement to comply with applicable federal and state securities laws requirements. The Company will promptly advise the Buyer, and the Buyer will promptly advise the Company, in writing if at any time prior to the Effective Time either the Company or the Buyer, as applicable, shall obtain knowledge of any facts that might make it necessary or appropriate to amend or supplement the Disclosure Statement in order to make the statements contained or incorporated by reference therein not misleading or to comply with applicable law. The Company agrees not to distribute the Disclosure Statement until the Buyer has had a reasonable -37-
opportunity to review and comment on the Disclosure Statement and the Disclosure Statement has been approved by the Buyer (which approval may not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed). If the Requisite Stockholder Approval is obtained (i) by means of a written consent, the Company shall send, (X) pursuant to Section 228 and Section 262(d) of the Delaware General Corporation Law, a written notice to all stockholders of the Company that did not execute such written consent informing them that this Agreement and the Merger were adopted and approved by the stockholders of the Company and that appraisal rights are available for their Company Shares pursuant to Section 262 of the Delaware General Corporation Law (which notice shall include a copy of such Section 262) and (Y) pursuant to Chapter 13 of the California General Corporation Law, as promptly as practicable but not later than 10 days after the date on which the Requisite Stockholder Approval was obtained, a notice to all stockholders of the Company entitled to vote on this Agreement and the Merger that did not execute such written consent informing them that this Agreement and the Merger were adopted and approved by the stockholders of the Company and that dissenters' rights are available for their Company Shares pursuant to Chapter 13 of the California General Corporation Law, which notice shall be accompanied by a copy of Sections 1300-1304 of the California General Corporation Law, a statement of the price determined by the Company to represent the fair market value of their Company Shares and a brief description of the procedure to be followed if such stockholder desires to exercise its dissenters' rights (the "California Dissenters' Rights Notice), or (ii) at a special meeting of stockholders, then the Company shall send the California Dissenters' Rights Notice as promptly as practicable but not later than 10 days after the date on which the Requisite Stockholder Approval was obtained. The Company shall promptly inform the Buyer of the date on which each such notice, if applicable, was sent. (b) The Company, acting through its Board of Directors, shall include in the Disclosure Statement (subject to Section 4.4(c)) the unanimous recommendation of its Board of Directors that the stockholders of the Company vote in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger. (c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company's Board of Directors may, in response to a Superior Proposal that did not result from a breach by the Company of Section 4.9 hereof, withdraw or modify the recommendation by the Company's Board of Directors of this Agreement and the Merger (an "Adverse Recommendation"), if the Company's Board of Directors determines in good faith, after consultation with outside counsel and taking into account any changes to the terms of the Merger proposed by the Buyer, that its fiduciary obligations require it to do so, but only at a time that is prior to the adoption of this Agreement either at a special meeting of stockholders or pursuant to a written stockholder consent and is after the fifth business day following the Buyer's receipt of written notice advising the Buyer that the Company's Board of Directors desires to withdraw or modify the recommendation due to the existence of a Superior Proposal (or any material change in the terms of such Superior Proposal), specifying the material terms and conditions of such Superior Proposal (including any such material changes), and identifying the person making such Superior Proposal. Such five business day period shall be required for each and every Superior Proposal or material modification thereto. Nothing in this Section 4.4 shall be deemed to (A) permit the Company to enter into any letter of intent, memorandum of understanding, agreement in principle, acquisition agreement, merger agreement or similar agreement (an "Alternative Acquisition Agreement") constituting or relating to any Acquisition Proposal (other than a confidentiality agreement referred to in Section 4.9 hereof entered into in the circumstances referred to in Section 4.9), (B) affect any obligation of the Company under this Agreement or (C) limit the Company's obligation to call, give notice of, convene and hold the special meeting of stockholders or distribute a written stockholder consent for purposes of approving this Agreement and the Merger regardless of whether the Company's Board of Directors has withdrawn or modified its recommendation of this Agreement and the Merger. -38-
(d) The Company shall ensure that the Disclosure Statement does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (provided that the Company shall not be responsible for the accuracy or completeness of any information concerning the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary furnished by the Buyer in writing for inclusion in the Disclosure Statement). (e) The Buyer shall ensure that any information furnished by the Buyer to the Company in writing for inclusion in the Disclosure Statement does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. (f) The Principal Stockholders have as of the date hereof entered into a Stockholder Agreement in the form attached hereto as Exhibit A, pursuant to which such Principal Stockholders have agreed, among other things, (i) if no Adverse Recommendation has been made, to vote Company Shares that are beneficially owned by the Principal Stockholders in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger, and (ii) unless an Adverse Recommendation is made, not to vote any Company Shares in favor of any Acquisition Proposal other than the Merger. 4.5 Operation of Business. Except as expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement, during the period from the date of this Agreement or as required by applicable law to the Closing or the earlier termination of this Agreement in accordance with Article X hereof (the "Pre-Closing Period"), the Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, conduct its operations only in the Ordinary Course of Business in all material respects and in compliance with all applicable U.S. federal, foreign, regional, state, provincial, county and local laws and regulations and, to the extent consistent therewith, use its Reasonable Best Efforts to preserve intact its current business organization, keep its physical assets in good working condition, keep available the services of its current officers and employees and preserve its relationships with customers, suppliers and others having business dealings with it. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, except (I) as expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement, (II) as set forth in Section 4.5 of the Disclosure Schedule or (III) as required by applicable law, during the Pre-Closing Period the Company shall not, and shall cause each Subsidiary not to, without the written consent of the Buyer: (a) issue or sell any stock or other securities of the Company or any Subsidiary any options, warrants or rights to acquire any such stock or other securities (except pursuant to the exercise of Options and Warrants outstanding on the date hereof and upon conversion of Preferred Stock outstanding as of the date of this Agreement and the issuance of Options to purchase at fair market value up to 2,800,000 Company Shares to employees, directors and consultants of or to the Company and its Subsidiaries on the terms set forth in Section 4.5(a) of the Disclosure Schedule), or amend any of the terms of (including the vesting of) any Options or Warrants or restricted stock agreements, or repurchase or redeem any stock or other securities of the Company (except from former employees, directors or consultants in accordance with agreements in place as of the date of this Agreement and providing for the repurchase of shares at their original issuance price in connection with any termination of employment with or services to the Company or any Subsidiary); (b) split, combine or reclassify any shares of its capital stock; or declare, set aside or pay any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, stock or property or any combination thereof) in respect of its capital stock; (c) create, incur or assume any indebtedness (including obligations in respect of capital leases) other than for short-term borrowings not to exceed $500,000 at any time outstanding under -39-
the Company's existing line of credit or a replacement line of credit on comparable terms and reasonably acceptable to the Buyer; assume, guarantee, endorse or otherwise become liable or responsible (whether directly, contingently or otherwise) for the obligations of any other person or entity; or make any loans, advances or capital contributions to, or investments in, any other person or entity (other than de minimis advances to employees in the Ordinary Course of Business in respect of travel expenses); (d) enter into, adopt or amend any Employee Benefit Plan or any employment or severance agreement or arrangement of the type described in Section 2.22(k) or (except for normal increases in the Ordinary Course of Business for employees who are not Affiliates) increase in any manner the compensation or fringe benefits of, or materially modify the employment terms of, its directors, officers or employees, generally or individually, or pay any bonus or other benefit to its directors, officers or employees (except for existing payment obligations for base salaries in the Ordinary Course of Business and bonus and other benefit obligations listed in Section 2.22(k) or (m) of the Disclosure Schedule) or hire any new officers or (except in the Ordinary Course of Business) any new employees or consultants; (e) acquire, sell, lease (other than the renewal of the lease for the Company's current headquarters in Santa Clara, California, space leased in Herndon, Virginia, at No. 501 in Olympus Tower of Acropolis, No. 20, Hosur Road, Bangalore, India and at No. 804 in Sparta Tower of Acropolis in Bangalore, India, each as described in Section 2.12 of the Disclosure Schedule, upon the terms and conditions set forth in Section 4.5(e) of the Disclosure Schedule), license or dispose of any assets or property (including any shares or other equity interests in or securities of any Subsidiary or any other corporation, partnership, association or other business organization or division thereof), other than purchases and sales of assets in the Ordinary Course of Business; (f) mortgage or pledge any of its property or assets or subject any such property or assets to any Security Interest, except for purchase-money Security Interests in respect of capital expenditures attributable to the purchase of equipment to the extent permitted pursuant to Section 4.5(p); (g) amend its charter, by laws or other organizational documents; (h) sell, assign, transfer, license or sublicense any Intellectual Property, other than pursuant to license or service agreements with customers entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business; (i) change the nature or scope of its business being carried on as of the date of this Agreement or commence any new business not being ancillary or incidental to such business or take any action to alter its organizational or management structure; (j) change its accounting methods, principles or practices, except insofar as may be required by a generally applicable change in GAAP, or make any new elections, or changes to any material current elections, with respect to Taxes; (k) enter into or amend in any material respect any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.12 of the Disclosure Schedule (other than the Great America Parkway Lease, the space leased in Herndon, Virginia, at No. 501 in Olympus Tower of Acropolis, No. 20, Hosur Road, Bangalore, India and at No. 804 in Sparta Tower of Acropolis in Bangalore, India, each of which may be amended in the manner set forth in Section 4.5(k) of the Disclosure Schedule); (l) enter into or amend in any material respect any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.13 of the Disclosure Schedule; -40-
(m) enter into or amend in any material respect any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.15(a)(i) or (ii) of the Disclosure Schedule, except for (1) equipment leases entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business with terms of twelve months or less, which shall nevertheless be subject to the limitations set forth in paragraph (p) below; (2) network service provider contracts entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business, having a term of one year or less and involving 100 mbps or less; (3) customer contracts entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business with pricing, terms and other conditions equivalent in all material respects to comparable customer contracts existing at the date of this Agreement; and (4) vendor agreements entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business involving less than the sum of $200,000 over the term of the agreement and are terminable within one year; (n) enter into or amend in any material respect any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.15 of the Disclosure Schedule (other than in Section 2.15(a)(i) or 2.15(a)(ii) thereof); (o) terminate, other than as a matter of right in the Ordinary Course of Business (including, but not limited to, termination of agreements of nonpaying customers) or take or omit to take any action that would constitute a violation under, or waive any material rights under, any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.12, Section 2.13 or Section 2.15 of the Disclosure Schedule or any other contract or agreement with any customer or the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries involving more than the sum of $50,000 over the term of the agreement; (p) make or commit to make any capital expenditure, including those permitted by Section 4.5(m)(1), in excess of $50,000 per item or $200,000 in the aggregate per month; (q) institute any Legal Proceeding, except for any Legal Proceeding brought by the Company for the purpose of enforcing the Buyer's performance of its obligations under this Agreement, or settle and Legal Proceeding, except for settlements of routine litigation in the Ordinary Course of Business, provided that such settlements only involve cash payments of monetary damages, which payments individually and in the aggregate shall not be material, or cash payments paid in full during the Pre-Closing Period; (r) take any action or fail to take any action permitted by this Agreement with the knowledge that such action or failure to take action would reasonably be expected to result in (i) any of the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Agreement becoming untrue during the Pre-Closing Period (other than as a result of changes to the representations and warranties expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement) or (ii) any of the conditions to the Merger set forth in Article V not being satisfied; (s) fail to take any action necessary to preserve the validity of any material Intellectual Property or Permit; or (t) agree in writing or otherwise to take any of the foregoing actions. In addition, during the Pre-Closing Period, the Company shall (i) accept customer orders in the Ordinary Course of Business and (ii) cooperate with the Buyer in communicating with suppliers and customers to prepare for the transfer of the Company's business to the Buyer as a result of and conditioned upon the Merger, on the Closing Date, so long as such communications are not inconsistent with the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act. -41-
4.6 Stay of Litigation. Upon execution of this Agreement, all activities as between the Parties in the prosecution and/or defense of the Lawsuits shall be immediately suspended, and the Parties shall cause their counsel to prepare and file, within two (2) business days following the date of this Agreement, joint motions to indefinitely stay the Lawsuits. The motions shall identify this Agreement, shall make a formal request for an Order vacating all currently scheduled dates, including but not limited to (a) the remaining dates related to the briefing and hearing on all pending discovery or other motions, (b) all other pretrial dates, and (c) the trial dates, and shall further require the parties to notify the Court upon either (i) any termination of this Agreement pursuant to Article X of this Agreement, or (ii) any Closing of the Merger pursuant to Article I of this Agreement. The joint motions shall also request that any such stay be automatically lifted, five (5) business days after notice to the court of any termination of this Agreement pursuant to Article X of this Agreement. If the stay is lifted, the parties will request a new trial setting conference as soon as reasonably practicable, at which time the Court will set a new schedule for trial and pre-trial dates. In the action pending in Santa Clara Superior Court and pursuant to the terms of the Contingent Settlement Agreement and Partial Release in the form attached hereto as Exhibit E, the Parties agree not to seek a trial date fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date the stay is lifted. In the actions pending in U.S. District Court in Massachusetts, the parties agree not to seek a trial date fewer than nine (9) months after the date the stay is lifted. Upon the Closing, the Buyer shall prepare and cause to be filed stipulations terminating the Lawsuits with a dismissal with prejudice as to each of Ajit Gupta, Richard Day and the Company, and all counsel will execute such stipulations. 4.7 Access to Information. (a) Except to the extent limited by the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act or other law, during the Pre-Closing Period, the Company shall (and shall cause each Subsidiary to) afford the officers, attorneys, accountants and other authorized representatives of the Buyer reasonable access upon reasonable notice and during normal business hours to all personnel, offices, properties, books and records of the Company, so that the Buyer may have full opportunity to make such investigation as it shall desire to make of the management, business, properties and affairs of the Company and the Subsidiaries, and the Buyer shall be permitted to make such abstracts from, or copies of, all such books and records as may be reasonably necessary to assist in planning for integration and operation of the combined business following the Closing, provided that such information shall be held pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Nondisclosure Agreement dated August 26, 2004, between the Buyer and the Company, as amended by Amendment No. 1 to the Nondisclosure Agreement dated January 13, 2005, and Amendment No. 2 to the Nondisclosure Agreement dated February 16, 2005 (the "NDA"). The Company shall (and shall cause each Subsidiary to) furnish to the Buyer such financial and operating data and other information as to the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries as the Buyer shall reasonably request. The Company shall, from and after the date hereof, cause its accountants to provide to the Buyer and its auditors such information and work papers as the Buyer or such auditors may reasonably deem necessary in connection with the preparation of the Buyer's SEC filings arising out of the Merger. The Company shall execute and deliver to its accountants such consents and waivers as may be necessary to afford the Buyer and its auditors access to such information and work papers. (b) Within 10 business days after the end of each month ending prior to the Closing, beginning with March 1, 2005, the Company shall furnish to the Buyer an unaudited income statement for such month and a balance sheet as of the end of such month, prepared on a basis consistent with the Financial Statements. Such financial statements shall present fairly the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries as of the dates thereof and for the periods covered thereby, and shall be consistent with the books and records of the Company and the Subsidiaries. 4.8 Notice of Breaches. -42-
(a) During the Pre-Closing Period, the Company shall promptly deliver to the Buyer supplemental information concerning events or circumstances occurring subsequent to the date hereof which would render any representation, warranty or statement of the Company in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect at any time after the date of this Agreement until the Closing. No such supplemental information shall be deemed to avoid or cure any misrepresentation or breach of warranty or constitute an amendment of any representation, warranty or statement in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule. (b) During the Pre-Closing Period, the Buyer shall promptly deliver to the Company supplemental information concerning events or circumstances occurring subsequent to the date hereof which would render any representation, warranty or statement of the Buyer in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect at any time after the date of this Agreement until the Closing. No such supplemental information shall be deemed to avoid or cure any misrepresentation or breach of warranty or constitute an amendment of any representation, warranty or statement in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule. 4.9 Exclusivity. (a) During the Pre-Closing Period, the Company shall not, and the Company shall require each of its officers, directors, employees, representatives and agents not to, directly or indirectly, (i) initiate, solicit, encourage or otherwise facilitate any inquiry, proposal, offer or discussion with any party (other than the Buyer) concerning any Acquisition Proposal, (ii) furnish any information concerning the business, properties or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary or the Company Shares to any party (other than the Buyer) or (iii) engage in negotiations or enter into any agreement with any party (other than the Buyer) concerning any such transaction. (b) Notwithstanding the foregoing, prior to the adoption of this Agreement either at a special meeting of stockholders or pursuant to a written stockholder consent, the Company may, to the extent required by the fiduciary obligations of the Company's Board of Directors, as determined in good faith by the Company's Board of Directors after consultation with outside counsel, in response to a bona fide, unsolicited written Acquisition Proposal from an unaffiliated third party made or received after the date of this Agreement that the Company's Board of Directors determines in good faith after consultation with outside counsel and a nationally recognized independent financial advisor is reasonably likely to lead to a Superior Proposal, in each case that did not result from a breach by the Company of this Section 4.9, and subject to compliance with Section 4.9(c), (x) furnish information with respect to the Company to the person making such Acquisition Proposal and its Advisors pursuant to a customary confidentiality agreement not less restrictive of the other party than the NDA and (y) participate in discussions or negotiations (including solicitation of a revised Acquisition Proposal) with such person and its Advisors regarding any Acquisition Proposal. Without limiting the foregoing, it is agreed that any violation of the restrictions set forth in this Section 4.9 by any Advisor of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, whether or not such person is purporting to act on behalf of the Company or otherwise, shall be deemed to be a material breach of this Section 4.9 by the Company. (c) The Company shall promptly, and in any event within one business day, notify any party with which discussions or negotiations of the nature described in paragraph (a) above were pending that the Company is terminating such discussions or negotiations. If the Company receives any Acquisition Proposal or any request for information in connection with any Acquisition Proposal, or of any inquiry with respect to, or that could reasonably be expected to lead to, any Acquisition Proposal, the Company shall, within two business days after such receipt, notify the Buyer of such Acquisition Proposal, request or inquiry, including the identity of the other party and the terms of such Acquisition Proposal, request or inquiry. -43-
4.10 Listing Notifications. The Buyer shall timely prepare and submit to NASDAQ any notice or other document or instrument required to be filed with or submitted to NASDAQ by applicable federal or state securities laws or the NASDAQ Marketplace Rules with respect to the shares of the Buyer Common Stock issuable in connection with the Merger. 4.11 Expenses. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, the Buyer will pay all fees and expenses (including legal and accounting fees and expenses) incurred by it in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby and the Equity Holders, jointly and severally, will pay all fees and expenses incurred by the Equity Holders in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby. Each Equity Holder shall be responsible for payment of all sales or transfer Taxes (including real property transfer Taxes) arising out of the conveyance of the Company Shares owned by such Company Stockholder. 4.12 Company 401(k) Plan. If requested by the Buyer, the Company shall terminate its 401(k) Plan in accordance with its terms as of or prior to the Effective Time. 4.13 280G Covenant. Prior to the Closing Date, the Company shall submit to a stockholder vote the right of any "disqualified individual" (as defined in Section 280G(c) of the Code) to receive any and all payments (or other benefits) that could be deemed "parachute payments" under Section 280G(b) of the Code, in a manner that satisfies the stockholder approval requirements for the small business exemption of Section 280G(b)(5) of the Code and any regulations (including proposed regulations) promulgated thereunder. Consistent with the requirements of Section 280G(b)(5) and the regulations, such vote shall establish the "disqualified individual's" right to the payment, benefit or other compensation, and before the Closing Date, the Company shall provide adequate disclosure to all Company Stockholders of all material facts concerning all payments that, but for such vote, could be deemed "parachute payments" to a "disqualified individual" under Section 280G of the Code in a manner that satisfies Section 280G(b)(5)(B)(ii) of the Code and any regulations (including proposed regulations) promulgated thereunder. 4.14 FIRPTA. Prior to the Closing, the Company shall deliver to the Buyer and to the Internal Revenue Service notices that the Company Shares are not "U.S. real property interests" in accordance with Treasury Regulations under Sections 897 and 1445 of the Code. If the Buyer does not receive the notices described above on or before the Closing Date, the Buyer, the Transitory Subsidiary or the Exchange Agent shall be permitted to withhold from the payments to be made pursuant to this Agreement any required withholding Tax under Section 1445 of the Code in the manner provided in Section 1.18. 4.15 Silicon Valley Bank Registration Rights. Prior to the Closing, the Company shall terminate all registration rights of Silicon Valley Bank disclosed in Section 2.2(e) of the Disclosure Schedule. 4.16 Option Acceleration. (a) Except in accordance with the terms of arrangements established by the Company prior to the Effective Time as specifically disclosed in Sections 2.2(c)(ii) and 2.7(b) of the Disclosure Schedule or in accordance employment arrangements between the Buyer and the Management Participants entered into as of the date of this Agreement, during the 18 month period commencing at the Effective Time, the Buyer agrees that it shall not (i) accelerate the vesting of any Outstanding Options assumed by the Buyer or (ii) continue the vesting of any Outstanding Options assumed by the Buyer for any employee that does not remain an active employee of or consultant to the Buyer or any of its -44-
Subsidiaries, including any employee or consultant that is not generally required to provide a minimum of 15 hours of service on a weekly basis to the Buyer or any of its Subsidiaries. (b) Following the 18 month anniversary of the Effective Time, the Buyer shall provide the Representative with such relevant back-up materials and documents as the Representative may reasonably request to allow the Representative to confirm the calculation of the number of Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares issued pursuant to Section 1.5(d)(iii). ARTICLE V CONDITIONS TO CONSUMMATION OF MERGER 5.1 Conditions to Obligations of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary. The obligation of each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary to consummate the Merger is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions precedent, each of which may be waived in writing in the sole discretion of the Buyer: (a) the holders of at least 95% of the votes represented by the outstanding Company Shares entitled to vote on this Agreement and the Merger shall have voted to adopt this Agreement and approve the Merger; (b) the Company shall have (i) obtained (and shall have provided copies thereof to the Buyer) all of the waivers, permits, consents, approvals or other authorizations (collectively, "Consents"), and effected all of the registrations, filings and notices (collectively, "Filings"), which are listed in Section 5.1(b)(i) of the Disclosure Schedule, and (ii) obtained (and shall have provided copies thereof to the Buyer) all other Consents and effected all other Filings that, if not obtained or effected, would reasonably be expected to result in a Company Material Adverse Effect (it being understood that the failure to obtain any of the Consents or effect any or all of the Filings listed in Section 5.1(b)(ii) of the Disclosure Schedule would not reasonably be expected to result in a Company Material Adverse Effect); (c) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct in all respects when made as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing as though made as of the Closing, except (i) to the extent such representations and warranties are specifically made as of a particular date (in which case such representations and warranties shall be true and correct in all material respects as of such date), (ii) for changes expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement and (iii) in any event, as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, for purposes of this Section 5.1(c), each representation or warranty made by the Company herein is made without any qualifications or limitations as to materiality (including without limitation any qualifications or limitations made by reference to a Company Material Adverse Effect) and, without limiting the foregoing, the word "material" and words of similar import shall be deemed deleted from any such representation or warranty; (d) the Company shall have performed or complied with its agreements and covenants required to be performed or complied with under this Agreement as of or prior to the Closing except for any failures to perform or comply which, individually or in the aggregate, are not material in amount or significance; (e) there shall have been no Company Material Adverse Effect as of or prior to the Closing; -45-
(f) no Legal Proceeding shall be pending wherein an unfavorable judgment, order, decree, stipulation or injunction would (i) prevent consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (ii) cause the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to be rescinded following consummation or (iii) have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect, and no such judgment, order, decree, stipulation or injunction shall be in effect; (g) all applicable waiting periods (and any extensions thereof) under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act and under any other applicable U.S. or foreign antitrust laws shall have expired or otherwise been terminated; (h) all applicable approvals by the California Commissioner of Corporations pursuant to Section 3(a)(10) of the Securities Act and California law shall have been granted or the issuance of the Buyer Common Shares in connection with the Merger shall have been registered on the Registration Statement; (i) the Buyer shall have received a counterpart executed by Ajit Gupta and Richard Day of the Contingent Settlement Agreement and Partial Release relating to the Lawsuits attached hereto as Exhibit E; (j) the Company shall have delivered to the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary the Company Certificate; (k) the Buyer shall have received copies of the resignations, effective as of the Closing, of each director and officer of the Company (other than any such resignations which the Buyer designates, by written notice to the Company, as unnecessary); (l) the Buyer shall have received a counterpart of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement executed by the Escrow Agent and the Representative; (m) the Buyer shall have received from Fenwick & West LLP, counsel to the Company, an opinion in the form attached hereto as Exhibit F addressed to the Buyer and dated as of the Closing Date; (n) the Buyer shall have received from counsel to the India Subsidiary an opinion in the form attached hereto as Exhibit G addressed to the Buyer and dated as of the Closing Date; (o) the Buyer shall have received from Silicon Valley Bank an executed pay-off letter in the form reasonably satisfactory to the Buyer certifying that all indebtedness of the Company to Silicon Valley Bank has been repaid as of the Closing and releasing any Security Interests held by Silicon Valley Bank in the business and/or the assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries; (p) the Buyer shall have received from the Company all UCC-3 termination statements set forth on Section 5.1(p) of the Disclosure Schedule and all other UCC-3 termination statements obtainable by the Company prior to Closing using its Reasonable Best Efforts for all filed UCC-1 financing statements related to indebtedness of the Company, each duly executed by the applicable lienholder and in a form proper to be filed with the appropriate Governmental Entity, and all other necessary release documents for all Security Interests in the business and/or assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries, each duly executed by the appropriate lienholder; -46-
(q) the Buyer shall have received evidence that this Agreement and the Merger have received the Requisite Stockholder Approval; (r) the Buyer shall have received evidence that the stockholder vote required by Section 4.13 has occurred; (s) the Buyer shall have received a certificate of incorporation from the concerned Registrar of Companies for the India Subsidiary; (t) the Buyer shall have received documentation in form satisfactory to the Buyer evidencing the appointment of at least two nominees of the Buyer as additional directors of the India Subsidiary and authorizing the secretary of the India Subsidiary or any other official of the India Subsidiary to file a return on Form 32 with the concerned Registrar of Companies; and (u) the Buyer shall have received such other certificates and instruments (including certificates of good standing of the Company in its jurisdiction of organization and the various foreign jurisdictions in which it is qualified, certified charter documents, certificates as to the incumbency of officers and the adoption of authorizing resolutions) as it shall reasonably request in connection with the Closing. 5.2 Conditions to Obligations of the Company. The obligation of the Company to consummate the Merger is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions precedent, each of which may be waived in writing in the sole discretion of the Company: (a) the representations and warranties of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct when made as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing as though made as of the Closing, except (i) to the extent such representations and warranties are specifically made as of a particular date (in which case such representations and warranties shall be true and correct in all material respects as of such date), (ii) for changes expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement and (iii) in any event, as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a material adverse effect on the Buyer and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, for purposes of this Section 5.2(a), each representation or warranty made by the Buyer herein is made without any qualifications or limitations as to materiality (including without limitation any qualifications or limitations made by reference to a material adverse effect on the Buyer) and, without limiting the foregoing, the word "material" and words of similar import shall be deemed deleted from any such representation or warranty; (b) each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary shall have performed or complied with its agreements and covenants required to be performed or complied with under this Agreement as of or prior to the Closing except for any failures to perform or comply which, individually or in the aggregate, are not material in amount or significance; (c) the Company shall have received a counterpart executed by the Buyer to the releases and stipulations relating to the Lawsuits attached hereto as Exhibit E; (d) the Buyer shall have delivered to the Representative the Buyer Certificate; (e) the Representative shall have received a counterpart of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement executed by the Buyer and the Escrow Agent; -47-
(f) the Representative shall have received evidence of delivery of the Indemnification Escrow Shares to the Escrow Agent; (g) the Representative shall have received such other certificates and instruments (including certificates of good standing of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary in their jurisdiction of organization, certified charter documents, certificates as to the incumbency of officers and the adoption of authorizing resolutions) as it shall reasonably request in connection with the Closing; (h) the Representative shall have received from Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP, counsel to the Buyer, an opinion in the form attached hereto as Exhibit H addressed to the Equity Holders and dated as of the Closing Date; and (i) no Legal Proceeding shall be pending by or before any Governmental Entity in which a Governmental Entity is a party wherein an unfavorable judgment, order, decree, stipulation or injunction would (A) prevent consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or (B) cause the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to be rescinded following the Closing. ARTICLE VI INDEMNIFICATION 6.1 Indemnification by the Equity Holders. From and after the Effective Time, the Equity Holders, on a basis providing for equal culpability via their deposit of the Indemnification Escrow Shares, shall indemnify the Buyer in respect of, and hold it harmless against, any and all Damages incurred or suffered by the Company, the Surviving Corporation, the Buyer or any Affiliate thereof resulting from, relating to or constituting: (a) any breach, as of the date of this Agreement or as of the Closing Date, of any representation or warranty of the Company contained in this Agreement; (b) any failure to perform any covenant or agreement of the Company contained in this Agreement; (c) any failure of any Company Stockholder to have good, valid and marketable title to the issued and outstanding Company Shares issued in the name of such Company Stockholder, free and clear of all Security Interests; (d) any claim by a stockholder or former stockholder of the Company, or any other person or entity (including any officer or director of the Company or any Subsidiary), seeking to assert, or based upon: (i) ownership or rights to ownership of any shares of stock of the Company; (ii) any rights of a stockholder (other than the right to receive the Merger Consideration pursuant to this Agreement or procedure to dissent under the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law or California Corporations Code), including any option, preemptive rights or rights to notice or to vote; or (iii) any claim that his, her or its shares were wrongfully repurchased by the Company; or (e) any claim for indemnification by an Indemnified Party as provided in Section 9.1 other than in connection with a claim by Buyer directly against an officer or director of the Company to the extent such officer or director is entitled to indemnification by the Company in connection with such claim, unless it is ultimately determined that such officer or director is not entitled to such indemnification. -48-
6.2 Indemnification Claims. (a) The Buyer shall give written notification to the Representative of the commencement of any Third Party Action. Such notification shall be given within 20 days after receipt by the Buyer of notice of such Third Party Action, and shall describe in reasonable detail (to the extent then known by the Buyer) the facts constituting the basis for such Third Party Action and the amount of the claimed damages. No delay or failure on the part of the Buyer in so notifying the Representative shall relieve the Equity Holders of any liability or obligation hereunder except to the extent of any damage or liability caused by or arising out of such delay or failure. Within 20 days after delivery of such notification, the Representative may, upon written notice thereof to the Buyer, assume control of the defense of such Third Party Action with counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Buyer; provided that (i) the Representative may only assume control of such defense if (A) he, she or it acknowledges in writing to the Buyer that any damages, fines, costs or other liabilities that may be assessed against the Buyer in connection with such Third Party Action constitute Damages for which the Buyer shall be indemnified pursuant to this Article VI, (B) the ad damnum does not exceed 110% of the amount of Damages for which the Equity Holders are liable under this Article VI, and (C) an adverse resolution of the Third Party Action would not have a material adverse effect on the goodwill or reputation of the Buyer or the business, operations or future conduct of the Buyer and (ii) the Representative may not assume control of the defense of Third Party Action involving criminal liability or in which equitable relief is sought against the Buyer and may not assume control of any Tax Proceeding to the extent such Tax Proceeding involves consolidated or combined Tax Returns of the Buyer for any Tax period (or portion thereof) after the Closing Date or a potential Tax liability which may exceed 110% of the amount for which the Equity Holders may be liable under this Article VI after taking into account the amount of all other liabilities for which claims have been made by the Buyer. If the Representative does not, or is not permitted under the terms hereof to, so assume control of the defense of a Third Party Action, the Buyer shall control such defense. The Non-controlling Party may participate in such defense at its own expense. The Controlling Party shall keep the Non-controlling Party advised of the status of such Third Party Action and the defense thereof and shall consider in good faith recommendations made by the Non-controlling Party with respect thereto. The Non-controlling Party shall furnish the Controlling Party with such information as it may have with respect to such Third Party Action (including copies of any summons, complaint or other pleading which may have been served on such party and any written claim, demand, invoice, billing or other document evidencing or asserting the same) and shall otherwise cooperate with and assist the Controlling Party in the defense of such Third Party Action. The fees and expenses of counsel to the Buyer with respect to a Third Party Action shall be considered Damages for purposes of this Agreement if (i) the Buyer controls the defense of such Third Party Action pursuant to the terms of this Section 6.2(a) or (ii) the Representative assumes control of such defense and the Buyer reasonably concludes that the Representative and the Buyer have conflicting interests or different defenses available with respect to such Third Party Action. The Representative shall not agree to any settlement of, or the entry of any judgment arising from, any Third Party Action without the prior written consent of the Buyer, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed; provided that the consent of the Buyer shall not be required if the Representative agrees in writing to pay any amounts payable pursuant to such settlement or judgment and such settlement or judgment includes a complete release of the Buyer from further liability and has no other adverse effect on the Buyer. Except as provided in Section 6.2(f) below, the Buyer shall not agree to any settlement of, or the entry of any judgment arising from, any such Third Party Action without the prior written consent of the Representative, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed. (b) In order to seek indemnification under this Article VI, the Buyer shall deliver a Claim Notice to the Representative. -49-
(c) Within 30 days after delivery of a Claim Notice, the Representative shall deliver to the Buyer a Response, in which the Representative, on behalf of the Equity Holders, shall: (i) agree that the Buyer is entitled to receive all of the Claimed Amount (in which case the Response shall be accompanied by a letter instructing the Escrow Agent to disburse to the Buyer from the Indemnification Escrow Shares a number of shares that if multiplied by a value of $12.50 per share will equal the Claimed Amount), (ii) agree that the Buyer is entitled to receive the Agreed Amount (in which case the Response shall be accompanied by a letter instructing the Escrow Agent to disburse to the Buyer from the Indemnification Escrow Shares a number of shares that if multiplied by a value of $12.50 per share will equal the Agreed Amount) or (iii) dispute that the Buyer is entitled to receive any of the Claimed Amount. The Equity Holders may contest the payment of all or a portion of the Claimed Amount only based upon a good faith belief that all or such portion of the Claimed Amount does not constitute Damages for which the Buyer is entitled to indemnification under this Article VI. If no Response is delivered by the Equity Holders within such 30-day period, the Equity Holders shall be deemed to have agreed that all of the Claimed Amount is owed to the Buyer. Acceptance by the Buyer of partial payment of any Claimed Amount shall be without prejudice to the Buyer's right to claim the balance of any such Claimed Amount. (d) During the 30-day period following the delivery of a Response that reflects a Dispute, the Equity Holders and the Buyer shall use good faith efforts to resolve the Dispute. If the Dispute is not resolved within such 30-day period, the Equity Holders and the Buyer shall submit the Dispute to binding arbitration and such Dispute shall be resolved in accordance with Section 6.2(e). (e) Any arbitration shall be conducted in San Francisco, California, in the case of a claim made by the Buyer, or in Boston, Massachusetts, in the case of a claim made by the Representative, by a single arbitrator (the "Arbitrator") in accordance with the Commercial Rules in effect from time to time and the following provisions: (i) In the event of any conflict between the Commercial Rules in effect from time to time and the provisions of this Agreement, the provisions of this Agreement shall prevail and be controlling; (ii) Either party shall commence the arbitration by filing a written submission with the office of the AAA in the appropriate city and state as provided by this Section 6.2(e) in accordance with Commercial Rule 5 (or any successor provision); (iii) All depositions or other discovery shall be conducted pursuant to the applicable U.S. federal rules relating to discovery; (iv) Not later than 30 days after the conclusion of the arbitration hearing, the Arbitrator shall prepare and distribute to the parties a writing setting forth the arbitral award and the Arbitrator's reasons therefor. Any award rendered by the Arbitrator shall be final, conclusive and binding upon the parties, and judgment thereon may be entered and enforced in any court of competent jurisdiction (subject to Section 12.11); (v) The Arbitrator shall have no power or authority, under the Commercial Rules or otherwise, to (x) modify or disregard any provision of this Agreement, including the provisions of this Section 6.2(e), or (y) address or resolve any issue not submitted by the parties; and (vi) In connection with any arbitration proceeding pursuant to this Agreement, each party shall bear its own costs and expenses, except that the fees and costs of the AAA -50-
and the Arbitrator, the costs and expenses of obtaining the facility where the arbitration hearing is held, and such other costs and expenses as the Arbitrator may determine to be directly related to the conduct of the arbitration and appropriately borne jointly by the parties (which shall not include any party's attorneys' fees or costs, witness fees (if any), costs of investigation and similar expenses) shall be shared equally by the Buyer and the Equity Holders. (f) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section 6.2, if a third party asserts (other than by means of a lawsuit) that the Buyer is liable to such third party for a monetary or other obligation which may constitute or result in Damages for which the Buyer may be entitled to indemnification pursuant to this Article VI, and the Buyer reasonably determines that it has a valid business reason to fulfill such obligation, then (i) the Buyer shall be entitled to satisfy such obligation, without prior notice to or consent from the Representative or the Equity Holders, (ii) the Buyer may subsequently make a claim for indemnification in accordance with the provisions of this Article VI, and (iii) the Buyer shall be reimbursed, in accordance with the provisions of this Article VI, for any such Damages for which it is entitled to indemnification pursuant to this Article VI (subject to the right of the Equity Holders to dispute the Buyer's entitlement to indemnification, or the amount for which it is entitled to indemnification, under the terms of this Article VI). (g) The Representative shall have full power and authority on behalf of each Equity Holder to take any and all actions on behalf of, execute any and all instruments on behalf of, and execute or waive any and all rights of, the Equity Holders under this Article VI. The Representative shall have no liability to any Equity Holder for any action taken or omitted on behalf of the Equity Holders pursuant to this Article VI. 6.3 Survival of Representations and Warranties. Unless otherwise specified in this Section 6.3 or elsewhere in this Agreement, all provisions of this Agreement shall survive the Closing and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and shall continue forever in full force and effect in accordance with their terms; provided that the representations and warranties of the Buyer set forth in Sections 3.6 and 3.7 and the covenants of the Buyer set forth in Section 4.8(b) (as they relate to such representations and warranties) shall terminate at, and shall not survive, the Closing. All representations and warranties (other than those set forth in Sections 2.2, 2.3, 2.9, 2.13 and 2.23) and all covenants and other agreements of the Company set forth in Article IV (other than those set forth in Sections 4.2, 4.13 and 4.14) shall expire on the date 18 months following the Closing Date, and the representations and warranties set forth in Sections 2.2, 2.3, 2.9, 2.13 and 2.23 and the covenants and other agreements of the Company set forth in Sections 4.2, 4.13 and 4.14 shall survive for a period of 30 months following the Closing Date. If the Buyer delivers to the Representative, before expiration of a representation or warranty, either a Claim Notice based upon a breach of such representation or warranty, or an Expected Claim Notice based upon a breach of such representation or warranty, then the applicable representation or warranty shall survive until, but only for purposes of, the resolution of the matter covered by such notice. If the legal proceeding or written claim with respect to which a Claim Notice or an Expected Claim Notice has been given is definitively withdrawn or resolved in favor of the Buyer, the Buyer shall promptly so notify the Representative. The rights to indemnification set forth in this Article VI shall not be affected by (i) any investigation conducted by or on behalf of the Buyer or any actual or implied knowledge or notice acquired (or capable of being acquired) by the Buyer, whether before or after the date of this Agreement or the Closing Date, with respect to the inaccuracy or noncompliance with any representation, warranty, covenant or obligation which is the subject of indemnification hereunder, or (ii) any waiver by the Buyer of any closing condition relating to the accuracy of representations and warranties or the performance of or compliance with agreements and covenants. 6.4 Limitations. -51-
(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, the Equity Holders shall not be liable under Section 6.1(a) or clause (x) of Section 8.2 unless and until the aggregate Damages for which they would otherwise be liable under Section 6.1(a) and clause (x) of Section 8.2 exceed $1,000,000 (at which point the Equity Holders shall become liable for the aggregate Damages under Sections 6.1(a) and clause (x) of Section 8.2 and not just amounts in excess of $1,000,000); provided, however, that the limitation set forth in this paragraph (a) shall not apply with respect to any liability with respect to breaches of Section 2.9(o) or, for the avoidance of doubt, liability under clauses (y) or (z) of Section 8.2. (b) From and after the Effective Time, except in the case of fraud or knowing misrepresentation, the sole and exclusive remedy of the Buyer with respect to claims resulting from or relating to any misrepresentation, breach of warranty or failure to perform any covenant or agreement contained in this Agreement (including any claim under Article VIII) or arising out of or in connection with the Company's obligations under this Agreement shall be the Indemnification Escrow Shares. (c) No Equity Holder shall have any right of contribution against the Company or the Surviving Corporation with respect to any breach by the Company of any of its representations, warranties, covenants or agreements. (d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth herein, nothing in this Article VI or in Article VIII is intended to create an affirmative indemnity obligation by any Equity Holder for fraud or knowing misrepresentation (it being understood that the foregoing shall not limit any right of the Buyer to assert any claim based on fraud or knowing misrepresentation not based on the indemnification obligations set forth in Sections 6.1 and 8.2 of this Agreement (as affirmed by Section 4 of the Stockholders Agreement and Section 2 of the Management Participant Agreement)). (e) Any recovery of Damages by the Buyer for indemnification pursuant to Article VI shall be offset by any insurance proceeds actually received by the Buyer corresponding to such indemnification claim. To the extent the Buyer receives any such insurance proceeds after the delivery of Indemnification Escrow Shares from the Equity Holders pursuant to Section 3 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement, the Buyer will issue and deliver that number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the value of the insurance proceeds to the Equity Holders or to the Escrow Agent, to be allocated among the Equity Holders in accordance with Article I of this Agreement. ARTICLE VII REGISTRATION OF SHARES 7.1 California Permit; Registered Offering. (a) As promptly as practicable after the execution of this Agreement, the Buyer shall prepare the necessary documents and apply to obtain a California Permit so that the issuance of the Buyer Common Shares in the Merger shall be exempt from registration under the Securities Act, by virtue of the exemption from registration contained in Section 3(a)(10) thereof; provided, however, that the Buyer shall use all Reasonable Best Efforts to prepare and file the application to obtain a California Permit within 15 days after the later of (i) execution of this Agreement and (ii) the date on which the Company has furnished to the Buyer materials in conformity with the requirements of such application. The Company shall cooperate with, and provide information to, the Buyer in connection with the Buyer's application for the California Permit, including such Disclosure Statement, financial statements and other information with respect to the Company as, in the reasonable judgment of the Buyer or its counsel, are required to be filed therewith. The Company and the Buyer will respond promptly to any comments from the California Commissioner of Corporations and will each use Reasonable Best Efforts to have the -52-
California Permit granted as soon as practicable after such filing; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be understood to require either the Company or the Buyer to amend its respective charter documents. None of the information supplied by the Company to the Buyer, the California Commissioner of Corporations or any representative thereof in connection with the California Permit application or any other document prepared to comply with federal or state securities laws shall contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. None of the information supplied by the Buyer to the Company, the California Commissioner of Corporations or any representative thereof in connection with the California Permit application or any other document prepared to comply with federal or state securities laws shall contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The Company shall promptly advise the Buyer, and the Buyer shall promptly advise the Company, in writing if at any time prior to the Effective Time either the Company or the Buyer, as applicable, shall obtain knowledge of any facts that might make it necessary or appropriate to amend or supplement the California Permit application in order to make the statements contained or incorporated by reference therein not misleading or to comply with applicable law. (b) If a California Permit cannot be issued for any reason, or is not issued on or before the date that is 75 days after the date of the initial filing of the application to obtain a California Permit, then the Parties shall use their Reasonable Best Efforts to permit the delivery of Buyer Common Shares pursuant to the Merger to be accomplished by means of registration of such Buyer Common Shares on a Registration Statement on Form S-4 (or another appropriate form) (the "Registration Statement") under the Securities Act. If the Buyer Common Shares will be issued pursuant to an effective Registration Statement, the Buyer shall prepare, with the assistance and cooperation of the Company, the Registration Statement and the Proxy Statement/Prospectus with the SEC as promptly as is reasonably practicable. The Buyer shall file the Registration Statement with the SEC and shall, with the assistance and cooperation of the Company, promptly respond to any SEC comments on the Registration Statement and shall otherwise use its Reasonable Best Efforts to have the Registration Statement declared effective by the SEC as promptly as practicable and to maintain the effectiveness of the Registration Statement through the Effective Time. The Buyer shall advise the Company promptly after it receives notice of (i) the Registration Statement being declared effective or any supplement or amendment thereto being filed with the SEC, (ii) the issuance of any stop order in respect of the Registration Statement, and (iii) the receipt of any substantive correspondence, comments or requests from the SEC in respect of the Registration Statement. Following receipt of such notice from the Buyer, the Company shall promptly distribute the Proxy Statement/Prospectus to the Company Stockholders. The Company, acting through its Board of Directors, shall include in the Proxy Statement/Prospectus the unanimous recommendation of its Board of Directors that the Company Stockholders vote in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger. Each of the Buyer and the Company shall also cooperate to, and shall, take such other reasonable actions (other than qualifying to do business in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified) required to be taken under any applicable state securities laws in connection therewith. The Buyer will pay all customary expenses in connection with the Registration Statement, including, without limitation, registration fees, legal and accounting fees, listing fees, transfer agent fees and printing and mailing costs related to the Registration Statement. None of the information supplied by the Company to the Buyer for inclusion in the Registration Statement shall contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. None of the information supplied by the Buyer for inclusion in the Registration Statement shall contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that, for the avoidance of -53-
doubt, the Buyer shall not be responsible for the accuracy or completeness of any information relating to the Company or furnished by the Company in writing for inclusion in the Registration Statement. (c) Section 7.1(c) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of those persons who are, in the Company's reasonable judgment, Rule 145 Affiliates. The Company shall notify the Buyer in writing of any change in the identity of its Rule 145 Affiliates prior to the Closing Date. The Buyer shall be entitled to place appropriate legends on the certificates evidencing any shares of Buyer Common Stock to be received by Rule 145 Affiliates of the Company in the Merger reflecting the restrictions set forth in Rule 145 promulgated under the Securities Act and to issue appropriate stop transfer instructions to the transfer agent for Buyer Common Stock (provided that such legends or stop transfer instructions shall be removed one year after the Effective Time, upon the request of any holder of shares of Buyer Common Stock issued in the Merger, if such holder is not then a Rule 145 Affiliate of the Buyer). 7.2 Lock-up Agreements. (a) The Company shall deliver to the Buyer at the Closing the written undertaking of each Management Participant, each other Company Stockholder that is a member of the Company's management and each Company Stockholder that as a result of the consummation of the Merger, and together with its Affiliates, would be the holder of more than 240,000 Buyer Common Shares (or in lieu of any single such Company Stockholder, other Company Stockholders who, in the aggregate, would be the holders of the same number of shares held by the Company Stockholders as to which the Company would otherwise be obligated to deliver such undertaking under this Section 7.2(a)) not to sell or otherwise transfer or dispose of Buyer Common Shares, except as follows: (i) one-third of the Buyer Common Shares held by such Management Participant or Company Stockholder may be sold or otherwise transferred or disposed of during the 180-day period immediately following the Closing, (ii) an additional one-third of the Buyer Common Shares held by such Management Participant or Company Stockholder may be sold or otherwise transferred during the period commencing 180 days following the Closing and ending on the first anniversary of the Closing, and (iii) the final one-third of the Buyer Common Shares held by such Management Participant or Company Stockholder may be sold or otherwise transferred following the first anniversary of the Closing. (b) The Company may impose stop-transfer instructions with respect to the shares or other securities subject to the foregoing restriction until the end of such one year period. ARTICLE VIII TAX MATTERS 8.1 Preparation and Filing of Tax Returns; Payment of Taxes. (a) The Company shall prepare and timely file all Tax Returns of the Company required to be filed (taking into account extensions) prior to the Closing Date. (b) The Buyer shall prepare and timely file or shall cause to be prepared and timely filed all Tax Returns not filed on or before the Closing Date, including Tax Returns which were required to be filed before the Closing but were not filed and all other Tax Returns with respect to the Company or in respect of its business, assets or operations. (c) Any Tax Return to be prepared and filed by the Buyer for taxable periods beginning before the Closing Date shall be prepared on a basis consistent with the last previous similar Tax Return, to the extent such reporting is allowable without significant risk of the imposition of penalties or additions to Tax as determined by the Buyer in consultation with its Tax advisors; provided however, if -54-
the Company did not file a previous similar return, the Buyer shall prepare the return in the manner determined in it sole discretion, in consultation with its Tax advisors, including, but not limited to making voluntary disclosures of Tax Returns which were not filed for previous taxable periods. 8.2 Tax Indemnification by the Equity Holders. The Equity Holders shall indemnify via the Indemnification Escrow Shares, pursuant and subject to, and in accordance with, Article VI, the Buyer, the Company, the Surviving Corporation and their respective Affiliates in respect of, and hold the Buyer, the Company, the Surviving Corporation and such Affiliates harmless, against (x) any and all Damages resulting from, relating to, or constituting a breach of any representation contained in Section 2.9 hereof, (y) the failure to perform any covenant or agreement set forth in Article IV relating to Taxes or in this Article VIII, and (z) without duplication, any and all Taxes due and payable by the Surviving Corporation or the Company for any taxable period that ends (or is deemed pursuant to Section 8.3(b) to end) on or before the Closing Date in excess of any accruals for current Taxes (excluding accruals and reserves for deferred Taxes established to reflect timing differences between book and Tax income) on the Closing Balance Sheet. Amounts payable pursuant to this Section 8.2 shall be computed after taking into account all Tax consequences to the Buyer (or the Surviving Corporation) of (i) the receipt of (or the right to receive) the indemnification payment and (ii) the incurrence and payment of the liability that gave rise to the right to receive the indemnification payment. Thus, it is the intention of the Parties that the Buyer be held harmless with respect to the liability that gave rise to the right to the indemnification payment on a total after-Tax basis. 8.3 Allocation of Certain Taxes. (a) If the Surviving Corporation or the Company is permitted, but not required, under applicable foreign, state or local Tax laws to treat the Closing Date as the last day of a taxable period, such day shall be treated as the last day of a taxable period. (b) Any Taxes for a taxable period beginning before the Closing Date and ending after the Closing Date with respect to the Surviving Corporation and/or the Company shall be apportioned for purposes of Sections 2.9 and 8.2 between the portion of the period ending on the Closing Date and the portion of the period commencing on the day immediately following the Closing Date based on the actual operations of the Surviving Corporation and/or the Company, as the case may be, during such portions of the periods, and each such portion of such period shall be deemed to be a taxable period (whether or not it is in fact a taxable period). For purposes of computing the Taxes attributable to the two portions of a taxable period pursuant to this Section 8.3(b), the amount of any item that is taken into account only once for each taxable period (e.g., the benefit of graduated Tax rates, exemption amounts, etc.) shall be allocated between the two portions of the period in proportion to the number of days in each portion. 8.4 Termination of Tax-Sharing Agreements. All Tax sharing agreements or similar arrangements with respect to or involving the Company shall be terminated prior to the Closing Date and, after the Closing Date, the Company shall not be bound thereby or have any liability thereunder for amounts due in respect of periods ending on or before the Closing Date. 8.5 Scope of Article VIII. Any claim by any Party relating to a breach by another Party of their obligations under this Article VIII shall be pursued in accordance with the procedures for indemnification claims, and shall otherwise be subject to the terms and conditions, set forth in Article VI, including, for the avoidance of doubt, Sections 6.3 and 6.4. Notwithstanding the foregoing or any other term or condition of Article VI (except Sections 6.3 and 6.4), to the extent there is any inconsistency between the terms of Article VI and this Article VIII with respect to the allocation of responsibility between the Equity Holders and the Buyer for Taxes, the provisions of this Article VIII shall govern. -55-
ARTICLE IX INDEMNIFICATION OF DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS OF THE COMPANY 9.1 Indemnification and Insurance. (a) For a period of six years commencing at the Effective Time(1), the Buyer shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law and subject to the provisions of Section 6.1(e), cause the Surviving Corporation to honor all of the Company's obligations to indemnify and hold harmless each present and former director and officer of the Company and its Subsidiaries (the "Indemnified Parties"), against any costs or expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines, losses, claims, damages, liabilities or amounts paid in settlement incurred in connection with any claim, action, suit, proceeding or investigation, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative, arising out of or pertaining to matters existing or occurring at or prior to the Effective Time (collectively, "Indemnifiable Matters"), to the extent that such obligations to indemnify and hold harmless exist on the date of this Agreement (the "Existing Indemnification Obligations"). (b) Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall procure a six year "tail" directors' and officers' liability insurance and fiduciary liability insurance policy (the "Tail Policy"). The costs of the Tail Policy shall be fully accrued for on both the Preliminary and Closing Balance Sheets (except to the extent previously paid by the Company). The Surviving Corporation shall not terminate or modify the Tail Policy following the Effective Time. ARTICLE X TERMINATION 10.1 Termination of Agreement. The Parties may terminate this Agreement prior to the Closing (whether before or after Requisite Stockholder Approval), as provided below: (a) the Parties may terminate this Agreement by mutual written consent; (b) the Buyer may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Company in the event the Company is in breach of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement, and such breach, individually or in combination with any other such breach, (i) would cause the conditions set forth in clauses (c) or (d) of Section 5.1 not to be satisfied and (ii) is not cured within 30 days following delivery by the Buyer to the Company of written notice of such breach; (c) the Company may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Buyer in the event the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary is in breach of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement, and such breach, individually or in combination with any other such breach, (i) would cause the conditions set forth in clauses (a) or (b) of Section 5.2 not to be satisfied and (ii) is not cured within 30 days following delivery by the Company to the Buyer of written notice of such breach; (d) the Buyer may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the other Parties at any time after the stockholders of the Company have voted on whether to approve this Agreement and the Merger in the event this Agreement and the Merger failed to receive the Requisite Stockholder Approval; - ------------------ (1) To be conterminous with tail police. -56-
(e) the Buyer may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Company if the Closing shall not have occurred by the earlier of (i) two months after the Buyer has certified compliance with a second request, pursuant to 16 CFR 803.6, if a second request is made, or (ii) before September 16, 2005, (the "Outside Date"), by reason of the failure of any condition precedent under Section 5.1 (unless the failure results primarily from a breach by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement); (f) the Company may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary if the Closing shall not have occurred on or before the Outside Date, by reason of the failure of any condition precedent under Section 5.2 (unless the failure results primarily from a breach by the Company of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement); or (g) the Buyer may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Company if the Buyer has incurred (or incurred on behalf of Seller) more than an aggregate of $1,500,000 in Covered Costs (the "Cost Cap"); provided that the Buyer shall not have the right to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this paragraph (g) if the Company agrees to fund, and does fund, on a current basis, all Covered Costs in excess of the Cost Cap. If the Company does fund Covered Costs in excess of the Cost Cap and (i) clearance and approval of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement is received such that (ii) the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement are consummated and the Certificate of Merger is filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, then all Covered Costs paid or accrued by the Company in excess of the Cost Cap shall be added to the total assets of the Company on the Closing Balance Sheet for the purposes of determining the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment pursuant to Section 1.12. 10.2 Effect of Termination. (a) If any Party terminates this Agreement pursuant to Section 10.1, all obligations of the Parties hereunder shall terminate without any liability of any Party to any other Party (except for any liability of any Party for willful or knowing breaches of this Agreement or for breaches of Section 4.9 and except for any obligations of the Company pursuant to paragraph (b) below). (b) If (i) a Specified Termination (as defined below) occurs, and (ii) within 18 months of the Specified Termination, the Company (A) enters into an Alternative Acquisition Agreement, or (B) otherwise agrees to an Acquisition Proposal, then within two business days of such event, the Company shall tender and pay to, or shall cause to be tendered and paid to, the Buyer, or its designee, by wire transfer in immediately available funds, a termination fee of $5,000,000. A "Specified Termination" shall mean (I) the valid termination of this Agreement by the Buyer pursuant to Section 10.1(b), Section 10.1(d), Section 10.1(e), Section 10.1(f) or Section 10.1(g) at a time when an Adverse Recommendation has been made and not withdrawn, and (II) the valid termination of this Agreement by the Buyer pursuant to Section 10.1(b) as a result of the Company's breach of any of its covenants and agreements pursuant to this Agreement to call, give notice of, convene and hold the special meeting of stockholders or distribute a written stockholder consent for purposes of approving this Agreement and the Merger regardless of whether the Company's Board of Directors has withdrawn or modified its recommendation of this Agreement and the Merger. ARTICLE XI DEFINITIONS For purposes of this Agreement, each of the following terms shall have the meaning set forth below. -57-
"AAA" shall mean the American Arbitration Association. "Acquisition Proposal" shall mean any proposal or offer involving, directly or indirectly, (i) the sale of more than 20% of the voting power of the Company, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange involving the Company, (iii) any sale of securities representing more than 20% of the voting power of the Company, (iv) the sale or other disposition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the Ordinary Course of Business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 20% of the Company's total assets (on a consolidated basis) or assets that account for more than 20% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of the Company. "Adjusted Base Purchase Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(f). "Adjusted Buyer Common Shares" shall mean, for each Outstanding Common Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the difference between (w) the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio and (x) the Closing Common Conversion Ratio, and, for each Outstanding Preferred Share, zero; and with respect to each Exercised Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the fraction obtained by dividing (x) the Adjusted Buyer Common Shares for each Outstanding Common Share, by (y) the Closing Common Conversion Ratio. "Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the Adjusted Merger Consideration, minus the Management Shares issued pursuant to Sections 1.6(b)(i) and (ii), minus the Preferred Consideration, by (ii) the Closing Total Company Shares. "Adjusted Merger Consideration" shall mean the number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the greater of (x) the Preliminary Base Purchase Price or (y) the Adjusted Base Purchase Price by (ii) $12.50 per share. "Adjusted Total Company Shares" shall mean the number of Company Shares equal to (A) the Closing Total Company Shares minus (B) the quotient of (x) the number of Buyer Common Shares issuable upon exercise of Assumed Convertible Securities (or any portion thereof) that have expired unexercised as of the date 18 months following the Closing Date, divided by (y) the Closing Common Conversion Ratio or the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio, as applicable to such expired Assumed Convertible Security. "Adverse Recommendation " shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.4(c). "Advisors" shall mean any of the Company's or any of a Subsidiary's directors, officers, employees, investment bankers, attorneys, accountants or other advisors or representatives. "Affiliate" shall mean any affiliate, as defined in Rule 12b-2 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. "Aggregate Escrow Value" shall mean the sum of (A) the aggregate Option Merger Value of all Escrow Assumed Convertible Securities as of the date of determination plus (B) the product of $12.50 multiplied by the number of Indemnification Escrow Shares. "Agreed Amount" shall mean part, but not all, of the Claimed Amount. "Agreement" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph hereto. -58-
"Alternative Acquisition Agreement" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.4(c). "Arbitrator" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 6.2(e). "Asset Value Adjustment Date" is defined in Section 1.5(d)(ii). "Assumed Convertible Security" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(f). "Assumed Option" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(a). "Assumed Warrant" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(b). "Available Indemnification Amount" shall mean, at the time of any claim for indemnification pursuant to Section 9.1(a), the product of (i) the difference between (A) the number of Indemnification Escrow Shares held in escrow at that time pursuant to Section 1.13(a) minus (B) the number of Indemnification Escrow Shares attributable to any Claim Notice or Expected Claim Notice that the Buyer has previously delivered to the Escrow Agent but as to which the Escrow Agent has not received written notice of resolution multiplied by (ii) a value of $12.50 per Indemnification Escrow Share. "Base Purchase Price" shall mean $150,000,000. "Bonus Pool" shall mean 10% of the sum of (A) the Market Value of the Buyer Common Shares issuable upon conversion of Company Shares pursuant to Section 1.5, plus (B) the aggregate Option Value of all Assumed Convertible Securities and Preferred Warrants that collectively are vested and exercisable as of the Closing Date, plus (C) the Market Value of the Management Shares. "Bonus Pool Percentage" shall mean the Management Participant's applicable bonus pool percentage as set forth in the Company Employee Change in Control Bonus Plan, effective as of May 11, 2004. "Buyer" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Buyer Certificate" shall mean a certificate delivered by the Buyer (without qualification as to knowledge, materiality or otherwise), signed on behalf of the Buyer by the Vice President and General Counsel of the Buyer, to the effect that each of the conditions specified in clauses (a) and (b) of Section 5.2 is satisfied in all respects. "Buyer Common Shares" shall mean the common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Buyer. "Buyer Financial Statements" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3.7(b). "Buyer SEC Documents" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3.7(a). "California Permit" shall mean a permit from the California Commission of Corporations obtained pursuant to Section 25121 of the California Corporate Securities Law of 1968. "California Dissenters' Rights Notice" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.4(a). "CERCLA" shall mean the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, as amended. -59-
"Certificate of Merger" shall mean the certificate of merger or other appropriate documents prepared and executed in accordance with Section 251(c) of the Delaware General Corporation Law. "Certificates" shall mean shall mean stock certificates that, immediately prior to the Effective Time, represented Company Shares converted into the right to receive Buyer Common Shares pursuant to Section 1.5 (including any Company Shares referred to in Section 1.7). "Claim Notice" shall mean written notification which contains (i) a description of the Damages incurred or reasonably expected to be incurred by the Buyer and the Claimed Amount of such Damages, to the extent then known, (ii) a statement that the Buyer is entitled to indemnification under Article VI for such Damages and a reasonable explanation of the basis therefor, and (iii) a demand for payment in the amount of such Damages. "Claimed Amount" shall mean the amount of any Damages incurred or reasonably expected to be incurred by the Buyer in connection with a claim for indemnification pursuant to Article VI. "Closing" shall mean the closing of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. "Closing Balance Sheet" shall mean the balance sheet of the Company as of the Closing Date prepared in accordance with the provisions of Section 1.12 hereof. "Closing Buyer Common Shares" shall mean, for each Outstanding Common Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the Closing Common Conversion Ratio, and, for each Outstanding Preferred Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the applicable Series A Conversion Ratio, Series B Conversion Ratio or Series C Conversion Ratio. "Closing Common Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the Closing Merger Consideration, minus the Management Shares issued pursuant to Section 1.6(b)(i), minus the Preferred Consideration, by (ii) the Closing Total Company Shares. "Closing Date" shall mean the date two business days after the satisfaction or waiver of all of the conditions to the obligations of the Parties to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby (excluding the delivery at the Closing of any of the documents set forth in Article V), or such other date as may be mutually agreeable to the Parties. "Closing Merger Consideration" shall mean the number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the Preliminary Base Purchase Price by (ii) $12.50 per share. "Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment" shall mean the amount of the difference between the Net Asset Value and the Preliminary Net Asset Value, as it may be adjusted pursuant to the resolution of any disputes resolved pursuant to Section 1.12(d). The Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment shall be expressed as a positive number if the Net Asset Value on the Closing Balance Sheet is greater than the Preliminary Net Asset Value and as a negative number if the Net Asset Value on the Closing Balance Sheet is less than the Preliminary Net Asset Value. "Closing Total Company Shares" shall mean the number of Company Shares equal to the sum of (X) the number of Common Shares outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time plus (Y) the number of Common Shares that would be issued upon the exercise of all of the vested and unvested outstanding Options (provided that unvested Options shall not include Options held by employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries who have been notified by the Buyer or the Company at the direction of the -60-
Buyer that their employment will not continue after the Closing to the extent such Options shall remain unvested as of the Effective Time) and Warrants (which may be included on a net exercise treasury basis to the extent the Warrant holder has agreed in writing prior to the Effective Time to exercise such Warrant in full through a net exercise). "Code" shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. "Commercial Rules" shall mean the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the AAA. "Common Conversion Ratio" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.5(a). "Common Shares" shall mean the common stock, par value $0.001 per share, of the Company. "Company" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Company Certificate" shall mean a certificate delivered by the Company (without qualification as to knowledge or materiality or otherwise), signed on behalf of the Company by the President and the Chief Financial Officer of the Company, to the effect that each of the conditions specified in clauses (a) through (f) of Section 5.1 is satisfied in all respects. "Company Intellectual Property" shall mean the Intellectual Property owned by or licensed to the Company or a Subsidiary and covering, incorporated in, underlying or used in connection with the Customer Deliverables or the Internal Systems. "Company Licensed Intellectual Property" shall mean shall mean the Intellectual Property licensed to the Company or a Subsidiary and covering, incorporated in, underlying or used in connection with the Customer Deliverables or the Internal Systems. "Company Material Adverse Effect" shall mean any material adverse change, event, circumstance or development with respect to, or material adverse effect on, (i) the business, assets, liabilities, capitalization, financial condition or results of operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, other than any change, event, circumstance or development resulting (A) from changes in the United States economy in general, so long as such changes do not disproportionately affect the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, (B) from changes in the industry in which the Company operates, so long as such changes do not disproportionately affect the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, (C) from the announcement or pendency of the Merger, or (D) primarily from the taking by the Company of any action expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement; or (ii) the ability of the Buyer to operate the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries immediately after the Closing. For the avoidance of doubt, the parties agree that the terms "material," "materially" and "materiality" as used in this Agreement with an initial lower case "m" shall have their respective customary and ordinary meanings, without regard to the meaning ascribed to Company Material Adverse Effect. "Company Owned Intellectual Property" shall mean shall mean the Intellectual Property owned by the Company or a Subsidiary and covering, incorporated in, underlying or used in connection with the Customer Deliverables or the Internal Systems. "Company Plan" shall mean any Employee Benefit Plan maintained, or contributed to, by the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate. "Company Shares" shall mean the Common Shares and the Preferred Shares. -61-
"Company Source Code" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.13(g). "Company Stock Plan" shall mean any stock option plan or other stock or equity-related plan of the Company. "Company Stockholders" shall mean the holders of Company Shares. "Company Stockholders Shares" shall mean the Outstanding Common Shares and the Common Shares issuable upon conversion of Outstanding Preferred Shares. "Consents" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5.1(b). "Contract" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.15(a). "Controlling Party" shall mean the party controlling the defense of any Third Party Action. "Cost Cap" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 10.1(g). "Covered Costs" shall mean all out-of-pocket costs and expenses, including applicable filing fees under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act and other applicable U.S. or foreign antitrust laws, fees and expenses of counsel, experts and other advisors and costs of document production and assembly, incurred in seeking to obtain clearance or approval of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement. "Current India Financial Statements" shall mean the unaudited accounts of the India Subsidiary as of December 31, 2004. "Customer Deliverables" shall mean (a) products that the Company or any Subsidiary (i) currently manufactures, markets, sells or licenses or (ii) has manufactured, marketed, sold or licensed within the previous three years and (b) the services that the Company or any Subsidiary (i) currently provides or (ii) has provided within the previous three years. "Damages" shall mean any and all claims, debts, obligations and other liabilities (whether absolute, accrued, contingent, fixed or otherwise, or due or to become due or otherwise), diminution in value, monetary damages, fines, fees, penalties, interest obligations, deficiencies, losses and expenses (including amounts paid in settlement, interest, court costs, costs of investigators, fees and expenses of attorneys, accountants, financial advisors and other experts, and other expenses of litigation), other than those costs and expenses of arbitration of a Dispute which are to be shared equally by the Buyer and the Equity Holders as set forth in Section 6.2(e)(vi). "Disclosure Schedule" shall mean the disclosure schedule provided by the Company to the Buyer on the date hereof and accepted in writing by the Buyer. "Disclosure Statement" shall mean a written proxy or information statement containing the information prescribed by Section 4.4(a). "Dispute" shall mean the dispute resulting if the Representative, acting on behalf of the Equity Holders, in a Response disputes the liability of the Equity Holders for all or part of a Claimed Amount. "Dispute Notice" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(d). "Dissenting Shares" shall mean Company Shares held as of the Effective Time by a Company Stockholder who has not voted such Company Shares in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and with -62-
respect to which appraisal shall have been duly demanded and perfected in accordance with either (i) Section 262 of the Delaware General Corporation Act or (ii) Section 1300 et seq. of the California Corporations Code, and such perfected right was not effectively withdrawn or forfeited prior to the Effective Time. "DOHS" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(e). "DOL" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(e). "EAD" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(e). "Effective Time" shall mean the time at which the Surviving Corporation files the Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware. "Employee Benefit Plan" shall mean any "employee pension benefit plan" (as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA), any "employee welfare benefit plan" (as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA), any employee benefit plan or scheme prescribed under the provisions of the Indian Employees' Provident Funds and Miscellaneous Provisions Act, 1952, Employees' Pension Scheme, 1995, Payment of Bonus Act, 1965, Payment of Gratuity Act, 1972 and Employees' State Insurance Act, 1948, as applicable, and any other written or oral plan, agreement or arrangement involving direct or indirect compensation, including insurance coverage, severance benefits, disability benefits, deferred compensation, bonuses, stock options, stock purchase, phantom stock, stock appreciation or other forms of incentive compensation or post-retirement compensation, and all severance agreements, written or otherwise, for the benefit of or relating to any current or former employee or independent contractor of the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate. "Environmental Law" shall mean any federal, state or local law, statute, rule, order, directive, judgment, Permit or regulation or the common law relating to the environment, occupational health and safety, or exposure of persons or property to Materials of Environmental Concern, including any statute, regulation, administrative decision or order pertaining to: (i) the presence of or the treatment, storage, disposal, generation, transportation, handling, distribution, manufacture, processing, use, import, export, labeling, recycling, registration, investigation or remediation of Materials of Environmental Concern or documentation related to the foregoing; (ii) air, water and noise pollution; (iii) groundwater and soil contamination; (iv) the release, threatened release, or accidental release into the environment, the workplace or other areas of Materials of Environmental Concern, including emissions, discharges, injections, spills, escapes or dumping of Materials of Environmental Concern; (v) transfer of interests in or control of real property which may be contaminated; (vi) community or worker right-to-know disclosures with respect to Materials of Environmental Concern; (vii) the protection of wild life, marine life and wetlands, and endangered and threatened species; (viii) storage tanks, vessels, containers, abandoned or discarded barrels and other closed receptacles; and (ix) health and safety of employees and other persons. As used above, the term "release" shall have the meaning set forth in CERCLA. "Equity Holders" shall mean the Company Stockholders, the Management Participants and the holders of any Options or Warrants outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time. "ERISA" shall mean the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended. "ERISA Affiliate" shall mean any entity which is, or at any applicable time was, a member of (i) a controlled group of corporations (as defined in Section 414(b) of the Code), (ii) a group of trades or businesses under common control (as defined in Section 414(c) of the Code), or (iii) an affiliated service -63-
group (as defined under Section 414(m) of the Code or the regulations under Section 414(o) of the Code), any of which includes or included the Company or a Subsidiary. "Escrow Agent" shall mean U.S. Bank National Association, Corporate Trust Services. "Escrow Assumed Convertible Security" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(f)(vi)(A). "Exchange Agent" shall mean Equiserve Trust Company, N.A. "Exchange Fund" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.8(a). "Exercised Shares" shall mean any Buyer Common Shares acquired upon the exercise of an Assumed Convertible Securities after the Effective Time and on or before the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date. "Existing Indemnification Obligations" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.1(a). "Expected Claim Notice" shall mean a notice that, as a result of a legal proceeding instituted by or written claim made by a third party, the Buyer reasonably expects to incur Damages for which it is entitled to indemnification under Article VI. "Filings" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5.1(b). "Financial Statements" shall mean: (a) the audited balance sheets and statements of income, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Company as of the end of and for each of the fiscal years ended June 30, 2002, 2003, and 2004, as certified without qualification by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP and BDO Seidman, LLP, the Company's independent public accountants; and (b) the unaudited balance sheets of the Company, including at December 31, 2004, and any fiscal quarter between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, and the related unaudited statements of operations, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows for each of the fiscal quarters then ended, which interim financial statements shall have been reviewed in accordance with Statement of Accounting Standards No. 100. "Free Assumed Convertible Security" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(f)(vi)(A). "GAAP" shall mean United States generally accepted accounting principles. "GPL" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.13(h). "Governmental Entity" shall mean any domestic or foreign court, arbitrational tribunal, administrative agency or commission or other domestic or foreign governmental or regulatory authority or agency. "Hart-Scott-Rodino Act" shall mean the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended. "Indemnifiable Matters" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.1(a). -64-
"Indemnification Escrow Agreement" shall mean the Indemnification Escrow Agreement in substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit D by and among the Buyer, the Representative and the Escrow Agent. "Indemnification Escrow Percentage" shall mean 15%. "Indemnification Escrow Period" shall mean the period during which Indemnification Escrow Shares are to be held in escrow, as set forth in the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. "Indemnification Escrow Shares" shall mean the Buyer Common Shares deposited in escrow pursuant to clause (i) of each of Sections 1.5(d), 1.6(b), 1.7(a) and 1.11(a) and pursuant to Section 1.13(a) and held and disposed of in accordance with the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. "Indemnification Obligations" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.1(a). "Indemnified Parties" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.1(a). "India Subsidiary" shall mean Saturn Networks India Private Limited. "Initial Management Shares" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.6(b). "Initial Merger Shares" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.5(d). "Intellectual Property" shall mean all: (a) patents, patent applications, patent disclosures and all related continuation, continuation-in-part, divisional, reissue, reexamination, utility model, certificate of invention and design patents, patent applications, registrations and applications for registrations ("Patent Rights"); (b) registered trademarks and service marks, Internet domain names, logos, trade names, corporate names, doing business designations and registrations and applications for registration thereof (collectively, "Trademark Registrations"), common law trademarks and service marks and trade dress, and all goodwill in the foregoing; (c) copyrights and registrations and applications for registration thereof; (d) mask works and registrations and applications for registration thereof; (e) domain names, computer software, data and documentation; (f) inventions, trade secrets and confidential business and technical information, whether patentable or nonpatentable and whether or not reduced to practice, know-how, manufacturing and product processes and techniques, research and development information, copyrightable works, financial, marketing and business data, pricing and cost information, business and marketing plans and customer and supplier lists and information; (g) other proprietary rights relating to any of the foregoing (including remedies against infringements thereof and rights of protection of interest therein under the laws of all jurisdictions); and (h) copies and tangible embodiments thereof. -65-
"Intellectual Property Registration" shall mean Patent Rights, Trademark Registrations, registered copyrights and mask work registrations. "Internal Systems" shall mean the internal systems of the Company or any Subsidiary that are used in its business or operations, including computer hardware systems, software applications and embedded systems. "Lawsuits" shall mean all Legal Proceedings between the Buyer, on the one hand, and the Company or any Subsidiary, on the other hand, pending as of the Closing Date. "Lease" shall mean any lease or sublease pursuant to which the Company or any Subsidiary leases or subleases from another party any real property. "Legal Proceeding" shall mean any action, suit, proceeding, claim, arbitration or investigation before any Governmental Entity or before any arbitrator. "Management Participant Agreement" shall mean the Management Participant Agreement executed by the Buyer and each of the Management Participants as of the date hereof in the form of Exhibit B attached hereto. "Management Participants" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.6(a). "Management Shares" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.6(a). "Market Value" shall mean the average of the closing prices of a share of Buyer Common Shares on the NASDAQ National Market for the thirty (30) days ending three (3) days before the Closing Date. "Materials of Environmental Concern" shall mean any: pollutants, contaminants or hazardous substances (as such terms are defined under CERCLA), pesticides (as such term is defined under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act), solid wastes and hazardous wastes (as such terms are defined under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act), chemicals, other hazardous, radioactive or toxic materials, oil, petroleum and petroleum products (and fractions thereof), or any other material (or article containing such material) listed or subject to regulation under any law, statute, rule, regulation, order, Permit, or directive due to its potential, directly or indirectly, to harm the environment or the health of humans or other living beings. "Merger" shall mean the merger of the Transitory Subsidiary with and into the Company in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. "Merger Consideration" shall mean the total payments received by the Equity Holders pursuant to this Agreement in consideration for the consummation of the Merger. "Merger Shares" shall mean the Buyer Common Shares to be distributed to the Equity Holders in the Merger. "Most Recent Balance Sheet" shall mean the unaudited balance sheet of the Company as of the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date. "Most Recent Balance Sheet Date" shall mean February 28, 2005. "NDA" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(a). -66-
"Net Asset Value" shall mean the total assets of the Company less the total liabilities of the Company as shown on the Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet or the Closing Balance Sheet, as the case may be. "Neutral Accountant" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(d). "Non-controlling Party" shall mean the party not controlling the defense of any Third Party Action. "Open Source Materials" shall mean all software or other material that is licensed under a license approved by the Open Source Initiative or otherwise distributed as "free software", "open source software" or under a similar licensing or distribution model. "Option" shall mean each option to purchase or acquire Company Shares. "Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares" shall mean, for each Outstanding Common Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the difference between (w) the Common Conversion Ratio and (x) the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio, and, for each Outstanding Preferred Share, zero; with respect to each Exercised Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the fraction obtained by dividing (x) the Options Adjusted Buyer Common Shares for each Outstanding Common Share, by (y) the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio. "Option Merger Value" shall equal the product of (A) the difference, if any, between $12.50 and the per share exercise price multiplied by (B) the number of Buyer Common Shares which may yet be acquired upon exercise of the relevant Assumed Convertible Security (assuming the full vesting thereof) as of the time of such determination. "Option Plan" shall mean the Company's 1999 Equity Incentive Plan. "Option Value" shall mean with respect to an Assumed Convertible Security or Preferred Warrant, the product of (x) the number of Buyer Common Shares subject to such Assumed Convertible Security or Preferred Warrant multiplied by (y) the excess, if any, of (A) the Market Value of a Buyer Common Share, minus (B) the exercise price per each share of Buyer Common Shares or Preferred Warrant subject to such Assumed Convertible Security. "Option/Warrant Consideration" shall mean the aggregate amount payable to all holders of Options and Warrants in accordance with Section 1.11. "Ordinary Course of Business" shall mean the ordinary course of business of the Company and the Subsidiaries consistent with past custom and practice (including with respect to frequency and amount). "Outside Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 10.1(e). "Outstanding Common Shares", each an "Outstanding Common Share", shall mean the Common Shares issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than Common Shares owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and Common Shares held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Options", each an "Outstanding Option", shall mean the number of Options outstanding as of immediately prior to the Closing. -67-
"Outstanding Preferred Shares," each an "Outstanding Preferred Share" shall mean the Preferred Shares issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than Preferred Shares owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and Preferred Shares held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Series A Preferred Shares", each an "Outstanding Series A Preferred Share", shall mean the shares of the Company's Series A Preferred Stock, $.001 par value per share, issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than shares of Series A Preferred Stock owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and shares of Series A Preferred Stock held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Series B Preferred Shares", each an "Outstanding Series B Preferred Share", shall mean the shares of the Company's Series B Preferred Stock, $.001 par value per share, issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than shares of Series B Preferred Stock owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and shares of Series B Preferred Stock held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Series C Preferred Shares", each an "Outstanding Series C Preferred Share", shall mean the shares of the Company's Series C Preferred Stock, $.001 par value per share, issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than shares of Series C Preferred Stock owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and shares of Series C Preferred Stock held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Warrants" shall mean the Warrants outstanding as of immediately prior to the Effective Time. "Parties" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Permits" shall mean all permits, licenses, registrations, certificates, orders, approvals, franchises, variances and similar rights issued by or obtained from any Governmental Entity (including those issued or required under Environmental Laws and those relating to the occupancy or use of owned or leased real property). "Pre-Closing Period" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.5. "Preferred Consideration" shall mean the sum of (A) the Series A Conversion Ratio times the Outstanding Series A Preferred Shares, plus (B) the aggregate of the applicable Series B Conversion Ratios times the relevant Outstanding Series B Preferred Shares, plus (C) the aggregate of the applicable Series C Conversion Ratios times the relevant Outstanding Series C Preferred Shares. "Preferred Shares" shall mean the preferred stock, par value $0.001 per share, of the Company. "Preferred Warrant" shall mean each warrant to purchase or acquire Preferred Shares. "Preliminary Base Purchase Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(a). "Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(a). "Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(a). "Preliminary Net Asset Value" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(a). -68-
"Principal Stockholders" shall mean the Company Stockholders who have executed the Stockholder Agreement. "Proxy Statement/Prospectus" shall mean the proxy statement/prospectus included as part of the Registration Statement, together with any accompanying letter to stockholders, notice of meeting and form of proxy or written consent. "Reasonable Best Efforts" shall mean best efforts, to the extent commercially reasonable. "Registration Statement" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7.1(b). "Representative" shall mean Thomas Cole. "Representative Fees" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.14(h). "Requisite Stockholder Approval" shall mean the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger by a majority of the outstanding Company Shares voting as a single class and a majority of the votes represented by each class of outstanding Company Shares entitled to vote on this Agreement and the Merger. "Response" shall mean a written response containing the information provided for in Section 6.2(c). "Rule 145 Affiliates" shall mean affiliates of the Company within the meaning of Rule 145 promulgated under the Securities Act. "Sarbanes Act" shall mean the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. "SEC" shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission. "Securities Act" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. "Security Interest" shall mean any mortgage, pledge, security interest, encumbrance, charge or other lien (whether arising by contract or by operation of law), other than (i) mechanic's, material men's and similar liens, (ii) liens arising under worker's compensation, unemployment insurance, social security, retirement and similar legislation, and (iii) liens on goods in transit incurred pursuant to documentary letters of credit, in each case arising in the Ordinary Course of Business of the Company and its Subsidiaries and not material to the Company or its Subsidiaries. "Series A Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) Series A Liquidation Amount per Share by (ii) the Market Value of a Buyer Common Share. "Series B Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the applicable Series B Liquidation Amount per Share by (ii) the Market Value of a Buyer Common Share. "Series C Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the applicable Series C Liquidation Amount per Share by (ii) the Market Value of a Buyer Common Share. "Series A Liquidation Amount per Share" shall mean $0.75. -69-
"Series B Liquidation Amount per Share" shall mean $0.233, plus accrued and unpaid dividends from the date of issuance of such share as provided in Section 2.2 of the Company's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation. "Series C Liquidation Amount per Share" shall mean $0.273, plus accrued and unpaid dividends from the date of issuance of such share as provided in Section 2.3 of the Company's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation. "Software" shall mean any of the software owned by the Company or a Subsidiary. "Stockholder Agreement" shall mean the Stockholder Agreement executed by the Buyer and each of the Principal Stockholders as of the date hereof in the form of Exhibit A attached hereto. "Stockholder Payment" shall mean the sum of (A) the Market Value of the Buyer Common Shares issuable pursuant to Section 1.5 upon the conversion of Common Shares owned by the applicable Management Participant (or by any member of such Management Participant's family to the extent acquired by gift from such Management Participant) as of the Effective Time (other than such Common Shares acquired upon conversion of Preferred Shares), plus (B) the Option Value of all Assumed Convertible Securities owned by the applicable Management Participant that are vested and exercisable as of the Effective Time. "Subsidiary" shall mean any corporation, partnership, trust, limited liability company or other non-corporate business enterprise in which the Company (or another Subsidiary) holds stock or other ownership interests representing (a) more than 50% of the voting power of all outstanding stock or ownership interests of such entity or (b) the right to receive more than 50% of the net assets of such entity available for distribution to the holders of outstanding stock or ownership interests upon a liquidation or dissolution of such entity. "Superior Proposal" shall mean any bona fide written proposal made by a third party (other than one made in response to any solicitation by the Company or its Advisors that is in violation of or inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement) to acquire all the equity securities or assets of the Company, pursuant to a stock purchase, tender or exchange offer, a merger, a consolidation or a sale of its assets, (i) on terms which the Company's Board of Directors determines in its good faith judgment to be materially more favorable from a financial point of view to the holders of Company Shares than the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (based on the written opinion, with only customary qualifications, of a nationally recognized independent financial advisor), taking into account all the terms and conditions of such proposal and this Agreement (including any proposal by the Buyer to amend the terms of this Agreement) and (ii) that is reasonably capable of being completed on the terms proposed, taking into account all financial, regulatory, legal and other aspects of such proposal; provided, however, that no Acquisition Proposal shall be deemed to be a Superior Proposal if any financing required to consummate the Acquisition Proposal is not committed. "Surviving Corporation" shall mean the Company, as the surviving corporation in the Merger. "Target Amount" shall mean zero dollars ($0.00). "Taxes" shall mean all taxes, charges, fees, levies or other similar assessments or liabilities, including income, gross receipts, ad valorem, premium, value-added, excise, real property, personal property, sales, use, transfer, withholding, employment, unemployment, insurance, social security, business license, business organization, environmental, workers compensation, payroll, profits, license, lease, service, service use, severance, stamp, occupation, windfall profits, customs, duties, franchise and -70-
other taxes imposed by the United States of America or any state, local or foreign government, or any agency thereof, or other political subdivision of the United States or any such government, and any interest, fines, penalties, assessments or additions to tax resulting from, attributable to or incurred in connection with any tax or any contest or dispute thereof. "Tax Proceeding" shall mean any audit, claim for refund, or contest or defense against any assessment, notice of deficiency, or other proposed adjustment relating to any and all Taxes of the Company or any Subsidiary. "Tax Returns" shall mean all reports, returns, declarations, statements or other information required to be supplied to a Taxing authority in connection with Taxes. "Third Party Action" shall mean any suit or proceeding by a person or entity other than a Party for which indemnification may be sought by a Party under Article VI. "Top Customers" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.15(a)(ii)(A)(1). "Transitory Subsidiary" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "WARN Act" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(g). "Warrant" shall mean each warrant to purchase or acquire Common Shares. "Work Permit" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(e). ARTICLE XII MISCELLANEOUS 12.1 Press Releases and Announcements. No Party shall issue any press release or public announcement relating to the subject matter of this Agreement without the prior written approval of the other Parties; provided, however, that (a) any Party may make any public disclosure it believes in good faith is required by applicable law, regulation or stock market rule (in which case the disclosing Party shall use reasonable efforts to advise the other Parties and provide them with a copy of the proposed disclosure prior to making the disclosure); (b) the Buyer and its Affiliates shall not be bound by the provisions of this Section 12.1 following the Closing Date; and (c) the Parties will issue such joint communications as are described and at the times set forth in Schedule 12.1 attached hereto. 12.2 No Third Party Beneficiaries. Except as set forth in Article IX, This Agreement shall not confer any rights or remedies upon any person other than the Parties and their respective successors and permitted assigns. 12.3 Entire Agreement. This Agreement (including the documents referred to herein) constitutes the entire agreement among the Parties and supersedes any prior understandings, agreements or representations by or among the Parties, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter hereof; provided that the NDA shall remain in effect in accordance with its terms. The Parties acknowledge that, except as set forth in Article II, in the case of the Company, or Article III, in the case of the Buyer, neither the Company nor the Buyer has made or is making any representations or warranties whatsoever to any other Party or person, expressed, implied or otherwise, provided that, subject to Section 6.4(d), the foregoing shall not be deemed to limit any right of any Party to assert a claim of fraud in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. -71-
12.4 Succession and Assignment. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Parties named herein and their respective successors and permitted assigns. No Party may assign either this Agreement or any of its rights, interests or obligations hereunder without the prior written approval of the other Parties; provided that the Transitory Subsidiary may assign its rights, interests and obligations hereunder to an Affiliate of the Buyer. 12.5 Counterparts and Facsimile Signature. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement may be executed by facsimile signature. 12.6 Headings. The section headings contained in this Agreement are inserted for convenience only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. 12.7 Notices. All notices, requests, demands, claims, and other communications hereunder shall be in writing. Any notice, request, demand, claim or other communication hereunder shall be deemed duly delivered two business days after it is sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, or one business day after it is sent for next business day delivery via a reputable nationwide overnight courier service, in each case to the intended recipient as set forth below: To the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary: With a copy to: Akamai Technologies, Inc. Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale 8 Cambridge Center and Dorr LLP Cambridge, MA 02142 60 State Street Attn: Melanie Haratunian, Boston, MA 02109 Vice President and General Counsel Attn: Susan W. Murley Telecopy: (617) 444-3001 Telecopy: (617) 526-5000 Telephone: (617) 444-3000 Telephone: (617) 526-6000 To the Company: With a copy to: Speedera Networks, Inc. Fenwick & West LLP 4800 Great America Parkway Embarcadero Center West Second Floor 275 Battery Street Santa Clara, CA 95054 San Francisco, CA 94111 Attn: Ajit Gupta Attn: Robert B. Dellenbach Telecopy: (408) 855-9543 Telecopy: (415) 281-1350 Telephone: (408) 970-1500 Telephone: (415) 875-2300 To the Representative: With a copy to: Thomas Cole Cooley Godward LLP as the Representative of the Equity Holders Five Palo Alto Square Trinity Ventures 3000 El Camino Real 3000 Sand Hill Road Palo Alto, CA 94306-2155 Building 4, Suite 160 Attention: Eric C. Jensen, Esq. Menlo Park, CA 94025 Telecopy: (650) 745-3929 Telecopy: (650-854-9501 Telephone: (650) 843-5049 Telephone: (650) 854-9500 -72-
Any Party may give any notice, request, demand, claim or other communication hereunder using any other means (including personal delivery, expedited courier, messenger service, telecopy, telex, ordinary mail or electronic mail), but no such notice, request, demand, claim or other communication shall be deemed to have been duly given unless and until it actually is received by the party for whom it is intended. Any Party may change the address to which notices, requests, demands, claims, and other communications hereunder are to be delivered by giving the other Parties notice in the manner herein set forth. 12.8 Governing Law. This Agreement (including the validity and applicability of the arbitration provisions of this Agreement, the conduct of any arbitration of a Dispute, the enforcement of any arbitral award made hereunder and any other questions of arbitration law or procedure arising hereunder) shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without giving effect to any choice or conflict of law provision or rule (whether of the State of Delaware or any other jurisdiction) that would cause the application of laws of any jurisdictions other than those of the State of Delaware. 12.9 Amendments and Waivers. The Parties may mutually amend any provision of this Agreement at any time prior to the Closing; provided, however, that any amendment effected subsequent to the Requisite Stockholder Approval shall be subject to any restrictions contained in the Delaware General Corporation Act. No amendment of any provision of this Agreement shall be valid unless the same shall be in writing and signed by all of the Parties. No waiver of any right or remedy hereunder shall be valid unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the Party giving such waiver. No waiver by any Party with respect to any default, misrepresentation or breach of warranty or covenant hereunder shall be deemed to extend to any prior or subsequent default, misrepresentation or breach of warranty or covenant hereunder or affect in any way any rights arising by virtue of any prior or subsequent such occurrence. 12.10 Severability. Any term or provision of this Agreement that is invalid or unenforceable in any situation in any jurisdiction shall not affect the validity or enforceability of the remaining terms and provisions hereof or the validity or enforceability of the offending term or provision in any other situation or in any other jurisdiction. If the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction declares that any term or provision hereof is invalid or unenforceable, the Parties agree that the court making the determination of invalidity or unenforceability shall have the power to limit the term or provision, to delete specific words or phrases, or to replace any invalid or unenforceable term or provision with a term or provision that is valid and enforceable and that comes closest to expressing the intention of the invalid or unenforceable term or provision, and this Agreement shall be enforceable as so modified. 12.11 Submission to Jurisdiction. Each Party (a) submits to the jurisdiction of any state or federal court sitting in the State of Delaware in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement (including any action or proceeding for the enforcement of any arbitral award made in connection with any arbitration of a Dispute hereunder), (b) agrees that all claims in respect of such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in any such court, (c) waives any claim of inconvenient forum or other challenge to venue in such court, (d) agrees not to bring any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any other court, and (e) waives any right it may have to a trial by jury with respect to any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement; provided in each case that, solely with respect to any arbitration of a Dispute, the Arbitrator shall resolve all threshold issues relating to the validity and applicability of the arbitration provisions of this Agreement, contract validity, applicability of statutes of limitations and issue preclusion, and such threshold issues shall not be -73-
heard or determined by such court. Each Party agrees to accept service of any summons, complaint or other initial pleading made in the manner provided for the giving of notices in Section 12.7, provided that nothing in this Section 12.11 shall affect the right of any Party to serve such summons, complaint or other initial pleading in any other manner permitted by law. 12.12 Construction. (a) The language used in this Agreement shall be deemed to be the language chosen by the Parties to express their mutual intent, and no rule of strict construction shall be applied against any Party. (b) Any reference to any federal, state, local or foreign statute or law shall be deemed also to refer to all rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, unless the context requires otherwise. (c) Any reference herein to "including" shall be interpreted as "including without limitation". (d) Any reference to any Article, Section or paragraph shall be deemed to refer to an Article, Section or paragraph of this Agreement, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise. (e) Any calculation of any conversion ratio pursuant to this Agreement, or of any number of Buyer Common Shares calculated pursuant to this Agreement, shall be subject to equitable adjustment in the event of any stock split, stock dividend, reverse stock split or similar event affecting the Buyer Common Shares after the date hereof. [REMAINDER OF THE PAGE INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK] -74-
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed this Agreement as of the date first above written. BUYER: AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: /s/ Paul Sagan -------------- Title: President TRANSITORY SUBSIDIARY: AQUARIUS ACQUISITION CORP. By: /s/ Paul Sagan -------------- Title: President COMPANY: SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. By: /s/ Ajit Gupta -------------- Title: President REPRESENTATIVE: Name: Fred Wang /s/ Fred Wang ------------- Signature -Signature Page to Agreement and Plan of Merger-
Schedule I Management Participants Richard Day Ajit Gupta Eric Swildens I-1

 
Exhibit 99.2
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) and Speedera Networks Inc. announced today that the two companies have signed a definitive agreement for Akamai to acquire Speedera in a stock-for-stock merger transaction. The acquisition is expected to be accretive on a normalized, diluted per share basis* within the first twelve months after the transaction closes. The closing of the transaction, which is subject to customary closing conditions including regulatory approvals and the approval of Speedera's stockholders, is expected to occur in the second quarter of 2005.
CAMBRIDGE, MA and SANTA CLARA, CA
March 15, 2005
The acquisition of Speedera is expected to enable Akamai to better compete against larger managed services vendors. Akamai and Speedera provide businesses with a cost-effective, distributed platform for accessing Web computing and capacity on demand worldwide without having to make significant upfront investments in infrastructure. The acquisition also will provide customers with a broader suite of services available on the world's largest, high-performance distributed computing platform for the delivery and acceleration of Web content and applications.
As businesses and government agencies strive for a more dynamic and interactive presence on the Web, and as they migrate more business processes online, leading technology analysts have identified that the demand for outsourced content and applications acceleration solutions will continue to expand. To compete online, enterprises must ensure that their customers, suppliers and partners receive a fast, reliable, scalable and secure Web experience.
"The combination of Akamai and Speedera will provide customers with the best attributes of both companies," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO-elect of Akamai. "Akamai and Speedera are customer-focused companies that emphasize leading-edge technology development to help businesses and government agencies to deliver more effective, higher performing, and lower cost Websites and online applications. We believe that this combination will benefit our customers, employees and shareholders."
 
Akamai was founded in 1998, and Speedera was founded in 1999.
"My colleagues and I at Speedera are very proud of what we have accomplished since the company's founding," said Ajit Gupta, president and CEO of Speedera Networks. "We have built a global network, acquired hundreds of customers, and delivered great services that make it possible for our customers to operate more successful online businesses. When we join forces with Akamai, our customers will have access to an even larger, global network and a wider portfolio of leading-edge services supported by a combination of the most experienced teams in the industry."
Under terms of the agreement, Akamai will acquire all of the outstanding common stock, preferred stock, and vested and unvested stock options of Speedera and its India-based, wholly-owned subsidiary by issuing approximately 12 million shares of Akamai common stock, which implies the transaction was valued at approximately $130 million based on the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Stock Market on March 15, 2005, the day the merger agreement was signed. The merger transaction is designed to be effected as a tax-free reorganization for Speedera stockholders and is expected to be accounted for by Akamai under the purchase method of accounting. All pending litigation between the two companies is stayed upon signing of the deal and will be formally dismissed when and if the deal is closed.
Akamai will host a conference call to discuss the acquisition of Speedera Networks tomorrow, March 16, 2005 at 8:45 a.m. Eastern time, that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 4835686.
Conference call scheduled tomorrow for 8:45 a.m. Eastern Time
www.akamai.com
About Speedera Networks
Speedera Networks, Inc. is a leading global provider of distributed application hosting and content delivery services. The company's SpeedSuite family of services provides on-demand services that cost-effectively solve the performance, scalability, availability and security problems of distributed applications and Web sites. Speedera's edge delivery network is deployed in the Americas, Europe and the Asia-Pacific region, with connectivity to over 1,000 carrier networks, controlled by a patented global traffic management system.
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,300 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of
About Akamai
 
their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
* In addition to the financial measures prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), we use certain non-GAAP financial measures, including normalized EPS. Akamai defines "normalized net income (loss)" as net income (loss) before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income (loss) to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the company's core operations or are non-cash.
We exclude these items because they are outside of our normal operations and, in certain cases, are difficult to forecast accurately for future periods. We believe that the inclusion of such measures helps investors to gain a better understanding of our core operating results and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts the company's performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts.
Akamai's guidance as to the expected impact that the acquisition will have on Akamai's earnings per share is only provided on a normalized basis. It is not feasible to provide the expected impact that the acquisition will have on a GAAP basis because the items excluded are difficult to predict and estimate and are primarily dependent on future events, such as the determination of the portion of the purchase price attributable to identifiable intangible assets and the amortization thereof and decisions concerning the location and timing of facility consolidations.
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about the anticipated closing of the acquisition and the expected future business and financial performance of Akamai resulting from and following the acquisition. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, material adverse changes in the financial conditions or operations of Speedera, substantial delay in the expected closing of the proposed merger, inability to secure all regulatory and stockholder approvals necessary to effect the proposed merger and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050427120032.txt.gz
TIME:20050427120032
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On April 21, 2005, the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") approved amendments to the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 1999 Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the "ESPP"). The amendments will be effective as of June 1, 2005, the commencement of the next offering period under the ESPP. The amendments are as follows:
(i) the duration of the offering periods during which an option to purchase shares of common stock of Akamai under the ESPP was changed to six months from 24 months;
(ii) the number of times a participant may elect to change his or her percentage payroll deductions during an offering period was changed to two times from four times;
(iii) the definition of "Compensation," which is used in determining a participant's contribution to the ESPP, was amended to expressly include cash bonuses and other cash incentive payments received by the participant from Akamai; and
(iv) a provision was added to indicate that, upon termination of an offering period, each eligible participant will be automatically enrolled in the next offering period unless he or she provides a withdrawal notification to Akamai.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050427160126.txt.gz
TIME:20050427160126
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On April 27, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2005. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2005. Revenue for the first quarter 2005 was $60.1 million, a 4 percent increase over fourth quarter 2004 revenue of $57.6 million, and a 24 percent increase over first quarter 2004 revenue of $48.4 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 27, 2005
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, increased in the first quarter of 2005 to $14.1 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, consistent with earnings per diluted share in the prior quarter, and a significant improvement over 2004 first quarter earnings per diluted share of $0.02 per share.
"We are off to a great start this year and this quarter's positive results demonstrate the expanding market opportunity for, and utilization of, our global, on-demand platform," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "Our goal is to continue growing revenue and earnings through increased adoption of our core delivery services, as well as new offerings for on-demand managed services and accelerating Web applications."
The Company generated normalized net income* of $14.3 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2005. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the first quarter of 2005 was $20.4 million, up 10 percent compared to $18.6 million in the prior quarter, and up 37 percent compared to $14.9 million in the first quarter of 2004. Adjusted EBITDA as a percent of revenue was 34 percent, up from 32 percent in the prior quarter. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
 
Cash from operations increased 20 percent to $18.7 million in the first quarter as compared to fourth quarter 2004 cash from operations of $15.6 million, and was more than double first quarter 2004 cash from operations of $8.6 million.
At March 31, 2005, the Company had approximately 127.4 million shares of common stock outstanding, and had approximately $118.0 million of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The number of total customers under long-term services contracts increased to 1,360, a 4 percent increase over fourth quarter 2004, marking the ninth consecutive quarter of net customer growth, and a 16 percent increase year-over-year.
Customers
New customers in the first quarter included Connextra Limited, CTS EVENTIM AG, Fordham University, F-Secure Corporation, InterSystems, Motricity, New England Patriots, Palladium Group, Inc., 3 Suisses-Gruppe, U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA), and West Elm, among others.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 25 percent and 20 percent, respectively, of revenue for the first quarter of 2005.
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 5075937.
Quarterly Conference Call
www.akamai.com
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,300 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
About Akamai
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
 
Financial Statements
 
 
 
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
 
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment, net interest expense and restructuring activities, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statement of cash flows in the company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services , inability to service and repay our outstanding debt and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050429171539.txt.gz
TIME:20050429171539
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On April 25, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") and Robert W. Hughes, Akamai's Executive Vice PresidentGlobal Sales and Services entered into Mr. Hughes's 2005 cash incentive plan. The plan provides for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, Mr. Hughes's bonus is weighted as follows: 50% based on Akamai achievement of revenue targets; 25% on Akamai's achievement of earnings per share targets; and 25% on Mr. Hughes achieving specified committed contract value goals. The plan was approved by the Compensation Committee of Akamai's Board of Directors. The foregoing description of Mr. Hughes's plan is qualified in its entirety by the full text of such plan set forth in Exhibit 99.1.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
This 2005 incentive plan sets forth your annual compensation for 2005 based on the achievement of certain annual corporate and individual performance objectives. In order to receive your annual incentive bonus, you must be an employee and a member of the Office of the CEO throughout all of 2005 and the corporate and individual objectives must be met, as described more thoroughly below. The Compensation Committee will resolve all questions arising in the administration, interpretation and application of this plan, and the Compensation Committee's determination will be final and binding on all concerned. Where permitted by applicable law, the Compensation Committee reserves the right to modify, at its discretion and at any time, the terms of this plan, including, but not limited to, the performance objectives, targets, and payouts.
Annual Compensation Levels at Target Performance
Performance Objectives/Targets
The following are the annual corporate and individual performance objectives for your 2005 Incentive:
Payment of each component of the annual incentive bonus is contingent upon, and will be paid following, the achievement of each corresponding objective. The Compensation Committee of Akamai's Board of Directors retains the right and sole discretion to determine whether the corporate and individual objectives have been met, after consideration of any recommendation by the Chief Executive Officer. The Compensation Committee's determination will be final and binding on all concerned. No incentive will be paid under a specific incentive criteria for performance below the associated threshold listed for that criteria. Performance that falls between the target and either the threshold or maximum will be interpolated on a straight line basis to determine the incentive amount. Performance above the maximum may or may not result in higher reward, at the sole discretion of the Compensation Committee, except in the case of CCV. Any bonus payout based on attainment of CCV goals will be paid as follows: 0.0635% of CCV up to 105% performance, 0.134% thereafter.
 
Payment
Your achievement of the goals set forth above will be evaluated on an annual basis. Failure to achieve one of the annual threshold goals set forth above will result in no bonus payment for that particular goal. However, in order to provide ongoing incentives throughout the year, Akamai will pay you, in advance, on a pro-rated basis using your performance during each quarter against pro-rated quarterly Recognized Revenue and CCV goals. Whether you have achieved the pro-rated, quarterly Recognized Revenue and CCV goals will be determined and measured by the Commissions Group (Finance) based on the annual objectives set in this plan. If you have achieved the pro-rated, quarterly Recognized Revenue and CCV goals, you will be paid 50% of the pro-rated bonus for that quarter within five (5) days following the filing of Akamai's SEC 10-Q filing for that quarter. For purposes of making quarterly payments under this plan, target performance (100%) during each quarter is defined as follows:
After the end of the fourth quarter, the Company will make a final determination as to whether each of your annual threshold goals were met. If there is any difference between performance during the first three quarters in which 50% of a pro-rated bonus was paid, and the total annual performance for that year, there will be a final reconciliation as follows:
For example, if you achieve your pro-rated, quarterly Targets in Q1, Q2 and Q3, you will be paid 50% of the pro-rated bonus amount on a quarterly basis. If you also achieve your pro-rated, quarterly Target in Q4, then you are entitled to receive 100% of your annual incentive bonus. Within five (5) days following the filing of Akamai's SEC 10-K filing for 2005, you will be paid 100% of your pro-rated bonus for Q4, as well as the remaining 50% of your pro-rated bonus for Q1, Q2 and Q3.
For example, if you achieve your pro-rated, quarterly Target for Recognized Revenue in Q1, Q2 and Q3, but fail to achieve your pro-rated, quarterly Target in Q4, and your total achievement for 2005 falls below the Threshold goal set forth above, then in accordance with this plan, you are not entitled to receive any bonus payment for that particular goal. You will be obligated to repay Akamai for each 50% quarterly payment you received during 2005.
The payment of the Diluted GAAP EPS component will be made within thirty (30) days following the filing of Akamai's SEC 10-K filing for FY 2005.
 
Termination
If either you or the Company terminates your employment before the end of 2005, you will remain eligible for each component of your annual bonus on a pro-rated basis, i.e., both your annual Targets and the bonus based on each component of those Targets will be pro-rated from January 1, 2005 through your last day of employment. At that time, the Company will make a final determination as to whether each of your pro-rated annual goals were met. If there is any difference between performance during the quarters in which you were employed and 50% of a pro-rated bonus was paid, and the total performance for the quarters in which you were employed during 2005, there will be a final reconciliation to determine your performance based on the pro-rated annual goals and the amount of pro-rated bonus, if any, due.
If your employment were to terminate on September 30, 2005, your pro-rated, annual Recognized Revenue Target would be 75% of the 2005 Recognized Revenue Target. If, after the close of Q3, Akamai determined that you achieved this pro-rated Target, you would be eligible for a total pro-rated bonus of $75,000 . Because you already would have received $25,000 towards this bonus for Q1 and Q2, you would receive the remaining $50,000 amount within five (5) days following the filing of Akamai's SEC 10-Q filing for Q3.
EXAMPLE:
Using the same termination date and pro-rated Recognized Revenue Target, if, after the close of Q3, Akamai determines that there is a negative difference between the amounts paid for your pro-rated, quarterly performance and the amount calculated for your total Recognized Revenue performance through September 30, 2005, Akamai may require you to reimburse the Company for the difference. Should Akamai require such reimbursement, the amount to be reimbursed shall be withheld from any severance payment that may be due to you upon your termination. If no severance payment is due, you may be required to reimburse Akamai within five (5) days following the filing of Akamai's SEC 10-Q filing for Q3.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050616170109.txt.gz
TIME:20050616170109
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
ITEM 2.01 ACQUISITION OR DISPOSITION OF ASSETS.
     On March 16, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Akamai"), entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement"), by and among Akamai, Aquarius Acquisition Corp. a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Akamai (the "Merger Sub"), and Speedera Networks, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Speedera"). A copy of the Merger Agreement, together with the exhibits thereto, is filed with this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein. A copy of the press release announcing completion of the acquisition is filed with this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.2.
     The acquisition contemplated by the Merger Agreement closed on June 10, 2005. Upon closing, Speedera, a provider of distributed application hosting and content delivery services, became a wholly-owned subsidiary of Akamai. Shares of Speedera capital stock issued and outstanding immediately prior to the closing were canceled and converted into the right to receive shares of Akamai common stock. Each outstanding option to purchase shares of Speedera capital stock was assumed by Akamai and converted into an option to purchase shares of Akamai common stock.
     Under the terms of the Merger Agreement, Akamai issued approximately 10.6 million shares of its common stock to the holders of Speedera capital stock and assumed Speedera's outstanding options, which became options to purchase approximately 1.7 million shares of Akamai common stock. Approximately 1.6 million shares of the 10.6 million shares issued at closing were placed in escrow to secure the indemnification obligations of Speedera's shareholders; additionally, fifteen percent of nearly all shares issued upon exercise of any Speedera options assumed in the acquisition will be added to the escrow. The terms of the transaction are more fully described in the Merger Agreement filed as Exhibit 99.1 to Akamai's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 18, 2005.
     The terms of the Merger Agreement were determined on the basis of arms-length negotiations. Prior to the execution of the Merger Agreement, none of Akamai, any of its affiliates, any director or officer of Akamai or any associate of any such director or officer, had any material relationship with Speedera.
ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS.
(a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired
The financial statements required to be filed pursuant to Item 7(a) of Form 8-K will be filed by amendment as soon as practicable, but in no event later than 71 days after the date this Current Report on Form 8-K is required to be filed.
(b) Pro Forma Financial Information
The pro forma financial information required to be filed pursuant to Item 7(b) of Form 8-K will be filed by amendment as soon as practicable, but in no event later than 71 days after the date this Current Report on Form 8-K is required to be filed.
(c) Exhibits.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1 AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER BY AND AMONG AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC., AQUARIUS ACQUISITION CORP., SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. AND THE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE EQUITY HOLDERS (NAMED HEREIN) March 16, 2005
TABLE OF CONTENTS -i-
2.26 Permits................................................................. 32 2.27 Certain Business Relationships With Affiliates.......................... 32 2.28 Brokers' Fees........................................................... 32 2.29 Books and Records....................................................... 32 2.30 Prepayments, Prebilled Invoices and Deposits............................ 32 2.31 Government Contracts.................................................... 33 2.32 Disclosure.............................................................. 33 ARTICLE III REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE BUYER AND THE TRANSITORY SUBSIDIARY......................................................................... 34 3.1 Organization and Corporate Power........................................ 34 3.2 Authorization of Transaction............................................ 34 3.3 Noncontravention........................................................ 34 3.4 Broker's Fees........................................................... 34 3.5 Investment Representation............................................... 34 3.6 Litigation.............................................................. 35 3.7 SEC Filings............................................................. 35 3.8 Merger Shares and Management Shares Validly Issued...................... 35 3.9 Disclosure.............................................................. 35 3.10 Actions Consistent With Reorganization Treatment........................ 35 ARTICLE IV COVENANTS................................................................ 36 4.1 Closing Efforts......................................................... 36 4.2 Treatment of the Merger as a Reorganization for Tax Purposes............ 36 4.3 Governmental and Third-Party Notices and Consents....................... 36 4.4 Stockholder Approval.................................................... 37 4.5 Operation of Business................................................... 39 4.6 Stay of Litigation...................................................... 42 4.7 Access to Information................................................... 42 4.8 Notice of Breaches...................................................... 42 4.9 Exclusivity............................................................. 43 4.10 Listing Notifications................................................... 44 4.11 Expenses................................................................ 44 4.12 Company 401(k) Plan..................................................... 44 4.13 280G Covenant........................................................... 44 4.14 FIRPTA.................................................................. 44 4.15 Silicon Valley Bank Registration Rights................................. 44 4.16 Option Acceleration..................................................... 44 ARTICLE V CONDITIONS TO CONSUMMATION OF MERGER...................................... 45 5.1 Conditions to Obligations of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary.... 45 5.2 Conditions to Obligations of the Company................................ 47 ARTICLE VI INDEMNIFICATION.......................................................... 48 6.1 Indemnification by the Equity Holders................................... 48 6.2 Indemnification Claims.................................................. 49 6.3 Survival of Representations and Warranties.............................. 51 6.4 Limitations............................................................. 51 ARTICLE VII REGISTRATION OF SHARES.................................................. 52 7.1 California Permit; Registered Offering.................................. 52 7.2 Lock-up Agreements...................................................... 54 ARTICLE VIII TAX MATTERS............................................................ 54 8.1 Preparation and Filing of Tax Returns; Payment of Taxes................. 54 8.2 Tax Indemnification by the Equity Holders............................... 55 8.3 Allocation of Certain Taxes............................................. 55
-ii-
8.4 Termination of Tax-Sharing Agreements............................... 55 8.5 Scope of Article VIII............................................... 55 ARTICLE IX INDEMNIFICATION OF DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS OF THE COMPANY............. 56 9.1 Indemnification and Insurance....................................... 56 ARTICLE X TERMINATION........................................................... 56 10.1 Termination of Agreement............................................ 56 10.2 Effect of Termination............................................... 57 ARTICLE XI DEFINITIONS.......................................................... 57 ARTICLE XII MISCELLANEOUS....................................................... 71 12.1 Press Releases and Announcements.................................... 71 12.2 No Third Party Beneficiaries........................................ 71 12.3 Entire Agreement.................................................... 71 12.4 Succession and Assignment........................................... 72 12.5 Counterparts and Facsimile Signature................................ 72 12.6 Headings............................................................ 72 12.7 Notices............................................................. 72 12.8 Governing Law....................................................... 73 12.9 Amendments and Waivers.............................................. 73 12.10 Severability...................................................... 73 12.11 Submission to Jurisdiction........................................ 73 12.12 Construction...................................................... 74
Exhibit A - Stockholder Agreement Exhibit B - Management Participant Agreement Exhibit C - Form of Notice and Transmittal Exhibit D - Form of Indemnification Escrow Agreement Exhibit E - Form of Contingent Settlement Agreement and Partial Release Exhibit F - Form of Opinion of Counsel to the Company Exhibit G - Form of Opinion of Counsel to the India Subsidiary Exhibit H - Form of Opinion of Counsel to the Buyer Schedule I - Management Participants Schedule 12.1 - Press Releases and Announcements Disclosure Schedule -iii-
AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER This Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Agreement") is entered into as of March 16, 2005, by and among Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Buyer"), Aquarius Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Buyer (the "Transitory Subsidiary"), Speedera Networks, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and, solely for the purposes of Section 1.14 hereof and carrying out its resulting responsibilities hereunder as representative of the Company Stockholders, the Management Participants and the holders of Options, the Representative specified in Article XI. The Buyer, the Transitory Subsidiary and the Company are sometimes referred to herein individually as a "Party" and collectively as the "Parties". This Agreement contemplates a merger of the Transitory Subsidiary into the Company. In such merger, (a) the Company Stockholders will receive Buyer Common Shares in exchange for their capital stock of the Company, (b) options and warrants to acquire common stock of the Company will become options and warrants to acquire Buyer Common Shares and (c) Management Participants will receive Buyer Common Shares in satisfaction of certain obligations of the Company to such Management Participants, as set forth in the Management Participant Agreement. The Representative will have the authority to act, with binding effect, on behalf of the Equity Holders according to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement. For federal income tax purposes, it is intended that the Merger shall qualify as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code. Simultaneously with the execution of this Agreement, in order to induce the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary to enter into the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the Principal Stockholders have executed the Stockholder Agreement and the Management Participants have executed the Management Participant Agreement. Now, therefore, in consideration of the representations, warranties and covenants herein contained, the Parties hereby agree as follows. ARTICLE I THE MERGER 1.1 The Merger. Upon and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Transitory Subsidiary shall merge with and into the Company at the Effective Time. From and after the Effective Time, the separate corporate existence of the Transitory Subsidiary shall cease and the Company shall continue as the Surviving Corporation. The Merger shall have the effects set forth in Section 259 of the Delaware General Corporation Law. 1.2 The Closing. The Closing shall take place at the offices of Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP, 60 State Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02109, commencing at 9:00 a.m. local time on the Closing Date. 1.3 Actions at the Closing. At the Closing: (a) the Company shall deliver to the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary the various certificates, instruments and documents referred to in Section 5.1; (b) the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary shall deliver to the Company the various certificates, instruments and documents referred to in Section 5.2;
(c) the Surviving Corporation shall file with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware the Certificate of Merger; (d) the Buyer or the Surviving Co the Exchange Agent to establish a reserve account for the distribution of certificates representing the Initial Merger Shares to the Company Stockholders in accordance with Sections 1.5(d) and 1.8(a); (e) the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation shall deliver instructions to the Exchange Agent to distribute certificates representing the Initial Merger Shares to the Management Participants in accordance with Sections 1.6(b) and 1.9; and (f) the Buyer, the Representative and the Escrow Agent shall execute and deliver the Indemnification Escrow Agreement, and the Buyer shall deliver to the Escrow Agent certificates for the Indemnification Escrow Shares being placed in escrow on the Closing Date pursuant to Section 1.13. 1.4 Additional Action. The Surviving Corporation may, at any time from and after the Effective Time, take any action, including executing and delivering any document, in the name and on behalf of either the Company or the Transitory Subsidiary, in order to consummate and give effect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 1.5 Conversion of Shares. At the Effective Time, by virtue of the Merger and without any action on the part of any Party or the holder of any of the following securities: (a) Each Outstanding Common Share shall be converted into and represent the right to receive (subject to the provisions of Section 1.13) a fraction of a share (the "Common Conversion Ratio") of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the Adjusted Merger Consideration, minus the Management Shares, minus the Preferred Consideration, by (ii) the Adjusted Total Company Shares. (b) Each Outstanding Series A Preferred Share shall be converted into and represent the right to receive (subject to the provisions of Section 1.13) a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares equal to the Series A Conversion Ratio; each Outstanding Series B Preferred Share shall be converted into and represent the right to receive (subject to the provisions of Section 1.13) a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares equal to the Series B Conversion Ratio; and each Outstanding Series C Preferred Share shall be converted into and represent the right to receive (subject to the provisions of Section 1.13) a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares equal to the Series C Conversion Ratio. (c) The Company shall take all steps necessary to ensure that all outstanding convertible promissory notes issued by the Company, if any, shall be converted into Common Shares immediately prior to the Closing, pursuant to the conversion terms thereof. (d) The Buyer Common Shares into which each Company Stockholder's Company Shares shall be converted at the Effective Time pursuant to Section 1.5(a) shall be delivered as follows: (i) On the Closing Date the Buyer shall (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13 the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Closing Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Company Stockholders in accordance with Section 1.8 the remainder of such Closing Buyer Common Shares, subject to the provisions of Section 1.10, not deposited into escrow (the "Initial Merger Shares"). -2-
(ii) On the date specified in Section 1.12(f) (the "Asset Value Adjustment Date"), if the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is positive, the Buyer shall (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13 the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Company Stockholders in accordance with Section 1.8 the remainder of such Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, subject to the provisions of Section 1.10, not deposited into escrow. (iii) On the date which is 18 months after Closing Date and is before the payment on any claims under the Escrow Agreement, the Buyer shall (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13 the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Company Stockholders in accordance with Section 1.8 the remainder of such Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, subject to the provisions of Section 1.10, not deposited into escrow. (e) Each Company Share held in the Company's treasury immediately prior to the Effective Time and each Company Share owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary shall be cancelled and retired without payment of any consideration therefor. (f) Each share of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Transitory Subsidiary issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be converted into and thereafter evidence one share of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Surviving Corporation. (g) Each Preferred Warrant outstanding and not exercised as of the Effective Time shall be converted into a warrant to acquire such number of shares of Buyer Common Shares equal to the number of shares of Buyer Common Shares that would be issusable pursuant to Section 1.5(b), if the warrant were exercised immediately before the Effective Time for Preferred Shares. The exercise price per Buyer Common Share shall equal the aggregate exercise price of such warrant divided by the number of Buyer Common Shares subject to such Preferred Warrants. The aggregate Option Value of the Preferred Warrants outstanding and not exercised as of the Effective Time (whether vested or exercisable) shall be added to the Preferred Consideration for all purposes of this Agreement. 1.6 Management Shares. (a) Each member of the Company's management named in Schedule I attached hereto (each a "Management Participant" and collectively the "Management Participants") shall have the right to receive as of the Effective Time (subject to Sections 1.13 and 1.6(b)) the number of Buyer Common Shares which have a Market Value equal to the excess, if any, of (x) such Management Participant's Bonus Pool Percentage of the Bonus Pool minus, (y) such Management Participant's Stockholder Payment (the "Management Shares"), it being understood that such calculation is dependent on the Common Conversion Ratio which is dependent on the definition of Management Shares and is an iterative calculation. (b) Of the Management Shares which each Management Participant shall have the right to receive as of the Effective Time pursuant to Section 1.6(a): (i) On the Closing Date the Buyer shall (A) deposit with the Escrow Agent the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of such Management Shares, calculated using the Closing Common Conversion Ratio, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares and deposited in escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a) and (B) deliver the -3-
remainder of such Management Shares, calculated using the Closing Common Conversion Ratio, not deposited into escrow (the "Initial Management Shares") to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Management Participants in accordance with 1.9. (ii) On the Asset Value Adjustment Date, if the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is positive, the Buyer shall (A) deposit with the Escrow Agent the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of such Management Shares, calculated using the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares and deposited in escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a), and (B) deliver the remainder of such Management Shares not deposited into escrow to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Management Participants in accordance with 1.9; in each case, less any Management Shares delivered to the Escrow Agent and the Management Participants, as the case may be, pursuant to Section 1.6(b)(i). (iii) On the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date, the Buyer shall (A) deposit with the Escrow Agent the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of any Management Shares not delivered pursuant to Section 1.6(b)(i) or 1.6(b)(ii), rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares and deposited in escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a), and (B) deliver the remainder of any such Management Shares not deposited into escrow (or delivered to the Management Participants pursuant to Sections 1.6(b)(i) or 1.6(b)(ii)) to the Exchange Agent for distribution to the Management Participants in accordance with Section 1.9; provided, however, that if any Management Participant has received (or has had deposited into Escrow) Buyer Common Shares pursuant to this Section 1.6(b) which exceeds such Management Participants' Management Shares, the Management Participant shall promptly return any such excess shares to the Buyer. 1.7 Dissenting Shares. (a) Dissenting Shares shall not be converted into or represent the right to receive Buyer Common Shares, unless the Company Stockholder holding such Dissenting Shares shall have forfeited his, her or its right to appraisal under each of the Delaware General Corporation Law and the California Corporations Code or properly withdrawn, his, her or its demand for appraisal. If such Company Stockholder has so forfeited or withdrawn his, her or its right to appraisal of Dissenting Shares, then as of the occurrence of such event, such holder's Dissenting Shares shall cease to be Dissenting Shares and shall be converted into and represent the right to receive the Buyer Common Shares issuable in respect of such Company Shares pursuant to Section 1.5, which Buyer Common Shares shall be either deposited with the Escrow Agent or distributed to the Company Stockholder holding Dissenting Shares as provided in Section 1.5(d). (b) The Company shall give the Buyer (i) prompt notice of any written demands for appraisal of any Company Shares, withdrawals of such demands, and any other instruments that relate to such demands received by the Company and (ii) the opportunity to direct all negotiations and proceedings with respect to demands for appraisal under the Delaware General Corporation Law or the California Corporations Code, as applicable. The Company shall not, except with the prior written consent of the Buyer, make any payment with respect to any demands for appraisal of Company Shares or offer to settle or settle any such demands. 1.8 Exchange of Shares. (a) At or prior to the Effective Time, the Buyer shall appoint the Exchange Agent to effect the issuance of Initial Merger Shares in exchange for Certificates. On the Closing Date, the Buyer shall deliver instructions to the Exchange Agent to establish a reserve account for the distribution of -4-
certificates representing the Initial Merger Shares issuable to the Company Stockholders, as described in Section 1.5, and cash for any fractional shares as described in Section 1.10 (the "Exchange Fund"). Within five (5) business days after the Effective Time, provided that the Company has delivered to the Buyer at least five (5) business days prior to the Effective Time a list setting forth (i) the name of each holder of a Certificate, (ii) the mailing address of each such holder, (iii) the number of Company Shares represented by each Certificate held by each holder prior to the Effective Time and (iv) the total number of shares of Buyer Common Stock represented by such Certificate following the Effective Time, the Buyer shall cause the Exchange Agent to send to each holder of a Certificate a notice and a transmittal in substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit C advising such holder of the effectiveness of the Merger and the procedure for surrendering to the Exchange Agent such Certificate in exchange for the Initial Merger Shares issuable to such holder pursuant to Section 1.5. Each holder of a Certificate, upon proper surrender thereof to the Exchange Agent in accordance with the instructions in such notice, shall be entitled to receive in exchange therefor (subject to any Taxes required to be withheld) the Initial Merger Shares issuable pursuant to Section 1.5 plus cash in lieu of any fractional shares, as provided in Section 1.10 below. The Buyer shall instruct the Exchange Agent to distribute the Initial Merger Shares and cash in lieu of fractional shares to such holder as soon as practicable after receipt of such Certificate and such other documents required by such notice. Until properly surrendered, each such Certificate shall be deemed for all purposes to evidence only the right to receive a certificate for the Initial Merger Shares issuable pursuant to Section 1.5. Holders of Certificates shall not be entitled to receive certificates for the Initial Merger Shares to which they would otherwise be entitled until such Certificates are properly surrendered. (b) If any Initial Merger Shares are to be issued in the name of a person other than the person in whose name the Certificate surrendered in exchange therefor is registered, it shall be a condition to the issuance of such Initial Merger Shares that (i) the Certificate so surrendered shall be transferable, and shall be properly assigned, endorsed or accompanied by appropriate stock powers, (ii) such transfer shall otherwise be proper and (iii) the person requesting such transfer shall pay to the Exchange Agent any transfer or other Taxes payable by reason of the foregoing or establish to the satisfaction of the Exchange Agent that such Taxes have been paid or are not required to be paid. Notwithstanding the foregoing, neither the Exchange Agent nor any Party shall be liable to a holder of Company Shares for any Initial Merger Shares issuable to such holder pursuant to Section 1.5 that are delivered to a public official pursuant to applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar laws. (c) In the event any Certificate shall have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming such Certificate to be lost, stolen or destroyed, the Exchange Agent shall issue in exchange for such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate the Initial Merger Shares issuable in exchange therefor pursuant to Section 1.5. The Exchange Agent may, in its discretion and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate to give the Exchange Agent and the Buyer a bond in such sum as it may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the Exchange Agent or the Buyer with respect to the Certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed. (d) No dividends or other distributions that are payable to the holders of record of Buyer Common Shares as of a date on or after the Closing Date shall be paid to former Company Stockholders entitled by reason of the Merger to receive Initial Merger Shares until such holders surrender their Certificates for certificates representing the Merger Shares. Upon such surrender, the Buyer shall pay or deliver to the persons in whose name the certificates representing such Initial Merger Shares are issued any dividends or other distributions that are payable to the holders of record of Buyer Common Shares as of a date on or after the Closing Date and which were paid or delivered between the Effective Time and the time of such surrender; provided that no such person shall be entitled to receive any interest on such dividends or other distributions. -5-
(e) By demand, at any time after the first anniversary of the Effective Time, the Buyer may require that any portion of the Exchange Fund which remains undistributed to the Company Stockholders or Management Participants at such time shall be delivered to the Buyer and any Company Stockholder or Management Participant who has not previously complied with this Section 1.8 shall thereafter look only to the Buyer, as a general unsecured creditor, for payment of its claim for Buyer Common Shares, any cash in lieu of fractional Buyer Common Shares and any dividends or distributions with respect to Buyer Common Shares. (f) To the extent permitted by applicable law, none of the Buyer, the Transitory Subsidiary, the Company, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent shall be liable to any Company Stockholder or any Management Participant, as the case may be, for any Buyer Common Shares (or dividends or distributions with respect thereto) delivered to a public official pursuant to any applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar law. If any Certificate or required letter of transmittal shall not have been surrendered or delivered prior to the third anniversary of the Effective Time (or immediately prior to such earlier date on which any Buyer Common Shares, and any cash payable to any Company Stockholder or Management Participant or any dividends or distributions payable to the holder of such Buyer Common Shares pursuant to this Article I would otherwise escheat to or become the property of any Governmental Entity), any such Buyer Common Shares or cash, dividends or distributions in respect thereof shall, to the extent permitted by applicable law, become the property of the Surviving Corporation, free and clear of all claims or interest of any person previously entitled thereto. 1.9 Issuance of Management Shares. The Buyer shall deliver instructions to the Exchange Agent to distribute certificates representing the Management Shares to the Management Participants, as described in Section 1.6(b). As soon as practicable after the applicable date on which the Buyer is required to deliver the Management Shares pursuant to Section 1.6(b), the Exchange Agent shall deliver to the Management Participants the Management Shares issuable pursuant to Section 1.6(b). 1.10 Fractional Shares. No certificates or scrip representing fractional Merger Shares shall be issued to Company Stockholders upon the surrender for exchange of Certificates, and such Company Stockholders shall not be entitled to any voting rights, rights to receive any dividends or distributions or other rights as a stockholder of the Buyer with respect to any fractional Merger Shares that would have otherwise been issued to such Company Stockholders. In lieu of any fractional Merger Shares that would have otherwise been issued, each Company Stockholder that would have been entitled to receive a fractional Merger Share shall, upon proper surrender of such person's Certificates, receive a cash payment equal to the closing price of the Buyer Common Shares on the NASDAQ Stock Market on the day immediately preceding the Closing multiplied by the fraction of a share that such Company Stockholder would otherwise be entitled to receive. 1.11 Options and Warrants. (a) As of the Effective Time, all Options, whether vested or unvested, and the Option Plan, insofar as it relates to Options outstanding under such Plan as of the Closing, shall be assumed by the Buyer. Immediately after the Effective Time, each Option outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be deemed to constitute an option to acquire, on the same terms and conditions as were applicable under such Option at the Effective Time, such number of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the number of Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of such Option multiplied by the Common Conversion Ratio (with any fraction resulting from such multiplication to be rounded down to the nearest whole number) (each such Option an "Assumed Option"). The exercise price per share of each Assumed Option shall be equal to the exercise price of such Option immediately prior to the Effective Time, divided by the Common Conversion Ratio (rounded up to the nearest whole cent). The term, exercisability, vesting schedule, status as an "incentive stock option" under Section 422 of the -6-
Code, if applicable, and all of the other terms of the Options shall otherwise remain unchanged, except as provided in Section 1.11(f) below, and except that by virtue of the Merger each Option shall be amended to the extent set forth in Section 4 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement with respect to the deposit of Indemnification Escrow Shares and the forfeiture of unexercised portions of any Assumed Options. (b) Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain the agreement of each holder of a Warrant or Preferred Warrant to exercise, no later than immediately prior to the Effective Time, all vested Warrants and to terminate, as of such time, all unvested Warrants. As of the Effective Time, all Warrants, whether vested or unvested, not so exercised shall be assumed by the Buyer. Immediately after the Effective Time, each Warrant outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be deemed to constitute a warrant to acquire, on the same terms and conditions as were applicable under such Warrant at the Effective Time, such number of shares of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the number of Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of such Warrant multiplied by the Common Conversion Ratio (with any fraction resulting from such multiplication to be rounded down to the nearest whole number) (each such Warrant an "Assumed Warrant"). The exercise price per share of each such Assumed Warrant shall be equal to the exercise price of such Warrant immediately prior to the Effective Time, divided by the Common Conversion Ratio (rounded up to the nearest whole cent). The term, exercisability, vesting schedule, and all of the other terms of the Warrant shall otherwise remain unchanged, except as provided in Section 1.11(f) below, and except that by virtue of the Merger each Warrant shall be amended to the extent set forth in Section 4 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement with respect to the deposit of Indemnification Escrow Shares and the forfeiture of unexercised portions of any Assumed Warrants. (c) As soon as practicable after the Effective Time, the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation shall deliver to the holders of Options and Warrants appropriate notices setting forth such holders' rights pursuant to such Options or Warrants, as applicable, as amended by this Section 1.11, and the agreements evidencing such Options or Warrants, as applicable, and that such Options or Warrants shall continue in effect on the same terms and conditions (subject to the amendments provided for in this Section 1.11, the Indemnification Escrow Agreement and such notice). (d) The Buyer shall take all corporate action necessary to reserve for issuance a sufficient number of shares of Buyer Common Shares for delivery upon exercise of the Options and Warrants assumed in accordance with this Section 1.11. As promptly as practicable after the Effective Time, but in no event later than the date on which the Buyer has filed pursuant to Form 8-K the financial statements required to be filed by the Buyer in connection with the Merger pursuant to Regulation S-X of the Securities Act in connection with the Merger, the Buyer shall file a Registration Statement on Form S-8 (or any successor form) under the Securities Act with respect to all shares of Buyer Common Shares subject to the Options that may be registered on a Form S-8, and shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to maintain the effectiveness of such Registration Statement for so long as such Options remain outstanding. The Buyer Common Shares subject to the Warrants will be tradeable at such time as they become eligible for resale pursuant to Rule 144 under the Securities Act. (e) The Company shall obtain, prior to the Closing, the consent from each holder of an Option (other than holders of Options representing, in the aggregate, less than 3% of the Total Company Shares) or a Warrant to the amendment of such Option or Warrant pursuant to the Indemnification Escrow Agreement and Sections 1.11 and 1.13(a) and Article VI of this Agreement (unless such consent is not required under the terms of the applicable agreement, instrument or plan). (f) Each Assumed Option and Assumed Warrant (collectively, the "Assumed Convertible Securities" and individually an "Assumed Convertible Security") shall be subject to the following provisions: -7-
(i) Upon the exercise of an Assumed Convertible Security after the Closing Date and before the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date, the Buyer shall (A) deliver to the Escrow Agent a certificate representing the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Buyer Common Shares acquired in such exercise, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares and deposited in escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a), and (B) deliver to the holder of such Assumed Convertible Security a certificate representing the remainder of the Buyer Common Shares acquired in such exercise and not deposited into escrow, which Buyer Common Shares shall be considered Initial Merger Shares for all purposes of this Agreement. (ii) At any time before the Asset Value Adjustment Date, each Assumed Convertible Security shall (x) only be exercisable for a number of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the number of Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of such corresponding Option or Warrant multiplied by the Closing Common Conversion Ratio (with any fraction resulting from such multiplication to be rounded down to the nearest whole number) and (y) have an exercise price per share equal to the exercise price of such corresponding Option or Warrant immediately prior to the Effective Time, divided by the Closing Common Conversion Ratio (rounded up to the nearest whole cent). (iii) On the Asset Value Adjustment Date, if the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is positive, the Buyer shall with respect to each Exercised Share (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a) the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the person who exercised the Assumed Convertible Security related to such Exercised Shares the remainder of such Adjusted Buyer Common Shares not deposited into escrow. (iv) At any time after the Asset Value Adjustment Date and before the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date, each Assumed Convertible Security shall (x) only be exercisable for a number of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the number of Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of such corresponding Option or Warrant multiplied by the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio (with any fraction resulting from such multiplication to be rounded down to the nearest whole number) and (y) have an exercise price per share equal to the exercise price of such corresponding Option or Warrant immediately prior to the Effective Time, divided by the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio (rounded up to the nearest whole cent). (v) On the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date and immediately before the payment of any claims under the Escrow Agreement, the Buyer shall with respect to each Exercised Share (A) deposit into escrow pursuant to Section 1.13(a) the Indemnification Escrow Percentage of the Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares, rounded up to the nearest whole number, which shares shall be designated as Indemnification Escrow Shares, and (B) deliver to the person who exercised the Assumed Convertible Security related to such Exercised Shares the remainder of such Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares not deposited into escrow. (vi) Assumed Convertible Securities shall be amended to reduce the number of Buyer Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of any Assumed Convertible Security by such Assumed Convertible Security's percentage share of any Damages subject to indemnification, as follows: (A) Immediately prior to any distributions made pursuant to Section 3 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement, each Assumed Convertible Security shall be split into two securities, the "Escrow Assumed Convertible Security" and the "Free Assumed Convertible Security". The Escrow Assumed Convertible Security shall have an Option Merger Value equal to 15% of the Option Merger Value of the Assumed Convertible Security, and the remaining Assumed Convertible -8-
Security shall be the Free Assumed Convertible Security, which shall no longer be subject to the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. If, after any forfeiture is made pursuant to clause (B) below of the unexercised portion of such Escrow Assumed Convertible Security attributable to Damages distributed to the Buyer in respect of any claims for indemnification by the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof, the Escrow Assumed Convertible Security has an Option Merger Value in excess of the 5% of the Option Merger Value of the Assumed Convertible Security before any amounts in respect of Damages were paid, then the Escrow Assumed Convertible Security shall be reduced by the amount of such excess Option Merger Value and the Free Assumed Convertible Security shall be increased by a like amount. If an Escrow Assumed Convertible Security is exercised after the Initial Distribution Date, 100% of the Buyer Common Shares acquired upon exercise of such option shall be deposited into escrow and held in trust for the holder of such exercised Escrow Assumed Convertible Security. (B) Upon any determination that the Buyer is entitled to receive some or all of the Indemnification Escrow Shares through a distribution in respect of Damages made pursuant to Section 3 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement, each holder of an Escrow Assumed Convertible Security shall forfeit that amount of the unexercised portion of such Escrow Assumed Convertible Security equal in value to such holder's "pro rata share" of such Damages. Such holder's pro rata share of such Damages shall be determined by dividing (x) the Option Merger Value of such holder's Escrow Assumed Convertible Security immediately before the distribution in respect of Damages is made by (y) the Aggregate Escrow Value immediately before such distribution is made. Any forfeitures hereunder shall be applied against the Assumed Convertible Security on a pro rata basis against the vested and unvested portion of the Assumed Convertible Security. 1.12 Adjustment Before and After the Closing. The Base Purchase Price shall be subject to adjustment as follows: (a) Not later than three business days prior to the Closing Date, the Company shall prepare and deliver to the Buyer a balance sheet of the Company as of a date (the "Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet Date") within five business days of the Closing Date (the "Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet"). The Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet shall be prepared in accordance with the provisions relating to the preparation of the Closing Balance Sheet set forth in this Section 1.12. The Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet shall be accompanied by (i) all relevant backup materials and schedules, in detail reasonably acceptable to the Buyer, and (ii) a statement setting forth the amount, if any, by which the estimated Net Asset Value is greater than, or less than, the Target Amount (the "Preliminary Net Asset Value"). In calculating the Preliminary Net Asset Value, the Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet shall include (A) as liabilities the full amount of the transaction fees and expenses payable by the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including legal and accounting fees, to the extent such transaction fees and expenses have not been paid prior to the date of the Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet; and (B) reserves in respect of Taxes due with respect to periods ending (or deemed to end pursuant to Section 8.3(b) hereof) at or prior to the Effective Time determined in accordance with GAAP. The Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet shall be accompanied by a statement setting forth the calculations showing the basis for the determination of such sums. If the Preliminary Net Asset Value on the Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet is (i) greater than the Target Amount, then the difference shall be added to the Base Purchase Price, or (ii) less than the Target Amount, then the difference shall be deducted from the Base Purchase Price (the Base Purchase Price, as so adjusted, is referred to as the "Preliminary Base Purchase Price"). (b) Not later than 60 calendar days after the Closing Date, the Buyer shall deliver to the Representative the Closing Balance Sheet. The Closing Balance Sheet shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP applied consistently with the Company's past practices (to the extent such past -9-
practices are consistent with GAAP), except that the Closing Balance Sheet may exclude all footnotes, subject to the adjustments set forth in this Section 1.12 (which shall be in addition to and not in lieu of those required by GAAP) and shall be certified as such by the Buyer. (c) The Closing Balance Sheet delivered pursuant to paragraph (a) above shall be accompanied by (i) all relevant backup materials and schedules, in detail reasonably acceptable to the Representative, and (ii) a statement setting forth the amount, if any, by which the Net Asset Value (plus the amount of Covered Costs in excess of the Cost Cap to be borne by the Buyer pursuant to Section 10.1(g), if applicable) is greater than, or less than, the Preliminary Net Asset Value. In calculating the Net Asset Value, the Closing Balance Sheet shall include (A) as liabilities the full amount of the transaction fees and expenses payable by the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including legal and accounting fees, to the extent such transaction fees and expenses were not paid prior to the Effective Time; and (B) reserves in respect of Taxes due with respect to periods ending (or deemed to end pursuant to Section 8.3(b) hereof) at or prior to the Effective Time determined in accordance with GAAP. The Closing Balance Sheet shall be accompanied by a statement setting forth the calculations showing the basis for the determination of such sums. (d) In the event that the Representative disputes the Closing Balance Sheet or the calculation of the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment, the Representative shall notify the Buyer in writing (the "Dispute Notice") of the amount, nature and basis of such dispute, within 30 calendar days after delivery of the Closing Balance Sheet. In the event of such a dispute, the Buyer and the Representative shall first use his, her or its diligent good faith efforts to resolve such dispute among themselves. If the Buyer and the Representative are unable to resolve the dispute within 30 calendar days after delivery of the Dispute Notice, then any remaining items in dispute shall be submitted to an independent nationally recognized accounting firm selected in writing by the Representative and the Buyer or, if the Representative and the Buyer fail or refuse to select a firm within 10 calendar days after written request therefor by the Representative or the Buyer, such an independent nationally recognized accounting firm shall be selected in accordance with the rules of the Boston, Massachusetts office of the AAA (the "Neutral Accountant"). All determinations pursuant to this paragraph (d) shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the Buyer and the Representative. The determination of the Neutral Accountant as to the resolution of any dispute shall be binding and conclusive upon all Parties. A judgment on the determination made by the Neutral Accountant pursuant to this Section 1.12 may be entered in and enforced by any court having jurisdiction thereover. (e) The fees and expenses of the Neutral Accountant in connection with the resolution of disputes pursuant to paragraph (c) above shall be shared equally by the Equity Holders, on the one hand, and the Buyer, on the other hand; provided that if the Neutral Accountant determines that one such party has adopted a position or positions with respect to the Closing Balance Sheet or the calculation of the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment that is frivolous or clearly without merit, the Neutral Accountant may, in its discretion, assign a greater portion of any such fees and expenses to such party. Any such fees and expenses that are the responsibility of the Equity Holders pursuant to this paragraph (e) shall be funded from the Indemnification Escrow Shares. (f) Immediately upon the expiration of the 30-day period for giving the Dispute Notice, if no such notice is given, or upon notification by the Representative to the Buyer, that no such notice will be given, or immediately upon the resolution of disputes, if any, pursuant to this Section 1.12, the Preliminary Base Purchase Price shall be adjusted as follows (as so adjusted, the "Adjusted Base Purchase Price"): (i) If the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is negative, such deficiency shall be deducted from the Preliminary Base Purchase Price to obtain the Adjusted Base Purchase Price, -10-
and the Buyer shall be entitled to recover such deficiency pursuant to the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement; (ii) If the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is zero, the Adjusted Base Purchase Price shall be equal to the Preliminary Base Purchase Price; and (iii) If the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is positive, such surplus shall be added to the Preliminary Base Purchase Price to obtain the Adjusted Base Purchase Price, and the Buyer shall deliver to the Exchange Agent Buyer Common Shares as provided in Section 1.5(d)(ii) hereof. 1.13 Escrow Arrangements. (a) On the Closing Date, the Buyer shall deliver to the Escrow Agent a certificate (issued in the name of the Escrow Agent or its nominee) representing the Indemnification Escrow Shares issuable pursuant to Sections 1.5(d) and 1.6(b)(i). The Indemnification Escrow Shares will be held in escrow for the purpose of (i) providing security for any adjustment to the amount of the Preliminary Base Purchase Price pursuant to Section 1.12 and (ii) securing the indemnification obligations of the Equity Holders set forth in Section 6.1. The Indemnification Escrow Shares shall be held by the Escrow Agent under the Indemnification Escrow Agreement pursuant to the terms thereof. The Indemnification Escrow Shares shall be held as a trust fund and shall not be subject to any lien, attachment, trustee process or any other judicial process of any creditor of any party, and shall be held and disbursed solely for the purposes and in accordance with the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. Equity Holders shall have the right to receive cash dividends (in conjunction with any general distribution of cash dividends made by the Buyer with respect to all Buyer Common Shares) with respect to any issued Indemnification Escrow Shares held on their behalf. The Representative shall have the right to vote any issued Indemnification Escrow Shares by instructing the Escrow Agent in accordance with the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. (b) The execution of this Agreement by the Representative and the adoption of this Agreement and approval of the Merger by the Company Stockholders shall constitute approval of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement and of all of the arrangements relating thereto, including the placement of the Indemnification Escrow Shares in escrow. 1.14 Representative. (a) In order to efficiently administer the transactions contemplated hereby, including (i) the determination of the Net Asset Value and Adjusted Base Purchase Price and (ii) the defense and/or settlement of any claims for which the Equity Holders may be required to indemnify the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof, the Company Stockholders, by the approval of the Merger and adoption of this Agreement, the holders of Options or Warrants by executing amendments to such Options or Warrants, as applicable, pursuant to Section 1.11(f) hereof, the Principal Stockholders, by their execution of the Stockholder Agreement, and the Management Participants, by their execution of the Management Participant Agreement, shall each be deemed to have designated the Representative as their representative. (b) The Company Stockholders, by the approval of the Merger and adoption of this Agreement, and the holders of Options or Warrants by executing amendments to such Options or Warrants, as applicable, pursuant to Section 1.11(f) hereof, shall each be deemed to have authorized the Representative (i) to make all decisions relating to the determination of the Net Asset Value and the Adjusted Base Purchase Price, (ii) to take all action necessary in connection with the defense and/or -11-
settlement of any claims for which the Company Stockholders may be required to indemnify the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof, (iii) after the Effective Time, to give and receive all notices required to be given under the Agreement, and (iv) to take any and all additional action as is contemplated or permitted by this Agreement or the Indemnification Escrow Agreement to be taken by or on behalf of the Equity Holders. (c) The Buyer shall be able to rely conclusively on the instructions and decisions of the Representative as to the determination of the Net Asset Value and the Adjusted Base Purchase Price, the settlement of any claims for indemnification by the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof or any other actions required or contemplated or permitted to be taken by the Representative hereunder, and no party shall have any cause of action against the Buyer for any action taken by the Buyer in reliance upon the instructions or decisions of the Representative. (d) The Representative will have the right to act as the representative of the Equity Holders, and to act on behalf of the Equity Holders and to take any and all actions required or permitted to be taken by the Representative under this Agreement, with respect to any claims (including payment thereof) made pursuant to Section 6.1 and with respect to any actions to be taken by the Representative pursuant to the terms of the Escrow Agreement. All decisions and actions by the Representative, including without limitation any agreement between the Representative and the Buyer relating to the determination of the Net Asset Value and the Adjusted Base Purchase Price or the defense or settlement of any claims for which the Equity Holders may be required to indemnify the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII hereof, shall be binding upon all of the Equity Holders, and no Equity Holder shall have the right to object, dissent, protest or otherwise contest the same. (e) The Representative (or any of the directors, officers, agents, employees or Affiliates thereof) shall incur no liability to the Equity Holders with respect to any action taken or suffered by the Representative in reliance upon any notice, direction, instruction, consent, statement, or other document believed by the Representative to be genuinely and duly authorized, nor for any other action or inaction with respect to distributions of the Indemnification Escrow Shares, any defense or settlement of any claims, and the making of payments with respect thereto, nor with respect to voting or failing to vote the Indemnification Escrow Shares, except to the extent resulting from the Representative's own willful misconduct or gross negligence. The Representative may, in all questions arising under this Agreement, rely on the advice of counsel, and for anything done, omitted, or suffered in good faith by the Representative in reliance on such advice, shall not be liable to the Equity Holders. (f) In the event that the Representative dies or becomes unable to perform his, her or its responsibilities as the Representative or resigns from such position, Trinity Ventures shall appoint a new Representative, and if within 30 days of such death, inability to perform his, her or its responsibilities or resignation of the Representative, Trinity Ventures fails to appoint a new Representative, the Equity Holders receiving an aggregate of greater than 50% of the Adjusted Merger Consideration shall select another representative to fill such vacancy and such substituted representative shall be deemed to be the Representative for all purposes of this Agreement. (g) The Buyer and the Surviving Corporation shall be entitled to rely conclusively on a certificate from the Representative with respect to any action taken by the Representative, and no party shall have any cause of action against the Buyer for any action taken by the Buyer in reliance upon such a certificate from the Representative. (h) The Company Stockholders, by the approval of the Merger and adoption of this Agreement, and the holders of Options or Warrants by executing amendments to such Options or Warrants, as applicable, pursuant to Section (a) hereof, shall -12-
each be deemed to (i) agree and authorize the Escrow Agent to withhold from the Indemnification Escrow Shares, if any, otherwise payable to the Equity Holders under the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement a number of shares having a value (using a price of $12.50 per share) equal to the reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable professional fees) incurred by, or reasonably anticipated by the Representative to be incurred by, the Representative in connection with the representation of the Equity Holders in any proceeding arising out of this Agreement (including all matters concerning claims for indemnification under Article VI or Article VIII of this Agreement) or the transactions or agreements related hereto (the "Representative Fees"); (ii) agree and authorize the Representative to withhold Buyer Common Shares (valued at $12.50 per share) evidencing the Representative Fees from any shares otherwise issuable to the Equity Holders pursuant to Section 1.12 hereof (to the extent such fees are not withheld from the Escrow Shares); and (iii) agree to reimburse the Representative for the Representative Fees. (i) The provisions of this Section 1.14 are independent and severable, are irrevocable and coupled with an interest and shall be enforceable notwithstanding any rights or remedies that any Equity Holder may have in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Remedies available at law for any breach of the provisions of this Section 1.14 are inadequate; therefore, the Buyer and the Surviving Corporation shall be entitled to temporary and permanent injunctive relief without the necessity of proving damages if either the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation brings an action to enforce the provisions of this Section 1.14. The provisions of this Section 1.14 shall be binding upon the executors, heirs, legal representatives, personal representatives, successors and permitted assigns of each Equity Holder, and any references in this Agreement to a Equity Holder or the Equity Holders shall mean and include the successors to the Equity Holder's rights hereunder, whether pursuant to testamentary disposition, the laws of descent and distribution or otherwise. 1.15 Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws (a) The Certificate of Incorporation of the Surviving Corporation immediately following the Effective Time shall be the same as the Certificate of Incorporation of the Transitory Subsidiary immediately prior to the Effective Time, except that (i) the name of the corporation set forth therein shall be changed to the name of the Company and (ii) the identity of the incorporator shall be deleted. (b) The By-laws of the Surviving Corporation immediately following the Effective Time shall be the same as the By-laws of the Transitory Subsidiary immediately prior to the Effective Time, except that the name of the corporation set forth therein shall be changed to the name of the Company. 1.16 No Further Rights. From and after the Effective Time, no Company Shares shall be deemed to be outstanding, and holders of Certificates shall cease to have any rights with respect thereto, except as provided herein or by law. 1.17 Closing of Transfer Books. At the Effective Time, the stock transfer books of the Company shall be closed and no transfer of Company Shares shall thereafter be made. If, after the Effective Time, Certificates are presented to the Buyer, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent, they shall be cancelled and exchanged for Initial Merger Shares in accordance with Section 1.5, subject to Section 1.12 and to applicable law in the case of Dissenting Shares. 1.18 Withholding Obligations. Each of the Buyer and the Surviving Corporation shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from the consideration otherwise payable pursuant to any provision of this Agreement to any Equity Holders such amounts as it reasonably determines that it is required to deduct -13-
and withhold with respect to the making of such payment under the Code, or any other applicable U.S. or foreign law, rule or regulation. The Buyer or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, shall timely pay over such withheld amounts to the appropriate Governmental Entity on behalf of the Equity Holders from whom such amounts are withheld in accordance with the Code or such other applicable U.S. or foreign law, rule, or regulation. To the extent that amounts are so withheld by the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, such withheld amounts shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the Equity Holders in respect of which such deduction and withholding was made by the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be. The Buyer shall also have the right to collect Forms W-8 or W-9, or such other forms relating to United States federal withholding obligations as may be applicable, from the Equity Holders. Each Equity Holder from whom the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation is required to withhold shall indemnify and hold harmless the Buyer, the Surviving Corporation and their respective Affiliates from and against any and all Taxes (but, for the purposes of this Section 1.18, the term "Taxes" shall not include any penalty or interest) incurred or suffered by any of them as a result of or relating to the calculation or payment (including without limitation any errors in the calculation or failure to make any payment) of any amounts required to be withheld from such Equity Holder and/or paid to any Governmental Entity in respect of payment of the Merger Consideration or Management Shares to such Equity Holder or in respect of the exercise of any Options or Warrants held by such Equity Holder and the payment of the Option/Warrant Consideration in connection with the Merger. ARTICLE II REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE COMPANY The Company represents and warrants to the Buyer that, except as set forth in the Disclosure Schedule, the statements contained in this Article II are true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and will be true and correct as of the Closing as though made as of the Closing, except to the extent such representations and warranties are specifically made as of a particular date (in which case such representations and warranties will be true and correct as of such date). The Disclosure Schedule shall be arranged in sections and paragraphs corresponding to the numbered and lettered sections and paragraphs contained in this Article II, and the disclosures in any section or paragraph of the Disclosure Schedule shall qualify only (a) the corresponding section or paragraph in this Article II and (b) other sections or paragraphs in this Article II to the extent that it is reasonably clear from a reading of the disclosure that such disclosure also qualifies or applies to such other section or paragraph. 2.1 Organization, Qualification and Corporate Power. The Company is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in corporate and Tax good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware. The Company is duly qualified to conduct business and is in corporate and Tax good standing under the laws of each jurisdiction listed in Section 2.1 of the Disclosure Schedule, which jurisdictions constitute the only jurisdictions in which the nature of the Company's businesses or the ownership or leasing of its properties requires such qualification. The Company has all requisite power and authority to carry on the businesses in which it is engaged and to own and use the properties owned and used by it. The Company has furnished to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of its charter and by-laws, each as amended to date. The Company is not in default under or in violation of any provision of its charter or by-laws. 2.2 Capitalization. (a) The authorized capital stock of the Company consists of (i) 400,000,000 Common Shares, of which, as of the date of this Agreement, 38,645,605 shares were issued and outstanding and 3,729,109 shares were held in the treasury of the Company, and (ii) 222,824,205 Preferred Shares, of which (A) 7,523,366 shares have been designated as Series A Convertible Preferred -14-
Stock, of which, as of the date of this Agreement, 7,433,330 shares were issued and outstanding, (B) 122,463,448 shares have been designated as Series B Convertible Preferred Stock, of which, as of the date of this Agreement, 110,189,329 shares were issued and outstanding, and (C) 92,837,391 shares have been designated as Series C Convertible Preferred Stock, of which, as of the date of this Agreement, 86,866,934 shares were issued and outstanding. (b) Section 2.2(b) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list, as of the date of the Agreement, of the holders of Company Shares, showing the number of shares and the class or series of such shares held by each Company Stockholder and (for shares other than Common Shares) the number of Common Shares (if any) into which such shares are convertible. Section 2.2(b) of the Disclosure Schedule also indicates all outstanding Company Shares that constitute restricted stock or that are otherwise subject to a repurchase or redemption right, indicating the name of the applicable stockholder, the vesting schedule (including any acceleration provisions with respect thereto), and the repurchase price payable by the Company. All of the issued and outstanding Company Shares have been and on the Closing Date will be duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable and free of all preemptive rights. All of the issued and outstanding Company Shares have been offered, issued and sold by the Company in compliance with all applicable federal and state securities laws. (c) Section 2.2(c) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list, as of the date of this Agreement, of: (i) all Company Stock Plans, indicating for each Company Stock Plan the number of Company Shares issued to date under such Plan, the number of Company Shares subject to outstanding options under such Plan and the number of Company Shares reserved for future issuance under such Plan, (ii) all holders of outstanding Options, indicating with respect to each Option the Company Stock Plan under which it was granted, the number of Company Shares subject to such Option, the exercise price, the date of grant, and the vesting schedule (including any acceleration provisions with respect thereto), and (iii) all holders of outstanding Warrants, indicating with respect to each Warrant the agreement or other document under which it was granted, the number of shares of capital stock, and the class or series of such shares, subject to such Warrant, the exercise price, the date of issuance and the expiration date thereof. The Company has provided to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of all Company Stock Plans and forms of all stock option agreements evidencing Options and all agreements evidencing Warrants. All of the Company Shares subject to Options and Warrants will be, upon issuance pursuant to the exercise of such instruments, duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable and free of all preemptive rights. (d) Except as set forth in Section 2.2(c) or 2.2(d) of the Disclosure Schedule, (i) no subscription, warrant, option, convertible security or other right (contingent or otherwise) to purchase or acquire any shares of capital stock of the Company is authorized or outstanding, (ii) the Company has no obligation (contingent or otherwise) to issue any subscription, warrant, option, convertible security or other such right, or to issue or distribute to holders of any shares of its capital stock any evidences of indebtedness or assets of the Company, (iii) the Company has no obligation (contingent or otherwise) to purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Company Shares or any interest therein or to pay any dividend or to make any other distribution in respect thereof, and (iv) there are no outstanding or authorized stock appreciation, phantom stock or similar rights with respect to the Company. (e) Except as set forth in Section 2.2(e) of the Disclosure Schedule, there is no agreement, written or oral, between the Company and any holder of its securities, or, to the Company's knowledge, among any holders of its securities, relating to the sale or transfer (including agreements relating to rights of first refusal, co sale rights or "drag along" rights), registration under the Securities Act, or voting, of the capital stock of the Company. -15-
(f) There are no claims by any stockholder or former stockholder of the Company, or any other person or entity (including any officer or director of the Company or any Subsidiary), seeking to assert, or based upon, any rights under the charter, by-laws or comparable organizational documents of the Company. 2.3 Authorization. The Company has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and to perform its respective obligations hereunder. The execution and delivery by the Company of this Agreement and the agreements provided for herein, and, subject to obtaining the Requisite Stockholder Approval, the performance by the Company of this Agreement and the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate and other action on the part of the Company. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Board of Directors of the Company, at a meeting duly called and held, by the unanimous vote of all directors (i) determined that the Merger is fair and in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders, (ii) adopted this Agreement in accordance with the provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law, and (iii) directed that this Agreement and the Merger be submitted to the stockholders of the Company for their adoption and approval and resolved to recommend that the stockholders of the Company vote in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger. This Agreement and all other agreements provided for herein have been or will be as of the Closing Date duly and validly executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes or will constitute a valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by general equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses. 2.4 Noncontravention. Subject to the filing of the Certificate of Merger as required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, to the filing requirements of the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, to the regulatory approvals, if any, required under Indian laws, and to the filing or other regulatory requirements of any other applicable U.S. or foreign regulatory body, neither the execution and delivery by the Company of this Agreement or any other agreement provided for herein, nor the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, will (a) conflict with or violate any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of the Company each as amended or restated to date, or the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws (or comparable organizational documents) of any Subsidiary each as amended or restated to date , (b) require on the part of the Company, any Subsidiary or any Company Stockholder or Management Participant any notice to or filing with, or any permit, authorization, consent or approval of, any Governmental Entity, (c) except as set forth in Section 2.4 of the Disclosure Schedule, conflict with, result in a breach of, constitute (with or without due notice or lapse of time or both) a default under, result in the acceleration of obligations under, create in any party the right to accelerate, terminate, modify or cancel, or require any notice, consent or waiver under, any contract, lease, sublease, license, sublicense, franchise, permit, indenture, agreement or mortgage for borrowed money, instrument of indebtedness, Security Interest or other arrangement to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any Subsidiary is bound or to which any of the assets of the Company or any Subsidiary are subject, (d) result in the imposition of any Security Interest upon any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary or (e) violate any order, writ, injunction, decree, statute, rule or regulation applicable to the Company, any Subsidiary, any Company Stockholder or Management Participant or any of their respective properties or assets. Section 2.4 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true, correct and complete list of all consents and approvals of third parties and Governmental Entities, and all filings and notices, that are required in connection with the consummation by the Company, the Company Stockholders and the Management Participants of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. -16-
2.5 Subsidiaries. (a) Section 2.5 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth: (i) the name of each Subsidiary; (ii) the number and type of outstanding equity securities of each Subsidiary and a list of the holders thereof; (iii) the jurisdiction of organization of each Subsidiary; (iv) the names of the officers and directors of each Subsidiary; and (v) the jurisdictions in which each Subsidiary is qualified or holds licenses to do business as a foreign corporation or other entity. (b) Each Subsidiary is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in corporate and Tax good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation. Each Subsidiary is duly qualified to conduct business and is in corporate and Tax good standing under the laws of each jurisdiction in which the nature of its businesses or the ownership or leasing of its properties requires such qualification. Each Subsidiary has all requisite power and authority to carry on the businesses in which it is engaged and to own and use the properties owned and used by it. The Company has delivered to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of each Subsidiary. No Subsidiary is in default under or in violation of any provision of its charter, by-laws or other organizational documents. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of each Subsidiary are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable and free of preemptive rights. All shares of each Subsidiary that are held of record or owned beneficially by either the Company or any Subsidiary are held or owned free and clear of any restrictions on transfer (other than restrictions under the Securities Act and state securities laws), claims, Security Interests, options, warrants, rights, contracts, calls, commitments, equities and demands. There are no outstanding or authorized options, warrants, rights, agreements or commitments to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or which are binding on any of them providing for the issuance, disposition or acquisition of any capital stock of any Subsidiary. There are no outstanding stock appreciation, phantom stock or similar rights with respect to any Subsidiary. There are no voting trusts, proxies or other agreements or understandings with respect to the voting of any capital stock of any Subsidiary. (c) The Company does not control directly or indirectly or have any direct or indirect equity participation or similar interest in any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust or other business association or entity which is not a Subsidiary. 2.6 Financial Statements. (a) The Company has provided to the Buyer the Financial Statements and the Current India Financial Statements. The Financial Statements have been prepared in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods covered thereby; provided, however, that the Financial Statements referred to in clause (b) of the definition of such term are subject to normal recurring year-end adjustments (which, individually and in the aggregate, will not be material) and do not include footnotes. (b) Each of the Financial Statements fairly presents the assets, liabilities, business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the Company as of the date thereof and for the period referred to therein, and is consistent with the books and records of the Company. The accruals for vacation expenses, severance payments and Taxes are accounted for on the Most Recent Balance Sheet and are adequate and properly reflect the expenses associated therewith in accordance with GAAP. The Current India Financial Statements fairly present the assets, liabilities, business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the India Subsidiary as of the date thereof and for the period referred to therein, and are consistent with the books and records of the India Subsidiary. -17-
(c) The Company maintains accurate books and records reflecting its assets and liabilities and maintains a system of internal accounting controls which provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed with management's authorization, (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of the financial statements of the Company and to maintain accountability for the Company's assets, (iii) access to assets of the Company is permitted only in accordance with management's authorization, (iv) the reporting of assets of the Company is compared with existing assets at regular intervals, and (v) accounts, notes and other receivables and inventory were recorded accurately, and proper and adequate procedures are implemented to effect the collection thereof on a current and timely basis. (d) Section 2.6(d) of the Disclosure Schedule lists, and the Company has delivered to the Buyer copies of the documentation creating or governing, all securitization transactions and "off-balance sheet arrangements" (as defined in Item 303 (a)(4) of Regulation S-K of the Securities and Exchange Commission) effected by the Company since June 30, 2001. Section 2.6(d) of the Disclosure Schedule lists all non-audit services performed by the Company's auditors for the Company since June 30, 2001. 2.7 Absence of Certain Changes. Since the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date, (a) there has occurred no event or development which, individually or in the aggregate, has had, or would, based on information then known to the Company, reasonably be expected to have in the future, a Company Material Adverse Effect, and (b) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has taken any of the actions set forth in paragraphs (a) through (t) of Section 4.5. 2.8 Undisclosed Liabilities. The Company does not have any liability (whether absolute or contingent, whether liquidated or unliquidated and whether due or to become due), except for (a) liabilities shown on the Most Recent Balance Sheet, a copy of which is attached to Section 2.8 of the Disclosure Schedule, (b) liabilities which have arisen since the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date in the Ordinary Course of Business and (c) contractual and other liabilities incurred in the Ordinary Course of Business which are not required by GAAP to be reflected on a balance sheet and that are not in the aggregate material. 2.9 Tax Matters. (a) The Company has filed on a timely basis all Tax Returns that it was required to file, and all such Tax Returns were complete and accurate. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is or has ever been a member of a group of corporations with which it has filed (or been required to file) consolidated, combined, unitary or similar Tax Returns, other than a group of which only the Company and the Subsidiaries are or were members. Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries has paid on a timely basis all Taxes that were due and payable whether or not shown on any Tax Return. The unpaid Taxes of the Company and the Subsidiaries for Tax periods through the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date do not exceed the accruals and reserves for Taxes (excluding accruals and reserves for deferred Taxes established to reflect timing differences between book and Tax income) set forth on the Most Recent Balance Sheet. All unpaid Taxes of the Company or any Subsidiary attributable to periods commencing after the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date arose in the Ordinary Course of Business and are similar in nature and amount to Taxes which arose during the comparable period of time in the immediate preceding fiscal year. All Taxes that the Company or any Subsidiary is or was required by law to withhold or collect have been duly withheld or collected and, to the extent required, have been paid to the proper Governmental Entity. (b) The Company has delivered or made available to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of all federal income Tax Returns, examination reports and statements of deficiencies -18-
assessed against or agreed to by the Company or any Subsidiary with respect to all taxable periods commencing on or after June 30, 2001 (or such earlier taxable periods with respect to which the applicable statute of limitations does not preclude the assessment of additional Tax). The U.S. federal income Tax Returns of the Company and each Subsidiary and the Tax Returns of the India Subsidiary under the Indian Income Tax Act, 1961, have been audited by the Internal Revenue Service or comparable Indian Governmental Entity or are closed by the applicable statute of limitations for all taxable years through the taxable year specified in Section 2.9(b) of the Disclosure Schedule. The Company has delivered or made available to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of all other Tax Returns of the Company and the Subsidiaries together with all related examination reports and statements of deficiency for all periods for which the applicable period for the assessment of the Tax has not been closed by any applicable statute of limitations. No examination or audit of any Tax Return of the Company or any Subsidiary by any Governmental Entity is currently in progress or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened or contemplated. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has been informed by any jurisdiction that the jurisdiction believes that the Company or Subsidiary was required to file any Tax Return that was not filed. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has waived any statute of limitations with respect to Taxes or agreed to an extension of time with respect to a Tax assessment or deficiency. (c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary: (i) has ever been a United States real property holding corporation within the meaning of Section 897(c)(2) of the Code during the applicable period specified in Section 897(c)(l)(A)(ii) of the Code; (ii) has made any payments, is obligated to make any payments, or is a party to any agreement that could obligate it to make any payments that may be treated as an "excess parachute payment" under Section 280G of the Code (determined without regard to Section 280G(b)(4) of the Code); (iii) has any actual or potential liability for any Taxes of any person (other than the Company or any Subsidiary) under Treasury Regulation Section 1.1502-6 (or any similar provision of federal, state, local, or foreign law), or as a transferee or successor, by contract, or otherwise; and (iv) is not or has never been required to make a basis reduction pursuant to Treasury Regulation Section 1.1502-20(b) or Treasury Regulation Section 1.337(d)-2(b). (d) None of the assets of the Company or any Subsidiary: (i) is "tax-exempt use property" within the meaning of Section 168(h) of the Code; or (ii) directly or indirectly secures any debt the interest on which is Tax exempt under Section 103(a) of the Code. (e) There are no adjustments under Section 481 of the Code (or any similar adjustments under any provision of the Code or the corresponding foreign, state or local Tax laws) that are required to be taken into account by the Company or any Subsidiary in any period ending after the Closing Date by reason of a change in method of accounting in any taxable period ending on or before the Closing Date. (f) Section 2.9(f) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the amount of any net operating loss, net capital loss, unused investment, foreign Tax or other credit, and excess charitable contribution allocable to the Company and each Subsidiary as of the most recent practicable date. (g) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has ever participated in an international boycott as defined in Section 999 of the Code. (h) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has distributed to its stockholders or security holders stock or securities of a controlled corporation, nor has stock or securities of the Company been distributed, in a transaction to which Section 355 of the Code applies (i) in the two years prior to the date of this Agreement or (ii) in a distribution that could otherwise constitute part of a "plan" or "series of -19-
related transactions" (within the meaning of Section 355(e) of the Code) that includes the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. (i) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is or has been a passive foreign investment company within the meaning of Sections 1291-1297 of the Code. (j) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has incurred (or been allocated) an "overall foreign loss" as defined in Section 904(f)(2) of the Code which has not been previously recaptured in full as provided in Sections 904(f)(1) and/or 904(f)(3) of the Code. (k) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to a gain recognition agreement under Section 367 of the Code. (l) Section 2.9 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list of any Subsidiaries for which a "check-the-box" election under Section 7701 has been made. (m) To the knowledge of the Company and any Subsidiary, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is or ever has been a party to a transaction or agreement that is in conflict with the Tax rules on transfer pricing in any relevant jurisdiction. (n) Section 2.9 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list of all material agreements, rulings, settlements or other Tax documents relating to Tax incentives between the Company or any Subsidiary and a Governmental Entity. (o) Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries has delivered or made available to the Buyer all payroll and other compensation records in respect of the Management Participants, Company Stockholders and Option and Warrant holders, necessary for the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation to fulfill their respective withholding obligations as described in Section 1.18 of this Agreement and, to the extent known to the Company or any Subsidiary, such other information as may be necessary to (i) identify any other Equity Holder for whom the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation may have a withholding obligation under Section 1.18 and (ii) fulfill their withholding obligations under Section 1.18 with respect to such Equity Holders. 2.10 Assets. (a) Except as disclosed in Section 2.10(a) of the Disclosure Schedule, the Company or the applicable Subsidiary is the true and lawful owner, and has good title to, all of the assets (tangible or intangible) purported to be owned by the Company or the Subsidiaries, free and clear of all Security Interests. Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries owns or leases all tangible assets necessary or desirable for the conduct of its businesses as presently conducted, which tangible assets are reflected in the Financial Statements (other than to the extent disposed of in the Ordinary Course of Business). Each such tangible asset is free from defects, has been maintained in accordance with normal industry practice, is in good operating condition and repair (subject to normal wear and tear) and is suitable for the purposes for which it presently is used. (b) Section 2.10(b) of the Disclosure Schedule lists individually (i) all fixed assets (within the meaning of GAAP) of the Company or the Subsidiaries, indicating the cost, accumulated book depreciation (if any) and the net book value of each such fixed asset as of December 31, 2004, and (ii) all other assets of a tangible nature (other than inventories) of the Company or the Subsidiaries. -20-
(c) Each item of equipment, motor vehicle and other asset that the Company or a Subsidiary has possession of pursuant to a lease agreement or other contractual arrangement is in such condition that, upon its return to its lessor or owner in its present condition at the end of the relevant lease term or as otherwise contemplated by the applicable lease or contract, the obligations of the Company or such Subsidiary to such lessor or owner will have been discharged in full. 2.11 Owned Real Property(a) . Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary does own, or has ever owned, any real property. 2.12 Real Property Leases. Section 2.12 of the Disclosure Schedule lists all Leases and lists the term of such Lease, any extension and expansion options, and the rent payable thereunder. The Company has delivered to the Buyer complete and accurate copies of the Leases. With respect to each Lease: (a) such Lease is legal, valid, binding, enforceable and in full force and effect; (b) such Lease will continue to be legal, valid, binding, enforceable against the Company and, to the Company's knowledge, against each other party thereto and in full force and effect immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect immediately prior to the Closing; (c) neither the Company, any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party to the Lease is in breach or violation of, or default under, any such Lease, and no event has occurred, is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, is threatened, which, after the giving of notice, with lapse of time, or otherwise, would constitute a breach or default by the Company or any Subsidiary or, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party under such Lease; (d) there are no disputes, oral agreements or forbearance programs in effect as to such Lease; (e) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has assigned, transferred, conveyed, mortgaged, deeded in trust or encumbered any interest in the leasehold or subleasehold; (f) the Company is not aware of any Security Interest, easement, covenant or other restriction applicable to the real property subject to such lease which would reasonably be expected to impair the current uses or the occupancy by the Company or a Subsidiary of the property subject thereto; (g) no construction, alteration or other leasehold improvement work with respect to the Lease remains to be paid for or performed by the Company or any Subsidiary; (h) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is obligated to pay any leasing or brokerage commission relating to such Lease and will not have any obligation to pay any leasing or brokerage commission upon the renewal of the Lease; and (i) the Financial Statements contain adequate reserves to provide for the restoration of the property subject to the Lease at the end of the respective Lease term, to the extent required by the Lease. -21-
2.13 Intellectual Property. (a) Company Owned Intellectual Property. The Company or a Subsidiary is the sole and exclusive owner of all Company Owned Intellectual Property, free and clear of any Security Interests. No other person or business entity has any joint ownership interest, royalty interest, or license right to any of the Company Owned Intellectual Property, and, to the knowledge of the Company, no other person or business entity is infringing, violating or misappropriating any of the Company Owned Intellectual Property. Section 2.13(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists each agreement, contract, assignment or other instrument pursuant to which the Company or any Subsidiary has at any time since the date of its incorporation obtained any ownership interest in or to each item of Company Owned Intellectual Property. (b) Company Intellectual Property. The Company Intellectual Property constitutes all Intellectual Property (i) used in the operation of the business of the Company or any Subsidiary or necessary for the operation of such business as presently conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries, (ii) necessary to develop, test, modify, make, use, sell, have made, used and sold, import, reproduce, market and distribute the Customer Deliverables in the manner currently done by the Company and its Subsidiaries, and (iii) necessary to operate and use the Internal Systems as they are currently used by the Company and its Subsidiaries. Each item of Company Intellectual Property will be owned or available for use by the Company or the applicable Subsidiary immediately following the Closing on substantially identical terms and conditions as it was immediately prior to the Closing. (c) Customer Deliverables. Except as set forth in the Disclosure Schedule or as alleged in a Lawsuit, none of the Customer Deliverables, or the development, manufacture, importation, marketing, sale, distribution, provision or use thereof by the Company, any Subsidiary or any reseller, distributor, customer or user thereof, or the conduct by the Company or any Subsidiary of its business, infringes, violates or constitutes a misappropriation of (or in the past infringed, violated or constituted a misappropriation of) any Intellectual Property rights of any other person or business entity. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any complaint, claim or notice alleging any such infringement, violation or misappropriation (including any notification that a license under any patent is or may be required). Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has agreed to indemnify any person against any infringement, violation or misappropriation of any Intellectual Property rights with respect to any Customer Deliverables, other than as required by customers in the Ordinary Course of Business pursuant to (i) the Company's and each Subsidiary's standard terms and conditions of sale, a copy of which has previously been delivered to the Buyer and (ii) such customers' standard terms and conditions of sale, where the annual amounts payable by or to the Company and its Subsidiaries under all such standard terms and conditions of sale does not exceed $250,000 per contract. (d) Intellectual Property Registrations. Section 2.13(d) of the Disclosure Schedule identifies each Intellectual Property Registration that is registered or filed in the name of the Company or any Subsidiary, alone or jointly with others, in each case enumerating specifically the applicable filing or registration number, title, subject matter, jurisdiction in which the filing was made or from which registration issued, date of filing or issuance, names of current registered owners (if other than the Company), and status of any required issuance, renewal, maintenance or other payments due within one year following the date of this Agreement. All assignments of Intellectual Property Registrations have been properly executed and recorded. To the knowledge of the Company, all Intellectual Property Registrations to the Company are valid and enforceable and all issuance, renewal, maintenance and other payments that are or have become due with respect thereto have been timely paid by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary, as applicable. -22-
(e) Grant of Rights With Respect to Company Intellectual Property. Section 2.13(e) of the Disclosure Schedule identifies each license, covenant or other agreement pursuant to which the Company has assigned, transferred, licensed, distributed or otherwise granted any right or access to any other person or business entity, or covenanted not to assert any right, with respect to any Company Intellectual Property other than non-exclusive licenses entered into with customers of the Company or any Subsidiary in the Ordinary Course of Business. (f) Company Licensed Intellectual Property. Section 2.13(f) of the Disclosure Schedule identifies each item of Company Licensed Intellectual Property that the Company or any Subsidiary currently licenses that is owned by a party other than the Company or such Subsidiary, and the license agreement pursuant to which the Company or such Subsidiary licenses such Intellectual Property (other than commercially available, off-the-shelf software programs that are part of the Internal Systems and are licensed by the Company or such Subsidiary pursuant to standard "shrink-wrap" licenses, with respect to which, although not listed in Section 2.13(f) of the Disclosure Schedule, the representations set forth in this Section 2.13(f) are true). Each license agreement referenced in this clause (f) and in Section 2.13(a) above is legal, valid, binding and enforceable against the Company or the applicable Subsidiary, and, to the knowledge of the Company, against each other party thereto, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses, and is in full force and effect. Each such license agreement will continue to be legal, valid, binding and enforceable against the Company or such Subsidiary and, to the knowledge of the Company, each other party thereto, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses, and will continue to be in full force and effect, immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect prior to the Closing. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party to such license agreement is in breach or default, and no event has occurred which with notice or lapse of time would constitute a breach or default or permit termination, modification or acceleration thereunder. (g) Company Source Code. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has licensed, distributed or disclosed, and knows of no distribution or disclosure by others (including its employees and contractors) of, the source code for any Software ("Company Source Code") to any other person or business entity, other than the Company and its Subsidiaries, and the Company and the Subsidiaries have taken reasonable physical and electronic security measures to prevent disclosure of such Company Source Code. To the knowledge of the Company, no event has occurred, and no circumstance or condition exists, that (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) will, or would reasonably be expected to, nor will the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, result in the disclosure or release of such Company Source Code by the Company, any Subsidiary or any escrow agent(s) or any other person to any third party. (h) Software. None of the Software includes "shareware", "freeware" or other code that was developed by or obtained by the Company or any Subsidiary from third parties. Except as set forth in Section 2.13(h) of the Disclosure Schedule, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has incorporated Open Source Materials into, or combined Open Source Materials with, the Software. To the extent Open Source Materials are used in any way to provide the Customer Deliverables, such use has not caused any Software to become subject to GNU General Public License ("GPL") requirements. -23-
2.14 Inventory. Other than general office supplies, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary maintains any inventory. 2.15 Contracts. (a) Section 2.15(a) of the Disclosure Schedule lists the following agreements to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party as of the date of this Agreement (each a "Contract"): (i) any agreement (or group of related agreements) for the lease of personal property from or to third parties; (ii) any agreement (or group of related agreements): (A) with (1) any customer of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries (other than agreements with any such customer that is not among the top 70 customers by revenue of the Company or any Subsidiary during the three-month period ended December 31, 2004 (the "Top Customers"), which agreements are not listed in Section 2.15(a) of the Disclosure Schedule but with respect to which the representations set forth in this Section 2.15 are true; Section 2.15(a)(ii)(A)(1) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the customer name and corresponding redacted contract number for each Top Customer Contract provided by the Company to the Buyer), (2) any network service provider that was in effect at any time since January 1, 2004, and (3) the top 20 vendors (by payment amount) to the Company for the twelve-month period ended December 31, 2004, and the eight-month period ended February 28, 2005; (B) which involves more than the sum of $50,000 over the term of the agreement (other than customer agreements, agreements with network service providers and vendor agreements); or (C) in which the Company or any Subsidiary has granted manufacturing rights, "most favored nation" pricing provisions or exclusive marketing or distribution rights relating to any services, products or territory or has agreed to purchase a minimum quantity of goods or services or has agreed to purchase goods or services exclusively from a certain party; (iii) any agreement concerning the establishment or operation of a partnership, joint venture or limited liability company; (iv) any agreement (or group of related agreements) under which it has created, incurred, assumed or guaranteed (or may create, incur, assume or guarantee) indebtedness (including capitalized lease obligations but excluding trade payables to vendors incurred in the Ordinary Course of Business) or under which it has imposed (or may impose) a Security Interest on any of its assets, tangible or intangible; (v) any agreement for the disposition of any significant portion of the assets or business of the Company or any Subsidiary (other than sales of products and disposition of obsolete equipment in the Ordinary Course of Business) or any agreement for the acquisition of the assets or business of any other entity (other than purchases of inventory or components in the Ordinary Course of Business); (vi) any agreement concerning confidentiality, noncompetition or non-solicitation (other than confidentiality agreements with customers or employees of the Company or any Subsidiary set forth in the Company's or the applicable Subsidiary's standard terms and conditions of sale -24-
or standard form of employment agreement, copies of which have previously been delivered to the Buyer); (vii) any employment or consulting agreement (other than agreements that are terminable at will without any cost, penalty or other obligation to the Company or any Subsidiary); (viii) any agreement involving any current or former officer, director or stockholder of the Company or any Subsidiary; (ix) any agency, distributor, sales representative, franchise or similar agreements to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any Subsidiary is bound; (x) any agreement which contains any provisions requiring the Company or any Subsidiary to indemnify any other party (excluding indemnities contained in agreements for the provision, purchase, sale or license of Customer Deliverables entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business); and (xi) any other agreement (or group of related agreements) (A) not entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business or (B) the termination or modification of which would have a Company Material Adverse Effect. (b) The Company has delivered to the Buyer a complete and accurate copy of each Contract (as amended to date). With respect to each Contract: (i) the Contract is legal, valid, binding and enforceable against the Company or applicable Subsidiary and, to the Company's knowledge, against each other party thereto, and in full force and effect, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by general equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses; (ii) the Contract will continue to be legal, valid, binding and enforceable against the Company or applicable Subsidiary and, to the Company's knowledge, against each other party thereto immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect immediately prior to the Closing, except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally and by general equitable principles, including those limiting the availability of specific performance, injunctive relief and other equitable remedies and those providing for equitable defenses; and (iii) neither the Company, any Subsidiary nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party, is in breach or violation of, or default under, any such Contract, and no event has occurred, is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, is threatened, which, after the giving of notice, with lapse of time, or otherwise, would constitute a breach or default by the Company, any Subsidiary or, to the knowledge of the Company, any other party under such Contract. (c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to any oral contract, agreement or other arrangement which, if reduced to written form, would be required to be listed in Section 2.15(a) of the Disclosure Schedule under the terms of Section 2.15(a). Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to any written or oral arrangement (i) to perform services or sell products which is expected to be performed at, or to result in, a loss or (ii) for which the customer has already been billed or paid that have not been fully accounted for on the Most Recent Balance Sheet. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is restricted by any Contract from carrying on business anywhere in the world. -25-
2.16 Accounts Receivable. All accounts receivable of the Company and its Subsidiaries reflected on the Most Recent Balance Sheet (other than those paid since such date) are valid receivables subject to no setoffs or counterclaims and are current and collectible (within 90 days after the date on which it first became due and payable), net of the applicable reserve for bad debts on the Most Recent Balance Sheet. A complete and accurate list of the accounts receivable as of December 31, 2004, showing the aging thereof, is included in Section 2.16 of the Disclosure Schedule. All accounts receivable of the Company and the Subsidiaries that have arisen since the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date are valid receivables subject to no setoffs or counterclaims and are collectible (within 90 days after the date on which it first became due and payable), net of a reserve for bad debts in an amount proportionate to the reserve shown on the Most Recent Balance Sheet. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any written notice from an account debtor stating that any account receivable in an amount in excess of $5,000 is subject to any contest, claim or setoff by such account debtor. 2.17 Powers of Attorney. There are no outstanding powers of attorney executed on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary. 2.18 Insurance. Section 2.18 of the Disclosure Schedule lists each insurance policy (including fire, theft, casualty, comprehensive general liability, workers compensation, business interruption, environmental, product liability and automobile insurance policies and bond and surety arrangements) to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party, a named insured or otherwise the beneficiary of coverage, all of which are in full force and effect. Except as set forth in Section 2.18 of the Disclosure Schedule, there is no claim pending under any such policy as to which coverage has been questioned, denied or disputed by the underwriter of such policy. All premiums due and payable under all such policies have been paid, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary will be liable for retroactive premiums or similar payments, and the Company and its Subsidiaries are otherwise in compliance with the terms of such policies. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any knowledge of any threatened termination of, or pending premium increase with respect to, any such policy. Each such policy will continue to be enforceable and in full force and effect immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect immediately prior to the Closing. Section 2.18 of the Disclosure Schedule identifies all claims asserted by the Company pursuant to any insurance policy since January 1, 2001 and describes the nature and status of each such claim. 2.19 Litigation. Section 2.19 of the Disclosure Schedule identifies and contains a brief description of (a) any unsatisfied judgment, order, decree, stipulation or injunction, and (b) any claim, complaint, action, suit, proceeding, hearing or investigation of or in any Governmental Entity or by a private party or before any arbitrator, in the case of each of clauses (a) and (b) to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or, to the knowledge of the Company, is threatened to be made a party. None of the complaints, actions, suits, proceedings, hearings and investigations set forth in Section 2.19 of the Disclosure Schedule, individually or collectively, could have a Company Material Adverse Effect. 2.20 Warranties. (a) No service or product provided, manufactured, sold, leased, licensed or delivered by the Company or any Subsidiary is subject to any guaranty, warranty, right of return, right of credit or other indemnity other than (i) the applicable standard terms and conditions of sale of each Customer Deliverable, which are set forth in Section 2.20(a) of the Disclosure Schedule, and (ii) manufacturers' warranties for which the Company has no liability. Section 2.20(a) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the aggregate expenses incurred and credits issued in fulfilling the Company's obligations under service-level agreements and similar guarantees with respect to the Company's services that were incurred or issued during the Company's most recent fiscal year and the interim period covered by the Financial -26-
Statements; and the Company does not know of any reason why such expenses should significantly increase as a percentage of sales in the future. (b) The reserve for warranty claims set forth on the Most Recent Balance Sheet and any reserves for warranty claims created by the Company in the Ordinary Course of Business subsequent to the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date are adequate and were calculated in accordance with GAAP consistently applied. (c) The Company has no liability to any customer in connection with any service provided or product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company to provide the customer with any other services or products of the Company on pre-negotiated terms, including without limitation for upgrades to other services or products at prices below the Company's published price for such services or products. The Company has no liability to any customer in connection with any service provided or product manufactured, sold, leased or delivered by the Company other than those arising in the Ordinary Course of Business. 2.21 Employees. (a) Section 2.21(a) of the Disclosure Schedule contains a list of all employees of the Company and each Subsidiary, along with the position, date of hire, annual rate of compensation (or with respect to employees compensated on an hourly, commission, piece rate or per diem basis, the hourly, commission, piece rate or per diem rate of compensation) and estimated or target annual incentive compensation of each such person. With the exception of employees listed in Section 2.21(a) of the Disclosure Schedule, each of such employees is retained at-will and none of such employees is a party to an employment agreement, compensation agreement or contract with the Company or any Subsidiary. Each such employee has entered into the Company's or a Subsidiary's standard form of invention assignment and confidentiality agreement with the Company, a copy of which has previously been delivered to the Buyer. All of the agreements referenced in the preceding sentence will continue to be legal, valid, binding and enforceable to the fullest extent under applicable laws against the Company or the applicable Subsidiary and, to the Company's knowledge, against each other party thereto and in full force and effect immediately following the Closing in accordance with the terms thereof as in effect immediately prior to the Closing. Each employee of the Company and each Subsidiary who has at any time in the past four years been classified as exempt from state and federal overtime requirements was properly classified as exempt at all such times. Section 2.21(a) of the Disclosure Schedule contains a list of all employees of the Company or any Subsidiary who are not citizens of the United States. To the knowledge of the Company, no key employee or group of employees has, as of the date of this Agreement, any plans to terminate employment with the Company or any Subsidiary. (b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to or bound by any collective bargaining agreement, nor has any of them experienced any strikes, grievances, claims of unfair labor practices or other collective bargaining disputes. The Company has no knowledge of any organizational effort made or threatened, either currently or within the past two years, by or on behalf of any labor union with respect to employees of the Company or any Subsidiary. (c) None of (i) the Company, any Subsidiary, any of the Principal Stockholders or Management Participants or any director or officer of the Company, (ii) to the Company's knowledge, any Affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary or (iii) to the Company's knowledge, any Affiliate of any Principal Stockholder, Management Participant or director or officer of the Company, has any existing contractual relationship with the Company that has not been disclosed in Section 2.21(c) of the Disclosure Schedule, or, to the Company's knowledge, owns, directly or indirectly, any interest in any entity which is in a business similar or competitive to the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries. -27-
(d) Section 2.21(d) of the Disclosure Schedule contains a list of all independent contractors currently engaged by the Company and the Subsidiaries, along with the position, date of retention and rate of remuneration for each such person or entity. Except as set forth in Section 2.21(d) of the Disclosure Schedule, none of such independent contractors is a party to a written agreement or contract with the Company or any Subsidiary. Each such independent contractor has entered into the Company's or the applicable Subsidiary's standard form of invention assignment and confidentiality agreement with the Company or the applicable Subsidiary, a copy of which has previously been delivered to the Buyer. (e) Each individual who has received compensation for the performance of services on behalf of the Company, the Subsidiaries or the ERISA Affiliates has been properly classified as an employee or independent contractor in accordance with applicable law. (f) Section 2.21(f) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of each employee of the Company or any Subsidiary who is providing services in the United States and who holds a temporary work authorization ("Work Permit"), including H-1B, TN, E-1, E-2, L-1, F-1 or J-1 visa status or Employment Authorization Document ("EAD") work authorizations, setting forth the name of such employee, the type of Work Permit and the length of time remaining on such Work Permit. With respect to each Work Permit, all of the information that the Company or any Subsidiary provided to the Department of Labor ("DOL") and the Department of Homeland Security (collectively with its predecessor and subsidiary entities, the "DOHS") in the applications for such Work Permit was, to the knowledge of the Company, true and complete at the time of filing such applications. The Company or applicable Subsidiary received the appropriate notice of approval or other evidence of authorized employment from the DOHS, the DOL, the Department of State or other relevant Governmental Entity with respect to each such Work Permit. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any notice from the DOHS or any other Governmental Entity that any Work Permit has been revoked. There is no action pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened to revoke or adversely modify the terms of any of the Work Permits. (g) The Company and the Subsidiaries have obtained the necessary prevailing wage documentation for each H-1B worker and has paid and continues to pay each H-1B worker the prevailing wage according to the regulations of the DOL. The Company and the Subsidiaries have complied with all terms of the Labor Condition Applications for all H-1B workers and has maintained all documentation required by the DOL regulations. The Company has provided the Buyer with a written statement which summarizes the compliance of the Company with the DOL regulations governing labor condition applications. Since December 1, 2004, neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has incurred any liability under the Worker Adjustment Retraining and Notification Act (the "WARN Act") (29 U.S.C. Sections 2101, et seq.) or any similar state law or statute (such as California Labor Code Section 1400 et seq.) and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not give rise to any such liability. Section 2.21(g) of the Disclosure Schedule will set forth, as of the Closing, all employee actions that could be aggregated with any employment action on or after the Closing to result in any liability under such laws. (h) Except as set forth in Section 2.21(h) of the Disclosure Schedule, there have been no federal or state or other claims based on sex, sexual or other harassment, age, disability, race or other discrimination or other claims, whether statutory or common law, including claims of wrongful termination, by any Governmental Entity, employee or former employee or by any individual who is or was performing work for the Company or any Subsidiary but provided by an outside employment agency, and there are no facts or circumstances that could reasonably be expected to give rise to such complaint or claim. The Company and each Subsidiary have complied with all legal requirements related to the employment of employees including, without limitation, any legal requirement relating to wages, hours, collective bargaining, the payment of Social Security and similar Taxes, equal employment opportunity, -28-
employment discrimination, employee health and safety (including without limitation, those promulgated under the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 and similar state laws). Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any notice of any claim that it has not complied with any legal requirement, or that it is liable for any arrearages of wages or any Taxes or penalties for failure to comply with any of the foregoing. 2.22 Employee Benefits. (a) Section 2.22(a) of the Disclosure Schedule contains a complete and accurate list of all Company Plans. Complete and accurate copies of (i) all Company Plans which have been reduced to writing, together with all amendments thereto (ii) written summaries of all unwritten Company Plans, (iii) all related trust agreements, insurance contracts, summary plan descriptions and material employee communications, (iv) all employee handbooks, employment manuals and policies, and (v) all annual reports filed on IRS Form 5500 series (including all schedules, financial statements and any other attachments thereto) have been delivered to the Buyer. All Company Plans comply (and at all times have complied) with applicable California law, to the extent not preempted by ERISA, the Code or other federal law. (b) Each Company Plan has been administered in accordance with its terms and each of the Company, the Subsidiaries and the ERISA Affiliates has met its obligations with respect to each Company Plan and has timely made all required contributions thereto. The Company, each ERISA Affiliate and each Company Plan are in compliance with the currently applicable provisions of ERISA and the Code and the regulations thereunder (including Section 4980B of the Code, Subtitle K, Chapter 100 of the Code and Sections 601 through 608 and Section 701 et seq. of ERISA). All filings and reports as to each Company Plan required to have been submitted to the Internal Revenue Service or to the United States Department of Labor have been timely submitted. (c) There are no Legal Proceedings (except claims for benefits payable in the normal operation of the Company Plans and proceedings with respect to qualified domestic relations orders) against or involving any Company Plan or asserting any rights or claims to benefits under any Company Plan that could give rise to any liability. No Company Plan is or within the last three calendar years has been the subject of, or has received notice that it is the subject of, examination by a government agency or a participant in a government sponsored amnesty, voluntary compliance or similar program. (d) All the Company Plans that are intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code have received determination letters from the Internal Revenue Service to the effect that such Company Plans are qualified and the plans and the trusts related thereto are exempt from federal income Taxes under Sections 401(a) and 501(a), respectively, of the Code, or, if reliance is permitted under IRS Announcement 2001-77, the Company relies on the favorable opinion letter or advisory letter of the master and prototype or volume submitter plan sponsor of such Company Plan, no such determination letter or opinion or advisory letter has been revoked and revocation has not been threatened, and no such Company Plan has been amended since the date of its most recent determination letter, opinion or advisory letter, or application therefor in any respect, and no act or omission has occurred, that would adversely affect its qualification or increase its cost. There has been no termination or partial termination of such a Company Plan. Each Company Plan that is required to satisfy Section 401(k)(3) or Section 401(m)(2) of the Code has been tested for compliance with, and satisfies the requirements of Section 401(k)(3) and Section 401(m)(2) of the Code for each plan year ending prior to the Closing Date. (e) Neither the Company, any Subsidiary nor any ERISA Affiliate has ever maintained or contributed to an Employee Benefit Plan subject to Section 412 of the Code or Title IV of -29-
ERISA. At no time has the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate been obligated to contribute to any "multiemployer plan" (as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA). (f) No Company Plan has assets that include securities issued by the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate. (g) With respect to the Company Plans, there are no benefit obligations for which contributions have not been made or properly accrued and there are no benefit obligations that have not been accounted for by reserves, or otherwise properly footnoted in accordance with GAAP, on the Financial Statements. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any liability for benefits (contingent or otherwise) under any Company Plan, except as set forth on the Financial Statements. The assets of each Company Plan that is funded are reported at their fair market value on the books and records of such Employee Benefit Plan. There are no unfunded obligations under any Company Plan providing benefits after termination of employment to any employee of the Company or any Subsidiary (or to any beneficiary of any such employee), including but not limited to retiree health coverage and deferred compensation, but excluding continuation of health coverage required to be continued under Section 4980B of the Code or other applicable law and insurance conversion privileges under state law, but only to the extent that such continuation of coverage is provided solely at the participant's or beneficiary's expense. (h) No act or omission has occurred and no condition exists with respect to any Company Plan that would subject the Buyer, the Company, any Subsidiary, any ERISA Affiliate, or any plan participant to (i) any fine, penalty, Tax or liability of any kind imposed under ERISA or the Code or (ii) any contractual indemnification or contribution obligation protecting any fiduciary, insurer or service provider with respect to any Company Plan, nor will the transactions contemplated by this Agreement give rise to any such liability. (i) No Company Plan is funded by, associated with or related to a "voluntary employee's beneficiary association" within the meaning of Section 501(c)(9) of the Code. (j) Each Company Plan is amendable and terminable unilaterally by the Company at any time without liability or expense other than administrative and legal expenses related to such amendment or termination to the Company or such Company Plan as a result thereof (other than for benefits accrued through the date of termination or amendment and reasonable administrative expenses related thereto) and no Company Plan, plan documentation or agreement, summary plan description or other written communication distributed generally to employees by its terms prohibits the Company from amending or terminating any such Company Plan, or in any way limit such action. (k) Section 2.22(k) of the Disclosure Schedule discloses each: (i) agreement with any stockholder, director, executive officer or other key employee of the Company or any Subsidiary (A) the benefits of which are contingent, or the terms of which are altered, upon the occurrence of a transaction involving the Company or any Subsidiary of the nature of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (B) providing any term of employment or compensation guarantee or (C) providing severance benefits or other benefits after the termination of employment of such director, executive officer or key employee and (ii) agreement or plan binding the Company or any Subsidiary, including any stock option plan, stock appreciation right plan, restricted stock plan, stock purchase plan, severance benefit plan or Company Plan, any of the benefits of which will be increased, or the vesting of the benefits of which will be accelerated, by the occurrence of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or the value of any of the benefits of which will be calculated on the basis of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. -30-
(l) Section 2.22(l) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth the policy of the Company and each Subsidiary with respect to accrued vacation, accrued sick time and earned time off for the past four years (and indicates whether the Company or Subsidiary cashes (and has cashed) out such vacation, accrued sick time and earned time off at termination of employment) and the amount of such liabilities as of December 31, 2004. (m) Section 2.22(m) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth all bonuses earned by the Company's employees through the Closing Date that are expected to be accrued on the Closing Balance Sheet but unpaid as of the Closing Date. (n) There are no loans or extension of credit from the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate to any employee of or independent contractor to the Company or any Subsidiary. (o) There is no plan or commitment, whether legally binding or not, to create any additional Company Plans or to modify any existing Company Plans with respect to employees of the Company or any Subsidiary. (p) There is no corporate-owned life insurance (COLI), split-dollar life insurance policy or any other life insurance policy on the life of any employee of the Company, any Subsidiary or on any Company Stockholder. 2.23 Environmental Matters. (a) The Company and the Subsidiaries have complied with all applicable Environmental Laws. There is no pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened civil or criminal litigation, written notice of violation, formal administrative proceeding, or investigation, inquiry or information request by any Governmental Entity, relating to any Environmental Law involving the Company or any Subsidiary. (b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any liabilities or obligations arising from the release of any Materials of Environmental Concern into the environment. (c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to or bound by any court order, administrative order, consent order or other agreement between the Company or any Subsidiary and any Governmental Entity entered into in connection with any legal obligation or liability arising under any Environmental Law. (d) Set forth in Section 2.23(d) of the Disclosure Schedule is a list of all documents (whether in hard copy or electronic form) that contain any environmental reports, investigations and audits relating to premises currently or previously owned or operated by the Company or any Subsidiary (whether conducted by or on behalf of the Company, the Subsidiaries or a third party, and whether done at the initiative of the Company or a Subsidiary or directed by a Governmental Entity or other third party) which the Company has possession of or access to. A complete and accurate copy of each such document has been provided to the Buyer. (e) The Company is not aware of any environmental liability of any solid or hazardous waste transporter or treatment, storage or disposal facility that has been used by the Company or any Subsidiary. -31-
2.24 Legal Compliance. Each of the Company and the Subsidiaries is currently conducting, and has at all times since January 1, 2002, conducted, its business in compliance with each applicable law (including rules and regulations thereunder) of any federal, state, local or foreign government, or any Governmental Entity. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received any notice or communication from any Governmental Entity alleging noncompliance with any applicable law, rule or regulation. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has violated any law concerning the export or re-export of any products or services or the prohibited boycott of any country. 2.25 Customers and Suppliers. Section 2.25 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of (a) each customer during the last full fiscal year or the interim period through December 31, 2004 (identifying only the Top Customers by name), and the amount of revenues accounted for by such customer during each such period and (b) each supplier that is the sole supplier of any significant product or service to the Company or any Subsidiary. No such customer or supplier has indicated within the past year that it will stop, or decrease the rate of, buying materials, products or services or supplying materials, products or services, as applicable, to the Company or any Subsidiary. No purchase order or commitment of the Company or any Subsidiary is for the exchange or barter of any products or services. 2.26 Permits. Section 2.26 of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of all Permits issued to or held by the Company or any Subsidiary. Such listed Permits are the only Permits that are required for the Company and the Subsidiaries to conduct their business as presently conducted. Each such Permit is in full force and effect; the Company or the applicable Subsidiary is in compliance with the terms of each such Permit; and, to the knowledge of the Company, no suspension or cancellation of such Permit is threatened and there is no basis for believing that such Permit will not be renewable upon expiration. Each such Permit will continue in full force and effect immediately following the Closing. 2.27 Certain Business Relationships With Affiliates. No Affiliate of the Company or any Subsidiary (a) owns any property or right, tangible or intangible, which is used in the business of the Company or any Subsidiary, (b) to the Company's knowledge, has any claim or cause of action against the Company or any Subsidiary, (c) owes any money to, or is owed any money by, the Company or any Subsidiary, or (d) is a party to any contract or other arrangement (written or oral) with the Company or any Subsidiary. Section 2.27 of the Disclosure Schedule describes any transactions or relationships between the Company or a Subsidiary and any Affiliate thereof which occurred or have existed since the beginning of the time period covered by the Financial Statements. 2.28 Brokers' Fees. Except as set forth in Section 2.28 of the Disclosure Schedule, none of the Company, any Subsidiary nor any of the Principal Stockholders has any liability or obligation to pay any fees or commissions to any broker, finder or agent with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 2.29 Books and Records. The minute books and other similar records of the Company and each Subsidiary contain complete and accurate records of all actions taken at any meetings of the Company's or such Subsidiary's stockholders, Board of Directors or any committee thereof and of all written consents executed in lieu of the holding of any such meeting. The books and records of the Company and each Subsidiary accurately reflect the assets, liabilities, business, financial condition and results of operations of the Company or such Subsidiary and have been maintained in accordance with good business and bookkeeping practices. Section 2.29 of the Disclosure Schedule contains a list of all bank accounts and safe deposit boxes of the Company and the Subsidiaries and the names of persons having signature authority with respect thereto or access thereto. 2.30 Prepayments, Prebilled Invoices and Deposits. -32-
(a) Section 2.30(a) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth (i) all prepayments, prebilled invoices and deposits that have been received by the Company and the Subsidiaries as of January 31, 2005 from customers for products to be shipped, or services to be performed, after the Closing Date, and (ii) with respect to each such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit, (A) the party and contract credited, (B) the date received or invoiced, (C) the products and/or services to be delivered and (D) the conditions for the return of such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit. All such prepayments, prebilled invoices and deposits are properly accrued for on the Most Recent Balance Sheet, and will be properly accrued for on the Closing Balance Sheet, in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis with the past practice of the Company. (b) Section 2.30(b) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth (i) all prepayments, prebilled invoices and deposits that have been made or paid by the Company and the Subsidiaries as of January 31, 2005 for products to be purchased, services to be performed or other benefits to be received after the Closing Date, and (ii) with respect to each such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit, (A) the party to whom such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit was made or paid, (B) the date made or paid, (C) the products and/or services to be delivered and (D) the conditions for the return of such prepayment, prebilled invoice or deposit. All such prepayments, prebilled invoices and deposits are properly accrued for on the Most Recent Balance Sheet, and will be properly accrued for on the Closing Balance Sheet, in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis with the past practice of the Company. 2.31 Government Contracts. (a) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has been suspended or debarred from bidding on contracts or subcontracts with any Governmental Entity; no such suspension or debarment has been initiated or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened; and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not result in any such suspension or debarment of the Company or any Subsidiary. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has been or is now being audited or investigated by the United States Government Accounting Office, the United States Department of Defense or any of its agencies, the Defense Contract Audit Agency, the contracting or auditing function of any Governmental Entity with which it is contracting, the United States Department of Justice, the Inspector General of the United States Governmental Entity, or any prime contractor with a Governmental Entity; nor, to the knowledge of the Company, has any such audit or investigation been threatened. To the knowledge of the Company, there is no valid basis for (i) the suspension or debarment of the Company or any Subsidiary from bidding on contracts or subcontracts with any Governmental Entity or (ii) any claim (including any claim for return of funds to the Government) pursuant to an audit or investigation by any of the entities named in the foregoing sentence. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any agreements, contracts or commitments which require it to obtain or maintain a security clearance with any Governmental Entity. (b) To the knowledge of the Company, no basis exists for any of the following with respect to any of its contracts or subcontracts with any Governmental Entity: (i) a Termination for Default (as provided in 48 C.F.R. Ch.1 Section 52.249-8, 52.249-9 or similar sections), (ii) a Termination for Convenience (as provided in 48 C.F.R. Ch.1 Section 52.241-1, 52.249-2 or similar sections), or a Stop Work Order (as provided in 48 C.F.R. Ch.1 Section 52.212-13 or similar sections); and the Company has no reason to believe that funding may not be provided under any contract or subcontract with any Governmental Entity in the upcoming federal fiscal year. 2.32 Disclosure. No representation or warranty by the Company contained in this Agreement, and no statement contained in the Disclosure Schedule or any other document, certificate or other instrument delivered or to be delivered by or on behalf of the Company or any Company Stockholder -33-
pursuant to this Agreement, contains or will contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omits or will omit to state any material fact necessary, in light of the circumstances under which it was or will be made, in order to make the statements herein or therein not misleading. ARTICLE III REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE BUYER AND THE TRANSITORY SUBSIDIARY Each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary represents and warrants to the Company that the statements contained in this Article III are true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and will be true and correct as of the Closing as though made as of the Closing. 3.1 Organization and Corporate Power. Each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the state of its incorporation. The Buyer has all requisite power and authority (corporate and other) to carry on the businesses in which it is engaged and to own and use the properties owned and used by it. 3.2 Authorization of Transaction. Each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary has all requisite power and authority (corporate and other) to execute and deliver this Agreement and to perform its obligations hereunder. The execution and delivery by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary of this Agreement and the consummation by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Buyer and Transitory Subsidiary, respectively. This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary and constitutes a valid and binding obligation of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary, enforceable against them in accordance with its terms. 3.3 Noncontravention. Subject to the filing of the Certificate of Merger as required by the Delaware General Corporation Law and to the filing requirements of the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, neither the execution and delivery by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary of this Agreement or any other agreement provided for herein, nor the consummation by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, will (a) conflict with or violate any provision of the charter or By-laws of the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, (b) require on the part of the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary any filing with, or permit, authorization, consent or approval of, any Governmental Entity, (c) conflict with, result in breach of, constitute (with or without due notice or lapse of time or both) a default under, result in the acceleration of obligations under, create in any party any right to accelerate, terminate, modify or cancel, or require any notice, consent or waiver under, any contract, lease, sublease, license, sublicense, franchise, permit, indenture, agreement or mortgage for borrowed money, instrument of indebtedness, Security Interest or other arrangement to which the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary is a party or by which either is bound or to which any of their assets are subject, or (d) violate any order, writ, injunction, decree, statute, rule or regulation applicable to the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary or any of their properties or assets. 3.4 Broker's Fees. The Buyer has no liability or obligation to pay any fees or commissions to any broker, finder or agent with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 3.5 Investment Representation. The Buyer is acquiring the Company Shares from each Company Stockholder for its own account for investment and not with a view to, or for sale in connection with, any distribution thereof, nor with any present intention of distributing or selling the same; and, except as contemplated by this Agreement and the agreements contemplated herein, the Buyer has no -34-
present or contemplated agreement, undertaking, arrangement, obligation, indebtedness or commitment providing for the disposition thereof. 3.6 Litigation. Except for matters disclosed in the Buyer SEC Documents, there is no claim, complaint, action, suit, proceeding, hearing or investigation pending against the Buyer or any of its subsidiaries in any Governmental Entity or before any arbitrator that is required to be disclosed in the Buyer SEC Documents pursuant to Item 103 of Regulation S-K under the Securities Act. 3.7 SEC Filings. (a) SEC Reports. The Buyer has filed with the SEC all registration statements, prospectuses, reports, forms, statements, schedules, certifications and other documents (including exhibits and all other items incorporated by reference) required to be filed by the Buyer since January 1, 2004 (all such required registration statements, prospectuses, reports, forms, statements, schedules, certifications and other documents, including those that the Buyer may file subsequent to the date of this Agreement, are referred to herein as the "Buyer SEC Documents"). As of their respective dates, Buyer SEC Documents (i) complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, the Sarbanes Act (to the extent then applicable), and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder applicable to such Buyer SEC Documents and (ii) did not at the time they were filed (or if amended or superseded by a filing prior to the date of this Agreement, then on the date of such filing) contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, except to the extent corrected prior to the date hereof by a subsequently filed Buyer SEC Document. (b) Financial Statements. Each of the consolidated financial statements (including, in each case, any related notes thereto) contained in the Buyer SEC Documents (the "Buyer Financial Statements"), including each Buyer SEC Document filed after the date of this Agreement until the Closing, (i) complied, as of their respective dates of filing with the SEC, as to form in all material respects with the published rules and regulations of the SEC with respect thereto, (ii) was prepared in accordance with GAAP (except in the case of unaudited interim financial statements, as may be permitted by the SEC on Form 10-Q or Form 8-K) applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto), and (iii) fairly presented in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Buyer and its subsidiaries as at the respective dates thereof and the consolidated results of Buyer's and its subsidiaries' operations and cash flows for the periods indicated (except that the unaudited interim financial statements were subject to normal and recurring year-end and quarter-end adjustments which were not material). 3.8 Merger Shares and Management Shares Validly Issued. The Merger Shares and Management Shares to be issued pursuant to the Agreement have been duly authorized and, when issued and delivered in accordance with the Agreement, will have been validly issued and will be fully paid and nonassessable and the issuance thereof is not subject to any preemptive or other similar right. 3.9 Disclosure. No representation or warranty by the Buyer contained in this Agreement, and no statement contained in any other document, certificate or other instrument delivered or to be delivered by or on behalf of the Buyer pursuant to this Agreement, contains or will contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omits or will omit to state any material fact necessary, in light of the circumstances under which it was or will be made, in order to make the statements herein or therein not misleading. 3.10 Actions Consistent With Reorganization Treatment. To their knowledge, neither the Buyer nor the Transitory Subsidiary has taken any action that (alone or in combination with other events) -35-
would cause the Merger to fail to qualify as a "reorganization" within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code. ARTICLE IV COVENANTS 4.1 Closing Efforts. Each of the Parties shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to take all actions and to do all things necessary, proper or advisable to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including using its or his Reasonable Best Efforts to ensure that (a) its or his representations and warranties remain true and correct through the Closing Date, except to the extent expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement and (b) the conditions to the obligations of the other Parties to consummate the Merger are satisfied. 4.2 Treatment of the Merger as a Reorganization for Tax Purposes. (a) To the extent permitted by applicable law, each of the Parties shall file all of its Tax Returns on the basis that the Merger qualifies as a "reorganization" as defined in Section 368(a) of the Code. No party shall knowingly take any action that (alone or in combination with other of its actions) would reasonably be interpreted to likely cause the Merger to fail to qualify as a "reorganization." (b) The Buyer presently intends that, following the Merger, it will cause the Surviving Corporation to continue the Company's historic business or will use a significant portion of the Company's historic business assets in a business. 4.3 Governmental and Third-Party Notices and Consents. (a) Subject to Section 4.3(c) below, the Company shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain, at its expense, all waivers, permits, consents, approvals or other authorizations from third parties and Governmental Entities, and effect all registrations, filings and notices with or to third parties and Governmental Entities, as may be necessary or desirable to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and to otherwise comply with all applicable laws and regulations in connection with the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Company shall promptly file any Notification and Report Forms and related material that it may be required to file with the Federal Trade Commission and the Antitrust Division of the United States Department of Justice under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act or other applicable U.S. or foreign antitrust laws, shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain an early termination of the applicable waiting period, and shall make any further filings or information submissions pursuant thereto and take such actions that may be necessary, proper or advisable, including, but not limited to: (A) responding to formal requests for additional information or documentary material pursuant to 16 C.F.R. 803.20 under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, (B) negotiating in good faith to resolve any questions or concerns raised in the course of investigation by such Governmental Entities; and (C) defending against any action by such Governmental Entities seeking to enjoin the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. (b) Subject to Section 4.3(c) below, the Buyer shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain, at its expense, all waivers, permits, consents, approvals or other authorizations from third parties and Governmental Entities, and effect all registrations, filings and notices with or to third parties and Governmental Entities, as may be necessary or desirable to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and to otherwise comply with all applicable laws and regulations in -36-
connection with the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Buyer shall promptly file any Notification and Report Forms and related material that it may be required to file with the Federal Trade Commission and the Antitrust Division of the United States Department of Justice under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act or other applicable U.S. or foreign antitrust laws, shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain an early termination of the applicable waiting period, and shall make any further filings or information submissions pursuant thereto and take such actions that may be necessary, proper or advisable, including, but not limited to: (A) responding to formal requests for additional information or documentary material pursuant to 16 C.F.R. 803.20 under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, (B) negotiating in good faith to resolve any questions or concerns raised in the course of investigation by such Governmental Entities; and (C) defending against any action by such Governmental Entities seeking to enjoin the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; provided, however, that notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, the Buyer shall not be obligated to sell or dispose of or hold separately (through a trust or otherwise) any assets or businesses of the Buyer or its Affiliates. (c) The Buyer and the Company shall be equally responsible for the payment of the filing fees required to be paid in connection with filings to be made under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act; provided, however, that if the Merger is consummated, such filing fees paid or accrued by the Company shall be added to the total assets of the Company on the Closing Balance Sheet for the purposes of determining the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment pursuant to Section 1.12. 4.4 Stockholder Approval. (a) Subject to Section 4.4(c), the Company shall use its Reasonable Best Efforts to obtain, as promptly as practicable following receipt of the California Permit or, if not received, the effective date of the Registration Statement (as hereinafter defined), the Requisite Stockholder Approval, either at a special meeting of stockholders or pursuant to a written stockholder consent, all in accordance with the applicable requirements of both the Delaware General Corporation Law and California General Corporation Law. In connection with such special meeting of stockholders or written stockholder consent, the Company shall provide to its stockholders the Disclosure Statement, which shall include (A) a summary of the Merger and this Agreement (which summary shall include a summary of the terms relating to the indemnification obligations of the Company Stockholders, the escrow arrangements and the authority of the Representative, subject to Section 4.4(c), the unanimous recommendation of the Board of Directors of the Company that the Company's stockholders adopt and approve this Agreement and the Merger and, subject to Section 4.4(c), the conclusion of the Board of Directors that the Merger is fair and in the best interests of the Company and its stockholders, and a statement that the adoption of this Agreement by the stockholders of the Company shall constitute approval of such terms) and (B) a statement that appraisal rights are available for the Company Shares pursuant to Section 262 of the Delaware General Corporation Law and a copy of such Section 262. Each of the Company and the Buyer agrees to cooperate with the other in the preparation of the Disclosure Statement, including, without limitation, providing promptly to the other such information concerning its business and financial statements and affairs as, in the reasonable judgment of the providing party or its counsel, may be required or appropriate for inclusion in the Disclosure Statement, and to cause its counsel and auditors to cooperate with the other's counsel and auditors in the preparation of the Disclosure Statement. The Buyer and the Company shall each use Reasonable Best Efforts to cause the Disclosure Statement to comply with applicable federal and state securities laws requirements. The Company will promptly advise the Buyer, and the Buyer will promptly advise the Company, in writing if at any time prior to the Effective Time either the Company or the Buyer, as applicable, shall obtain knowledge of any facts that might make it necessary or appropriate to amend or supplement the Disclosure Statement in order to make the statements contained or incorporated by reference therein not misleading or to comply with applicable law. The Company agrees not to distribute the Disclosure Statement until the Buyer has had a reasonable -37-
opportunity to review and comment on the Disclosure Statement and the Disclosure Statement has been approved by the Buyer (which approval may not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed). If the Requisite Stockholder Approval is obtained (i) by means of a written consent, the Company shall send, (X) pursuant to Section 228 and Section 262(d) of the Delaware General Corporation Law, a written notice to all stockholders of the Company that did not execute such written consent informing them that this Agreement and the Merger were adopted and approved by the stockholders of the Company and that appraisal rights are available for their Company Shares pursuant to Section 262 of the Delaware General Corporation Law (which notice shall include a copy of such Section 262) and (Y) pursuant to Chapter 13 of the California General Corporation Law, as promptly as practicable but not later than 10 days after the date on which the Requisite Stockholder Approval was obtained, a notice to all stockholders of the Company entitled to vote on this Agreement and the Merger that did not execute such written consent informing them that this Agreement and the Merger were adopted and approved by the stockholders of the Company and that dissenters' rights are available for their Company Shares pursuant to Chapter 13 of the California General Corporation Law, which notice shall be accompanied by a copy of Sections 1300-1304 of the California General Corporation Law, a statement of the price determined by the Company to represent the fair market value of their Company Shares and a brief description of the procedure to be followed if such stockholder desires to exercise its dissenters' rights (the "California Dissenters' Rights Notice), or (ii) at a special meeting of stockholders, then the Company shall send the California Dissenters' Rights Notice as promptly as practicable but not later than 10 days after the date on which the Requisite Stockholder Approval was obtained. The Company shall promptly inform the Buyer of the date on which each such notice, if applicable, was sent. (b) The Company, acting through its Board of Directors, shall include in the Disclosure Statement (subject to Section 4.4(c)) the unanimous recommendation of its Board of Directors that the stockholders of the Company vote in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger. (c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company's Board of Directors may, in response to a Superior Proposal that did not result from a breach by the Company of Section 4.9 hereof, withdraw or modify the recommendation by the Company's Board of Directors of this Agreement and the Merger (an "Adverse Recommendation"), if the Company's Board of Directors determines in good faith, after consultation with outside counsel and taking into account any changes to the terms of the Merger proposed by the Buyer, that its fiduciary obligations require it to do so, but only at a time that is prior to the adoption of this Agreement either at a special meeting of stockholders or pursuant to a written stockholder consent and is after the fifth business day following the Buyer's receipt of written notice advising the Buyer that the Company's Board of Directors desires to withdraw or modify the recommendation due to the existence of a Superior Proposal (or any material change in the terms of such Superior Proposal), specifying the material terms and conditions of such Superior Proposal (including any such material changes), and identifying the person making such Superior Proposal. Such five business day period shall be required for each and every Superior Proposal or material modification thereto. Nothing in this Section 4.4 shall be deemed to (A) permit the Company to enter into any letter of intent, memorandum of understanding, agreement in principle, acquisition agreement, merger agreement or similar agreement (an "Alternative Acquisition Agreement") constituting or relating to any Acquisition Proposal (other than a confidentiality agreement referred to in Section 4.9 hereof entered into in the circumstances referred to in Section 4.9), (B) affect any obligation of the Company under this Agreement or (C) limit the Company's obligation to call, give notice of, convene and hold the special meeting of stockholders or distribute a written stockholder consent for purposes of approving this Agreement and the Merger regardless of whether the Company's Board of Directors has withdrawn or modified its recommendation of this Agreement and the Merger. -38-
(d) The Company shall ensure that the Disclosure Statement does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (provided that the Company shall not be responsible for the accuracy or completeness of any information concerning the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary furnished by the Buyer in writing for inclusion in the Disclosure Statement). (e) The Buyer shall ensure that any information furnished by the Buyer to the Company in writing for inclusion in the Disclosure Statement does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. (f) The Principal Stockholders have as of the date hereof entered into a Stockholder Agreement in the form attached hereto as Exhibit A, pursuant to which such Principal Stockholders have agreed, among other things, (i) if no Adverse Recommendation has been made, to vote Company Shares that are beneficially owned by the Principal Stockholders in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger, and (ii) unless an Adverse Recommendation is made, not to vote any Company Shares in favor of any Acquisition Proposal other than the Merger. 4.5 Operation of Business. Except as expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement, during the period from the date of this Agreement or as required by applicable law to the Closing or the earlier termination of this Agreement in accordance with Article X hereof (the "Pre-Closing Period"), the Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, conduct its operations only in the Ordinary Course of Business in all material respects and in compliance with all applicable U.S. federal, foreign, regional, state, provincial, county and local laws and regulations and, to the extent consistent therewith, use its Reasonable Best Efforts to preserve intact its current business organization, keep its physical assets in good working condition, keep available the services of its current officers and employees and preserve its relationships with customers, suppliers and others having business dealings with it. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, except (I) as expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement, (II) as set forth in Section 4.5 of the Disclosure Schedule or (III) as required by applicable law, during the Pre-Closing Period the Company shall not, and shall cause each Subsidiary not to, without the written consent of the Buyer: (a) issue or sell any stock or other securities of the Company or any Subsidiary any options, warrants or rights to acquire any such stock or other securities (except pursuant to the exercise of Options and Warrants outstanding on the date hereof and upon conversion of Preferred Stock outstanding as of the date of this Agreement and the issuance of Options to purchase at fair market value up to 2,800,000 Company Shares to employees, directors and consultants of or to the Company and its Subsidiaries on the terms set forth in Section 4.5(a) of the Disclosure Schedule), or amend any of the terms of (including the vesting of) any Options or Warrants or restricted stock agreements, or repurchase or redeem any stock or other securities of the Company (except from former employees, directors or consultants in accordance with agreements in place as of the date of this Agreement and providing for the repurchase of shares at their original issuance price in connection with any termination of employment with or services to the Company or any Subsidiary); (b) split, combine or reclassify any shares of its capital stock; or declare, set aside or pay any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, stock or property or any combination thereof) in respect of its capital stock; (c) create, incur or assume any indebtedness (including obligations in respect of capital leases) other than for short-term borrowings not to exceed $500,000 at any time outstanding under -39-
the Company's existing line of credit or a replacement line of credit on comparable terms and reasonably acceptable to the Buyer; assume, guarantee, endorse or otherwise become liable or responsible (whether directly, contingently or otherwise) for the obligations of any other person or entity; or make any loans, advances or capital contributions to, or investments in, any other person or entity (other than de minimis advances to employees in the Ordinary Course of Business in respect of travel expenses); (d) enter into, adopt or amend any Employee Benefit Plan or any employment or severance agreement or arrangement of the type described in Section 2.22(k) or (except for normal increases in the Ordinary Course of Business for employees who are not Affiliates) increase in any manner the compensation or fringe benefits of, or materially modify the employment terms of, its directors, officers or employees, generally or individually, or pay any bonus or other benefit to its directors, officers or employees (except for existing payment obligations for base salaries in the Ordinary Course of Business and bonus and other benefit obligations listed in Section 2.22(k) or (m) of the Disclosure Schedule) or hire any new officers or (except in the Ordinary Course of Business) any new employees or consultants; (e) acquire, sell, lease (other than the renewal of the lease for the Company's current headquarters in Santa Clara, California, space leased in Herndon, Virginia, at No. 501 in Olympus Tower of Acropolis, No. 20, Hosur Road, Bangalore, India and at No. 804 in Sparta Tower of Acropolis in Bangalore, India, each as described in Section 2.12 of the Disclosure Schedule, upon the terms and conditions set forth in Section 4.5(e) of the Disclosure Schedule), license or dispose of any assets or property (including any shares or other equity interests in or securities of any Subsidiary or any other corporation, partnership, association or other business organization or division thereof), other than purchases and sales of assets in the Ordinary Course of Business; (f) mortgage or pledge any of its property or assets or subject any such property or assets to any Security Interest, except for purchase-money Security Interests in respect of capital expenditures attributable to the purchase of equipment to the extent permitted pursuant to Section 4.5(p); (g) amend its charter, by laws or other organizational documents; (h) sell, assign, transfer, license or sublicense any Intellectual Property, other than pursuant to license or service agreements with customers entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business; (i) change the nature or scope of its business being carried on as of the date of this Agreement or commence any new business not being ancillary or incidental to such business or take any action to alter its organizational or management structure; (j) change its accounting methods, principles or practices, except insofar as may be required by a generally applicable change in GAAP, or make any new elections, or changes to any material current elections, with respect to Taxes; (k) enter into or amend in any material respect any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.12 of the Disclosure Schedule (other than the Great America Parkway Lease, the space leased in Herndon, Virginia, at No. 501 in Olympus Tower of Acropolis, No. 20, Hosur Road, Bangalore, India and at No. 804 in Sparta Tower of Acropolis in Bangalore, India, each of which may be amended in the manner set forth in Section 4.5(k) of the Disclosure Schedule); (l) enter into or amend in any material respect any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.13 of the Disclosure Schedule; -40-
(m) enter into or amend in any material respect any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.15(a)(i) or (ii) of the Disclosure Schedule, except for (1) equipment leases entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business with terms of twelve months or less, which shall nevertheless be subject to the limitations set forth in paragraph (p) below; (2) network service provider contracts entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business, having a term of one year or less and involving 100 mbps or less; (3) customer contracts entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business with pricing, terms and other conditions equivalent in all material respects to comparable customer contracts existing at the date of this Agreement; and (4) vendor agreements entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business involving less than the sum of $200,000 over the term of the agreement and are terminable within one year; (n) enter into or amend in any material respect any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.15 of the Disclosure Schedule (other than in Section 2.15(a)(i) or 2.15(a)(ii) thereof); (o) terminate, other than as a matter of right in the Ordinary Course of Business (including, but not limited to, termination of agreements of nonpaying customers) or take or omit to take any action that would constitute a violation under, or waive any material rights under, any contract or agreement of a nature required to be listed in Section 2.12, Section 2.13 or Section 2.15 of the Disclosure Schedule or any other contract or agreement with any customer or the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries involving more than the sum of $50,000 over the term of the agreement; (p) make or commit to make any capital expenditure, including those permitted by Section 4.5(m)(1), in excess of $50,000 per item or $200,000 in the aggregate per month; (q) institute any Legal Proceeding, except for any Legal Proceeding brought by the Company for the purpose of enforcing the Buyer's performance of its obligations under this Agreement, or settle and Legal Proceeding, except for settlements of routine litigation in the Ordinary Course of Business, provided that such settlements only involve cash payments of monetary damages, which payments individually and in the aggregate shall not be material, or cash payments paid in full during the Pre-Closing Period; (r) take any action or fail to take any action permitted by this Agreement with the knowledge that such action or failure to take action would reasonably be expected to result in (i) any of the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Agreement becoming untrue during the Pre-Closing Period (other than as a result of changes to the representations and warranties expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement) or (ii) any of the conditions to the Merger set forth in Article V not being satisfied; (s) fail to take any action necessary to preserve the validity of any material Intellectual Property or Permit; or (t) agree in writing or otherwise to take any of the foregoing actions. In addition, during the Pre-Closing Period, the Company shall (i) accept customer orders in the Ordinary Course of Business and (ii) cooperate with the Buyer in communicating with suppliers and customers to prepare for the transfer of the Company's business to the Buyer as a result of and conditioned upon the Merger, on the Closing Date, so long as such communications are not inconsistent with the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act. -41-
4.6 Stay of Litigation. Upon execution of this Agreement, all activities as between the Parties in the prosecution and/or defense of the Lawsuits shall be immediately suspended, and the Parties shall cause their counsel to prepare and file, within two (2) business days following the date of this Agreement, joint motions to indefinitely stay the Lawsuits. The motions shall identify this Agreement, shall make a formal request for an Order vacating all currently scheduled dates, including but not limited to (a) the remaining dates related to the briefing and hearing on all pending discovery or other motions, (b) all other pretrial dates, and (c) the trial dates, and shall further require the parties to notify the Court upon either (i) any termination of this Agreement pursuant to Article X of this Agreement, or (ii) any Closing of the Merger pursuant to Article I of this Agreement. The joint motions shall also request that any such stay be automatically lifted, five (5) business days after notice to the court of any termination of this Agreement pursuant to Article X of this Agreement. If the stay is lifted, the parties will request a new trial setting conference as soon as reasonably practicable, at which time the Court will set a new schedule for trial and pre-trial dates. In the action pending in Santa Clara Superior Court and pursuant to the terms of the Contingent Settlement Agreement and Partial Release in the form attached hereto as Exhibit E, the Parties agree not to seek a trial date fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date the stay is lifted. In the actions pending in U.S. District Court in Massachusetts, the parties agree not to seek a trial date fewer than nine (9) months after the date the stay is lifted. Upon the Closing, the Buyer shall prepare and cause to be filed stipulations terminating the Lawsuits with a dismissal with prejudice as to each of Ajit Gupta, Richard Day and the Company, and all counsel will execute such stipulations. 4.7 Access to Information. (a) Except to the extent limited by the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act or other law, during the Pre-Closing Period, the Company shall (and shall cause each Subsidiary to) afford the officers, attorneys, accountants and other authorized representatives of the Buyer reasonable access upon reasonable notice and during normal business hours to all personnel, offices, properties, books and records of the Company, so that the Buyer may have full opportunity to make such investigation as it shall desire to make of the management, business, properties and affairs of the Company and the Subsidiaries, and the Buyer shall be permitted to make such abstracts from, or copies of, all such books and records as may be reasonably necessary to assist in planning for integration and operation of the combined business following the Closing, provided that such information shall be held pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Nondisclosure Agreement dated August 26, 2004, between the Buyer and the Company, as amended by Amendment No. 1 to the Nondisclosure Agreement dated January 13, 2005, and Amendment No. 2 to the Nondisclosure Agreement dated February 16, 2005 (the "NDA"). The Company shall (and shall cause each Subsidiary to) furnish to the Buyer such financial and operating data and other information as to the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries as the Buyer shall reasonably request. The Company shall, from and after the date hereof, cause its accountants to provide to the Buyer and its auditors such information and work papers as the Buyer or such auditors may reasonably deem necessary in connection with the preparation of the Buyer's SEC filings arising out of the Merger. The Company shall execute and deliver to its accountants such consents and waivers as may be necessary to afford the Buyer and its auditors access to such information and work papers. (b) Within 10 business days after the end of each month ending prior to the Closing, beginning with March 1, 2005, the Company shall furnish to the Buyer an unaudited income statement for such month and a balance sheet as of the end of such month, prepared on a basis consistent with the Financial Statements. Such financial statements shall present fairly the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries as of the dates thereof and for the periods covered thereby, and shall be consistent with the books and records of the Company and the Subsidiaries. 4.8 Notice of Breaches. -42-
(a) During the Pre-Closing Period, the Company shall promptly deliver to the Buyer supplemental information concerning events or circumstances occurring subsequent to the date hereof which would render any representation, warranty or statement of the Company in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect at any time after the date of this Agreement until the Closing. No such supplemental information shall be deemed to avoid or cure any misrepresentation or breach of warranty or constitute an amendment of any representation, warranty or statement in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule. (b) During the Pre-Closing Period, the Buyer shall promptly deliver to the Company supplemental information concerning events or circumstances occurring subsequent to the date hereof which would render any representation, warranty or statement of the Buyer in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect at any time after the date of this Agreement until the Closing. No such supplemental information shall be deemed to avoid or cure any misrepresentation or breach of warranty or constitute an amendment of any representation, warranty or statement in this Agreement or the Disclosure Schedule. 4.9 Exclusivity. (a) During the Pre-Closing Period, the Company shall not, and the Company shall require each of its officers, directors, employees, representatives and agents not to, directly or indirectly, (i) initiate, solicit, encourage or otherwise facilitate any inquiry, proposal, offer or discussion with any party (other than the Buyer) concerning any Acquisition Proposal, (ii) furnish any information concerning the business, properties or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary or the Company Shares to any party (other than the Buyer) or (iii) engage in negotiations or enter into any agreement with any party (other than the Buyer) concerning any such transaction. (b) Notwithstanding the foregoing, prior to the adoption of this Agreement either at a special meeting of stockholders or pursuant to a written stockholder consent, the Company may, to the extent required by the fiduciary obligations of the Company's Board of Directors, as determined in good faith by the Company's Board of Directors after consultation with outside counsel, in response to a bona fide, unsolicited written Acquisition Proposal from an unaffiliated third party made or received after the date of this Agreement that the Company's Board of Directors determines in good faith after consultation with outside counsel and a nationally recognized independent financial advisor is reasonably likely to lead to a Superior Proposal, in each case that did not result from a breach by the Company of this Section 4.9, and subject to compliance with Section 4.9(c), (x) furnish information with respect to the Company to the person making such Acquisition Proposal and its Advisors pursuant to a customary confidentiality agreement not less restrictive of the other party than the NDA and (y) participate in discussions or negotiations (including solicitation of a revised Acquisition Proposal) with such person and its Advisors regarding any Acquisition Proposal. Without limiting the foregoing, it is agreed that any violation of the restrictions set forth in this Section 4.9 by any Advisor of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, whether or not such person is purporting to act on behalf of the Company or otherwise, shall be deemed to be a material breach of this Section 4.9 by the Company. (c) The Company shall promptly, and in any event within one business day, notify any party with which discussions or negotiations of the nature described in paragraph (a) above were pending that the Company is terminating such discussions or negotiations. If the Company receives any Acquisition Proposal or any request for information in connection with any Acquisition Proposal, or of any inquiry with respect to, or that could reasonably be expected to lead to, any Acquisition Proposal, the Company shall, within two business days after such receipt, notify the Buyer of such Acquisition Proposal, request or inquiry, including the identity of the other party and the terms of such Acquisition Proposal, request or inquiry. -43-
4.10 Listing Notifications. The Buyer shall timely prepare and submit to NASDAQ any notice or other document or instrument required to be filed with or submitted to NASDAQ by applicable federal or state securities laws or the NASDAQ Marketplace Rules with respect to the shares of the Buyer Common Stock issuable in connection with the Merger. 4.11 Expenses. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, the Buyer will pay all fees and expenses (including legal and accounting fees and expenses) incurred by it in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby and the Equity Holders, jointly and severally, will pay all fees and expenses incurred by the Equity Holders in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby. Each Equity Holder shall be responsible for payment of all sales or transfer Taxes (including real property transfer Taxes) arising out of the conveyance of the Company Shares owned by such Company Stockholder. 4.12 Company 401(k) Plan. If requested by the Buyer, the Company shall terminate its 401(k) Plan in accordance with its terms as of or prior to the Effective Time. 4.13 280G Covenant. Prior to the Closing Date, the Company shall submit to a stockholder vote the right of any "disqualified individual" (as defined in Section 280G(c) of the Code) to receive any and all payments (or other benefits) that could be deemed "parachute payments" under Section 280G(b) of the Code, in a manner that satisfies the stockholder approval requirements for the small business exemption of Section 280G(b)(5) of the Code and any regulations (including proposed regulations) promulgated thereunder. Consistent with the requirements of Section 280G(b)(5) and the regulations, such vote shall establish the "disqualified individual's" right to the payment, benefit or other compensation, and before the Closing Date, the Company shall provide adequate disclosure to all Company Stockholders of all material facts concerning all payments that, but for such vote, could be deemed "parachute payments" to a "disqualified individual" under Section 280G of the Code in a manner that satisfies Section 280G(b)(5)(B)(ii) of the Code and any regulations (including proposed regulations) promulgated thereunder. 4.14 FIRPTA. Prior to the Closing, the Company shall deliver to the Buyer and to the Internal Revenue Service notices that the Company Shares are not "U.S. real property interests" in accordance with Treasury Regulations under Sections 897 and 1445 of the Code. If the Buyer does not receive the notices described above on or before the Closing Date, the Buyer, the Transitory Subsidiary or the Exchange Agent shall be permitted to withhold from the payments to be made pursuant to this Agreement any required withholding Tax under Section 1445 of the Code in the manner provided in Section 1.18. 4.15 Silicon Valley Bank Registration Rights. Prior to the Closing, the Company shall terminate all registration rights of Silicon Valley Bank disclosed in Section 2.2(e) of the Disclosure Schedule. 4.16 Option Acceleration. (a) Except in accordance with the terms of arrangements established by the Company prior to the Effective Time as specifically disclosed in Sections 2.2(c)(ii) and 2.7(b) of the Disclosure Schedule or in accordance employment arrangements between the Buyer and the Management Participants entered into as of the date of this Agreement, during the 18 month period commencing at the Effective Time, the Buyer agrees that it shall not (i) accelerate the vesting of any Outstanding Options assumed by the Buyer or (ii) continue the vesting of any Outstanding Options assumed by the Buyer for any employee that does not remain an active employee of or consultant to the Buyer or any of its -44-
Subsidiaries, including any employee or consultant that is not generally required to provide a minimum of 15 hours of service on a weekly basis to the Buyer or any of its Subsidiaries. (b) Following the 18 month anniversary of the Effective Time, the Buyer shall provide the Representative with such relevant back-up materials and documents as the Representative may reasonably request to allow the Representative to confirm the calculation of the number of Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares issued pursuant to Section 1.5(d)(iii). ARTICLE V CONDITIONS TO CONSUMMATION OF MERGER 5.1 Conditions to Obligations of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary. The obligation of each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary to consummate the Merger is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions precedent, each of which may be waived in writing in the sole discretion of the Buyer: (a) the holders of at least 95% of the votes represented by the outstanding Company Shares entitled to vote on this Agreement and the Merger shall have voted to adopt this Agreement and approve the Merger; (b) the Company shall have (i) obtained (and shall have provided copies thereof to the Buyer) all of the waivers, permits, consents, approvals or other authorizations (collectively, "Consents"), and effected all of the registrations, filings and notices (collectively, "Filings"), which are listed in Section 5.1(b)(i) of the Disclosure Schedule, and (ii) obtained (and shall have provided copies thereof to the Buyer) all other Consents and effected all other Filings that, if not obtained or effected, would reasonably be expected to result in a Company Material Adverse Effect (it being understood that the failure to obtain any of the Consents or effect any or all of the Filings listed in Section 5.1(b)(ii) of the Disclosure Schedule would not reasonably be expected to result in a Company Material Adverse Effect); (c) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct in all respects when made as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing as though made as of the Closing, except (i) to the extent such representations and warranties are specifically made as of a particular date (in which case such representations and warranties shall be true and correct in all material respects as of such date), (ii) for changes expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement and (iii) in any event, as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, for purposes of this Section 5.1(c), each representation or warranty made by the Company herein is made without any qualifications or limitations as to materiality (including without limitation any qualifications or limitations made by reference to a Company Material Adverse Effect) and, without limiting the foregoing, the word "material" and words of similar import shall be deemed deleted from any such representation or warranty; (d) the Company shall have performed or complied with its agreements and covenants required to be performed or complied with under this Agreement as of or prior to the Closing except for any failures to perform or comply which, individually or in the aggregate, are not material in amount or significance; (e) there shall have been no Company Material Adverse Effect as of or prior to the Closing; -45-
(f) no Legal Proceeding shall be pending wherein an unfavorable judgment, order, decree, stipulation or injunction would (i) prevent consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (ii) cause the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to be rescinded following consummation or (iii) have, individually or in the aggregate, a Company Material Adverse Effect, and no such judgment, order, decree, stipulation or injunction shall be in effect; (g) all applicable waiting periods (and any extensions thereof) under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act and under any other applicable U.S. or foreign antitrust laws shall have expired or otherwise been terminated; (h) all applicable approvals by the California Commissioner of Corporations pursuant to Section 3(a)(10) of the Securities Act and California law shall have been granted or the issuance of the Buyer Common Shares in connection with the Merger shall have been registered on the Registration Statement; (i) the Buyer shall have received a counterpart executed by Ajit Gupta and Richard Day of the Contingent Settlement Agreement and Partial Release relating to the Lawsuits attached hereto as Exhibit E; (j) the Company shall have delivered to the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary the Company Certificate; (k) the Buyer shall have received copies of the resignations, effective as of the Closing, of each director and officer of the Company (other than any such resignations which the Buyer designates, by written notice to the Company, as unnecessary); (l) the Buyer shall have received a counterpart of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement executed by the Escrow Agent and the Representative; (m) the Buyer shall have received from Fenwick & West LLP, counsel to the Company, an opinion in the form attached hereto as Exhibit F addressed to the Buyer and dated as of the Closing Date; (n) the Buyer shall have received from counsel to the India Subsidiary an opinion in the form attached hereto as Exhibit G addressed to the Buyer and dated as of the Closing Date; (o) the Buyer shall have received from Silicon Valley Bank an executed pay-off letter in the form reasonably satisfactory to the Buyer certifying that all indebtedness of the Company to Silicon Valley Bank has been repaid as of the Closing and releasing any Security Interests held by Silicon Valley Bank in the business and/or the assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries; (p) the Buyer shall have received from the Company all UCC-3 termination statements set forth on Section 5.1(p) of the Disclosure Schedule and all other UCC-3 termination statements obtainable by the Company prior to Closing using its Reasonable Best Efforts for all filed UCC-1 financing statements related to indebtedness of the Company, each duly executed by the applicable lienholder and in a form proper to be filed with the appropriate Governmental Entity, and all other necessary release documents for all Security Interests in the business and/or assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries, each duly executed by the appropriate lienholder; -46-
(q) the Buyer shall have received evidence that this Agreement and the Merger have received the Requisite Stockholder Approval; (r) the Buyer shall have received evidence that the stockholder vote required by Section 4.13 has occurred; (s) the Buyer shall have received a certificate of incorporation from the concerned Registrar of Companies for the India Subsidiary; (t) the Buyer shall have received documentation in form satisfactory to the Buyer evidencing the appointment of at least two nominees of the Buyer as additional directors of the India Subsidiary and authorizing the secretary of the India Subsidiary or any other official of the India Subsidiary to file a return on Form 32 with the concerned Registrar of Companies; and (u) the Buyer shall have received such other certificates and instruments (including certificates of good standing of the Company in its jurisdiction of organization and the various foreign jurisdictions in which it is qualified, certified charter documents, certificates as to the incumbency of officers and the adoption of authorizing resolutions) as it shall reasonably request in connection with the Closing. 5.2 Conditions to Obligations of the Company. The obligation of the Company to consummate the Merger is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions precedent, each of which may be waived in writing in the sole discretion of the Company: (a) the representations and warranties of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct when made as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing as though made as of the Closing, except (i) to the extent such representations and warranties are specifically made as of a particular date (in which case such representations and warranties shall be true and correct in all material respects as of such date), (ii) for changes expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement and (iii) in any event, as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a material adverse effect on the Buyer and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, for purposes of this Section 5.2(a), each representation or warranty made by the Buyer herein is made without any qualifications or limitations as to materiality (including without limitation any qualifications or limitations made by reference to a material adverse effect on the Buyer) and, without limiting the foregoing, the word "material" and words of similar import shall be deemed deleted from any such representation or warranty; (b) each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary shall have performed or complied with its agreements and covenants required to be performed or complied with under this Agreement as of or prior to the Closing except for any failures to perform or comply which, individually or in the aggregate, are not material in amount or significance; (c) the Company shall have received a counterpart executed by the Buyer to the releases and stipulations relating to the Lawsuits attached hereto as Exhibit E; (d) the Buyer shall have delivered to the Representative the Buyer Certificate; (e) the Representative shall have received a counterpart of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement executed by the Buyer and the Escrow Agent; -47-
(f) the Representative shall have received evidence of delivery of the Indemnification Escrow Shares to the Escrow Agent; (g) the Representative shall have received such other certificates and instruments (including certificates of good standing of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary in their jurisdiction of organization, certified charter documents, certificates as to the incumbency of officers and the adoption of authorizing resolutions) as it shall reasonably request in connection with the Closing; (h) the Representative shall have received from Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP, counsel to the Buyer, an opinion in the form attached hereto as Exhibit H addressed to the Equity Holders and dated as of the Closing Date; and (i) no Legal Proceeding shall be pending by or before any Governmental Entity in which a Governmental Entity is a party wherein an unfavorable judgment, order, decree, stipulation or injunction would (A) prevent consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or (B) cause the transactions contemplated by this Agreement to be rescinded following the Closing. ARTICLE VI INDEMNIFICATION 6.1 Indemnification by the Equity Holders. From and after the Effective Time, the Equity Holders, on a basis providing for equal culpability via their deposit of the Indemnification Escrow Shares, shall indemnify the Buyer in respect of, and hold it harmless against, any and all Damages incurred or suffered by the Company, the Surviving Corporation, the Buyer or any Affiliate thereof resulting from, relating to or constituting: (a) any breach, as of the date of this Agreement or as of the Closing Date, of any representation or warranty of the Company contained in this Agreement; (b) any failure to perform any covenant or agreement of the Company contained in this Agreement; (c) any failure of any Company Stockholder to have good, valid and marketable title to the issued and outstanding Company Shares issued in the name of such Company Stockholder, free and clear of all Security Interests; (d) any claim by a stockholder or former stockholder of the Company, or any other person or entity (including any officer or director of the Company or any Subsidiary), seeking to assert, or based upon: (i) ownership or rights to ownership of any shares of stock of the Company; (ii) any rights of a stockholder (other than the right to receive the Merger Consideration pursuant to this Agreement or procedure to dissent under the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law or California Corporations Code), including any option, preemptive rights or rights to notice or to vote; or (iii) any claim that his, her or its shares were wrongfully repurchased by the Company; or (e) any claim for indemnification by an Indemnified Party as provided in Section 9.1 other than in connection with a claim by Buyer directly against an officer or director of the Company to the extent such officer or director is entitled to indemnification by the Company in connection with such claim, unless it is ultimately determined that such officer or director is not entitled to such indemnification. -48-
6.2 Indemnification Claims. (a) The Buyer shall give written notification to the Representative of the commencement of any Third Party Action. Such notification shall be given within 20 days after receipt by the Buyer of notice of such Third Party Action, and shall describe in reasonable detail (to the extent then known by the Buyer) the facts constituting the basis for such Third Party Action and the amount of the claimed damages. No delay or failure on the part of the Buyer in so notifying the Representative shall relieve the Equity Holders of any liability or obligation hereunder except to the extent of any damage or liability caused by or arising out of such delay or failure. Within 20 days after delivery of such notification, the Representative may, upon written notice thereof to the Buyer, assume control of the defense of such Third Party Action with counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Buyer; provided that (i) the Representative may only assume control of such defense if (A) he, she or it acknowledges in writing to the Buyer that any damages, fines, costs or other liabilities that may be assessed against the Buyer in connection with such Third Party Action constitute Damages for which the Buyer shall be indemnified pursuant to this Article VI, (B) the ad damnum does not exceed 110% of the amount of Damages for which the Equity Holders are liable under this Article VI, and (C) an adverse resolution of the Third Party Action would not have a material adverse effect on the goodwill or reputation of the Buyer or the business, operations or future conduct of the Buyer and (ii) the Representative may not assume control of the defense of Third Party Action involving criminal liability or in which equitable relief is sought against the Buyer and may not assume control of any Tax Proceeding to the extent such Tax Proceeding involves consolidated or combined Tax Returns of the Buyer for any Tax period (or portion thereof) after the Closing Date or a potential Tax liability which may exceed 110% of the amount for which the Equity Holders may be liable under this Article VI after taking into account the amount of all other liabilities for which claims have been made by the Buyer. If the Representative does not, or is not permitted under the terms hereof to, so assume control of the defense of a Third Party Action, the Buyer shall control such defense. The Non-controlling Party may participate in such defense at its own expense. The Controlling Party shall keep the Non-controlling Party advised of the status of such Third Party Action and the defense thereof and shall consider in good faith recommendations made by the Non-controlling Party with respect thereto. The Non-controlling Party shall furnish the Controlling Party with such information as it may have with respect to such Third Party Action (including copies of any summons, complaint or other pleading which may have been served on such party and any written claim, demand, invoice, billing or other document evidencing or asserting the same) and shall otherwise cooperate with and assist the Controlling Party in the defense of such Third Party Action. The fees and expenses of counsel to the Buyer with respect to a Third Party Action shall be considered Damages for purposes of this Agreement if (i) the Buyer controls the defense of such Third Party Action pursuant to the terms of this Section 6.2(a) or (ii) the Representative assumes control of such defense and the Buyer reasonably concludes that the Representative and the Buyer have conflicting interests or different defenses available with respect to such Third Party Action. The Representative shall not agree to any settlement of, or the entry of any judgment arising from, any Third Party Action without the prior written consent of the Buyer, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed; provided that the consent of the Buyer shall not be required if the Representative agrees in writing to pay any amounts payable pursuant to such settlement or judgment and such settlement or judgment includes a complete release of the Buyer from further liability and has no other adverse effect on the Buyer. Except as provided in Section 6.2(f) below, the Buyer shall not agree to any settlement of, or the entry of any judgment arising from, any such Third Party Action without the prior written consent of the Representative, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed. (b) In order to seek indemnification under this Article VI, the Buyer shall deliver a Claim Notice to the Representative. -49-
(c) Within 30 days after delivery of a Claim Notice, the Representative shall deliver to the Buyer a Response, in which the Representative, on behalf of the Equity Holders, shall: (i) agree that the Buyer is entitled to receive all of the Claimed Amount (in which case the Response shall be accompanied by a letter instructing the Escrow Agent to disburse to the Buyer from the Indemnification Escrow Shares a number of shares that if multiplied by a value of $12.50 per share will equal the Claimed Amount), (ii) agree that the Buyer is entitled to receive the Agreed Amount (in which case the Response shall be accompanied by a letter instructing the Escrow Agent to disburse to the Buyer from the Indemnification Escrow Shares a number of shares that if multiplied by a value of $12.50 per share will equal the Agreed Amount) or (iii) dispute that the Buyer is entitled to receive any of the Claimed Amount. The Equity Holders may contest the payment of all or a portion of the Claimed Amount only based upon a good faith belief that all or such portion of the Claimed Amount does not constitute Damages for which the Buyer is entitled to indemnification under this Article VI. If no Response is delivered by the Equity Holders within such 30-day period, the Equity Holders shall be deemed to have agreed that all of the Claimed Amount is owed to the Buyer. Acceptance by the Buyer of partial payment of any Claimed Amount shall be without prejudice to the Buyer's right to claim the balance of any such Claimed Amount. (d) During the 30-day period following the delivery of a Response that reflects a Dispute, the Equity Holders and the Buyer shall use good faith efforts to resolve the Dispute. If the Dispute is not resolved within such 30-day period, the Equity Holders and the Buyer shall submit the Dispute to binding arbitration and such Dispute shall be resolved in accordance with Section 6.2(e). (e) Any arbitration shall be conducted in San Francisco, California, in the case of a claim made by the Buyer, or in Boston, Massachusetts, in the case of a claim made by the Representative, by a single arbitrator (the "Arbitrator") in accordance with the Commercial Rules in effect from time to time and the following provisions: (i) In the event of any conflict between the Commercial Rules in effect from time to time and the provisions of this Agreement, the provisions of this Agreement shall prevail and be controlling; (ii) Either party shall commence the arbitration by filing a written submission with the office of the AAA in the appropriate city and state as provided by this Section 6.2(e) in accordance with Commercial Rule 5 (or any successor provision); (iii) All depositions or other discovery shall be conducted pursuant to the applicable U.S. federal rules relating to discovery; (iv) Not later than 30 days after the conclusion of the arbitration hearing, the Arbitrator shall prepare and distribute to the parties a writing setting forth the arbitral award and the Arbitrator's reasons therefor. Any award rendered by the Arbitrator shall be final, conclusive and binding upon the parties, and judgment thereon may be entered and enforced in any court of competent jurisdiction (subject to Section 12.11); (v) The Arbitrator shall have no power or authority, under the Commercial Rules or otherwise, to (x) modify or disregard any provision of this Agreement, including the provisions of this Section 6.2(e), or (y) address or resolve any issue not submitted by the parties; and (vi) In connection with any arbitration proceeding pursuant to this Agreement, each party shall bear its own costs and expenses, except that the fees and costs of the AAA -50-
and the Arbitrator, the costs and expenses of obtaining the facility where the arbitration hearing is held, and such other costs and expenses as the Arbitrator may determine to be directly related to the conduct of the arbitration and appropriately borne jointly by the parties (which shall not include any party's attorneys' fees or costs, witness fees (if any), costs of investigation and similar expenses) shall be shared equally by the Buyer and the Equity Holders. (f) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section 6.2, if a third party asserts (other than by means of a lawsuit) that the Buyer is liable to such third party for a monetary or other obligation which may constitute or result in Damages for which the Buyer may be entitled to indemnification pursuant to this Article VI, and the Buyer reasonably determines that it has a valid business reason to fulfill such obligation, then (i) the Buyer shall be entitled to satisfy such obligation, without prior notice to or consent from the Representative or the Equity Holders, (ii) the Buyer may subsequently make a claim for indemnification in accordance with the provisions of this Article VI, and (iii) the Buyer shall be reimbursed, in accordance with the provisions of this Article VI, for any such Damages for which it is entitled to indemnification pursuant to this Article VI (subject to the right of the Equity Holders to dispute the Buyer's entitlement to indemnification, or the amount for which it is entitled to indemnification, under the terms of this Article VI). (g) The Representative shall have full power and authority on behalf of each Equity Holder to take any and all actions on behalf of, execute any and all instruments on behalf of, and execute or waive any and all rights of, the Equity Holders under this Article VI. The Representative shall have no liability to any Equity Holder for any action taken or omitted on behalf of the Equity Holders pursuant to this Article VI. 6.3 Survival of Representations and Warranties. Unless otherwise specified in this Section 6.3 or elsewhere in this Agreement, all provisions of this Agreement shall survive the Closing and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and shall continue forever in full force and effect in accordance with their terms; provided that the representations and warranties of the Buyer set forth in Sections 3.6 and 3.7 and the covenants of the Buyer set forth in Section 4.8(b) (as they relate to such representations and warranties) shall terminate at, and shall not survive, the Closing. All representations and warranties (other than those set forth in Sections 2.2, 2.3, 2.9, 2.13 and 2.23) and all covenants and other agreements of the Company set forth in Article IV (other than those set forth in Sections 4.2, 4.13 and 4.14) shall expire on the date 18 months following the Closing Date, and the representations and warranties set forth in Sections 2.2, 2.3, 2.9, 2.13 and 2.23 and the covenants and other agreements of the Company set forth in Sections 4.2, 4.13 and 4.14 shall survive for a period of 30 months following the Closing Date. If the Buyer delivers to the Representative, before expiration of a representation or warranty, either a Claim Notice based upon a breach of such representation or warranty, or an Expected Claim Notice based upon a breach of such representation or warranty, then the applicable representation or warranty shall survive until, but only for purposes of, the resolution of the matter covered by such notice. If the legal proceeding or written claim with respect to which a Claim Notice or an Expected Claim Notice has been given is definitively withdrawn or resolved in favor of the Buyer, the Buyer shall promptly so notify the Representative. The rights to indemnification set forth in this Article VI shall not be affected by (i) any investigation conducted by or on behalf of the Buyer or any actual or implied knowledge or notice acquired (or capable of being acquired) by the Buyer, whether before or after the date of this Agreement or the Closing Date, with respect to the inaccuracy or noncompliance with any representation, warranty, covenant or obligation which is the subject of indemnification hereunder, or (ii) any waiver by the Buyer of any closing condition relating to the accuracy of representations and warranties or the performance of or compliance with agreements and covenants. 6.4 Limitations. -51-
(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, the Equity Holders shall not be liable under Section 6.1(a) or clause (x) of Section 8.2 unless and until the aggregate Damages for which they would otherwise be liable under Section 6.1(a) and clause (x) of Section 8.2 exceed $1,000,000 (at which point the Equity Holders shall become liable for the aggregate Damages under Sections 6.1(a) and clause (x) of Section 8.2 and not just amounts in excess of $1,000,000); provided, however, that the limitation set forth in this paragraph (a) shall not apply with respect to any liability with respect to breaches of Section 2.9(o) or, for the avoidance of doubt, liability under clauses (y) or (z) of Section 8.2. (b) From and after the Effective Time, except in the case of fraud or knowing misrepresentation, the sole and exclusive remedy of the Buyer with respect to claims resulting from or relating to any misrepresentation, breach of warranty or failure to perform any covenant or agreement contained in this Agreement (including any claim under Article VIII) or arising out of or in connection with the Company's obligations under this Agreement shall be the Indemnification Escrow Shares. (c) No Equity Holder shall have any right of contribution against the Company or the Surviving Corporation with respect to any breach by the Company of any of its representations, warranties, covenants or agreements. (d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth herein, nothing in this Article VI or in Article VIII is intended to create an affirmative indemnity obligation by any Equity Holder for fraud or knowing misrepresentation (it being understood that the foregoing shall not limit any right of the Buyer to assert any claim based on fraud or knowing misrepresentation not based on the indemnification obligations set forth in Sections 6.1 and 8.2 of this Agreement (as affirmed by Section 4 of the Stockholders Agreement and Section 2 of the Management Participant Agreement)). (e) Any recovery of Damages by the Buyer for indemnification pursuant to Article VI shall be offset by any insurance proceeds actually received by the Buyer corresponding to such indemnification claim. To the extent the Buyer receives any such insurance proceeds after the delivery of Indemnification Escrow Shares from the Equity Holders pursuant to Section 3 of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement, the Buyer will issue and deliver that number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the value of the insurance proceeds to the Equity Holders or to the Escrow Agent, to be allocated among the Equity Holders in accordance with Article I of this Agreement. ARTICLE VII REGISTRATION OF SHARES 7.1 California Permit; Registered Offering. (a) As promptly as practicable after the execution of this Agreement, the Buyer shall prepare the necessary documents and apply to obtain a California Permit so that the issuance of the Buyer Common Shares in the Merger shall be exempt from registration under the Securities Act, by virtue of the exemption from registration contained in Section 3(a)(10) thereof; provided, however, that the Buyer shall use all Reasonable Best Efforts to prepare and file the application to obtain a California Permit within 15 days after the later of (i) execution of this Agreement and (ii) the date on which the Company has furnished to the Buyer materials in conformity with the requirements of such application. The Company shall cooperate with, and provide information to, the Buyer in connection with the Buyer's application for the California Permit, including such Disclosure Statement, financial statements and other information with respect to the Company as, in the reasonable judgment of the Buyer or its counsel, are required to be filed therewith. The Company and the Buyer will respond promptly to any comments from the California Commissioner of Corporations and will each use Reasonable Best Efforts to have the -52-
California Permit granted as soon as practicable after such filing; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be understood to require either the Company or the Buyer to amend its respective charter documents. None of the information supplied by the Company to the Buyer, the California Commissioner of Corporations or any representative thereof in connection with the California Permit application or any other document prepared to comply with federal or state securities laws shall contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. None of the information supplied by the Buyer to the Company, the California Commissioner of Corporations or any representative thereof in connection with the California Permit application or any other document prepared to comply with federal or state securities laws shall contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The Company shall promptly advise the Buyer, and the Buyer shall promptly advise the Company, in writing if at any time prior to the Effective Time either the Company or the Buyer, as applicable, shall obtain knowledge of any facts that might make it necessary or appropriate to amend or supplement the California Permit application in order to make the statements contained or incorporated by reference therein not misleading or to comply with applicable law. (b) If a California Permit cannot be issued for any reason, or is not issued on or before the date that is 75 days after the date of the initial filing of the application to obtain a California Permit, then the Parties shall use their Reasonable Best Efforts to permit the delivery of Buyer Common Shares pursuant to the Merger to be accomplished by means of registration of such Buyer Common Shares on a Registration Statement on Form S-4 (or another appropriate form) (the "Registration Statement") under the Securities Act. If the Buyer Common Shares will be issued pursuant to an effective Registration Statement, the Buyer shall prepare, with the assistance and cooperation of the Company, the Registration Statement and the Proxy Statement/Prospectus with the SEC as promptly as is reasonably practicable. The Buyer shall file the Registration Statement with the SEC and shall, with the assistance and cooperation of the Company, promptly respond to any SEC comments on the Registration Statement and shall otherwise use its Reasonable Best Efforts to have the Registration Statement declared effective by the SEC as promptly as practicable and to maintain the effectiveness of the Registration Statement through the Effective Time. The Buyer shall advise the Company promptly after it receives notice of (i) the Registration Statement being declared effective or any supplement or amendment thereto being filed with the SEC, (ii) the issuance of any stop order in respect of the Registration Statement, and (iii) the receipt of any substantive correspondence, comments or requests from the SEC in respect of the Registration Statement. Following receipt of such notice from the Buyer, the Company shall promptly distribute the Proxy Statement/Prospectus to the Company Stockholders. The Company, acting through its Board of Directors, shall include in the Proxy Statement/Prospectus the unanimous recommendation of its Board of Directors that the Company Stockholders vote in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger. Each of the Buyer and the Company shall also cooperate to, and shall, take such other reasonable actions (other than qualifying to do business in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified) required to be taken under any applicable state securities laws in connection therewith. The Buyer will pay all customary expenses in connection with the Registration Statement, including, without limitation, registration fees, legal and accounting fees, listing fees, transfer agent fees and printing and mailing costs related to the Registration Statement. None of the information supplied by the Company to the Buyer for inclusion in the Registration Statement shall contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. None of the information supplied by the Buyer for inclusion in the Registration Statement shall contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that, for the avoidance of -53-
doubt, the Buyer shall not be responsible for the accuracy or completeness of any information relating to the Company or furnished by the Company in writing for inclusion in the Registration Statement. (c) Section 7.1(c) of the Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list of those persons who are, in the Company's reasonable judgment, Rule 145 Affiliates. The Company shall notify the Buyer in writing of any change in the identity of its Rule 145 Affiliates prior to the Closing Date. The Buyer shall be entitled to place appropriate legends on the certificates evidencing any shares of Buyer Common Stock to be received by Rule 145 Affiliates of the Company in the Merger reflecting the restrictions set forth in Rule 145 promulgated under the Securities Act and to issue appropriate stop transfer instructions to the transfer agent for Buyer Common Stock (provided that such legends or stop transfer instructions shall be removed one year after the Effective Time, upon the request of any holder of shares of Buyer Common Stock issued in the Merger, if such holder is not then a Rule 145 Affiliate of the Buyer). 7.2 Lock-up Agreements. (a) The Company shall deliver to the Buyer at the Closing the written undertaking of each Management Participant, each other Company Stockholder that is a member of the Company's management and each Company Stockholder that as a result of the consummation of the Merger, and together with its Affiliates, would be the holder of more than 240,000 Buyer Common Shares (or in lieu of any single such Company Stockholder, other Company Stockholders who, in the aggregate, would be the holders of the same number of shares held by the Company Stockholders as to which the Company would otherwise be obligated to deliver such undertaking under this Section 7.2(a)) not to sell or otherwise transfer or dispose of Buyer Common Shares, except as follows: (i) one-third of the Buyer Common Shares held by such Management Participant or Company Stockholder may be sold or otherwise transferred or disposed of during the 180-day period immediately following the Closing, (ii) an additional one-third of the Buyer Common Shares held by such Management Participant or Company Stockholder may be sold or otherwise transferred during the period commencing 180 days following the Closing and ending on the first anniversary of the Closing, and (iii) the final one-third of the Buyer Common Shares held by such Management Participant or Company Stockholder may be sold or otherwise transferred following the first anniversary of the Closing. (b) The Company may impose stop-transfer instructions with respect to the shares or other securities subject to the foregoing restriction until the end of such one year period. ARTICLE VIII TAX MATTERS 8.1 Preparation and Filing of Tax Returns; Payment of Taxes. (a) The Company shall prepare and timely file all Tax Returns of the Company required to be filed (taking into account extensions) prior to the Closing Date. (b) The Buyer shall prepare and timely file or shall cause to be prepared and timely filed all Tax Returns not filed on or before the Closing Date, including Tax Returns which were required to be filed before the Closing but were not filed and all other Tax Returns with respect to the Company or in respect of its business, assets or operations. (c) Any Tax Return to be prepared and filed by the Buyer for taxable periods beginning before the Closing Date shall be prepared on a basis consistent with the last previous similar Tax Return, to the extent such reporting is allowable without significant risk of the imposition of penalties or additions to Tax as determined by the Buyer in consultation with its Tax advisors; provided however, if -54-
the Company did not file a previous similar return, the Buyer shall prepare the return in the manner determined in it sole discretion, in consultation with its Tax advisors, including, but not limited to making voluntary disclosures of Tax Returns which were not filed for previous taxable periods. 8.2 Tax Indemnification by the Equity Holders. The Equity Holders shall indemnify via the Indemnification Escrow Shares, pursuant and subject to, and in accordance with, Article VI, the Buyer, the Company, the Surviving Corporation and their respective Affiliates in respect of, and hold the Buyer, the Company, the Surviving Corporation and such Affiliates harmless, against (x) any and all Damages resulting from, relating to, or constituting a breach of any representation contained in Section 2.9 hereof, (y) the failure to perform any covenant or agreement set forth in Article IV relating to Taxes or in this Article VIII, and (z) without duplication, any and all Taxes due and payable by the Surviving Corporation or the Company for any taxable period that ends (or is deemed pursuant to Section 8.3(b) to end) on or before the Closing Date in excess of any accruals for current Taxes (excluding accruals and reserves for deferred Taxes established to reflect timing differences between book and Tax income) on the Closing Balance Sheet. Amounts payable pursuant to this Section 8.2 shall be computed after taking into account all Tax consequences to the Buyer (or the Surviving Corporation) of (i) the receipt of (or the right to receive) the indemnification payment and (ii) the incurrence and payment of the liability that gave rise to the right to receive the indemnification payment. Thus, it is the intention of the Parties that the Buyer be held harmless with respect to the liability that gave rise to the right to the indemnification payment on a total after-Tax basis. 8.3 Allocation of Certain Taxes. (a) If the Surviving Corporation or the Company is permitted, but not required, under applicable foreign, state or local Tax laws to treat the Closing Date as the last day of a taxable period, such day shall be treated as the last day of a taxable period. (b) Any Taxes for a taxable period beginning before the Closing Date and ending after the Closing Date with respect to the Surviving Corporation and/or the Company shall be apportioned for purposes of Sections 2.9 and 8.2 between the portion of the period ending on the Closing Date and the portion of the period commencing on the day immediately following the Closing Date based on the actual operations of the Surviving Corporation and/or the Company, as the case may be, during such portions of the periods, and each such portion of such period shall be deemed to be a taxable period (whether or not it is in fact a taxable period). For purposes of computing the Taxes attributable to the two portions of a taxable period pursuant to this Section 8.3(b), the amount of any item that is taken into account only once for each taxable period (e.g., the benefit of graduated Tax rates, exemption amounts, etc.) shall be allocated between the two portions of the period in proportion to the number of days in each portion. 8.4 Termination of Tax-Sharing Agreements. All Tax sharing agreements or similar arrangements with respect to or involving the Company shall be terminated prior to the Closing Date and, after the Closing Date, the Company shall not be bound thereby or have any liability thereunder for amounts due in respect of periods ending on or before the Closing Date. 8.5 Scope of Article VIII. Any claim by any Party relating to a breach by another Party of their obligations under this Article VIII shall be pursued in accordance with the procedures for indemnification claims, and shall otherwise be subject to the terms and conditions, set forth in Article VI, including, for the avoidance of doubt, Sections 6.3 and 6.4. Notwithstanding the foregoing or any other term or condition of Article VI (except Sections 6.3 and 6.4), to the extent there is any inconsistency between the terms of Article VI and this Article VIII with respect to the allocation of responsibility between the Equity Holders and the Buyer for Taxes, the provisions of this Article VIII shall govern. -55-
ARTICLE IX INDEMNIFICATION OF DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS OF THE COMPANY 9.1 Indemnification and Insurance. (a) For a period of six years commencing at the Effective Time(1), the Buyer shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law and subject to the provisions of Section 6.1(e), cause the Surviving Corporation to honor all of the Company's obligations to indemnify and hold harmless each present and former director and officer of the Company and its Subsidiaries (the "Indemnified Parties"), against any costs or expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines, losses, claims, damages, liabilities or amounts paid in settlement incurred in connection with any claim, action, suit, proceeding or investigation, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative, arising out of or pertaining to matters existing or occurring at or prior to the Effective Time (collectively, "Indemnifiable Matters"), to the extent that such obligations to indemnify and hold harmless exist on the date of this Agreement (the "Existing Indemnification Obligations"). (b) Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall procure a six year "tail" directors' and officers' liability insurance and fiduciary liability insurance policy (the "Tail Policy"). The costs of the Tail Policy shall be fully accrued for on both the Preliminary and Closing Balance Sheets (except to the extent previously paid by the Company). The Surviving Corporation shall not terminate or modify the Tail Policy following the Effective Time. ARTICLE X TERMINATION 10.1 Termination of Agreement. The Parties may terminate this Agreement prior to the Closing (whether before or after Requisite Stockholder Approval), as provided below: (a) the Parties may terminate this Agreement by mutual written consent; (b) the Buyer may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Company in the event the Company is in breach of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement, and such breach, individually or in combination with any other such breach, (i) would cause the conditions set forth in clauses (c) or (d) of Section 5.1 not to be satisfied and (ii) is not cured within 30 days following delivery by the Buyer to the Company of written notice of such breach; (c) the Company may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Buyer in the event the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary is in breach of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement, and such breach, individually or in combination with any other such breach, (i) would cause the conditions set forth in clauses (a) or (b) of Section 5.2 not to be satisfied and (ii) is not cured within 30 days following delivery by the Company to the Buyer of written notice of such breach; (d) the Buyer may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the other Parties at any time after the stockholders of the Company have voted on whether to approve this Agreement and the Merger in the event this Agreement and the Merger failed to receive the Requisite Stockholder Approval; - ------------------ (1) To be conterminous with tail police. -56-
(e) the Buyer may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Company if the Closing shall not have occurred by the earlier of (i) two months after the Buyer has certified compliance with a second request, pursuant to 16 CFR 803.6, if a second request is made, or (ii) before September 16, 2005, (the "Outside Date"), by reason of the failure of any condition precedent under Section 5.1 (unless the failure results primarily from a breach by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement); (f) the Company may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary if the Closing shall not have occurred on or before the Outside Date, by reason of the failure of any condition precedent under Section 5.2 (unless the failure results primarily from a breach by the Company of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement); or (g) the Buyer may terminate this Agreement by giving written notice to the Company if the Buyer has incurred (or incurred on behalf of Seller) more than an aggregate of $1,500,000 in Covered Costs (the "Cost Cap"); provided that the Buyer shall not have the right to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this paragraph (g) if the Company agrees to fund, and does fund, on a current basis, all Covered Costs in excess of the Cost Cap. If the Company does fund Covered Costs in excess of the Cost Cap and (i) clearance and approval of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement is received such that (ii) the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement are consummated and the Certificate of Merger is filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, then all Covered Costs paid or accrued by the Company in excess of the Cost Cap shall be added to the total assets of the Company on the Closing Balance Sheet for the purposes of determining the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment pursuant to Section 1.12. 10.2 Effect of Termination. (a) If any Party terminates this Agreement pursuant to Section 10.1, all obligations of the Parties hereunder shall terminate without any liability of any Party to any other Party (except for any liability of any Party for willful or knowing breaches of this Agreement or for breaches of Section 4.9 and except for any obligations of the Company pursuant to paragraph (b) below). (b) If (i) a Specified Termination (as defined below) occurs, and (ii) within 18 months of the Specified Termination, the Company (A) enters into an Alternative Acquisition Agreement, or (B) otherwise agrees to an Acquisition Proposal, then within two business days of such event, the Company shall tender and pay to, or shall cause to be tendered and paid to, the Buyer, or its designee, by wire transfer in immediately available funds, a termination fee of $5,000,000. A "Specified Termination" shall mean (I) the valid termination of this Agreement by the Buyer pursuant to Section 10.1(b), Section 10.1(d), Section 10.1(e), Section 10.1(f) or Section 10.1(g) at a time when an Adverse Recommendation has been made and not withdrawn, and (II) the valid termination of this Agreement by the Buyer pursuant to Section 10.1(b) as a result of the Company's breach of any of its covenants and agreements pursuant to this Agreement to call, give notice of, convene and hold the special meeting of stockholders or distribute a written stockholder consent for purposes of approving this Agreement and the Merger regardless of whether the Company's Board of Directors has withdrawn or modified its recommendation of this Agreement and the Merger. ARTICLE XI DEFINITIONS For purposes of this Agreement, each of the following terms shall have the meaning set forth below. -57-
"AAA" shall mean the American Arbitration Association. "Acquisition Proposal" shall mean any proposal or offer involving, directly or indirectly, (i) the sale of more than 20% of the voting power of the Company, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange involving the Company, (iii) any sale of securities representing more than 20% of the voting power of the Company, (iv) the sale or other disposition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the Ordinary Course of Business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 20% of the Company's total assets (on a consolidated basis) or assets that account for more than 20% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of the Company. "Adjusted Base Purchase Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(f). "Adjusted Buyer Common Shares" shall mean, for each Outstanding Common Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the difference between (w) the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio and (x) the Closing Common Conversion Ratio, and, for each Outstanding Preferred Share, zero; and with respect to each Exercised Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the fraction obtained by dividing (x) the Adjusted Buyer Common Shares for each Outstanding Common Share, by (y) the Closing Common Conversion Ratio. "Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the Adjusted Merger Consideration, minus the Management Shares issued pursuant to Sections 1.6(b)(i) and (ii), minus the Preferred Consideration, by (ii) the Closing Total Company Shares. "Adjusted Merger Consideration" shall mean the number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the greater of (x) the Preliminary Base Purchase Price or (y) the Adjusted Base Purchase Price by (ii) $12.50 per share. "Adjusted Total Company Shares" shall mean the number of Company Shares equal to (A) the Closing Total Company Shares minus (B) the quotient of (x) the number of Buyer Common Shares issuable upon exercise of Assumed Convertible Securities (or any portion thereof) that have expired unexercised as of the date 18 months following the Closing Date, divided by (y) the Closing Common Conversion Ratio or the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio, as applicable to such expired Assumed Convertible Security. "Adverse Recommendation " shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.4(c). "Advisors" shall mean any of the Company's or any of a Subsidiary's directors, officers, employees, investment bankers, attorneys, accountants or other advisors or representatives. "Affiliate" shall mean any affiliate, as defined in Rule 12b-2 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. "Aggregate Escrow Value" shall mean the sum of (A) the aggregate Option Merger Value of all Escrow Assumed Convertible Securities as of the date of determination plus (B) the product of $12.50 multiplied by the number of Indemnification Escrow Shares. "Agreed Amount" shall mean part, but not all, of the Claimed Amount. "Agreement" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph hereto. -58-
"Alternative Acquisition Agreement" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.4(c). "Arbitrator" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 6.2(e). "Asset Value Adjustment Date" is defined in Section 1.5(d)(ii). "Assumed Convertible Security" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(f). "Assumed Option" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(a). "Assumed Warrant" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(b). "Available Indemnification Amount" shall mean, at the time of any claim for indemnification pursuant to Section 9.1(a), the product of (i) the difference between (A) the number of Indemnification Escrow Shares held in escrow at that time pursuant to Section 1.13(a) minus (B) the number of Indemnification Escrow Shares attributable to any Claim Notice or Expected Claim Notice that the Buyer has previously delivered to the Escrow Agent but as to which the Escrow Agent has not received written notice of resolution multiplied by (ii) a value of $12.50 per Indemnification Escrow Share. "Base Purchase Price" shall mean $150,000,000. "Bonus Pool" shall mean 10% of the sum of (A) the Market Value of the Buyer Common Shares issuable upon conversion of Company Shares pursuant to Section 1.5, plus (B) the aggregate Option Value of all Assumed Convertible Securities and Preferred Warrants that collectively are vested and exercisable as of the Closing Date, plus (C) the Market Value of the Management Shares. "Bonus Pool Percentage" shall mean the Management Participant's applicable bonus pool percentage as set forth in the Company Employee Change in Control Bonus Plan, effective as of May 11, 2004. "Buyer" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Buyer Certificate" shall mean a certificate delivered by the Buyer (without qualification as to knowledge, materiality or otherwise), signed on behalf of the Buyer by the Vice President and General Counsel of the Buyer, to the effect that each of the conditions specified in clauses (a) and (b) of Section 5.2 is satisfied in all respects. "Buyer Common Shares" shall mean the common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Buyer. "Buyer Financial Statements" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3.7(b). "Buyer SEC Documents" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3.7(a). "California Permit" shall mean a permit from the California Commission of Corporations obtained pursuant to Section 25121 of the California Corporate Securities Law of 1968. "California Dissenters' Rights Notice" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.4(a). "CERCLA" shall mean the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, as amended. -59-
"Certificate of Merger" shall mean the certificate of merger or other appropriate documents prepared and executed in accordance with Section 251(c) of the Delaware General Corporation Law. "Certificates" shall mean shall mean stock certificates that, immediately prior to the Effective Time, represented Company Shares converted into the right to receive Buyer Common Shares pursuant to Section 1.5 (including any Company Shares referred to in Section 1.7). "Claim Notice" shall mean written notification which contains (i) a description of the Damages incurred or reasonably expected to be incurred by the Buyer and the Claimed Amount of such Damages, to the extent then known, (ii) a statement that the Buyer is entitled to indemnification under Article VI for such Damages and a reasonable explanation of the basis therefor, and (iii) a demand for payment in the amount of such Damages. "Claimed Amount" shall mean the amount of any Damages incurred or reasonably expected to be incurred by the Buyer in connection with a claim for indemnification pursuant to Article VI. "Closing" shall mean the closing of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. "Closing Balance Sheet" shall mean the balance sheet of the Company as of the Closing Date prepared in accordance with the provisions of Section 1.12 hereof. "Closing Buyer Common Shares" shall mean, for each Outstanding Common Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the Closing Common Conversion Ratio, and, for each Outstanding Preferred Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the applicable Series A Conversion Ratio, Series B Conversion Ratio or Series C Conversion Ratio. "Closing Common Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the Closing Merger Consideration, minus the Management Shares issued pursuant to Section 1.6(b)(i), minus the Preferred Consideration, by (ii) the Closing Total Company Shares. "Closing Date" shall mean the date two business days after the satisfaction or waiver of all of the conditions to the obligations of the Parties to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby (excluding the delivery at the Closing of any of the documents set forth in Article V), or such other date as may be mutually agreeable to the Parties. "Closing Merger Consideration" shall mean the number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the Preliminary Base Purchase Price by (ii) $12.50 per share. "Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment" shall mean the amount of the difference between the Net Asset Value and the Preliminary Net Asset Value, as it may be adjusted pursuant to the resolution of any disputes resolved pursuant to Section 1.12(d). The Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment shall be expressed as a positive number if the Net Asset Value on the Closing Balance Sheet is greater than the Preliminary Net Asset Value and as a negative number if the Net Asset Value on the Closing Balance Sheet is less than the Preliminary Net Asset Value. "Closing Total Company Shares" shall mean the number of Company Shares equal to the sum of (X) the number of Common Shares outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time plus (Y) the number of Common Shares that would be issued upon the exercise of all of the vested and unvested outstanding Options (provided that unvested Options shall not include Options held by employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries who have been notified by the Buyer or the Company at the direction of the -60-
Buyer that their employment will not continue after the Closing to the extent such Options shall remain unvested as of the Effective Time) and Warrants (which may be included on a net exercise treasury basis to the extent the Warrant holder has agreed in writing prior to the Effective Time to exercise such Warrant in full through a net exercise). "Code" shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. "Commercial Rules" shall mean the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the AAA. "Common Conversion Ratio" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.5(a). "Common Shares" shall mean the common stock, par value $0.001 per share, of the Company. "Company" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Company Certificate" shall mean a certificate delivered by the Company (without qualification as to knowledge or materiality or otherwise), signed on behalf of the Company by the President and the Chief Financial Officer of the Company, to the effect that each of the conditions specified in clauses (a) through (f) of Section 5.1 is satisfied in all respects. "Company Intellectual Property" shall mean the Intellectual Property owned by or licensed to the Company or a Subsidiary and covering, incorporated in, underlying or used in connection with the Customer Deliverables or the Internal Systems. "Company Licensed Intellectual Property" shall mean shall mean the Intellectual Property licensed to the Company or a Subsidiary and covering, incorporated in, underlying or used in connection with the Customer Deliverables or the Internal Systems. "Company Material Adverse Effect" shall mean any material adverse change, event, circumstance or development with respect to, or material adverse effect on, (i) the business, assets, liabilities, capitalization, financial condition or results of operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, other than any change, event, circumstance or development resulting (A) from changes in the United States economy in general, so long as such changes do not disproportionately affect the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, (B) from changes in the industry in which the Company operates, so long as such changes do not disproportionately affect the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, (C) from the announcement or pendency of the Merger, or (D) primarily from the taking by the Company of any action expressly contemplated or permitted by this Agreement; or (ii) the ability of the Buyer to operate the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries immediately after the Closing. For the avoidance of doubt, the parties agree that the terms "material," "materially" and "materiality" as used in this Agreement with an initial lower case "m" shall have their respective customary and ordinary meanings, without regard to the meaning ascribed to Company Material Adverse Effect. "Company Owned Intellectual Property" shall mean shall mean the Intellectual Property owned by the Company or a Subsidiary and covering, incorporated in, underlying or used in connection with the Customer Deliverables or the Internal Systems. "Company Plan" shall mean any Employee Benefit Plan maintained, or contributed to, by the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate. "Company Shares" shall mean the Common Shares and the Preferred Shares. -61-
"Company Source Code" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.13(g). "Company Stock Plan" shall mean any stock option plan or other stock or equity-related plan of the Company. "Company Stockholders" shall mean the holders of Company Shares. "Company Stockholders Shares" shall mean the Outstanding Common Shares and the Common Shares issuable upon conversion of Outstanding Preferred Shares. "Consents" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5.1(b). "Contract" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.15(a). "Controlling Party" shall mean the party controlling the defense of any Third Party Action. "Cost Cap" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 10.1(g). "Covered Costs" shall mean all out-of-pocket costs and expenses, including applicable filing fees under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act and other applicable U.S. or foreign antitrust laws, fees and expenses of counsel, experts and other advisors and costs of document production and assembly, incurred in seeking to obtain clearance or approval of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement. "Current India Financial Statements" shall mean the unaudited accounts of the India Subsidiary as of December 31, 2004. "Customer Deliverables" shall mean (a) products that the Company or any Subsidiary (i) currently manufactures, markets, sells or licenses or (ii) has manufactured, marketed, sold or licensed within the previous three years and (b) the services that the Company or any Subsidiary (i) currently provides or (ii) has provided within the previous three years. "Damages" shall mean any and all claims, debts, obligations and other liabilities (whether absolute, accrued, contingent, fixed or otherwise, or due or to become due or otherwise), diminution in value, monetary damages, fines, fees, penalties, interest obligations, deficiencies, losses and expenses (including amounts paid in settlement, interest, court costs, costs of investigators, fees and expenses of attorneys, accountants, financial advisors and other experts, and other expenses of litigation), other than those costs and expenses of arbitration of a Dispute which are to be shared equally by the Buyer and the Equity Holders as set forth in Section 6.2(e)(vi). "Disclosure Schedule" shall mean the disclosure schedule provided by the Company to the Buyer on the date hereof and accepted in writing by the Buyer. "Disclosure Statement" shall mean a written proxy or information statement containing the information prescribed by Section 4.4(a). "Dispute" shall mean the dispute resulting if the Representative, acting on behalf of the Equity Holders, in a Response disputes the liability of the Equity Holders for all or part of a Claimed Amount. "Dispute Notice" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(d). "Dissenting Shares" shall mean Company Shares held as of the Effective Time by a Company Stockholder who has not voted such Company Shares in favor of the adoption of this Agreement and with -62-
respect to which appraisal shall have been duly demanded and perfected in accordance with either (i) Section 262 of the Delaware General Corporation Act or (ii) Section 1300 et seq. of the California Corporations Code, and such perfected right was not effectively withdrawn or forfeited prior to the Effective Time. "DOHS" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(e). "DOL" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(e). "EAD" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(e). "Effective Time" shall mean the time at which the Surviving Corporation files the Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware. "Employee Benefit Plan" shall mean any "employee pension benefit plan" (as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA), any "employee welfare benefit plan" (as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA), any employee benefit plan or scheme prescribed under the provisions of the Indian Employees' Provident Funds and Miscellaneous Provisions Act, 1952, Employees' Pension Scheme, 1995, Payment of Bonus Act, 1965, Payment of Gratuity Act, 1972 and Employees' State Insurance Act, 1948, as applicable, and any other written or oral plan, agreement or arrangement involving direct or indirect compensation, including insurance coverage, severance benefits, disability benefits, deferred compensation, bonuses, stock options, stock purchase, phantom stock, stock appreciation or other forms of incentive compensation or post-retirement compensation, and all severance agreements, written or otherwise, for the benefit of or relating to any current or former employee or independent contractor of the Company, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate. "Environmental Law" shall mean any federal, state or local law, statute, rule, order, directive, judgment, Permit or regulation or the common law relating to the environment, occupational health and safety, or exposure of persons or property to Materials of Environmental Concern, including any statute, regulation, administrative decision or order pertaining to: (i) the presence of or the treatment, storage, disposal, generation, transportation, handling, distribution, manufacture, processing, use, import, export, labeling, recycling, registration, investigation or remediation of Materials of Environmental Concern or documentation related to the foregoing; (ii) air, water and noise pollution; (iii) groundwater and soil contamination; (iv) the release, threatened release, or accidental release into the environment, the workplace or other areas of Materials of Environmental Concern, including emissions, discharges, injections, spills, escapes or dumping of Materials of Environmental Concern; (v) transfer of interests in or control of real property which may be contaminated; (vi) community or worker right-to-know disclosures with respect to Materials of Environmental Concern; (vii) the protection of wild life, marine life and wetlands, and endangered and threatened species; (viii) storage tanks, vessels, containers, abandoned or discarded barrels and other closed receptacles; and (ix) health and safety of employees and other persons. As used above, the term "release" shall have the meaning set forth in CERCLA. "Equity Holders" shall mean the Company Stockholders, the Management Participants and the holders of any Options or Warrants outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time. "ERISA" shall mean the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended. "ERISA Affiliate" shall mean any entity which is, or at any applicable time was, a member of (i) a controlled group of corporations (as defined in Section 414(b) of the Code), (ii) a group of trades or businesses under common control (as defined in Section 414(c) of the Code), or (iii) an affiliated service -63-
group (as defined under Section 414(m) of the Code or the regulations under Section 414(o) of the Code), any of which includes or included the Company or a Subsidiary. "Escrow Agent" shall mean U.S. Bank National Association, Corporate Trust Services. "Escrow Assumed Convertible Security" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(f)(vi)(A). "Exchange Agent" shall mean Equiserve Trust Company, N.A. "Exchange Fund" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.8(a). "Exercised Shares" shall mean any Buyer Common Shares acquired upon the exercise of an Assumed Convertible Securities after the Effective Time and on or before the date which is 18 months after the Closing Date. "Existing Indemnification Obligations" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.1(a). "Expected Claim Notice" shall mean a notice that, as a result of a legal proceeding instituted by or written claim made by a third party, the Buyer reasonably expects to incur Damages for which it is entitled to indemnification under Article VI. "Filings" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5.1(b). "Financial Statements" shall mean: (a) the audited balance sheets and statements of income, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Company as of the end of and for each of the fiscal years ended June 30, 2002, 2003, and 2004, as certified without qualification by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP and BDO Seidman, LLP, the Company's independent public accountants; and (b) the unaudited balance sheets of the Company, including at December 31, 2004, and any fiscal quarter between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, and the related unaudited statements of operations, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows for each of the fiscal quarters then ended, which interim financial statements shall have been reviewed in accordance with Statement of Accounting Standards No. 100. "Free Assumed Convertible Security" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.11(f)(vi)(A). "GAAP" shall mean United States generally accepted accounting principles. "GPL" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.13(h). "Governmental Entity" shall mean any domestic or foreign court, arbitrational tribunal, administrative agency or commission or other domestic or foreign governmental or regulatory authority or agency. "Hart-Scott-Rodino Act" shall mean the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended. "Indemnifiable Matters" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.1(a). -64-
"Indemnification Escrow Agreement" shall mean the Indemnification Escrow Agreement in substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit D by and among the Buyer, the Representative and the Escrow Agent. "Indemnification Escrow Percentage" shall mean 15%. "Indemnification Escrow Period" shall mean the period during which Indemnification Escrow Shares are to be held in escrow, as set forth in the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. "Indemnification Escrow Shares" shall mean the Buyer Common Shares deposited in escrow pursuant to clause (i) of each of Sections 1.5(d), 1.6(b), 1.7(a) and 1.11(a) and pursuant to Section 1.13(a) and held and disposed of in accordance with the terms of the Indemnification Escrow Agreement. "Indemnification Obligations" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.1(a). "Indemnified Parties" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.1(a). "India Subsidiary" shall mean Saturn Networks India Private Limited. "Initial Management Shares" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.6(b). "Initial Merger Shares" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.5(d). "Intellectual Property" shall mean all: (a) patents, patent applications, patent disclosures and all related continuation, continuation-in-part, divisional, reissue, reexamination, utility model, certificate of invention and design patents, patent applications, registrations and applications for registrations ("Patent Rights"); (b) registered trademarks and service marks, Internet domain names, logos, trade names, corporate names, doing business designations and registrations and applications for registration thereof (collectively, "Trademark Registrations"), common law trademarks and service marks and trade dress, and all goodwill in the foregoing; (c) copyrights and registrations and applications for registration thereof; (d) mask works and registrations and applications for registration thereof; (e) domain names, computer software, data and documentation; (f) inventions, trade secrets and confidential business and technical information, whether patentable or nonpatentable and whether or not reduced to practice, know-how, manufacturing and product processes and techniques, research and development information, copyrightable works, financial, marketing and business data, pricing and cost information, business and marketing plans and customer and supplier lists and information; (g) other proprietary rights relating to any of the foregoing (including remedies against infringements thereof and rights of protection of interest therein under the laws of all jurisdictions); and (h) copies and tangible embodiments thereof. -65-
"Intellectual Property Registration" shall mean Patent Rights, Trademark Registrations, registered copyrights and mask work registrations. "Internal Systems" shall mean the internal systems of the Company or any Subsidiary that are used in its business or operations, including computer hardware systems, software applications and embedded systems. "Lawsuits" shall mean all Legal Proceedings between the Buyer, on the one hand, and the Company or any Subsidiary, on the other hand, pending as of the Closing Date. "Lease" shall mean any lease or sublease pursuant to which the Company or any Subsidiary leases or subleases from another party any real property. "Legal Proceeding" shall mean any action, suit, proceeding, claim, arbitration or investigation before any Governmental Entity or before any arbitrator. "Management Participant Agreement" shall mean the Management Participant Agreement executed by the Buyer and each of the Management Participants as of the date hereof in the form of Exhibit B attached hereto. "Management Participants" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.6(a). "Management Shares" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.6(a). "Market Value" shall mean the average of the closing prices of a share of Buyer Common Shares on the NASDAQ National Market for the thirty (30) days ending three (3) days before the Closing Date. "Materials of Environmental Concern" shall mean any: pollutants, contaminants or hazardous substances (as such terms are defined under CERCLA), pesticides (as such term is defined under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act), solid wastes and hazardous wastes (as such terms are defined under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act), chemicals, other hazardous, radioactive or toxic materials, oil, petroleum and petroleum products (and fractions thereof), or any other material (or article containing such material) listed or subject to regulation under any law, statute, rule, regulation, order, Permit, or directive due to its potential, directly or indirectly, to harm the environment or the health of humans or other living beings. "Merger" shall mean the merger of the Transitory Subsidiary with and into the Company in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. "Merger Consideration" shall mean the total payments received by the Equity Holders pursuant to this Agreement in consideration for the consummation of the Merger. "Merger Shares" shall mean the Buyer Common Shares to be distributed to the Equity Holders in the Merger. "Most Recent Balance Sheet" shall mean the unaudited balance sheet of the Company as of the Most Recent Balance Sheet Date. "Most Recent Balance Sheet Date" shall mean February 28, 2005. "NDA" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.7(a). -66-
"Net Asset Value" shall mean the total assets of the Company less the total liabilities of the Company as shown on the Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet or the Closing Balance Sheet, as the case may be. "Neutral Accountant" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(d). "Non-controlling Party" shall mean the party not controlling the defense of any Third Party Action. "Open Source Materials" shall mean all software or other material that is licensed under a license approved by the Open Source Initiative or otherwise distributed as "free software", "open source software" or under a similar licensing or distribution model. "Option" shall mean each option to purchase or acquire Company Shares. "Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares" shall mean, for each Outstanding Common Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the difference between (w) the Common Conversion Ratio and (x) the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio, and, for each Outstanding Preferred Share, zero; with respect to each Exercised Share, a number of Buyer Common Shares equal to the fraction obtained by dividing (x) the Options Adjusted Buyer Common Shares for each Outstanding Common Share, by (y) the Adjusted Common Conversion Ratio. "Option Merger Value" shall equal the product of (A) the difference, if any, between $12.50 and the per share exercise price multiplied by (B) the number of Buyer Common Shares which may yet be acquired upon exercise of the relevant Assumed Convertible Security (assuming the full vesting thereof) as of the time of such determination. "Option Plan" shall mean the Company's 1999 Equity Incentive Plan. "Option Value" shall mean with respect to an Assumed Convertible Security or Preferred Warrant, the product of (x) the number of Buyer Common Shares subject to such Assumed Convertible Security or Preferred Warrant multiplied by (y) the excess, if any, of (A) the Market Value of a Buyer Common Share, minus (B) the exercise price per each share of Buyer Common Shares or Preferred Warrant subject to such Assumed Convertible Security. "Option/Warrant Consideration" shall mean the aggregate amount payable to all holders of Options and Warrants in accordance with Section 1.11. "Ordinary Course of Business" shall mean the ordinary course of business of the Company and the Subsidiaries consistent with past custom and practice (including with respect to frequency and amount). "Outside Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 10.1(e). "Outstanding Common Shares", each an "Outstanding Common Share", shall mean the Common Shares issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than Common Shares owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and Common Shares held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Options", each an "Outstanding Option", shall mean the number of Options outstanding as of immediately prior to the Closing. -67-
"Outstanding Preferred Shares," each an "Outstanding Preferred Share" shall mean the Preferred Shares issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than Preferred Shares owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and Preferred Shares held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Series A Preferred Shares", each an "Outstanding Series A Preferred Share", shall mean the shares of the Company's Series A Preferred Stock, $.001 par value per share, issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than shares of Series A Preferred Stock owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and shares of Series A Preferred Stock held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Series B Preferred Shares", each an "Outstanding Series B Preferred Share", shall mean the shares of the Company's Series B Preferred Stock, $.001 par value per share, issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than shares of Series B Preferred Stock owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and shares of Series B Preferred Stock held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Series C Preferred Shares", each an "Outstanding Series C Preferred Share", shall mean the shares of the Company's Series C Preferred Stock, $.001 par value per share, issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than shares of Series C Preferred Stock owned beneficially by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, Dissenting Shares and shares of Series C Preferred Stock held in the Company's treasury). "Outstanding Warrants" shall mean the Warrants outstanding as of immediately prior to the Effective Time. "Parties" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Permits" shall mean all permits, licenses, registrations, certificates, orders, approvals, franchises, variances and similar rights issued by or obtained from any Governmental Entity (including those issued or required under Environmental Laws and those relating to the occupancy or use of owned or leased real property). "Pre-Closing Period" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4.5. "Preferred Consideration" shall mean the sum of (A) the Series A Conversion Ratio times the Outstanding Series A Preferred Shares, plus (B) the aggregate of the applicable Series B Conversion Ratios times the relevant Outstanding Series B Preferred Shares, plus (C) the aggregate of the applicable Series C Conversion Ratios times the relevant Outstanding Series C Preferred Shares. "Preferred Shares" shall mean the preferred stock, par value $0.001 per share, of the Company. "Preferred Warrant" shall mean each warrant to purchase or acquire Preferred Shares. "Preliminary Base Purchase Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(a). "Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(a). "Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(a). "Preliminary Net Asset Value" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.12(a). -68-
"Principal Stockholders" shall mean the Company Stockholders who have executed the Stockholder Agreement. "Proxy Statement/Prospectus" shall mean the proxy statement/prospectus included as part of the Registration Statement, together with any accompanying letter to stockholders, notice of meeting and form of proxy or written consent. "Reasonable Best Efforts" shall mean best efforts, to the extent commercially reasonable. "Registration Statement" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7.1(b). "Representative" shall mean Thomas Cole. "Representative Fees" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1.14(h). "Requisite Stockholder Approval" shall mean the adoption of this Agreement and the approval of the Merger by a majority of the outstanding Company Shares voting as a single class and a majority of the votes represented by each class of outstanding Company Shares entitled to vote on this Agreement and the Merger. "Response" shall mean a written response containing the information provided for in Section 6.2(c). "Rule 145 Affiliates" shall mean affiliates of the Company within the meaning of Rule 145 promulgated under the Securities Act. "Sarbanes Act" shall mean the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. "SEC" shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission. "Securities Act" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. "Security Interest" shall mean any mortgage, pledge, security interest, encumbrance, charge or other lien (whether arising by contract or by operation of law), other than (i) mechanic's, material men's and similar liens, (ii) liens arising under worker's compensation, unemployment insurance, social security, retirement and similar legislation, and (iii) liens on goods in transit incurred pursuant to documentary letters of credit, in each case arising in the Ordinary Course of Business of the Company and its Subsidiaries and not material to the Company or its Subsidiaries. "Series A Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) Series A Liquidation Amount per Share by (ii) the Market Value of a Buyer Common Share. "Series B Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the applicable Series B Liquidation Amount per Share by (ii) the Market Value of a Buyer Common Share. "Series C Conversion Ratio" shall mean a fraction of a share of Buyer Common Shares as is equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) the applicable Series C Liquidation Amount per Share by (ii) the Market Value of a Buyer Common Share. "Series A Liquidation Amount per Share" shall mean $0.75. -69-
"Series B Liquidation Amount per Share" shall mean $0.233, plus accrued and unpaid dividends from the date of issuance of such share as provided in Section 2.2 of the Company's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation. "Series C Liquidation Amount per Share" shall mean $0.273, plus accrued and unpaid dividends from the date of issuance of such share as provided in Section 2.3 of the Company's Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation. "Software" shall mean any of the software owned by the Company or a Subsidiary. "Stockholder Agreement" shall mean the Stockholder Agreement executed by the Buyer and each of the Principal Stockholders as of the date hereof in the form of Exhibit A attached hereto. "Stockholder Payment" shall mean the sum of (A) the Market Value of the Buyer Common Shares issuable pursuant to Section 1.5 upon the conversion of Common Shares owned by the applicable Management Participant (or by any member of such Management Participant's family to the extent acquired by gift from such Management Participant) as of the Effective Time (other than such Common Shares acquired upon conversion of Preferred Shares), plus (B) the Option Value of all Assumed Convertible Securities owned by the applicable Management Participant that are vested and exercisable as of the Effective Time. "Subsidiary" shall mean any corporation, partnership, trust, limited liability company or other non-corporate business enterprise in which the Company (or another Subsidiary) holds stock or other ownership interests representing (a) more than 50% of the voting power of all outstanding stock or ownership interests of such entity or (b) the right to receive more than 50% of the net assets of such entity available for distribution to the holders of outstanding stock or ownership interests upon a liquidation or dissolution of such entity. "Superior Proposal" shall mean any bona fide written proposal made by a third party (other than one made in response to any solicitation by the Company or its Advisors that is in violation of or inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement) to acquire all the equity securities or assets of the Company, pursuant to a stock purchase, tender or exchange offer, a merger, a consolidation or a sale of its assets, (i) on terms which the Company's Board of Directors determines in its good faith judgment to be materially more favorable from a financial point of view to the holders of Company Shares than the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (based on the written opinion, with only customary qualifications, of a nationally recognized independent financial advisor), taking into account all the terms and conditions of such proposal and this Agreement (including any proposal by the Buyer to amend the terms of this Agreement) and (ii) that is reasonably capable of being completed on the terms proposed, taking into account all financial, regulatory, legal and other aspects of such proposal; provided, however, that no Acquisition Proposal shall be deemed to be a Superior Proposal if any financing required to consummate the Acquisition Proposal is not committed. "Surviving Corporation" shall mean the Company, as the surviving corporation in the Merger. "Target Amount" shall mean zero dollars ($0.00). "Taxes" shall mean all taxes, charges, fees, levies or other similar assessments or liabilities, including income, gross receipts, ad valorem, premium, value-added, excise, real property, personal property, sales, use, transfer, withholding, employment, unemployment, insurance, social security, business license, business organization, environmental, workers compensation, payroll, profits, license, lease, service, service use, severance, stamp, occupation, windfall profits, customs, duties, franchise and -70-
other taxes imposed by the United States of America or any state, local or foreign government, or any agency thereof, or other political subdivision of the United States or any such government, and any interest, fines, penalties, assessments or additions to tax resulting from, attributable to or incurred in connection with any tax or any contest or dispute thereof. "Tax Proceeding" shall mean any audit, claim for refund, or contest or defense against any assessment, notice of deficiency, or other proposed adjustment relating to any and all Taxes of the Company or any Subsidiary. "Tax Returns" shall mean all reports, returns, declarations, statements or other information required to be supplied to a Taxing authority in connection with Taxes. "Third Party Action" shall mean any suit or proceeding by a person or entity other than a Party for which indemnification may be sought by a Party under Article VI. "Top Customers" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.15(a)(ii)(A)(1). "Transitory Subsidiary" shall have the meaning set forth in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "WARN Act" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(g). "Warrant" shall mean each warrant to purchase or acquire Common Shares. "Work Permit" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(e). ARTICLE XII MISCELLANEOUS 12.1 Press Releases and Announcements. No Party shall issue any press release or public announcement relating to the subject matter of this Agreement without the prior written approval of the other Parties; provided, however, that (a) any Party may make any public disclosure it believes in good faith is required by applicable law, regulation or stock market rule (in which case the disclosing Party shall use reasonable efforts to advise the other Parties and provide them with a copy of the proposed disclosure prior to making the disclosure); (b) the Buyer and its Affiliates shall not be bound by the provisions of this Section 12.1 following the Closing Date; and (c) the Parties will issue such joint communications as are described and at the times set forth in Schedule 12.1 attached hereto. 12.2 No Third Party Beneficiaries. Except as set forth in Article IX, This Agreement shall not confer any rights or remedies upon any person other than the Parties and their respective successors and permitted assigns. 12.3 Entire Agreement. This Agreement (including the documents referred to herein) constitutes the entire agreement among the Parties and supersedes any prior understandings, agreements or representations by or among the Parties, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter hereof; provided that the NDA shall remain in effect in accordance with its terms. The Parties acknowledge that, except as set forth in Article II, in the case of the Company, or Article III, in the case of the Buyer, neither the Company nor the Buyer has made or is making any representations or warranties whatsoever to any other Party or person, expressed, implied or otherwise, provided that, subject to Section 6.4(d), the foregoing shall not be deemed to limit any right of any Party to assert a claim of fraud in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. -71-
12.4 Succession and Assignment. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Parties named herein and their respective successors and permitted assigns. No Party may assign either this Agreement or any of its rights, interests or obligations hereunder without the prior written approval of the other Parties; provided that the Transitory Subsidiary may assign its rights, interests and obligations hereunder to an Affiliate of the Buyer. 12.5 Counterparts and Facsimile Signature. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement may be executed by facsimile signature. 12.6 Headings. The section headings contained in this Agreement are inserted for convenience only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. 12.7 Notices. All notices, requests, demands, claims, and other communications hereunder shall be in writing. Any notice, request, demand, claim or other communication hereunder shall be deemed duly delivered two business days after it is sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, or one business day after it is sent for next business day delivery via a reputable nationwide overnight courier service, in each case to the intended recipient as set forth below: To the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary: With a copy to: Akamai Technologies, Inc. Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale 8 Cambridge Center and Dorr LLP Cambridge, MA 02142 60 State Street Attn: Melanie Haratunian, Boston, MA 02109 Vice President and General Counsel Attn: Susan W. Murley Telecopy: (617) 444-3001 Telecopy: (617) 526-5000 Telephone: (617) 444-3000 Telephone: (617) 526-6000 To the Company: With a copy to: Speedera Networks, Inc. Fenwick & West LLP 4800 Great America Parkway Embarcadero Center West Second Floor 275 Battery Street Santa Clara, CA 95054 San Francisco, CA 94111 Attn: Ajit Gupta Attn: Robert B. Dellenbach Telecopy: (408) 855-9543 Telecopy: (415) 281-1350 Telephone: (408) 970-1500 Telephone: (415) 875-2300 To the Representative: With a copy to: Thomas Cole Cooley Godward LLP as the Representative of the Equity Holders Five Palo Alto Square Trinity Ventures 3000 El Camino Real 3000 Sand Hill Road Palo Alto, CA 94306-2155 Building 4, Suite 160 Attention: Eric C. Jensen, Esq. Menlo Park, CA 94025 Telecopy: (650) 745-3929 Telecopy: (650-854-9501 Telephone: (650) 843-5049 Telephone: (650) 854-9500 -72-
Any Party may give any notice, request, demand, claim or other communication hereunder using any other means (including personal delivery, expedited courier, messenger service, telecopy, telex, ordinary mail or electronic mail), but no such notice, request, demand, claim or other communication shall be deemed to have been duly given unless and until it actually is received by the party for whom it is intended. Any Party may change the address to which notices, requests, demands, claims, and other communications hereunder are to be delivered by giving the other Parties notice in the manner herein set forth. 12.8 Governing Law. This Agreement (including the validity and applicability of the arbitration provisions of this Agreement, the conduct of any arbitration of a Dispute, the enforcement of any arbitral award made hereunder and any other questions of arbitration law or procedure arising hereunder) shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without giving effect to any choice or conflict of law provision or rule (whether of the State of Delaware or any other jurisdiction) that would cause the application of laws of any jurisdictions other than those of the State of Delaware. 12.9 Amendments and Waivers. The Parties may mutually amend any provision of this Agreement at any time prior to the Closing; provided, however, that any amendment effected subsequent to the Requisite Stockholder Approval shall be subject to any restrictions contained in the Delaware General Corporation Act. No amendment of any provision of this Agreement shall be valid unless the same shall be in writing and signed by all of the Parties. No waiver of any right or remedy hereunder shall be valid unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the Party giving such waiver. No waiver by any Party with respect to any default, misrepresentation or breach of warranty or covenant hereunder shall be deemed to extend to any prior or subsequent default, misrepresentation or breach of warranty or covenant hereunder or affect in any way any rights arising by virtue of any prior or subsequent such occurrence. 12.10 Severability. Any term or provision of this Agreement that is invalid or unenforceable in any situation in any jurisdiction shall not affect the validity or enforceability of the remaining terms and provisions hereof or the validity or enforceability of the offending term or provision in any other situation or in any other jurisdiction. If the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction declares that any term or provision hereof is invalid or unenforceable, the Parties agree that the court making the determination of invalidity or unenforceability shall have the power to limit the term or provision, to delete specific words or phrases, or to replace any invalid or unenforceable term or provision with a term or provision that is valid and enforceable and that comes closest to expressing the intention of the invalid or unenforceable term or provision, and this Agreement shall be enforceable as so modified. 12.11 Submission to Jurisdiction. Each Party (a) submits to the jurisdiction of any state or federal court sitting in the State of Delaware in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement (including any action or proceeding for the enforcement of any arbitral award made in connection with any arbitration of a Dispute hereunder), (b) agrees that all claims in respect of such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in any such court, (c) waives any claim of inconvenient forum or other challenge to venue in such court, (d) agrees not to bring any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any other court, and (e) waives any right it may have to a trial by jury with respect to any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement; provided in each case that, solely with respect to any arbitration of a Dispute, the Arbitrator shall resolve all threshold issues relating to the validity and applicability of the arbitration provisions of this Agreement, contract validity, applicability of statutes of limitations and issue preclusion, and such threshold issues shall not be -73-
heard or determined by such court. Each Party agrees to accept service of any summons, complaint or other initial pleading made in the manner provided for the giving of notices in Section 12.7, provided that nothing in this Section 12.11 shall affect the right of any Party to serve such summons, complaint or other initial pleading in any other manner permitted by law. 12.12 Construction. (a) The language used in this Agreement shall be deemed to be the language chosen by the Parties to express their mutual intent, and no rule of strict construction shall be applied against any Party. (b) Any reference to any federal, state, local or foreign statute or law shall be deemed also to refer to all rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, unless the context requires otherwise. (c) Any reference herein to "including" shall be interpreted as "including without limitation". (d) Any reference to any Article, Section or paragraph shall be deemed to refer to an Article, Section or paragraph of this Agreement, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise. (e) Any calculation of any conversion ratio pursuant to this Agreement, or of any number of Buyer Common Shares calculated pursuant to this Agreement, shall be subject to equitable adjustment in the event of any stock split, stock dividend, reverse stock split or similar event affecting the Buyer Common Shares after the date hereof. [REMAINDER OF THE PAGE INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK] -74-
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have executed this Agreement as of the date first above written. BUYER: AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: /s/ Paul Sagan -------------- Title: President TRANSITORY SUBSIDIARY: AQUARIUS ACQUISITION CORP. By: /s/ Paul Sagan -------------- Title: President COMPANY: SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. By: /s/ Ajit Gupta -------------- Title: President REPRESENTATIVE: Name: Fred Wang /s/ Fred Wang ------------- Signature -Signature Page to Agreement and Plan of Merger-
EXHIBIT A STOCKHOLDER AGREEMENT THIS STOCKHOLDER AGREEMENT, dated as of March 16, 2005 (this "Agreement"), among the stockholders listed on the signature page(s) hereto (collectively, the "Principal Stockholders" and each individually, a "Principal Stockholder"), Speedera Networks, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Buyer"). Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings assigned to them in the Merger Agreement referred to below. WHEREAS, as of the date hereof, the Principal Stockholders collectively own of record and beneficially shares of capital stock of the Company, as set forth on Schedule I hereto (such shares, or any other voting or equity of securities of the Company hereafter acquired by any Principal Stockholder prior to the termination of this Agreement, being referred to herein collectively as the "Shares"); WHEREAS, concurrently with the execution of this Agreement, Buyer, the Company and the other parties named therein are entering into an Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of the date hereof (the "Merger Agreement"), pursuant to which, upon the terms and subject to the conditions thereof, a subsidiary of Buyer will be merged with and into the Company (the "Merger"), with the Company as the surviving corporation of the Merger (the "Surviving Corporation"); and WHEREAS, as a condition to the willingness of Buyer to enter into the Merger Agreement, Buyer has required that the Principal Stockholders agree, and, in order to induce Buyer to enter into the Merger Agreement, the Principal Stockholders are willing, to enter into this Agreement. NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein, and intending to be legally bound hereby, the parties hereby agree, severally and not jointly, as follows: Section 1. Voting of Shares. (a) Each Principal Stockholder covenants and agrees that until the termination of this Agreement in accordance with the terms hereof, at any meeting of the Company Stockholders, however called, and in any action by written consent of Company Stockholders, such Principal Stockholder agrees, (i) if no Adverse Recommendation has been made, to vote all Shares that are beneficially owned by such Principal Stockholder in favor of the adoption of the Merger Agreement and the approval of the Merger, and (ii) if an Adverse Recommendation has been made, to vote at least the Common Adverse Share Requirements and Preferred Adverse Share Requirements (each as defined below), rounded up to the nearest whole number, that are beneficially owned by such Principal Stockholder in favor of the adoption of the Merger Agreement and the approval of the Merger. For purposes of this Agreement, "Common Adverse Share Requirements" shall mean, with respect to each Principal Stockholder, that percentage (not to exceed 100%) of the Common Shares (not including any shares issuable upon conversion of outstanding Preferred Shares) then owned by such Principal Stockholder having in the aggregate
that number of votes in the election of directors and approval of any Acquisition Proposal ("Common Voting Power") equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) 40% by (ii) the percentage of the Common Voting Power of all then outstanding Common Shares (not including any shares issuable upon conversion of outstanding Preferred Shares) owned in the aggregate by the Principal Stockholders at the time of such vote. For purposes of this Agreement, "Preferred Adverse Share Requirements" shall mean, with respect to each Principal Stockholder, that percentage (not to exceed 100%) of the Preferred Shares then owned by such Principal Stockholder having in the aggregate that number of votes in the election of directors and approval of any Acquisition Proposal ("Preferred Voting Power") equal to the result obtained by dividing (i) 40% by (ii) the percentage of the Preferred Voting Power of all then outstanding Preferred Shares owned in the aggregate by the Principal Stockholders at the time of such vote. (b) Each Principal Stockholder covenants and agrees that until the termination of this Agreement in accordance with the terms hereof and, in the case of a Specified Termination, for a period of 18 months from the date thereof, at any meeting of the Company Stockholders, however called, and in any action by written consent of Company Stockholders, such Principal Stockholder agrees (i) to vote at least such Principal Stockholder's Common Adverse Share Requirements and Preferred Adverse Share Requirements against any Acquisition Proposal; (ii) not to vote any outstanding Common Shares in excess of the difference between such Principal Stockholder's Common Voting Power and such Principal Stockholder's Common Adverse Share Requirements in favor of, any Acquisition Proposal; and (iii) not to vote any outstanding Preferred Shares in excess of the difference between such Principal Stockholder's Preferred Voting Power and such Principal Stockholder's Preferred Adverse Share Requirements in favor of, any Acquisition Proposal. (c) Each Principal Stockholder hereby irrevocably grants to, and appoints, Buyer, and any individual designated in writing by it, and each of them individually, as its proxy and attorney-in-fact (with full power of substitution), for and in its name, place and stead, to vote his, her or its Shares at any meeting of the Company Stockholders called with respect to any of the matters specified in, and in accordance and consistent with, this Section 1. Each Principal Stockholder understands and acknowledges that Buyer is entering into the Merger Agreement in reliance upon the Principal Stockholder's execution and delivery of this Agreement. Each Principal Stockholder hereby affirms that the irrevocable proxy set forth in this Section 1(c) is given in connection with the execution of the Merger Agreement, and that such irrevocable proxy is given to secure the performance of the duties of such Principal Stockholder under this Agreement. Except as otherwise provided for herein, each Principal Stockholder hereby (i) affirms that the irrevocable proxy is coupled with an interest and may under no circumstances be revoked, (ii) ratifies and confirms all that the proxies appointed hereunder may lawfully do or cause to be done by virtue hereof and (iii) affirms that such irrevocable proxy is executed and intended to be irrevocable in accordance with the provisions of Section 212(e) of the Delaware General Corporation Law. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Agreement, the irrevocable proxy granted hereunder shall automatically terminate upon the termination of the Principal Stockholder's obligations pursuant to Section 1(b). Section 2. Transfer of Shares. 2
(a) Each Principal Stockholder covenants and agrees that such Principal Stockholder will not directly or indirectly (i) sell, assign, transfer (including by merger, testamentary disposition, interspousal disposition pursuant to a domestic relations proceeding or otherwise by operation of law), pledge, encumber or otherwise dispose of any of the Shares, (ii) deposit any of the Shares into a voting trust or enter into a voting agreement or arrangement with respect to the Shares or grant any proxy or power of attorney with respect thereto which is inconsistent with this Agreement, (iii) enter into any contract, option or other arrangement or undertaking with respect to the direct or indirect sale, assignment, transfer (including by merger, testamentary disposition, interspousal disposition pursuant to a domestic relations proceeding or otherwise by operation of law) or other disposition of any Shares, or (iv) otherwise commit any act, except as permitted by this Agreement or required by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, that could restrict or otherwise affect his, her or its legal power, authority and right to vote all of the Shares then owned of record or beneficially by him, her or it. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this Agreement shall prohibit the conversion of Preferred Shares into Common Shares or the exercise of Options to purchase Common Shares. (b) Each Principal Stockholder agrees to submit to the Company contemporaneously with or promptly following execution of this Agreement all certificates representing the Shares so that the Company may place thereon a conspicuous legend referring to the transfer restrictions set forth in this Agreement. (c) Notwithstanding the restrictions set forth in paragraph (a) above, each Principal Stockholder may sell, assign or transfer all or any portion of his or her Shares (i) to his or her spouse (or former spouse in connection with any marital separation, asset allocation agreement or qualified domestic relations order) or parents, siblings or children (by blood, marriage or adoption) ("Qualified Relatives"); (ii) to a trust established for the benefit of the Principal Stockholder or his or her Qualified Relatives; (iii) to an entity owned, directly or indirectly, by a trust set forth in clause (ii); (iv) to a beneficiary of his or her will through a disposition under such will; or (v) to the beneficiaries of any trust to which the Principal Stockholder has transferred Shares in compliance with subsection (ii); provided that in each case the transferee agrees in writing to be subject to the terms of this Agreement to the same extent as if such transferee were a holder of Shares hereunder. (d) The restrictions on transfer set forth in this Section 2 shall terminate at the Effective Time and shall not apply to any Buyer Common Shares issued in the Merger. Section 3. Representations and Warranties of the Principal Stockholders. Each Principal Stockholder on his, her or its own behalf hereby severally represents and warrants to Buyer with respect to itself and his, her or its ownership of the Shares as follows: (a) Ownership of Shares. The Principal Stockholder legally and beneficially owns all of the Shares as set forth on Schedule I hereto and has good and marketable title to such Shares, free and clear of any claims, liens, encumbrances and security interests whatsoever. The Principal Stockholder owns no shares of Common Stock other than the Shares as set forth on Schedule I hereto. The Principal Stockholder has sole voting power, without restrictions, with respect to all of the Shares. 3
(b) Power, Binding Agreement. The Principal Stockholder has the legal capacity and all requisite power and authority to enter into and perform all of its obligations, under this Agreement. This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by the Principal Stockholder and constitutes a valid and binding obligation of the Principal Stockholder, enforceable against the Principal Stockholder in accordance with its terms. (c) No Conflicts. The execution and delivery of this Agreement do not, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will not, conflict with or result in any violation of, or default (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) under, or give rise to a right of termination, cancellation or acceleration of any obligation or to loss of a material benefit under, any provision of any loan or credit agreement, note, bond, mortgage, indenture, lease, or other agreement, instrument, permit, concession, franchise, license, judgment, order, decree, statute, law, ordinance, rule or regulation applicable to the Principal Stockholder, the Shares or any of the Principal Stockholder's properties or assets. Except (i) as expressly contemplated hereby and (ii) for the Third Restated and Amended Voting Agreement dated November 13, 2002, and the Fifth Restated and Amended Co-Sale Agreement dated November 13, 2002 (the "Existing Agreements"), the Principal Stockholder is not a party to, and the Shares are not subject to or bound in any manner by, any contract or agreement relating to the Shares, including without limitation, any voting agreement, option agreement, purchase agreement, stockholders' agreement, partnership agreement or voting trust. Neither of the Existing Agreements limits in any way the ability of the Principal Stockholders to carry out the purpose and intent of, or to comply with the terms of, this Agreement. Except for the expiration or termination of the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act or other applicable U.S. or foreign antitrust laws, no consent, approval, order or authorization of, or registration, declaration or filing with, any court, administrative agency or commission or other governmental authority or instrumentality, domestic, foreign or supranational, is required by or with respect to the Principal Stockholder in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation by the Principal Stockholder of the transactions contemplated hereby. Section 4. Merger Agreement. Each Principal Stockholder hereby acknowledges and agrees that he, she or it will not assert any claim or defense that the covenants and agreements set forth in Sections 1.12, 1.13, 1.14, 1.18 and 8.2 and Article VI of the Merger Agreement and the Escrow Agreement are not binding on or enforceable against such Principal Stockholder in accordance with the terms thereof (and subject to the limitations set forth therein and in the Escrow Agreement), in each case to the extent applicable to a Principal Stockholder or an Equity Holder. Section 5. Exclusivity. (a) During the Pre-Closing Period, each of the Principal Stockholders agrees (and the Principal Stockholders shall require each of their officers, directors, employees, representatives and agents) not to directly or indirectly, (i) initiate, solicit, encourage or otherwise facilitate any inquiry, proposal, offer or discussion with any party (other than the Buyer) concerning any Acquisition Proposal, (ii) furnish any information concerning the business, properties or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary or the Company Shares to any 4
party (other than the Buyer) or (iii) engage in negotiations or enter into any agreement with any party (other than the Buyer) concerning any such transaction. (b) Each Principal Stockholders shall promptly, and in any event within one business day, notify any party with which discussions or negotiations of the nature described in paragraph (a) above were pending that such Principal Stockholder is terminating such discussions or negotiations. If a Principal Stockholder receives any inquiry, proposal or offer of the nature described in paragraph (a) above, such Principal Stockholder shall, within two business days after such receipt, notify the Buyer of such inquiry, proposal or offer, including the identity of the other party and the terms of such inquiry, proposal or offer. Section 6. Proprietary Information. (a) From and after the Effective Time, each of the Principal Stockholders and each of their respective Affiliates shall not disclose or make use of any information relating to the business of the Company that provides the Company with a competitive advantage (or that could be used to the Company's disadvantage by a competitive business), which is not generally known by, nor easily discoverable, determinable or discernable by, persons outside the Company (collectively referred to herein as "Proprietary Information"), including, but not limited to such information that may be in the form of: (a) specifications, manuals, software in various stages of development, and other technical data; (b) customer and prospect lists, details of agreements and communications with customers and prospects, and other customer information; (c) sales plans and projections, product pricing information, protocols, acquisition, expansion, marketing, financial and other business information and existing and future products and business plans and strategies of the Company; (d) sales proposals, demonstrations systems, sales material; (e) research and development; (f) software systems, computer programs and source codes; (g) sources of supply; (h) identity of specialized consultants and contractors and Proprietary Information developed by them for the Company; (i) purchasing, operating and other cost data; (j) special customer needs, cost and pricing data; and (k) employee information (including, but not limited to, personnel, payroll, compensation and benefit data and plans), including all such information recorded in manuals, memoranda, projections, reports, minutes, plans, drawings, sketches, designs, data, specifications, software programs and records, whether or not legended or otherwise identified by the Company as Proprietary Information, as well as such information that is the subject of meetings and discussions and not recorded. In any event, Proprietary Information shall not include such information that the Principal Stockholder can demonstrate (i) is generally available to the public (other than as a result of a disclosure by a Principal Stockholder or Management Participant), (ii) was disclosed to the Principal Stockholder by a third party under no obligation to keep such information confidential or (iii) was independently developed by the Principal Stockholder without reference to Proprietary Information and such Proprietary Information does not relate to a competitive business. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Principal Stockholders shall have no obligation hereunder to keep confidential any of the Proprietary Information to the extent disclosure thereof is required by law or regulation; provided, however, that in the event disclosure is required by law or regulation, each of the Principal Stockholders shall use his or her reasonable best efforts to provide the Buyer with prompt advance notice of such requirement so that the Buyer may seek an appropriate protective order. 5
(b) Each Principal Stockholder acknowledges that the remedy at law for any breach or threatened breach by the Principal Stockholder of this Section 6 will be inadequate and agrees that the Buyer in the event of such breach or threatened breach, in addition to all other remedies available for such breach or threatened breach (including a recovery of damages), will be entitled, without being required to prove actual damages or to post a bond or other surety, to obtain preliminary or permanent injunctive relief and, to the extent permitted by applicable statutes and rules of procedure, a temporary restraining order (or similar procedural device) upon the commencement of such action. Section 7. Capture (a) If (i) a Specified Termination occurs, and (ii) within 18 months of the Specified Termination, the Company (A) enters into an Alternative Acquisition Agreement, or (B) otherwise agrees to an Acquisition Proposal (a "Triggering Termination"), and any of a Principal Stockholder's Shares are sold, transferred, exchanged, canceled or disposed of in connection with, or as a result of, any Acquisition Proposal that is in existence on, or that has been otherwise made prior to, the eighteen month anniversary of the date of the Triggering Termination (an "Alternative Disposition") then, within two business days after the receipt by such Principal Stockholder of Alternative Transaction Consideration in connection with the closing of such Alternative Disposition, such Principal Stockholder shall tender and pay to, or shall cause to be tendered and paid to, Buyer, or its designee, in immediately available funds or the form of (and in the same proportions as) the Alternative Transaction Consideration (as determined at the option of the Principal Stockholder), the Profit (as defined below) realized from such Alternative Disposition. As used in this Section 7(a), "Profit" shall mean an amount equal to the excess, if any, of (i) the Alternative Transaction Consideration (as defined below) over (ii) the Current Transaction Consideration (as defined below). As used in this Section 7, "Alternative Transaction Consideration" shall mean all cash, securities, settlement or termination amounts, notes or other debt instruments, and other consideration received or to be received by such Principal Stockholder and his, her or its Affiliates in connection with or as a result of such Alternative Disposition or any agreements or arrangements (including, without limitation, any employment or consulting agreement (except (I) a bona fide employment agreement pursuant to which such Principal Stockholder is required to devote, and under which such Principal Stockholder in good faith agrees to devote, substantially all of his, her or its business time and effort to the performance of executive services for the Company in a manner substantially similar to the current employment arrangements of the Company's executive officers and (II) an employment/consulting agreement providing monetary and other benefits with a value not in excess of that provided under any employment/consulting agreement entered into between the Principal Stockholder and the Buyer on the date hereof), non-competition agreement, confidentiality agreement, settlement agreement and/or release agreement) entered into by such Principal Stockholder or any of his, her or its Affiliates as a part of or in connection with the Alternative Disposition or associated Acquisition Proposal, each of the foregoing less any taxes payable by the Principal Stockholder as a result of such Alternative Disposition. "Current Transaction Consideration" shall mean all amounts payable directly or indirectly by the Buyer to the Principal Stockholder in respect of his, her or its Company Shares pursuant to Article I of the Merger Agreement (valued based on the closing price of the Buyer Common Shares on The NASDAQ Stock Market on the date of the Triggering Termination). 6
(b) For purposes of determining Profits under this Section 7: (i) all non-cash items shall be valued based upon the fair market value thereof, (ii) all deferred payments or consideration shall be discounted to reflect a market rate of net present value thereof as determined by the above-referenced independent expert, (iii) all contingent payments will be deemed paid when they are received and (iv) if less than all of a Principal Stockholder's Shares are subject to the Alternative Disposition, then the Current Transaction Consideration shall be deemed to be an amount equal to the Current Transaction Consideration multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of such Principal Stockholder's Shares sold, transferred, exchanged, canceled or disposed of in such Alternative Disposition and the denominator of which is the total number of such Principal Stockholder's Shares. Section 8. Termination. The provisions of this Agreement shall survive the Closing and the Effective Time; provided that this Agreement shall terminate upon any termination of the Merger Agreement in accordance with the terms thereof; and provided, further, that no such termination shall (a) relieve any party of its obligations under Section 1(b) hereof, (b) terminate the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 2 hereof, which shall continue until the termination of the Principal Stockholder's obligations pursuant to Section 1(b), and (c) relieve any party from its liability for a breach hereof prior to termination. Section 9. Specific Performance. The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event any provision of this Agreement was not performed in accordance with the terms hereof and that the parties shall be entitled to specific performance of the terms hereof, in addition to any other remedy at law or in equity without posting any bond or other undertaking. Section 10. Liquidated Damages. In the event of an Alternative Disposition, the payment of Profit by a Principal Stockholder to the Buyer or its designee in accordance with Section 7(a) of this Agreement will fully discharge any liability of such Principal Stockholder to the Buyer under this Agreement (other than any liability for any willful breach of the terms hereof). Section 11. Fiduciary Duties. Each Principal Stockholder is signing this Agreement solely in such Principal Stockholder's capacity as an owner of his, her or its respective Shares, and nothing herein shall prohibit, prevent or preclude such Principal Stockholder from taking or not taking any action in his or her capacity as an officer or director of the Company in the manner required by such Principal Stockholder's fiduciary duties as an officer or director of the Company. Section 12. Consent and Waiver. Each Principal Stockholder hereby gives any consents or waivers that are reasonably required for the consummation of the Merger under the terms of any agreement to which such Principal Stockholder is a party or pursuant to any rights such Principal Stockholder may have in its capacity as a Company Stockholder. 7
Section 13. Miscellaneous. (a) Entire Agreement. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, both written and oral, between the parties with respect thereto. This Agreement may not be amended, modified or rescinded except by an instrument in writing signed by each of the parties hereto. (b) Severability. If any term or other provision of this Agreement is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced by any rule of law, or public policy, all other conditions and provisions of this Agreement shall nevertheless remain in full force and effect. Upon such determination that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced, the parties hereto shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law in a mutually acceptable manner in order that the terms of this Agreement remain as originally contemplated to the fullest extent possible. (c) Governing Law. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware without regard to the principles of conflicts of law thereof. (d) Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original and all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement may be executed by facsimile signature. (e) Notices. All notices, requests, demands, claims, and other communications hereunder shall be in writing. Any notice, request, demand, claim or other communication hereunder shall be deemed duly delivered two business days after it is sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, or one business day after it is sent for next business day delivery via a reputable nationwide overnight courier service, in each case to the intended recipient as set forth below: To a Principal Stockholder: To the address set forth on the respective signature page of this Agreement. To the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary: with a copy to: Akamai Technologies, Inc. Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP 8 Cambridge Center 60 State Street Cambridge, MA 02142 Boston, MA 02109 Attn: Melanie Haratunian, Esq. Attn: Susan W. Murley Telecopy: (617) 444-3695 Telecopy: (617) 526-5000 Telephone: (617) 444-3000 Telephone: (617) 526-6000 8
To the Company: with a copy to: Speedera Networks, Inc. Fenwick & West LLP 4800 Great America Parkway Embarcadero Center West Santa Clara, CA 95054 275 Battery Street Attn: Ajit Gupta San Francisco, CA 94111 Telecopy: (408) 855-9543 Attn: Robert B. Dellenbach Telephone: (408) 970-1500 Telecopy: (415) 281-1350 Telephone: (415) 875-2300 (f) No Third Party Beneficiaries. This Agreement is not intended, and shall not be deemed, to confer any rights or remedies upon any person other than the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns, to create any agreement of employment with any person or to otherwise create any third-party beneficiary hereto. (g) Assignment. Neither this Agreement nor any of the rights, interests or obligations under this Agreement may be assigned or delegated, in whole or in part, by operation of law or otherwise by any of the parties hereto without the prior written consent of the other parties, and any such assignment without such prior written consent shall be null and void, except that the Buyer may assign this Agreement to any direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the Buyer without the consent of the Company or the Principal Stockholder, provided that the Buyer shall remain liable for all of its obligations under this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement shall be binding upon, inure to the benefit of, and be enforceable by, the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns. (h) Interpretation. When reference is made in this Agreement to a Section, such reference shall be to a Section of this Agreement, unless otherwise indicated. The headings contained in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. The language used in this Agreement shall be deemed to be the language chosen by the parties hereto to express their mutual intent, and no rule of strict construction shall be applied against any party. Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa. Any reference to any federal, state, local or foreign statute or law shall be deemed also to refer to all rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, unless the context requires otherwise. Whenever the words "include," "includes" or "including" are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed to be followed by the words "without limitation." No summary of this Agreement prepared by the parties shall affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. (i) Submission to Jurisdiction. Each of the parties to this Agreement (i) consents to submit itself to the personal jurisdiction of any state or federal court sitting in the State of Delaware in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (ii) agrees that all claims in respect of such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in any such court, (iii) agrees that it will not attempt to deny or defeat such personal jurisdiction by motion or other request for leave from any such court and (iv) agrees not to bring any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in any other court. 9
Each of the parties hereto waives any defense of inconvenient forum to the maintenance of any action or proceeding so brought and waives any bond, surety or other security that might be required of any other party with respect thereto. Any party hereto may make service on another party by sending or delivering a copy of the process to the party to be served at the address and in the manner provided for the giving of notices in Section 13(e). Nothing in this Section, however, shall affect the right of any party to serve legal process in any other manner permitted by law. (j) WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL. EACH OF THE BUYER, THE COMPANY AND EACH PRINCIPAL STOCKHOLDER HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ALL RIGHTS TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION, PROCEEDING OR COUNTERCLAIM (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THE ACTIONS OF THE BUYER, THE COMPANY OR EACH PRINCIPAL STOCKHOLDER IN THE NEGOTIATION, ADMINISTRATION, PERFORMANCE AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS AGREEMENT, EXCEPT AS TO SECTION 6 OF THIS AGREEMENT, THE ENFORCEMENT OF WHICH MAY BE PURSUED BY COURT ACTION. [Signature Page to follow] 10
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each of the parties hereto has caused this Agreement to be signed individually or by its respective duly authorized officer as of the date first written above. SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. By: ____________________________________ Name: __________________________________ Title: _________________________________ AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: ____________________________________ Name: __________________________________ Title: _________________________________ PRINCIPAL STOCKHOLDERS: TRINITY VENTURES VII, L.P. By: ______________________________________ Signature ______________________________________ Name ______________________________________ Address ______________________________________ Address TRINITY VENTURES SIDE-BY-SIDE FUND, LP By: ______________________________________ Signature ______________________________________ Name ______________________________________ Address ______________________________________ Address 11
CONTINUUM LIMITED By: ______________________________________ Signature ______________________________________ Name ______________________________________ Address ______________________________________ Address INDUSTRY VENTURES By: ______________________________________ Signature ______________________________________ Name ______________________________________ Address ______________________________________ Address NAREN GUPTA __________________________________________ Signature __________________________________________ Name __________________________________________ Address __________________________________________ Address AJIT GUPTA __________________________________________ Signature __________________________________________ Name __________________________________________ Address __________________________________________ Address 12
RICHARD DAY __________________________________________ Signature __________________________________________ Name __________________________________________ Address __________________________________________ Address ERIC SWILDENS __________________________________________ Signature __________________________________________ Name __________________________________________ Address __________________________________________ Address 13
SCHEDULE I 14
15
16
EXHIBIT B MANAGEMENT PARTICIPANT AGREEMENT THIS MANAGEMENT PARTICIPANT AGREEMENT, dated as of March 16, 2005 (this "Agreement"), by and among Speedera Networks, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), the members of the Company's management listed on the signature page(s) hereto (collectively, "Management Participants" and each individually, a "Management Participant") and Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Buyer"). Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings assigned to them in the Merger Agreement referred to below. WHEREAS, concurrently with the execution of this Agreement, Buyer, the Company and the other parties named therein are entering into an Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of the date hereof (the "Merger Agreement"), pursuant to which, upon the terms and subject to the conditions thereof, a subsidiary of Buyer will be merged with and into the Company (the "Merger"), with the Company as the surviving corporation of the Merger (the "Surviving Corporation"); WHEREAS, pursuant to the Merger Agreement, the Management Participants will receive Buyer Common Shares as set forth in the Merger Agreement in satisfaction of certain obligations of the Company to such Management Participants, including those arising under the Company Employee Change in Control Bonus Plan and other severance, change of control, retention payment and similar obligations in connection with the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by the Merger Agreement, as more fully described herein; WHEREAS, the Management Participants are significant selling shareholders in connection with the Merger; WHEREAS, the Management Participants have nurtured many of the personal and business relationships that contribute to the success of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries and to its goodwill; WHEREAS, as a condition to the willingness of Buyer to enter into the Merger Agreement, Buyer has required that the Management Participants agree, and, in order to induce Buyer to enter into the Merger Agreement, the Management Participants are willing, to enter into this Agreement; and WHEREAS, Buyer and each Management Participant have entered into employment agreements contemporaneously with entering into this Agreement (the "New Employment Agreements"); NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein, and intending to be legally bound hereby, the parties hereby agree, severally and not jointly, as follows: Section 14. Full Satisfaction. Except as set forth in this Section 1, each Management Participant acknowledges and agrees that the Buyer Common Shares 17
to which the Management Participant is entitled pursuant to the Merger Agreement shall be in full consideration and satisfaction, from and after the Effective Time (as that term is defined in the Merger Agreement), of all known and unknown claims that the Management Participant may have against the Company and its directors, officers, shareholders and other persons or entities affiliated with the Company. This acknowledgment and agreement shall include (1) all claims arising under the Company's Employee Change in Control Bonus Plan, (2) all rights to payments or other benefits under the Management Participant's Employee Agreement with the Company, (3) all rights to MBO bonus payments under the Company's MBO Bonus Plan, except for any payment(s) due pursuant to the MBO Bonus Plan at the Closing to the extent accrued for on the Preliminary Closing Balance Sheet and the Closing Balance Sheet (as such terms are defined in the Merger Agreement), (4) all contractual rights to indemnification, provided, that this subsection shall not apply to claims arising out of or related to events, acts, omissions or occurrences arising at or before the Effective Time (the "Reserved Claims", and (5) all rights to acquire and/or sell (or otherwise dispose of) Company equity pursuant to stock purchase or option agreements with the Company or have share certificates issued pursuant to stock purchase or option agreements with the Company. This acknowledgment and agreement shall not apply to the Management Participant's rights (a) under the Management Participant's Speedera, Inc. Indemnification Agreement dated May 12, 2004 with respect to any Reserved Claims; (b) to benefits vested as of the Effective Time under a 401(k) Plan or similar retirement plan according to the terms of the plan; or (c) Assumed Options (as that term is defined in the Merger Agreement) issued in respect of any Options to acquire Company Common Shares in accordance with the terms of the Merger Agreement. Furthermore, this acknowledgment and agreement shall not apply to any rights and/or claims, if any, under (i) the New Employment Agreement to which such Management Participant is a party; (ii) the Stockholder Agreement to which each Management Participant is a party; (iii) this Agreement; (iv) the Merger Agreement; or (v) from and after the effectiveness thereof, the Settlement Agreement in the case Akamai Technologies, Inc. v. Speedera Networks, Inc., et al., Case No CV 809217, in the Superior Court for the State of California, County of Santa Clara. Each Management Participant further agrees (A) to waive the protections of California Civil Code Section 1542, which reads as follows: "A GENERAL RELEASE DOES NOT EXTEND TO CLAIMS WHICH A CREDITOR DOES NOT KNOW OF OR SUSPECT TO EXIST IN HER FAVOR AT THE TIME OF EXECUTING THE RELEASE WHICH IF KNOWN BY HER MUST HAVE MATERIALLY AFFECTED HER SETTLEMENT WITH THE DEBTOR," and (B) not to prosecute any legal action or other proceeding based upon any of the foregoing claims. Section 15. Merger Agreement. Each Management Participant hereby acknowledges and agrees that he, she or it will not assert any claim or defense that the covenants and agreements set forth in Sections 1.6, 1.12, 1.13, 1.14, 1.18 and 8.2 and Article VI of the Merger Agreement and the Escrow Agreement are not binding on or enforceable against such Management Participant in accordance with the terms thereof (and subject to the limitations set forth in the Merger Agreement 18
and the Escrow Agreement), in each case to the extent applicable to a Management Participant or an Equity Holder. Section 16. No Solicitation or Hiring of Former Employees. Except as provided by law, during the period commencing on the Closing Date of the Merger and ending on the third anniversary of the Closing Date, no Management Participant or Affiliate thereof shall directly or indirectly recruit, solicit or induce any person who was an employee or subcontractor of the Buyer or any of its Subsidiaries on or after the date hereof or on or after the Closing Date of the Merger (each a "Restricted Employee") to terminate his or her employment with, or otherwise terminate their relationship with, the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation (or any of their respective subsidiaries, as the case may be), or to become an employee or consultant of such Management Participant or Affiliate, provided, that on or after the first anniversary of the Closing Date, this provision shall not prohibit the Management Participant from recruiting, soliciting or inducing any person who has ceased to be employed by or ceased to be a consultant to the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation for any reason. In addition, no Management Participant shall hire or employ or use in any arrangement any Restricted Employee for a period of one year from the Closing Date without the prior written approval of an authorized executive officer of the Buyer. Each Management Participant acknowledges that the remedy at law for any breach or threatened breach by the Management Participant of this Section 3 will be inadequate and agrees that the Buyer in the event of such breach or threatened breach, in addition to all other remedies available for such breach or threatened breach (including a recovery of damages), will be entitled, without being required to prove actual damages or to post a bond or other surety in excess of $10,000, to obtain preliminary or permanent injunctive relief by a court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts (or, if appropriate, a federal court located within Massachusetts) and, to the extent permitted by applicable statutes and rules of procedure, a temporary restraining order (or similar procedural device) upon the commencement of such action. The Buyer agrees to cover the reasonable costs of air travel to and from Massachusetts and lodging in Massachusetts for the Management Participant and an attorney of his choosing while in Massachusetts to participate in any action in state or federal court pursuant to this Section. The right of the Buyer to bring and maintain the action pursuant to this Section shall be contingent on the Buyer paying the expenses required by the prior sentence to the extent not disputed by the Buyer in good faith, promptly following the Buyer's receipt of a copy of an invoice, and the court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall have jurisdiction to resolve any dispute with respect to the amount of such disputed expenses. If a Management Participant is found to have violated the provisions of this Section 3 by a court or arbitrator, the Management Participant shall continue to be held by the restrictions set forth in herein until a period equal to the period of restriction has expired without any violation. Section 17. Non-Compete. 19
(a) Each Management Participant acknowledges and agrees that (i) the Buyer believes that the future success of the business of the Buyer and its Subsidiaries depends, in large part, on the absence of competition from such Management Participant; (ii) the absence of such competition is an essential premise of the bargain set forth in the Merger Agreement; (iii) some restrictions on the activities of the Management Participants are necessary to protect the goodwill associated with the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries and/or the Surviving Corporation and other legitimate interests of the Buyer and its Affiliates; (iv) the restrictions set forth herein will not prevent the Management Participants from earning or seeking a livelihood; and (v) the Management Participants would have an unfair competitive advantage if any of the Management Participants were to compete with Buyer, the Surviving Corporation or the Affiliates thereof by violating the terms of this Agreement. Each Management Participant further acknowledges that in view of the nature of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries and the business objectives of the Buyer in acquiring the Company, and the consideration paid to the Management Participants therefor, the limitations of this Section 4 are reasonable and properly required for the adequate protection of the Buyer and its Affiliates. (b) Each Management Participant covenants and agrees that, during the period commencing on the Closing Date, such Management Participant shall not (whether as owner, partner, investor, consultant, agent, employee, co-venturer or otherwise), and shall not cause or permit any other person or entity that such Management Participant controls, directly or indirectly, to own, manage, operate, join, control or participate in the ownership, management, operation or control of, or be engaged by or connected in any other manner with, any enterprise that is engaged in any business that (i) discovers, develops, manufactures or sells any products that are substantially similar to any products under development by the Company or any of the Subsidiaries on or before the date hereof or (ii) otherwise engages in any business similar to or competitive with the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries; provided, that such restriction will not apply to (A) such Management Participant's services, if applicable, as an employee, officer, or director of or a consultant to the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation or (B) any passive investment representing an interest of less than 5% of an outstanding class of publicly traded securities of any corporation or other enterprise; and further provided, that the restrictions set forth in Section 4 shall not in any way prohibit a Management Participant from being employed by or providing consulting services to an entity (the "New Employer") that has a division or subsidiary (or other business unit) (a "Division") which is in a business described in clause (i) and (ii) of this Section, provided that (A) the Management Participant does not work in, advise, provide any services to or have any control over the Division or personally engage in any of the activities prohibited by Section 3 above or this Section 4 and (B) prior to the commencement of such services, the Management Participant advises the New Employer in writing, with a copy to the Buyer, of the terms and conditions of this Agreement. (c) The restrictions and obligations set forth in subparagraph (b), above, shall (i) apply in any county and/or city in the State of California or in any other county or political subdivision in any state or country in the world only to the extent the business of the Buyer and its Subsidiaries has been carried on in such geographic area; (ii) end, with respect to each such geographic area identified above, on the earlier to occur of (A) the third anniversary of the Closing Date; or (B) the first date on which the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation and the 20
Affiliates thereof (and their respective successors and assigns) cease to be engaged in the Business or a like business in such geographic area (the "Non-Compete Period"). (d) Each Management Participant acknowledges that the remedy at law for any breach or threatened breach by the Management Participant of this Section 4 will be inadequate and agrees that the Buyer in the event of such breach or threatened breach, in addition to all other remedies available for such breach or threatened breach (including a recovery of damages), will be entitled, without being required to prove actual damages or to post a bond or other surety in excess of $10,000, to obtain preliminary or permanent injunctive relief by a court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts (or, if appropriate, a federal court located within Massachusetts) and, to the extent permitted by applicable statutes and rules of procedure, a temporary restraining order (or similar procedural device) upon the commencement of such action. The Buyer agrees to cover the reasonable costs of air travel to and from Massachusetts and lodging in Massachusetts for the Management Participant and an attorney of his choosing while in Massachusetts to participate in any action in state or federal court pursuant to this Section. The right of the Buyer to bring and maintain the action pursuant to this Section shall be contingent on the Buyer paying the expenses required by the prior sentence to the extent not disputed by the Buyer in good faith, promptly following the Buyer's receipt of a copy of an invoice, and the court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall have jurisdiction to resolve any dispute with respect to the amount of such disputed expenses. (e) If a Management Participant is found to have violated the provisions of this Section 4 by a court or arbitrator, the Management Participant shall continue to be held by the restrictions set forth in herein until a period equal to the period of restriction has expired without any violation. (f) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, each Management Participant agrees that such Management Participant will comply with the restrictions and obligations set forth in subparagraph (b), above, during the term of any employment or independent contractor agreement with the Buyer, the Company or the Surviving Corporation. (g) This Section 4 constitutes an independent and severable covenant, and if any or all of the provisions of this Section 4 are held to be unenforceable for any reason whatsoever, it will not in any way invalidate or affect the remainder of this Agreement which will remain in full force and effect, or affect the application of such provision or provisions to circumstances other than those to which it is so determined to be unenforceable. The parties intend for the covenants of this Section 4 to be enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by law, and if any reviewing court deems any of such covenants to be unenforceable or invalid, the parties authorize such court to reform (i) the unenforceable or invalid provisions and to impose such restrictions as reformed, and (ii) the remaining provisions as it deems reasonable. Section 18. Notice of Future Employment. In response to any written request from the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation, which request shall be made no more than once a calendar quarter, each Management Participant shall, for the remainder of the Non-Compete Period, promptly respond to the written request by notifying the Buyer in writing of any change of address, and of any future 21
employment (stating the name and address of the employer and the nature of the position) or other business activity. Each Management Participant agrees and acknowledges that additional obligations to the Buyer with respect to future employment may be agreed upon in a separate agreement between that Management Participant and the Buyer. Section 19. Representations of Management Participant. Each Management Participant hereby represents and warrants to the Buyer as follows: (a) The Management Participant has read and understands each of the provisions of this Agreement and has had an opportunity to seek and obtain the advice of independent legal counsel before agreeing to be bound by the provisions hereof. (b) To the extent permitted by law, the Management Participant promises never to assert that the provisions of this Agreement do not comply with applicable law or are not enforceable. (c) This Agreement has been duly and validly executed and delivered by the Management Participant and constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of the Management Participant enforceable against the Management Participant in accordance with its terms. Section 20. Effectiveness; Termination. The parties acknowledge and agree that the provisions of Sections 1, 3, 4, and 5 shall become effective only from and after the Effective Time. The provisions of this Agreement shall survive the Closing and the Effective Time. This Agreement shall terminate upon any termination of the Merger Agreement in accordance with the terms of Article X thereof; provided, that no such termination shall relieve any party of liability for a breach hereof prior to termination. Section 21. Specific Performance. The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event any provision of this Agreement was not performed in accordance with the terms hereof and that the parties shall be entitled to specific performance of the terms hereof, in addition to any other remedy at law or in equity without posting any bond or other undertaking of more than $10,000. Section 22. Miscellaneous. (a) Entire Agreement. Except as specifically provided in Section 1 above, this Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, both written and oral, between the parties with respect thereto. This Agreement may not be amended, modified or rescinded except by an instrument in writing signed by each of the parties hereto. (b) Severability. If any term or other provision of this Agreement is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced by any rule of law, or public policy, all other conditions 22
and provisions of this Agreement shall nevertheless remain in full force and effect. Upon such determination that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced, the parties hereto shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law in a mutually acceptable manner in order that the terms of this Agreement remain as originally contemplated to the fullest extent possible. (c) Governing Law. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware without regard to the principles of conflicts of law thereof, except Sections 3 and 4 above, which shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, without regard to conflict of laws provisions. (d) Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original and all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement may be executed by facsimile signature. (e) Notices. All notices, requests, demands, claims, and other communications hereunder shall be in writing. Any notice, request, demand, claim or other communication hereunder shall be deemed duly delivered two business days after it is sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, or one business day after it is sent for next business day delivery via a reputable nationwide overnight courier service, in each case to the intended recipient as set forth below: To a Management Participant: To the address set forth on the respective signature page of this Agreement. To the Buyer or the Surviving Corporation: with a copy to: Akamai Technologies, Inc. Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP 8 Cambridge Center 60 State Street Cambridge, MA 02142 Boston, MA 02109 Attn: Melanie Haratunian, Esq. Attn: Susan W. Murley Telecopy: (617) 444-3695 Telecopy: (617) 526-5000 Telephone: (617) 444-3000 Telephone: (617) 526-6000 To the Company: with a copy to: 23
Speedera Networks, Inc. Fenwick & West LLP 4800 Great America Parkway Embarcadero Center West Santa Clara, CA 95054 275 Battery Street Attn: Ajit Gupta San Francisco, CA 94111 Telecopy: (408) 855-9543 Attn: Robert B. Dellenbach Telephone: (408) 970-1500 Telecopy: (415) 281-1350 Telephone: (415) 875-2300 (f) No Third Party Beneficiaries. This Agreement is not intended, and shall not be deemed, to confer any rights or remedies upon any person other than the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns, to create any agreement of employment with any person or to otherwise create any third-party beneficiary hereto. (g) Assignment. Neither this Agreement nor any of the rights, interests or obligations under this Agreement may be assigned or delegated, in whole or in part, by operation of law or otherwise by any of the parties hereto without the prior written consent of the other parties, and any such assignment without such prior written consent shall be null and void, except that the Buyer may assign this Agreement to any direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the Buyer without the consent of the Company or the Management Participant, provided that the Buyer shall remain liable for all of its obligations under this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement shall be binding upon, inure to the benefit of, and be enforceable by, the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns. (h) Interpretation. When reference is made in this Agreement to a Section, such reference shall be to a Section of this Agreement, unless otherwise indicated. The headings contained in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. The language used in this Agreement shall be deemed to be the language chosen by the parties hereto to express their mutual intent, and no rule of strict construction shall be applied against any party. Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa. Any reference to any federal, state, local or foreign statute or law shall be deemed also to refer to all rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, unless the context requires otherwise. Whenever the words "include," "includes" or "including" are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed to be followed by the words "without limitation." No summary of this Agreement prepared by the parties shall affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. (i) Submission to Jurisdiction. Each of the parties to this Agreement (i) consents to submit itself to the personal jurisdiction of any state or federal court sitting in the State of Delaware in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (ii) agrees that all claims in respect of such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in any such court, (iii) agrees that it will not attempt to deny or defeat such personal jurisdiction by motion or other request for leave from any such court and (iv) agrees not to bring any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in any other court, except for claims by the Buyer or by the Management Participant for any breach or threatened breach of Sections 3 and 4 above (the "Massachusetts Claims"), including claims for temporary 24
restraining orders or preliminary or permanent injunctions,which shall be commenced only in a court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts (or, if appropriate, a federal court located within Massachusetts), and the Buyer and the Management Participant each consent to the jurisdiction of such a court. Each of the parties hereto waives any defense of inconvenient forum to the maintenance of any action or proceeding so brought and waives any bond, surety or other security in excess of $10,000 that might be required of any other party with respect thereto. Any party hereto may make service on another party by sending or delivering a copy of the process to the party to be served at the address and in the manner provided for the giving of notices in Section 10(e). Nothing in this Section, however, shall affect the right of any party to serve legal process in any other manner permitted by law. The Buyer agrees to cover the reasonable costs of air travel to and from Massachusetts and lodging in Massachusetts for the Management Participant and an attorney of his choosing while in Massachusetts to participate in any action in state or federal court pursuant to this Section. The right of the Buyer to bring and maintain the action pursuant to this Section shall be contingent on the Buyer paying the expenses required by the prior sentence to the extent not disputed by the Buyer in good faith, promptly following the Buyer's receipt of a copy of an invoice, and the court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall have jurisdiction to resolve any dispute with respect to the amount of such disputed expenses. (j) WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL. EACH OF THE BUYER, THE COMPANY AND EACH MANAGEMENT PARTICIPANT HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ALL RIGHTS TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION, PROCEEDING OR COUNTERCLAIM (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THE ACTIONS OF THE BUYER, THE COMPANY OR EACH MANAGEMENT PARTICIPANT IN THE NEGOTIATION, ADMINISTRATION, PERFORMANCE AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS AGREEMENT, EXCEPT AS TO SECTIONS 3 AND 4 OF THIS AGREEMENT, THE ENFORCEMENT OF WHICH MAY BE PURSUED BY COURT ACTION. [Signature Page to follow] 25
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each of the parties hereto has caused this Agreement to be signed individually or by its respective duly authorized officer as of the date first written above. COMPANY: SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. By: __________________________________ Name: ________________________________ Title: _______________________________ BUYER: AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: __________________________________ Name: ________________________________ Title: _______________________________ MANAGEMENT PARTICIPANTS: ______________________________________ Signature ______________________________________ Ajit Gupta ______________________________________ Address ______________________________________ Signature ______________________________________ Eric Swildens ______________________________________ Address ______________________________________ Signature ______________________________________ Richard Day ______________________________________ Address 26
EXHIBIT C INSERT SURVIVING COMPANY NAME In connection with the Merger Agreement (the "Agreement") dated as of ________, 200_ by and among (Insert SURVIVING COMPANY name), a (Insert STATE OF INCORPORATION) corporation ("Surviving Company") and (Insert TARGET COMPANY name), a (insert STATE OF INCORPORATION) corporation ("TARGET COMPANY") pursuant to which the Surviving Company was merged with and into the Target Company and each share of common stock of Target Company was converted into the right to receive ___ of a share of [Aquarius] Common Stock, the undersigned, in compliance with the instructions below, surrenders to you for cancellation the above-described certificate(s) representing shares of the common stock of Target Company. ("Target Common Stock"), pursuant to the terms of the Agreement. PLEASE RETURN YOUR CERTIFICATE(s), ALONG WITH THE DETACHABLE LETTER OF TRANSMITTAL BELOW, TO ONE OF THE FOLLOWING ADDRESSES FOR EXCHANGE: This method of delivery of certificate(s) to be surrendered to one of the addresses above is the option and risk of the surrendering stockholder. Delivery will be deemed effective only when received. Please refer to the additional enclosure(s) for additional information. For additional assistance, you may call: X-XXX-XXX-XXXX NOTE: This form is to be used ONLY for the exchange of your securities. If you have additional questions or concerns regarding your account, such as a request for transfer or sale of your shares, please contact us at the number above or visit our website at http://www.equiserve.com/shs/forms/index_forms.htm to obtain the correct instructions and documentation for the desired transactions. If the registered owner listed on the form is unable to sign the Letter of Transmittal, please submit the appropriate legal documentation authorizing the heir or legal representative to sign in place of the shareholder, and have the form MEDALLION GUARANTEED. A Medallion Guarantee is a stamp which may be obtained at an institution such as a commercial bank, a trust company, a credit union, or a brokerage firm that participates in a Medallion program. A notary public seal is NOT acceptable, If you require additional information regarding the appropriate legal documentation, please contact us at the number above. LETTER OF TRANSMITTAL FOR SHARES OF (INSERT COMPANY NAME) STOCK YOU MUST RETURN THIS FORM WITH YOUR STOCK CERTIFICATES. DO NOT SIGN YOUR CERTIFICATES. [Note: need to add provisions below to allow stockholders to specify electronic delivery of shares of Acquarius common stock and to allow for delivery in a different name, if requested by the stockholder.] CERTIFICATE NUMBERS YOU HOLD: 1. Shares you hold as certificates: _____________________________________ Signature of owner _____________________________________ Signature of co-owner, if any INSTRUCTIONS REGARDING THE EXCHANGE FORM Shares you hold as certificates: This line shows the number of shares YOU are holding in certificate form. Signature of owner(s): You must sign the EXCHANGE FORM. Please sign EXACTLY as your name appears on the front of the EXCHANGE FORM. All registered owners must sign the form. Do not sign your stock certificates. Box A - I have lost my certificates: If you are unable to locate some or all of your stock certificates, please be sure to read Section A below regarding replacement fees. If you are still unable to locate the certificate(s), mark Box A on the front side of the form. Then mark the boxes corresponding to the missing certificate number(s), if shown. 27
SECTION A - Instructions Regarding Missing Certificates: This section shows the surety fee for the replacement of shares. (minimum fee for replacement of shares is $70.00). If some or all of your certificates have been lost, stolen, or destroyed, you must submit a check payable to EquiServe with your EXCHANGE FORM. Please complete Section A below. SECTION A - INSTRUCTIONS REGARDING MISSING CERTIFICATES By checking the lost certificates box and signing on the front of this form, I (we) certify that (a) I (we) am (are) the lawful owner(s) of the shares described on the front of this form; (b) I (we) reside at the address set forth on the front of this form; (c) I (we) am (are) entitled to possession of the lost certificate(s) (the "Lost Securities"); (d) the Lost Securities have been lost, mislaid, stolen or destroyed and cannot now be produced; (e) the Lost Securities WERE NOT ENDORSED and neither the Lost Securities nor the Owner(s)' rights therein have, in whole or in part, been cashed, negotiated, sold, transferred, hypothecated, pledged, deposed of, and to my (our) knowledge, no claim of right, like or interest, adverse to the Owner, in or to the Lost Securities, has been make or advanced by any person; (f) I (we) have made or caused to be made a diligent search for the Lost Securities and have been unable to find or recover the Lost Securities; (g) I (we) make this Affidavit of Lost Securities For EquiServe Accounts for the purpose of inducing the issuance of new or replacement Securities ("Replacement Securities") (in book-entry form, unless unavailable through the issuer) in lieu of the said Lost Securities, or the distribution to the Owner(s) of proceeds (including liquidation) thereof; (h) I (we) agree that this Lost Securities Affidavit for EquiServe Accounts may be delivered to and made part of this SAFECO Bond No. 5926165 [The Owner(s) hereby agree(s) in consideration of the issuance of (1) such replacement Securities in lieu of the Lost Securities, or of the distribution to the Owner of the proceeds therefrom, and (2) the assumption by SAFECO of liability therefor under the Safeco Blanker Bond, the OWNER, his/her/its heirs, successors and assigns agree to indemnify, protect and save harmless SAFECO, EquiServe Trust Company, N.A. and EquiServe, Inc. and the issuer, jointly and severally, and their respective agents, representatives, successors, and assigns from and against all losses, costs and damages to which they may be subject or liable arising out of or relating to the Lost Securities, the issuance of Replacement Securities, the Owner's requested action herein (or any other action arising out of or relating to the Replacement or Lost Securities), or SAFECO's assumption of liability under its blanket bond described above.
LOST CERTIFICATE BOND X $XXXXXX = + $50.00 processing fee = ____________ _________________ ________ _______________ PREMIUM CALCULATION: Shares lost Bond Premium per Share Total Premium Due Total Check Amount (MINIMUM $20.00) (MINIMUM $70.00)
Multiply the number of shares lost by the SAFECO Bond premium noted above to calculate the premium you owe. If you have Lost Securities representing XX or fewer shares, there is a minimum premium of $20.00. The premium is only valid until XX/XX/XXXX. There is also a processing fee of $50.00. If you have Lost Securities valued at $50,000 or more, or if the Lost Securities are part of an estate or trust, please call EquiServe for additional instructions. PLEASE MAKE YOUR CHECK PAYABLE TO "EQUISERVE FOR THE TOTAL AMOUNT (TOTAL BOND PREMIUM PLUS PROCESSING FEE) AND ENCLOSE WITH THIS AFFIDAVIT. EquiServe will forward the Bond premium to SAFECO. We cannot complete your exchange without a Surety Bond. NOTE: This premium is calculated based upon each lost share, not per each lost certificate.][Note: requiring a bond and an additional processing fee seems rather draconian in this context.] 28
Exhibit D INDEMNIFICATION ESCROW AGREEMENT This Indemnification Escrow Agreement is entered into as of ____________, 2005, by and among Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Buyer"), Thomas Cole, as representative (the "Representative") of the equity holders of Speedera Networks, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and U.S. Bank National Association, Corporate Trust Services (the "Escrow Agent"). Capitalized terms not specifically defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Merger Agreement (as hereinafter defined). WHEREAS, the Buyer and a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Buyer (the "Transitory Subsidiary"), the Company and the Representative have entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated March 16, 2005 (the "Merger Agreement"), pursuant to which the Transitory Subsidiary will be merged (the "Merger") into the Company, which, as the surviving corporation (the "Surviving Corporation"), will become a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Buyer; WHEREAS, the Merger Agreement provides that an escrow account will be established to secure (i) the indemnification obligations of the Equity Holders set forth in Articles VI and VIII of the Merger Agreement to the Buyer and (ii) any adjustment to the amount of the Preliminary Base Purchase Price pursuant to Section 1.12 of the Merger Agreement; and WHEREAS, the parties hereto desire to establish the terms and conditions pursuant to which such escrow account will be established and maintained; NOW, THEREFORE, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows: Section 23. Consent of Equity Holders. The Equity Holders, by operation of the Merger Agreement, the Company Stockholders, by the approval of the Merger Agreement and acceptance of the Merger Consideration, the holders of Options and, if applicable, Warrants, by executing amendments to such Options and Warrants pursuant to Section 1.11(e) of the Merger Agreement, the Principal Stockholders, by their execution of the Stockholder Agreement, and the Management Participants, by their execution of the Management Participant Agreement, shall each be deemed to have consented to: (a) the establishment of this escrow to secure (i) the Equity Holders' indemnification obligations pursuant to Articles VI and VIII of the Merger Agreement and (ii) any adjustment of the Preliminary Base Purchase Price pursuant to Section 1.12 of the Merger Agreement in the manner set forth herein, (b) the appointment of the Representative as their representative for purposes of this Agreement and as attorney-in-fact and agent for and on behalf of each Equity Holder, and the taking by the Representative of any and all actions and the making of any decisions required or permitted to be taken or made by them under this Agreement, and (c) all of the other terms, conditions and limitations in this Agreement. Section 24. Escrow and Indemnification. (a) Escrow of Shares. 29
(i) Initial Deposit. Simultaneously with the execution of this Agreement, the Buyer shall deposit with the Escrow Agent a certificate, issued in the name of the Escrow Agent or its nominee, for [___] Closing Buyer Common Shares, as determined pursuant to Sections 1.5(d)(i)(A) and 1.6(b)(i) of the Merger Agreement, to be held in trust for the Company Stockholders and the Management Participants. The Escrow Agent hereby acknowledges receipt of such certificate. (ii) Supplemental Deposits. The Buyer may from time to time deposit with the Escrow Agent additional Buyer Common Shares as follows: (A) On the date specified in Section 1.12(f) of the Merger Agreement, if the Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment is greater than the Preliminary Net Asset Value, a certificate, issued in the name of the Escrow Agent or its nominee, for the number of Adjusted Buyer Common Shares specified in Sections 1.5(d)(ii)(A) (with respect to the Company Stockholders), 1.6(b)(ii)(A) (with respect to the Management Participants) and 1.11(f)(iii)(A) (with respect to the holders of Exercised Shares as of the Asset Value Adjustment Date) of the Merger Agreement, to be held in trust for the applicable Equity Holders. (B) Upon the exercise of an Assumed Convertible Security after the date hereof but before the date 18 months after the date hereof (the "Initial Distribution Date"), a certificate, issued in the name of the Escrow Agent or its nominee, for the number of Buyer Common Shares as determined pursuant to Section 1.11(f)(i)(A) of the Merger Agreement, to be held in trust for the holder of such exercised Assumed Convertible Security. (C) On the Initial Distribution Date, a certificate, issued in the name of the Escrow Agent or its nominee, for the number of Option Adjusted Buyer Common Shares as determined pursuant to Sections 1.5(d)(iii)(A) (with respect to the Company Stockholders), 1.6(b)(iii)(A) (with respect to the Management Participants) and 1.11(f)(v)(A) (with respect to the holders of Exercised Shares as of the Initial Distribution Date) of the Merger Agreement, to be held in trust for the applicable Equity Holders. (D) At any time after the Initial Distribution Date, the Buyer may from time to time, upon the exercise of an Assumed Convertible Security, deposit with the Escrow Agent a certificate, issued in the name of the Escrow Agent or its nominee, for the number of additional Buyer Common Shares acquired in the exercise of such Assumed Convertible Security as determined pursuant to Section 1.11(f)(vi) of the Merger Agreement, to be held in trust for the holder of such exercised Assumed Convertible Security; and (E) The Buyer may from time to time deposit with the Escrow Agent certificates, issued in the name of the Escrow Agent or its nominee, for additional Buyer Common Shares as a result of the withdrawal of dissenters' rights and the agreement to accept the Merger Consideration by holders of Dissenting Shares pursuant to Section 1.7(a) of the Merger Agreement, to be held in trust for the holders of such Dissenting Shares. (iii) Indemnification Escrow Shares. The Buyer Common Shares deposited pursuant to this Section 2(a) shall be referred to herein as "Indemnification Escrow Shares". The Indemnification Escrow Shares shall be held as a trust fund and shall not be 30
subject to any lien, attachment, trustee process or any other judicial process of any creditor of any party hereto. The Escrow Agent agrees to accept delivery of the Indemnification Escrow Shares and to hold the Indemnification Escrow Shares in an escrow account (the "Escrow Account"), subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement. (b) Security and Indemnification. Section 1.13(a) of the Merger Agreement provides that the Indemnification Escrow Shares shall be used to secure (i) the Equity Holders' indemnification obligations pursuant to Articles VI and VIII of the Merger Agreement and (ii) any adjustment to the amount of the Preliminary Base Purchase Price pursuant to Section 1.12 of the Merger Agreement. (c) Dividends, Etc. Any securities distributed in respect of or in exchange for any of the Indemnification Escrow Shares, whether by way of stock dividends, stock splits or otherwise, shall be issued in the name of the Escrow Agent or its nominee, and shall be delivered to the Escrow Agent, who shall hold such securities in the Escrow Account. Such securities shall be considered Indemnification Escrow Shares for purposes hereof. Any cash dividends or property (other than securities) distributed in respect of the Indemnification Escrow Shares shall promptly be distributed by the Escrow Agent to the Equity Holders in accordance with Section 3(c). (d) Voting of Shares. The Representative shall have the right, in his, her or its sole discretion, on behalf of the Equity Holders, to direct the Escrow Agent in writing as to the exercise of any voting rights pertaining to the Indemnification Escrow Shares, and the Escrow Agent shall comply with any such written instructions. In the absence of such instructions, the Escrow Agent shall not vote any of the Indemnification Escrow Shares. The Representative shall have no obligation to solicit consents or proxies from the Equity Holders for purposes of any such vote. (e) Transferability. The respective interests of the Equity Holders in the Indemnification Escrow Shares shall not be assignable or transferable, other than by operation of law. Notice of any such assignment or transfer by operation of law shall be given to the Escrow Agent and the Buyer, and no such assignment or transfer shall be valid until such notice is given. Section 25. Administration of Escrow Account. (a) Distribution by Escrow Agent. The Escrow Agent shall distribute the Indemnification Escrow Shares only in accordance with (i) a written instrument delivered, pursuant to Section 6.2(c) of the Merger Agreement or otherwise, to the Escrow Agent that is executed by both the Buyer and the Representative and that instructs the Escrow Agent as to the distribution of some or all of the Indemnification Escrow Shares, (ii) a determination of an arbitrator pursuant to Section 6.2(e) of the Merger Agreement, a copy of which is delivered to the Escrow Agent by either the Buyer or the Representative, that instructs the Escrow Agent as to the distribution of some or all of the Indemnification Escrow Shares, or (iii) the provisions of Section 3(b) hereof. (b) Distributions of Escrow Shares. 31
(i) Initial Distribution. Within five business days after the Initial Distribution Date, the Escrow Agent shall distribute, subject to paragraph (iii) below, (A) to the Buyer, Indemnification Escrow Shares having a Value (as defined in Section 5 below) equal to the sum of (x) any Closing Net Asset Value Adjustment pursuant to Section 1.12(f)(i) of the Merger Agreement, to the extent the Net Asset Value on the Closing Balance Sheet is less than the Preliminary Net Asset Value, plus (y) the sum of (1) the aggregate Claimed Amount or Agreed Amount agreed to by the Representative and set forth in a Response delivered to the Escrow Agent on or prior to the Initial Distribution Date in respect of any Damages incurred by the Buyer after the Closing Date and for which the Buyer is entitled to indemnification pursuant to Article VI or VIII of the Merger Agreement ("Undisputed Damages") plus (2) the aggregate amount of Damages set forth in the determination of an arbitrator pursuant to Section 6.2(e) of the Merger Agreement ("Arbitrator-Determined Damages"), a copy of which determination is delivered to the Escrow Agent on or prior to the Initial Distribution Date and (B) after any distribution to the Buyer pursuant to the foregoing clause (A), to the Equity Holders all Indemnification Escrow Shares held in escrow in excess of an amount equal to 5% of the Merger Consideration, if any (any such excess, as it may be adjusted pursuant to the next sentence hereof, being the "Initial Distribution Amount"). Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Buyer has delivered, on or prior to the Initial Distribution Date, to the Escrow Agent a copy of a Claim Notice and the Escrow Agent has not received written notice of the resolution of the claim covered thereby, or if the Buyer has previously delivered to the Escrow Agent a copy of an Expected Claim Notice and the Escrow Agent has not received written notice of the resolution of the anticipated claim covered thereby, the Escrow Agent shall reduce any proposed distribution pursuant to clause (B) above by a number of Indemnification Escrow Shares as have a Value (as defined in Section 5 below) equal to 150% of (i) the Claimed Amount covered by such Claim Notice or (ii) the estimated amount of Damages set forth in such Expected Claim Notice, as the case may be. Any Indemnification Escrow Shares so retained in escrow with respect to such unresolved claims shall be distributed only in accordance with the terms of clauses (i) or (ii) of Section 3(a) hereof. (ii) Final Distribution. The Indemnification Escrow Shares that shall remain after the Initial Distribution Date shall continue to be held by the Escrow Agent until the date 30 months after the date hereof (the "Final Distribution Date") as security for any continuing indemnification obligations of the Equity Holders set forth in Article VI or VIII of the Merger Agreement. Within five business days after the Final Distribution Date, the Escrow Agent shall distribute, subject to paragraph (iii) below, after any distribution made after the Initial Distribution Date, to the Buyer of Indemnification Escrow Shares having an aggregate Value (as defined in Section 5 below) equal to (1) Undisputed Damages set forth in a Response delivered to the Escrow Agent after the Initial Distribution Date and on or prior to the Final Distribution Date plus (2) Arbitrator-Determined Damages, a copy of which determination is delivered to the Escrow Agent after the Initial Determination Date and on or prior to the Final Distribution Date, to the Equity Holders all Indemnification Escrow Shares held in escrow (as such amount may be adjusted pursuant to the next sentence hereof, the "Final Distribution Amount"). Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Buyer has delivered, on or prior to the Final Distribution Date, to the Escrow Agent a copy of a Claim Notice and the Escrow Agent has not received written notice of the resolution of the claim covered thereby, or if the Buyer has previously delivered to the Escrow Agent a copy of an Expected Claim Notice and the Escrow Agent has not received written notice of the resolution of the anticipated claim covered thereby, 32
the Escrow Agent shall retain in escrow after the Final Distribution Date such number of Indemnification Escrow Shares from the Final Distribution Amount as have a Value (as defined in Section 5 below) equal to 150% of (i) the Claimed Amount covered by such Claim Notice or (ii) the estimated amount of Damages set forth in such Expected Claim Notice, as the case may be. Any Indemnification Escrow Shares so retained in escrow with respect to such unresolved claims shall be distributed only in accordance with the terms of clauses (i) or (ii) of Section 3(a) hereof. (iii) Reductions for Assumed Convertible Security Forfeitures. In the event that, at the time that the Escrow Agent is to release any amounts of Indemnification Escrow Shares to the Buyer pursuant to this Section 3, holders of Assumed Convertible Securities would be required to forfeit an unexercised portion of any Escrow Assumed Convertible Securities pursuant to the terms of Section 1.11(f)(vi) of the Merger Agreement, the amounts of Indemnification Escrow Shares and cash or other property to be distributed to the Buyer pursuant to this Section 3 shall be reduced by the amount of such forfeiture, in accordance with the joint written instructions of the Buyer and the Representative. (iv) Reductions for Representative Fees. The Equity Holders, by operation of the Merger Agreement, the Company Stockholders, by the approval of the Merger Agreement and acceptance of the Merger Consideration, the holders of Options and, if applicable, Warrants, by executing amendments to such Options and Warrants pursuant to Section 1.11(e) of the Merger Agreement, the Principal Stockholders, by their execution of the Stockholder Agreement, and the Management Participants, by their execution of the Management Participant Agreement, shall each be deemed to agree and authorize the Escrow Agent to withhold such number of Indemnification Escrow Shares otherwise payable to the Equity Holders on the Initial Distribution Date or the Final Distribution Date that have a Value (as defined in Section 5 below) equal to the Representative Fees. (c) Method of Distribution. Any distribution of all or a portion of the Indemnification Escrow Shares (or cash or other property pursuant to Section 2(c) hereof) to Equity Holders shall be made by delivery of stock certificates issued in the name of such Equity Holders (or, in the case of cash or other property, in an amount) covering such percentage of the Indemnification Escrow Shares (or cash or other property) being distributed as is calculated in accordance with the percentages set forth opposite such holders' respective names on Attachment A hereto; provided, however, that the Escrow Agent shall withhold the distribution of the portion of the Indemnification Escrow Shares (or cash or other property) otherwise distributable to an Equity Holder who has not, according to a written notice provided by the Buyer to the Escrow Agent, prior to such distribution, surrendered pursuant to the terms of the Merger Agreement his, her or its stock certificates formerly representing shares of stock of the Company; and provided further that such Attachment A shall be appropriately revised by the Buyer to take into account additional deposits of Indemnification Escrow Shares with the Escrow Agent pursuant to Section 2(a) hereof. Any such withheld shares shall be delivered to the Buyer promptly after the next to occur of the Initial Distribution Date or the Final Distribution Date, and shall be delivered by the Buyer to the Exchange Agent to be delivered to the Equity Holders to whom such shares would have otherwise been distributed upon surrender of their Company stock certificates. Distributions to the Equity Holders shall be made by delivery of stock certificates to the Exchange Agent to be mailed to such holders at their respective addresses 33
shown on Attachment A (or such other address as may be provided in writing to the Escrow Agent by any such holder). No fractional Indemnification Escrow Shares shall be distributed to Equity Holders pursuant to this Agreement. Instead, the number of shares that each Equity Holder shall receive shall be rounded up or down to the nearest whole number (provided that the Representative shall have the authority to effect such rounding in such a manner that the total number of whole Indemnification Escrow Shares to be distributed equals the number of Indemnification Escrow Shares then being distributed). Section 26. Contribution by Holders of Convertible Securities. Pursuant to Section 1.11(f)(vi) of the Merger Agreement, Assumed Convertible Securities shall be amended to reduce the number of Buyer Common Shares subject to the unexercised portion of any Assumed Convertible Security by such Assumed Convertible Security's percentage share of any Damages subject to indemnification. Section 27. Valuation of Indemnification Escrow Shares. For purposes of this Agreement, the "Value" of any Indemnification Escrow Shares shall be fixed at a value of $12.50 per Indemnification Escrow Share (as such figure may be subject to equitable adjustment in the event of any stock split, stock dividend, reverse stock split or similar event affecting the Buyer Common Shares between the date hereof and the Effective Time). Section 28. Fees and Expenses of Escrow Agent. The Buyer shall (a) pay the fees of the Escrow Agent for the services to be rendered by the Escrow Agent hereunder, which are set forth on Attachment B hereto, and (b) reimburse the Escrow Agent for its reasonable expenses (including reasonable attorney's fees and expenses) incurred in connection with the performance of its duties under this Agreement. Section 29. Limitation of Escrow Agent's Liability. (a) Limitation on Liability. The Escrow Agent shall incur no liability with respect to any action taken or suffered by it in reliance upon any notice, direction, instruction, consent, statement or other documents believed by it to be genuine and duly authorized, nor for other action or inaction except its own bad faith, willful misconduct or gross negligence. The Escrow Agent shall not be responsible for the validity or sufficiency of this Agreement or any other agreement referred to herein. In all questions arising under the Escrow Agreement, the Escrow Agent may rely on the advice of counsel, and the Escrow Agent shall not be liable to anyone for anything done, omitted or suffered in good faith by the Escrow Agent based on such advice. The Escrow Agent shall not be required to take any action hereunder involving any expense unless the payment of such expense is made or provided for in a manner reasonably satisfactory to it. In no event shall the Escrow Agent be liable for indirect, punitive, special or consequential damages. (b) Indemnification. The Buyer agrees to indemnify the Escrow Agent for, and hold it harmless against, any loss, liability or expense incurred without bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the Escrow Agent, arising out of or in connection with its carrying out of its duties hereunder. Section 30. Representative. 34
(a) Authority. The Equity Holders, by operation of the Merger Agreement, the Company Stockholders, by the approval of the Merger Agreement and acceptance of the Merger Consideration, the holders of Options and, if applicable, Warrants, by executing amendments to such Options and Warrants pursuant to Section 1.11(e) of the Merger Agreement, the Principal Stockholders, by their execution of the Stockholder Agreement, and the Management Participants, by their execution of the Management Participant Agreement, shall each be deemed to have authorized the Representative (i) to make all decisions relating to the distribution of Indemnification Escrow Shares pursuant to Section 3 of this Agreement, (ii) to direct the Escrow Agent in writing as to the exercise of any voting rights pertaining to the Indemnification Escrow Shares pursuant to the terms and conditions set forth in Section 2(d) of this Agreement, (iii) to give and receive all notices required to be given under this Agreement, and (iv) to take any and all additional action as is contemplated or permitted by this Agreement to be taken by or on behalf of the Equity Holders. (b) Reliance by Escrow Agent. The Escrow Agent shall be able to rely conclusively on the instructions and decisions of the Representative as to the determination of the Net Asset Value and the Adjusted Base Purchase Price, the settlement of any claims for indemnification by the Buyer and/or the Surviving Corporation pursuant to Article VI or Article VIII of the Merger Agreement or any other actions required or contemplated or permitted to be taken by the Representative hereunder, and no party shall have any cause of action against the Escrow Agent for any action taken by the Escrow Agent in reliance upon the instructions or decisions of the Representative. (c) Successor Representatives. In the event that a successor Representative is appointed by the Equity Holders pursuant to Section 1.14(d) of the Merger Agreement, such successor Representative shall have all of the power, authority, rights and privileges conferred by this Agreement upon the original Representative, and the term "Representative" as used herein shall be deemed to include successor Representative. Section 31. Termination. This Agreement shall terminate upon the distribution by the Escrow Agent of all of the Indemnification Escrow Shares in accordance with this Agreement; provided that the provisions of Sections 7 and 8 shall survive such termination. Section 32. Successor Escrow Agent. In the event the Escrow Agent becomes unavailable or unwilling to continue in its capacity herewith, the Escrow Agent may resign and be discharged from its duties or obligations hereunder by delivering a resignation to the parties to this Escrow Agreement, not less than 60 days prior to the date when such resignation shall take effect. The Buyer may appoint a successor Escrow Agent without the consent of the Representative so long as such successor is a bank with assets of at least $500 million, and may appoint any other successor Escrow Agent with the consent of the Representative, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed. If, within such notice period, the Buyer provides to the Escrow Agent written instructions with respect to the appointment of a successor Escrow Agent and directions for the transfer of any Indemnification Escrow Shares then held by the Escrow Agent to such successor, the Escrow Agent shall act in accordance with such instructions and promptly transfer such Indemnification Escrow Shares to such designated successor. If no successor Escrow Agent is named as provided in this Section 10 prior to the 35
date on which the resignation of the Escrow Agent is to properly take effect, the Escrow Agent may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for appointment of a successor Escrow Agent. Section 33. General. (a) Entire Agreement. Except for those provisions of the Merger Agreement referenced herein, this Agreement constitutes the entire agreement among the parties and supersedes any prior understandings, agreements or representations by or among the parties, written or oral, with respect to the subject matter hereof. (b) Succession and Assignment. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties named herein and their respective successors and permitted assigns. (c) Counterparts and Facsimile Signature. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement may be executed by facsimile signature. (d) Headings. The section headings contained in this Agreement are inserted for convenience only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. (e) Notices. All notices, requests, demands, claims, and other communications hereunder shall be in writing. Any notice, request, demand, claim or other communication hereunder shall be deemed duly delivered two business days after it is sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, or one business day after it is sent for next business day delivery via a reputable nationwide overnight courier service, in each case to the intended recipient as set forth below: To the Buyer: With a copy to: Akamai Technologies, Inc. Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP 8 Cambridge Center 60 State Street Cambridge, MA 02142 Boston, MA 02109 Attn: Melanie Haratunian, Attn: Susan W. Murley Vice President and General Counsel Telecopy: (617) 526-5000 Telecopy: (617) 444-3001 Telephone: (617) 526-6000 Telephone: (617) 444-3000 To the Representative: With copies to: Thomas Cole Cooley Godward LLP as the Representative of the Equity Holders Five Palo Alto Square Trinity Ventures 3000 El Camino Real 3000 Sand Hill Road Palo Alto, CA 94306-2155 Building 4, Suite 160 Attention: Eric C. Jensen, Esq. Menlo Park, CA 94025 Telecopy: (650) 745-3929 36
Telecopy: (650-854-9501 Telephone: (650) 843-5049 Telephone: (650) 854-9500 Fenwick & West LLP Embarcadero Center West 275 Battery Street San Francisco, CA 94111 Attn: Robert B. Dellenbach Telecopy: (415) 281-1350 Telephone: (415) 875-2300 To the Escrow Agent: U.S. Bank National Association Corporate Trust Services 225 Asylum Street, 23rd Floor Hartford, CT 06103 Attention: Arthur Blakeslee Re: [insert name of escrow agreement] Telephone # (860) 241-6859 Any party may give any notice, instruction or other communication hereunder using any other means (including personal delivery, expedited courier, messenger service, telecopy, telex, ordinary mail or electronic mail), but no such notice, instruction or other communication shall be deemed to have been duly given unless and until it actually is received by the party to whom it is intended. Any party may change the address to which notices, instructions, or other communications hereunder are to be delivered by giving the other parties notice in the manner set forth in this Section. (f) Governing Law. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without giving effect to any choice or conflict of law provision or rule (whether of the State of Delaware or any other jurisdiction) that would cause the application of laws of any jurisdiction other than those of the State of Delaware. (g) Amendments and Waivers. This Agreement may be amended only with the written consent of the Buyer, the Escrow Agent and the Representative. No waiver of any right or remedy hereunder shall be valid unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the party giving such waiver. No waiver by any party with respect to any condition, default or breach of covenant hereunder shall be deemed to extend to any prior or subsequent condition, default or breach of covenant hereunder or affect in any way any rights arising by virtue of any prior or subsequent such occurrence. (h) Submission to Jurisdiction. Each Party (i) submits to the jurisdiction of any state or federal court sitting in the State of Delaware in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement (including any action or proceeding for the enforcement of any arbitral award made in connection with any arbitration of a Dispute hereunder), (ii) agrees that all claims in respect of such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in any such court, (iii) waives any claim of inconvenient forum or other challenge to venue in such court, (iv) 37
agrees not to bring any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any other court, and (v) waives any right it may have to a trial by jury with respect to any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement; provided in each case that, solely with respect to any arbitration of a Dispute, the Arbitrator shall resolve all threshold issues relating to the validity and applicability of the arbitration provisions of this Agreement, contract validity, applicability of statutes of limitations and issue preclusion, and such threshold issues shall not be heard or determined by such court. Each Party agrees to accept service of any summons, complaint or other initial pleading made in the manner provided for the giving of notices in Section 10(e), provided that nothing in this Section 10(h) shall affect the right of any Party to serve such summons, complaint or other initial pleading in any other manner permitted by law. 38
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year first above written. BUYER: AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: ____________________________________ Title: _________________________________ COMPANY: SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. By: ____________________________________ Title: _________________________________ ESCROW AGENT: U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, CORPORATE TRUST SERVICES By: ____________________________________ Name: __________________________________ Title: _________________________________ REPRESENTATIVE: THOMAS COLE By: ____________________________________ Title: _________________________________
EXHIBIT E CONTINGENT SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT AND PARTIAL RELEASE THIS CONTINGENT SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT AND PARTIAL RELEASE ("Agreement") is entered into on March 16, 2005 (the "Execution Date"), by and among Akamai Technologies, Inc., Ajit Gupta ("Gupta"), and Richard Day ("Day")(individually a "Party" and collectively, the "Parties"). RECITALS WHEREAS, disputes have arisen among the Parties, which in part are the subject of litigation titled Akamai Technologies, Inc. v. Speedera Networks, Inc. et al., Case No. CV 809217, in the Superior Court for the State of California, County of Santa Clara (the "Lawsuit"); and WHEREAS, Akamai Technologies, Inc. has entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated March 16, 2005 (the "Merger Agreement") with Speedera Networks, Inc. ("Speedera") pursuant to which Akamai has agreed to acquire Speedera as described therein (the "Transaction"); and WHEREAS, as between them only, and contingent upon the Closing as described below, the Parties desire to resolve amicably all of the issues arising out of or related to the Lawsuit according to the terms and conditions set forth below. THEREFORE, the terms and conditions set forth below, and other good and valuable consideration that have been received, the Parties agree as follows: - 40 -
1. STAY AND DISMISSAL OF LAWSUIT. Upon execution of the Merger Agreement, all activities as between the parties in the prosecution and/or defense of the Lawsuit shall be immediately suspended and the Parties shall cause their counsel to prepare and file, within two (2) business days following the Effective Date, a joint motion to indefinitely stay the Lawsuit. The motion shall identify the Merger Agreement, shall make a formal request for an Order vacating all currently scheduled dates, including but not limited to (a) the remaining dates related to the briefing and hearing on all pending discovery motions and Akamai's motion for summary adjudication, (b) all other pretrial dates, and (c) the April 18, 2005 trial date, and shall further require the parties to notify the Court upon either (i) any Termination of the Merger Agreement pursuant to Article 10, or (ii) any Closing of the Transaction pursuant to Article 1 of the Merger Agreement. The joint motion shall also request that any such stay be automatically lifted, five (5) business days after notice to the Court of any Termination of the Merger Agreement pursuant to Article 10 thereof. If the stay is lifted, the parties will request a new trial setting conference as soon as reasonably practicable, at which time the Court will set a new schedule for trial and pre-trial dates. The parties agree not to seek a trial date fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date the stay is lifted. Upon the Closing, Akamai shall prepare and cause to be filed a stipulation terminating the Lawsuit with a dismissal with prejudice as to each of Gupta and Day, and counsel for Gupta and Day will execute such stipulation. 2. RELEASE OF CLAIMS BY AKAMAI. Effective as of the Closing Date (as defined in the Merger Agreement), and except for (i) any dispute or breach relating to or arising out of this Agreement and, (ii) any dispute or breach relating to or arising out of the Merger Agreement, Akamai hereby releases and discharges each of Gupta and Day, as individuals, from any and all claims, demands, or suits, known or unknown, fixed or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated, including but not limited to any restitution in any civil or criminal proceeding, whether or not asserted in the Lawsuit, as of the Execution - 41 -
Date, arising from or related to any act or occurrence prior to the Execution Date (the "Akamai Released Claims"). For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to release Speedera with respect to any claim, suit or cause of action. With respect to the Akamai Released Claims, which shall only become effective upon any Closing, the Parties intend the release and discharge to remain in effect as a full and complete release, notwithstanding the discovery or existence of any additional or different facts or claims existing before the Execution Date. It is expressly understood and agreed that this Agreement is intended to and does cover not only all known facts or claims but also any facts or claims existing before the Execution Date, not now known or anticipated, and that may later be discovered. Akamai acknowledges its awareness of California Civil Code Section 1542 which reads as follows: "A general release does not extend to claims which the creditor does not know or suspect to exist in his favor at the time of executing the release which if known by him, must have materially affected his settlement with the debtor." With respect to the Akamai Released Claims only, Akamai intends to waive its rights under that section and any statute, rule, and legal doctrine similar to California Civil Code Section 1542 for all matters released in this Agreement. 3. RELEASE OF ALL CLAIMS BY GUPTA AND DAY. Effective as of the Closing Date Date, and except for (i) any dispute or breach relating to or arising out of this Agreement and (ii) any dispute or breach relating to or arising out of the Merger Agreement, each of Gupta and Day hereby release and discharge Akamai only and no third party (including Speedera) from any and all claims, demands, or suits, known or unknown, fixed or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated, whether or not asserted in the Lawsuit, as of the Execution Date, arising from or related to any act or occurrence prior to the Execution Date (the "Gupta/Day Released Claims"). For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed a release by Speedera with respect to any claim, suit or cause of action, nor shall anything herein be deemed a release by Gupta or Day of any claim - 42 -
they may have against Speedera or any claim preserved by Section 1 of the Management Participation Agreement (as defined in the Merger Agreement). With respect to the Gupta/Day Released Claims, which shall only become effective upon any Closing, the Parties intend the release and discharge to remain in effect as a full and complete release, notwithstanding the discovery or existence of any additional or different facts or claims existing before the Execution Date. It is expressly understood and agreed that this Agreement is intended to and does cover not only all known facts or claims but also any facts or claims existing before the Execution Date, not now known or anticipated, and that may later be discovered. Ajit Gupta and Richard Day each acknowledge his awareness of California Civil Code Section 1542 which reads as follows: "A general release does not extend to claims which the creditor does not know or suspect to exist in his favor at the time of executing the release which if known by him, must have materially affected his settlement with the debtor." As to the Gupta/Day Released Claims, Gupta and Day each intend to waive its rights under that section and any statute, rule, and legal doctrine similar to California Civil Code Section 1542 for all matters released in this Agreement. 4. DISCLAIMER OF LIABILITY. With respect to the subject matter hereof, the Parties acknowledge and agree that this Agreement is a compromise and settlement of disputed claims and in no way constitutes an admission of any liability or wrongdoing by any Party of any fault whatsoever or of any liability in connection with any matter or thing. This Agreement and the release set forth above shall be subject to California Rule of Evidence 1152, and to Federal Rule of Evidence 408, until the Closing Date as defined in the Merger Agreement. 5. RELEASE IS EXECUTED VOLUNTARILY. This Agreement is executed voluntarily by each of the Parties without any duress or undue influence on the part, or on behalf of, any - 43 -
of them. Each of the Parties represents and warrants to the others that it has read and fully understands the provisions of this Agreement and has relied on the independent advice and representations of counsel of their own choosing. 6. AUTHORITY. Each of the Parties represents and warrants to the others that it has the authority to enter into this Agreement. 7. JOINT DRAFTING OF RELEASE. Each of the Parties has had the opportunity to participate in the drafting and preparation of the final language of this Agreement and has been advised, or has had the opportunity to be advised, by their attorneys, regarding the terms, effects, and consequences of this Agreement. Accordingly, in any construction to be made of this Agreement, this Agreement shall not be construed as having been drafted solely by or on behalf of any one or more of each of the Parties. The Agreement shall be construed neutrally and not applied in favor of or against any particular Party. 8. EXECUTION OF DOCUMENTS. Each Party to this Agreement will execute and deliver to the other Party all documents and do such further acts as may be reasonably requested as necessary to accomplish the purpose of this Agreement. 9. AMENDMENTS. This Agreement may be amended only by an agreement in writing signed by each of the Parties. No waiver of any provision nor consent to any exception to the terms of this Agreement shall be effective unless in writing and signed by the Parties to be bound, and then only for the specific purpose, extent, and instance so provided. Failure by any one of the Parties to enforce any rights under this Agreement shall not be construed as a waiver of such rights. Failure by any one of the Parties to complain of any act or failure to act of another Party or to declare another party in default or otherwise - 44 -
enforce any rights under this Agreement, irrespective of how long such failure continues, shall not constitute a waiver by such Party of its rights. 10. NO ASSIGNMENT OF CLAIMS. Each Party hereby represents and warrants to the others that no claim that any Party has or may have against any other and which claim is covered by this Agreement has been assigned or transferred, and agrees to indemnify and hold the other harmless from and against any liabilities, claims, demands, damages, costs, expenses, and attorney fees incurred as a result of any person or entity asserting any such assignment or transfer. 11. HEADINGS. Section and paragraph headings contained in this Agreement are for convenience and shall not be considered for any purpose in construing this Agreement. 12. SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS. This Agreement is personal to the Parties. With respect to each of Gupta and Day, this Agreement is for their personal benefit only and may not be relied upon or asserted by Speedera or any other entity for any reason whatsoever. Except as otherwise provided herein, this Agreement shall bind and inure to the benefit of the Parties and their respective successors, assigns, administrators, and trustees. For the avoidance of doubt, neither Speedera nor any other entity is a third party beneficiary of this Agreement. 13. INTEGRATION AND MUTUAL REPRESENTATIONS. This document, including the attached exhibits, constitutes the entire agreement and understanding between the Parties concerning the settlement and dismissal of the Lawsuit and shall supersede all communications, oral or written, between or among the Parties on or before the date of this Agreement relating to its subject matter or terms. This is a fully integrated agreement. - 45 -
14. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Agreement is effective on the date that the Agreement has been executed by all the Parties. It is understood, however, that this Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but which, when taken together, shall constitute one and the same Agreement. 15. ADMISSIBILITY. This Agreement is admissible in court only to support any motion or other action to enforce this Agreement, or any other Agreements between the Parties. 16. CONFIDENTIALITY. The terms of this Agreement shall be treated as confidential by the Parties and shall not be disclosed to any third party (other than to the extent required by law or regulation or government officials related to any potential regulatory oversight or criminal investigation) absent the written consent of the other Parties. Auditors, attorneys, accountants and consultants retained by the Parties in the course of business, and others with a need to know, may have access to the terms of this Agreement, conditioned on their agreement to keep the terms of this Agreement that are disclosed to them confidential. Upon the Closing Date (as defined in the Merger Agreement) , the Stipulated Protective Order entered in the Lawsuit will remain in effect pursuant to its terms, and each Parties' documents subject to such Order obtained by another Party will be treated in accordance with the terms of the Stipulated Protective Order. The Parties agree that either may seek equitable relief, whether in the form of injunctive relief, specific performance, or otherwise, either separately or in conjunction with money damages, to preserve the confidentiality of this Agreement. 17. GOVERNING LAW. This Agreement is made and entered into in the State of California and shall be interpreted, applied and enforced under and pursuant to the laws of the State of California, without regard to any conflicts of laws principles. - 46 -
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, this Agreement has been executed by the undersigned. Dated: ___, 2005 Akamai Technologies, Inc. By: ________________________________ Name: ______________________________ Title: _____________________________ Dated: ___, 2005 Ajit Gupta By: ________________________________ Dated: ___, 2005 Richard Day By: ________________________________ - 47 -
EXHIBIT F _____ ___, 2005 Akamai Technologies, Inc. 8 Cambridge Center Cambridge, MA 02142 Ladies and Gentlemen: We have acted as counsel to Speedera Networks, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") in connection with the merger of Aquarius Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation ("Merger Sub") and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Parent"), with and into the Company, in a reverse triangular merger pursuant to the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of March 16, 2005 by and among Parent, Merger Sub, the Company, and Thomas Cole, the Representative of the Equity Holders (each as defined therein) (the "Plan of Merger"). This opinion is furnished to you pursuant to Section 5.1(n) of the Plan of Merger. Unless otherwise indicated in this letter that includes Attachment A hereto, all capitalized terms used herein have the meanings given to those terms in the Plan of Merger. In order to render this opinion we have examined such questions of law as we deem advisable under the circumstances. As to questions of fact, we have relied solely upon our examination of the documents described on Attachment A (the "Reviewed Documents") and our actual knowledge. We have not examined any document other than those described on Attachment A or made any other independent factual investigation. Except as described on Attachment A, we have not caused the search of any docket of any court, tribunal, agency or similar authority or any other record of any governmental agency or third party. In our examination of the Reviewed Documents for purposes of rendering this opinion, we have relied upon and assumed, and express no opinion as to, the current accuracy and completeness of (a) the information obtained from public officials and records and reports of professional filing service companies included in the Reviewed Documents referred to on Attachment A, (b) the representations and warranties of the Company as set forth in the Plan of Merger and the Closing Documents, and (c) the representations and warranties made by representatives of the Company to us, including without limitation, those set forth in the Management Certificate. We have also assumed that all the representations and warranties made by Parent, Merger Sub, the Company, the Representative, the Principal Stockholders and the Management Participants in, or pursuant to, any Transactional Agreements and Closing - 48 -
Documents to which Parent, Merger Sub, the Company, the Representative, any Principal Stockholder or any Management Participant is a party, are true and complete in all material respects. However, the representations and warranties of the Company upon which we have relied are limited to factual matters when those representations and warranties cover the same subject matter as any of the opinions rendered herein. We have made no attempt to verify the accuracy of any of such information, representations or warranties or to determine the existence or non-existence of any other factual matters other than those described above. In our examination of the Reviewed Documents and in rendering this opinion, we have relied upon and assumed, and express no opinion as to, (a) the genuineness of all signatures on original documents, (b) the authenticity and completeness of all documents submitted to us as originals, (c) the conformity to originals and completeness of all documents submitted to us as copies, (d) the lack of any undisclosed termination, modification, waiver or amendment to any document reviewed by us, (e) the legal competence or capacity of all persons or entities executing the same (other than the Company with respect to the Company's competence or capacity to enter into and perform the Plan of Merger, the Transactional Agreements and Closing Documents), and (f) (except with respect to due authorization, execution and delivery of the Transactional Agreements by the Company) the due authorization, execution and delivery of all documents where due authorization, execution and delivery are prerequisites to the effectiveness thereof. For the purposes of this opinion, we are assuming that: (a) each party to the Plan of Merger, other than the Company, has all requisite power and authority, and has taken any and all corporate or other action necessary, for the due authorization by such party to execute, deliver and perform by such person of all such party's obligations thereunder; (b) each party to the Plan of Merger, other than the Company, has fully performed all the obligations that such person is to perform at or before the Effective Time; (c) all the representations and warranties made by each party to the Plan of Merger, other than the Company, in, or pursuant to, the Plan of Merger are true and complete in all material respects; and (d) the Transactional Agreements are duly enforceable in accordance with their respective terms against, and constitute the legal, valid and binding obligations of each party to the Plan of Merger, other than the Company. As used in this opinion, the phrases "our actual knowledge," "to our knowledge," "we are not aware," "known to us" or words of similar import refer only to the actual knowledge of the attorneys currently in this firm who have regularly rendered legal services to the Company or otherwise rendered substantive attention to the transactions contemplated by the Plan of Merger. No inference as to our knowledge of any matters bearing on the accuracy of any such statement should be drawn from the fact of our representation of the Company. Where statements in this opinion regarding an effect on, or matters relating to the Company, are qualified by the term "material" or as having or not having a "Company Material Adverse Effect" on the Company, those statements involve judgments and opinions as to the materiality or lack of materiality of any matter to the Company's business, assets or financial condition, taken as a whole, which are entirely those of the Company and its officers, after having been advised by us as to the legal effect and consequences of such matters. - 49 -
We do not assume any responsibility for the accuracy, completeness or fairness of any information, including, but not limited to, financial information, furnished to the Parent and Merger Sub by the Company concerning the business or affairs of the Company or any other information of a factual nature furnished to the Parent and Merger Sub by the Company or any of their respective agents or representatives. In rendering the opinion expressed in paragraph 1 below, regarding the good standing and valid existence of the Company, we have relied solely on the certification of the Company's good standing set forth in the Certificates of Good Standing described in Attachment A. As to the enforceability of the Plan of Merger and each of the other documents referred to in paragraph 3 below (collectively, the "Agreements") and to the lack of conflicts with Material Contracts specified in paragraph 4 below or violation of any order, writ, injunction, decree, statute, rule or regulation as set forth in paragraph 4 below, this opinion is qualified by, and we render no opinion with respect to, the effect of the following: (a) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium and other similar laws relating to or affecting the relief of debtors or the rights and remedies of creditors generally, including without limitation the effect of statutory or other law regarding fraudulent conveyances, preferential transfers and equitable subordination; (b) general principles of equity, including but not limited to judicial decisions holding that certain provisions are unenforceable when their enforcement would violate the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing, or would be commercially unreasonable or involve undue delay, whether or not such principles or decisions have been codified by statute; (c) Section 1670.5 of the California Civil Code or any other California or United States federal law or provision of the Delaware General Corporation Law or equitable principle which provides that a court may refuse to enforce, or may limit the application of, a contract or any clause thereof that the court finds to have been unconscionable at the time it was made, unconscionable in performance or contrary to public policy; Section 34. (d) any provision of any Agreement purporting to (i) exclude conflict of law principles under any law or (ii) select certain courts as the venue, or establish a particular jurisdiction as the forum, for the adjudication of any controversy; Section 35. (e) judicial decisions, that may permit the introduction of extrinsic evidence to modify the terms or the interpretation of the Agreements; Section 36. (f) any United States federal or other antitrust laws, statutes, rules or regulations, including without limitation the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, or other laws relating to collusive or unfair trade practices or designed to promote competition in any jurisdiction; (g) the tax or accounting consequences of the Merger and of any transaction contemplated in connection therewith under applicable tax laws and regulations and - 50 -
under applicable accounting rules, regulations, releases, statements, interpretations or technical bulletins; Section 37. (h) applicable antifraud statutes, rules or regulations of United States federal or applicable state laws concerning the issuance or sale of securities, including, without limitation, (i) the accuracy and completeness of the information provided by the Company to the Purchasers in connection with the offer and sale of the Shares, and (ii) the accuracy or fairness of the past, present or future fair market value of any securities; (i) the effect any breach of the fiduciary duties of the members of the Company's Board of Directors, officers or principal stockholders would have on the enforceability, authorization and performance of any Agreement; (j) any provision of any Agreement purporting to waive rights to trial by jury, service of process or objections to the laying of venue or forum in connection with any litigation arising out of or pertaining to the Agreements; (k) public policy limitations on the right to indemnification or public policy limitations on the enforceability of the indemnification provisions of Article VI and Article VIII of the Plan of Merger; and Section 38. (l) any provisions in the Agreements concerning the voting of the Company's capital stock or any drag-along provision, including without limitation those provisions set forth in Section 4.3(e) of the Plan of Merger, due to (i) the application of equitable principles in connection with any remedy sought to enforce such provisions, irrespective of whether the remedies sought are legal or equitable in nature, (ii) the application of general legal principles requiring that waivers of rights be knowing and intelligent, and with knowledge of consequences of the waiver, and (iii) conflict with the provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law that set forth the requirements to take valid stockholder action and indicate the effect thereof. With respect to our opinions in paragraph 4 below, we render no opinion as to the effect of SQL Solutions, Inc. v. Oracle Corporation, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21097 (N.D. Cal. 1991) on the assignability of contracts, nor with respect to any contract of the Company that (a) either (i) contains a provision granting rights that are by their express terms nonassignable or nontransferable, or (ii) contains a provision prohibiting or restricting the assignment or transfer of such agreement or rights or obligations thereunder without the prior consent of the other party to such agreement, but (b) does not specify whether a merger, transfer by operation of law, change of control or sale of substantially all assets constitutes such an assignment or transfer. With respect to our opinion in paragraph 4 below as to required notices and filings, our opinion excludes, and we render no opinion with respect to notice and filing requirements in, any jurisdiction other than the federal courts and agencies of the United States, the State of California or that might be required under the Delaware General Corporation Law. In rendering the opinions set forth in paragraphs 5 and 6 below relating to the capitalization of the Company, we have relied without further investigation on (a) the Certificate - 51 -
of Incorporation, (b) the Minute Book Contents containing the Bylaws and meetings and written actions of the incorporator(s), Board of Directors and stockholders of the Company, (c) the Stockholder List and (d) statements in the Management Certificate relating to the Company's capitalization (collectively, the "Capitalization Records"). The Company has represented to us that the Capitalization Records accurately describe all of the issuances of shares of the Company's capital stock and of any options, warrants or other rights to purchase such capital stock. Although we have no knowledge that the information as to the number and type of issued and outstanding securities of the Company in paragraphs 5 and 6 is incorrect, we are not in a position to verify its accuracy or completeness. Accordingly, our opinion on the number and type of issued and outstanding securities means that, based upon the examination referred to above, the Capitalization Records are not inconsistent with the information as to the number and type of outstanding stock, options, warrants, conversion privileges or other rights that is set forth in paragraphs 5 and 6. We are admitted to practice law in the State of California, and we express no opinion herein with respect to the application or effect of the laws of any jurisdiction other than the existing laws of the State of California, the existing Delaware General Corporation Law (as set forth in standard statutory compilations and without reference to case law or secondary sources) and the existing federal laws of the United States of America. With respect to the Plan of Merger, we express no opinion as to whether the laws of any particular jurisdiction apply to the Plan of Merger, and whether the laws of any jurisdiction other than those identified above are applicable to the subject matter thereof, regardless of any choice of law provision that names another jurisdiction's law as the governing law. Our opinions assume, with your permission and without expression of any opinion thereon, that the internal laws of the State of California as applied to contracts made between California residents present in California when such a contract was entered into (without regard to laws regarding choice of law or conflict of laws) exclusively apply to and govern the Plan of Merger, regardless of the respective choice of law provisions thereof. We disclaim any opinion as to any statute, rule, regulation, ordinance, order or other promulgation of any regional or local governmental body. Our opinion is limited to such California State and United States federal orders, writs, injunctions, decrees, statutes, rules or regulations and provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law as in our experience are of general application to transactions of the sort provided for in the Plan of Merger. To the extent that any of the Material Contracts are governed by the laws of any jurisdiction other than the State of California, the United States federal law or the Delaware General Corporation Law as described above, our opinion relating to those documents is based solely upon the apparent meaning of the language, without regard to interpretation or construction that might be indicated by the laws governing those agreements. In accordance with Section 95 of the American Law Institute's Restatement (Third) of the Law Governing Lawyers (2000), this opinion letter is to be interpreted in accordance with the customary practices of lawyers rendering opinions to third parties in transactions of the type provided for in the Plan of Merger. - 52 -
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the assumptions, qualifications, limitations and exceptions contained or referred to herein and except as may be otherwise set forth or disclosed in the Plan of Merger and the exhibits and attachments thereto, including but not limited to the Company's Disclosure Schedule, the following are our opinions as of immediately prior to the Effective Time. 1. The Company is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware. The Company is duly qualified to transact business and is in good standing in each of the states of California, _______ and _______. 2. The Company has the requisite corporate power and corporate authority to conduct the business in which, to our knowledge, it is currently engaged, to execute and deliver the Transaction Documents and to perform its obligations thereunder. 3. The execution and delivery by the Company of the Plan of Merger and the performance by the Company of the Transaction Documents and the consummation by the Company of the transactions provided for therein have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company's Board of Directors and stockholders. The Plan of Merger has been duly and validly executed and delivered by the Company to the parties thereto and constitutes a valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company by you in accordance with the terms of the Plan of Merger. 4. Neither the execution and delivery by the Company of the Plan of Merger nor the consummation by the Company of the transactions provided for therein (a) conflicts with or violates any provision of the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws, (b) requires on the part of the Company any notice to or filing with, or any permit, authorization, consent or approval of, any United States federal or California State Governmental Entity, or pursuant to the DGCL to any entity administering such laws, which has not been filed or obtained, (c) results in a breach of, constitutes (with or without due notice or lapse of time or both) a default under, results in the acceleration of obligations under, creates in any party the right to accelerate, terminate, modify or cancel, or requires any notice, consent or waiver under, any of the Listed Contracts that have not been obtained, made or waived, or (e) violates any United States federal or California State law, statute, rule or regulation applicable to the Company or any of its properties or assets or any - 53 -
order, writ, injunction or decree known to us specifically naming the Company or any of its properties or assets. 5. The authorized capital stock of the Company consists of 400,000,000 shares of Common Stock, of which [38,549,773] shares are issued and outstanding, 7,523,366 shares of Series A Preferred Stock, of which [7,433,330] are issued and outstanding, 122,463,448 shares of Series B Preferred Stock, of which [110,189,329] are issued and outstanding, 92,837,391 shares of Series C Preferred Stock, of which [86,866,934] are issued and outstanding. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable, are held of record by the Company Stockholders as set on Schedule __ to the Merger Agreement, and are free of all preemptive rights imposed by law or contained in the Certificate of Incorporation or Bylaws. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company were issued in compliance with the registration requirements (or valid exemptions therefrom) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. 6. To our knowledge, (a) there is no authorized or outstanding subscription, warrant, option, convertible security or other right (contingent or otherwise) to purchase or acquire any shares of capital stock of the Company from the Company, (b) the Company has no obligation (contingent or otherwise) to issue any subscription, warrant, option, convertible security or other such right, or, except as provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, to issue or distribute to holders of any shares of its capital stock any evidences of indebtedness or assets of the Company, and (c) the Company has no obligation (contingent or otherwise), except as provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, to purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Company Shares or any interest therein or to pay any dividend or to make any other distribution in respect thereof. 7. All authorizations, consents and approvals of all U.S. federal and California State governmental agencies and authorities required to be obtained by the Company to consummate the transactions provided for in the Plan of Merger have been obtained. - 54 -
8. Upon the filing by the Surviving Corporation of the Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, the Merger will be effective under the Delaware General Corporation Law. (i) In addition to the foregoing, we supplementally inform you that, to our knowledge and except as set forth on the Disclosure Schedule, there is no action, suit or proceeding, or governmental inquiry or investigation, pending or overtly threatened against the Company that (a) if determined adversely to the Company, would reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company or (b) questions the validity of the Plan of Merger or the right of the Company to enter into the Plan of Merger or consummate the transactions provided for therein. Please note that we have not conducted a docket search in any jurisdiction with respect to litigation that may be pending against the Company or any of their affiliates, officers or directors, nor, other than to request the Management Certificate from the Company, have we undertaken any further inquiry whatsoever in connection with the existence any such action, suit, proceeding or investigation. In rendering the opinions above, we are opining only as to the specific legal issues expressly set forth herein, and no opinion shall be inferred as to other matters. This opinion is intended solely for Parent's use for the purpose of the above transaction, and is not to be made available to or relied upon for any other purpose or by, any other person or entity, without our prior written consent. We assume no obligation to advise you of any fact, circumstance, event or change in the law or the facts that may hereafter be brought to our attention whether or not such occurrence would affect or modify the opinions expressed herein. Very truly yours, FENWICK & WEST LLP By: _________________________________ Robert B. Dellenbach, a Partner - 55 -
EXHIBIT G FORM OF OPINION OF COUNSEL TO THE INDIA SUBSIDIARY 1. Speedera Networks India Private Limited (the "Company") is a limited corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the Republic of India. The Company is duly qualified to transact business and is in good standing in each of ___, ___ and _____. 2. The Company has all requisite corporate power and authority to conduct the business in which, to our knowledge, it is currently engaged. 3. The Company has an authorized share capital of India Rs. __________ comprising __________ equity shares of Indian Rs. ___ each. The issued and paid up share capital of the Company is India Rs. __________ comprising __________ equity shares of India Rs. __ each. All of the issued and outstanding shares of the Company are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable and are held of record by Speedera Networks, Inc. and Abhey Dubey and are free of all preemptive rights imposed by law or contained in the Company's charter or bylaws, [including its Memorandum and/or Articles of Association.] To our knowledge, there are no outstanding or authorized options, warrants, rights, contracts, calls, puts, rights to subscribe, conversion rights or other agreements or commitments to which the Company is a party or which are binding upon the Company providing for the issuance or redemption of any of its share capital. 4. The consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated March 16, 2005, by and among Akamai Technologies, Inc., Aquarius Acquisition Corp., Speedera Networks, Inc. and The Representatives (as defined herein) (the "Merger Agreement") does not (a) conflict with or violate any provision of the Company's charter or bylaws, [including its Memorandum and/or Articles of Association.], (b) require on the part of the Company any notice to or filing with, or any permit, authorization, consent or approval of, any India or governmental entity, which has not been filed or obtained, or (c) violate any law, statute, rule or regulation applicable to the Company or any of its properties or assets or any order, writ, injunction or decree known to us specifically naming the Company or any of its properties or assets. 5. To our knowledge, the Company is not (i) subject to any unsatisfied judgment, order, decree, stipulation or injunction, and is not (ii) a party to or threatened to be made a party to any claim, complaint, action, suit, proceeding, hearing or investigation of or in any court or administrative agency of any Indian, foreign, regional, state, provincial or local jurisdiction or before any arbitrator. 6. All authorizations, consents and approvals of all India governmental agencies and authorities required in order to permit consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Merger Agreement have been obtained. - 56 -
EXHIBIT H OPINION OF COUNSEL TO BUYER AND THE TRANSITORY SUBSIDIARY _____________, 2005 Speedera Networks, Inc. 4800 Great America Parkway Santa Clara, CA 95054 Re: Agreement and Plan of Merger Ladies and Gentlemen: This opinion is being furnished pursuant to Section 5.2(h) of the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of March 16, 2005 (the "Agreement") among Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Buyer"), Aquarius Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Buyer (the "Transitory Subsidiary"), and Speedera Networks, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"). Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed to them in the Agreement. We have acted as counsel to the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary in connection with the preparation, execution and delivery of the Agreement. As such counsel, we have examined and are familiar with and have relied upon the following documents: 1. the Agreement and the Escrow Agreement; 2. the Certificate of Incorporation and the By-laws of the Buyer and of the Transitory Subsidiary; 3. a certificate, dated as of ___________, 2005, of the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, certifying as to the continued legal existence and corporate good standing of the Buyer in Delaware (the "Buyer Domestic Certificate"); 4. a certificate, dated as of ___________, 2005, of the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, certifying as to the continued legal existence and corporate good standing of the Transitory Subsidiary in Delaware (the "Transitory Subsidiary Domestic Certificate"); 5. an Officer's Certificate from the Buyer, dated as of the date hereof, attesting to the Buyer's Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws, certain resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors of the Buyer, the incumbency of certain officers of the Buyer and certain other matters; - 57 -
6. an Officer's Certificate from the Buyer, dated as of the date hereof, attesting to the Transitory Subsidiary's Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws, certain resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors and stockholder of the Transitory Subsidiary, the incumbency of certain officers of the Transitory Subsidiary and certain other matters; and 7. such other records of meetings, documents, instruments and certificates (including but not limited to certificates of public officials and officers of the Buyer and of the Transitory Subsidiary) as we have considered necessary for purposes of this opinion. In our examination of the documents described above, we have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the legal capacity of all individual signatories, the completeness of all corporate and stock records provided to us, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the conformity to original documents of all documents submitted to us as copies, and the authenticity of the originals of such latter documents. In rendering this opinion, we have relied, as to all questions of fact material to this opinion, upon certificates of public officials and officers of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary and, with your permission, upon the representations and warranties made by the Company, the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary in the Agreement. We have not attempted to verify independently such facts. We have not conducted a search of any electronic databases or the dockets of any court, administrative or regulatory body, agency or other filing office in any jurisdiction. For purposes of this opinion, we have assumed that the Agreement and the Escrow Agreement have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by all parties thereto other than the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary, and that such other parties have all requisite power and authority to effect the transactions contemplated by the Agreement and the Escrow Agreement. We have also assumed that the Agreement and the Escrow Agreement are the valid and binding obligations of all parties thereto other than the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary and are enforceable against such other parties in accordance with their respective terms. We do not render any opinion as to the application of any federal or state law or regulation to the power, authority or competence of such other parties. Our opinions set forth below are qualified to the extent that they may be subject to or affected by (i) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent conveyance or similar laws relating to or affecting the rights of creditors generally, (ii) statutory or decisional law concerning recourse by creditors to security in the absence of notice or hearing, (iii) duties and standards imposed on creditors and parties to contracts, including, without limitation, requirements of good faith, reasonableness and fair dealing, and (iv) general equitable principles. We express no opinion as to the availability of any equitable or specific remedy upon any breach of any of the agreements as to which we are opining herein, or any of the agreements, documents or obligations referred to therein, or to the successful assertion of any equitable defenses, inasmuch as the availability of such remedies or the success of any such defenses may be subject to the discretion of a court. - 58 -
We also express no opinion herein as to any provision of any agreement (a) which may be deemed to or construed to waive any right of the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary, (b) to the effect that rights and remedies are not exclusive, that every right or remedy is cumulative and may be exercised in addition to or with any other right or remedy and does not preclude recourse to one or more other rights or remedies, (c) relating to the effect of invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of the Agreement on the validity or enforceability of any other provision thereof, (d) requiring the payment of penalties, consequential damages or liquidated damages, (e) which is in violation of public policy, including, without limitation, any provision [relating to non-competition and non-solicitation or] relating to indemnification and contribution with respect to securities law matters, (f) purporting to indemnify any person against his, her or its own negligence or intentional misconduct, (g) which provides that the terms of the Agreement may not be waived or modified except in writing or (h) relating to choice of law or consent to jurisdiction. We are expressing no opinion herein as to the consequences of the Merger under applicable state, local or federal income tax laws and regulations. We are expressing no opinion herein with respect to compliance by the Buyer with state or federal antitrust or unfair competition laws, state or federal securities or "blue sky" laws, state or federal securities antifraud laws. Our opinions expressed in paragraph 1 below are based solely on the Buyer Domestic Certificate and the Transitory Subsidiary Domestic Certificate and are limited accordingly, and, as to such matters, our opinions are rendered as of the date of such certificates. We express no opinion as to the tax good standing of the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary in any jurisdiction. We are opining herein solely as to the state laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, the Delaware General Corporation Law statute and the federal laws of the United States of America. To the extent that any other laws govern any of the matters as to which we are opining below, we have assumed, with your permission and without independent investigation, that such laws are identical to the state laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, and we express no opinion as to whether such assumption is reasonable or correct. We note that the Agreement states that it is governed by Delaware law. For purposes of our opinions rendered below, we have assumed that the facts and law governing the future performance by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary of their obligations under the Agreement will be identical to the facts and law governing their performance on the date of this opinion. Based on and subject to the foregoing, we are of the opinion that: Section 39. Each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware. Section 40. Each of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary has all requisite corporate power and authority to conduct the business in which, to our knowledge, it is currently engaged, to execute and deliver the Agreement and (in the case of the Buyer) the Escrow Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated thereby. - 59 -
Section 41. All of the Merger Shares will be, when issued in accordance with the Agreement, duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable. Section 42. The execution and delivery by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary of the Agreement and (in the case of the Buyer) the Escrow Agreement and the consummation by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary of the transactions contemplated thereby have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate and stockholder action on the part of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary, respectively. The Agreement and (in the case of the Buyer) the Escrow Agreement have been duly and validly executed and delivered by the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary and constitute valid and binding obligations of the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary, enforceable against the Buyer and the Transitory Subsidiary in accordance with their respective terms. Section 43. Except as set forth in the Agreement, neither the execution and delivery by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary of the Agreement or (in the case of the Buyer) the Escrow Agreement, nor the consummation by the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary of the transactions contemplated thereby violates the provisions of any U.S. federal or Massachusetts state law, rule or regulation applicable to the Buyer or the Transitory Subsidiary or the Delaware General Corporation Law statute. Section 44. Upon the filing by the Surviving Corporation of the Certificate of Merger with the Secretary of State of Delaware, the Merger will be effective under the Delaware General Corporation law statute. This opinion is provided to the Company as a legal opinion only and not as a guaranty or warranty of the matters discussed herein. This opinion is based upon currently existing statutes, rules, regulations and judicial decisions and is rendered as of the date hereof, and we disclaim any obligation to advise you of any change in any of the foregoing sources of law or subsequent developments in law or changes in facts or circumstances which might affect any matters or opinions set forth herein. This opinion is rendered only to the Company and is solely for the benefit of the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated by the Agreement. This opinion may not be relied upon by the Company for any other purpose, nor may this opinion be provided to, quoted to or relied upon by any other person or entity for any purpose, without our prior written consent. Very truly yours, WILMER CUTLER PICKERING HALE AND DORR LLP By: ____________________________________ Susan Murley, a Partner - 60 -

 
EXHIBIT 99.2
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced it has completed its acquisition of Speedera Networks, Inc., a privately held company based in Santa Clara, California. Akamai announced a definitive agreement on March 16, 2005 to acquire Speedera in a stock-for-stock transaction.
CAMBRIDGE, MA
June 13, 2005
Akamai and Speedera provide businesses with a cost-effective, distributed platform for accessing Web computing and capacity on demand worldwide without having to make significant upfront investments in infrastructure. The acquisition will provide customers with a broader suite of services available on the world's largest, high-performance distributed computing platform for the delivery and acceleration of Web content and applications.
"We are excited about completing our acquisition of Speedera because it will enable us to expand our business through significant customer acquisition and the introduction of additional value-added services designed to make our customers' Internet initiatives more reliable, more scalable and more cost-effective," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We are delighted to start working with a talented group of new employees who are joining us. In addition to the contribution of Speedera's U.S.-based team, the company's strong presence in Bangalore provides us an opportunity to establish operations in India."
Under the terms of the agreement, Akamai has acquired all of the outstanding common stock, preferred stock, and vested and unvested stock options of Speedera and its India-based, wholly-owned subsidiary by issuing approximately 12 million shares of Akamai common stock. The transaction is designed to be effected as a tax-free reorganization for Speedera stockholders and will be accounted for by Akamai under the purchase method of accounting.
Akamai expects to provide an update on its integration with Speedera during its second quarter 2005 financial call on July 26.
th
 
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,300 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com.
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, difficult in integrating Speedera's operations with Akamai's, changes in tax laws or interpretations of existing tax laws, failure of Akamai's network infrastructure and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050726160159.txt.gz
TIME:20050726160159
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On July 26, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2005. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
     (c) Exhibits
          The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
- - Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2005.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
July 26, 2005
Revenue for the second quarter 2005 was $64.6 million, an 8 percent increase over first quarter 2005 revenue of $60.1 million, and a 27 percent increase over second quarter 2004 revenue of $50.8 million.
Akamai's second quarter consolidated financial results include 20 days of activity from Speedera Networks, Inc. following the closing of Akamai's acquisition of Speedera on June 10. Speedera contributed $2.5 million of revenue during the quarter.
th
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, increased in the second quarter of 2005 to $15.9 million, or $0.11 per diluted share, a 13 percent increase over first quarter 2005 GAAP net income of $14.1 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, and a significant improvement over 2004 second quarter earnings per diluted share of $0.05 per share.
"Excellent performance across our business in the second quarter helped to drive our record top-line results and profitability," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "In addition, we already are seeing benefits from the Speedera acquisition, and expect further improvements as we work to expand our client base and service offerings."
 
The Company generated normalized net income* of $17.1 million, or $0.12 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2005. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the second quarter of 2005 was $22.7 million, up 11 percent compared to $20.4 million in the prior quarter, and up 28 percent compared to $17.7 million in the second quarter of 2004. Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenue was 35 percent, up from 34 percent in the prior quarter, and consistent with second quarter 2004. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $14.7 million in the second quarter, including costs associated with the acquisition, as compared to first quarter 2005 cash from operations of $18.7 million. On a year-to-date basis, cash from operations was $33.4 million, as compared to $21.1 million in the first six months of 2004.
At June 30, 2005, the Company had approximately 138.8 million shares of common stock outstanding, and had approximately $130.7 million of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities, including $4.5 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities resulting from the Speedera acquisition.
Excluding any customers that were acquired from Speedera, Akamai added 71 net new customers under long-term services contracts during the second quarter 2005. The Speedera acquisition resulted in an additional 305 recurring revenue customers, bringing Akamai's total number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the second quarter to 1,736.
Customers
"We are benefiting from the increased adoption of our platform by leading enterprises and government agencies that need to make mission-critical applications predictable, scalable and secure," continued Sagan. "We believe that, in the near term, growth will continue in such markets as online commerce, electronic software and media delivery, manufacturing, travel and hospitality, news and information portals, and the public sector."
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 25 percent and 21 percent, respectively, of revenue for the second quarter of 2005.
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 7069997.
Quarterly Conference Call
www.akamai.com
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,700 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and
About Akamai
 
have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
* Includes depreciation (see supplemental tables for figures)
 
* Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, and loss on early extinguishment of debt.
 
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures. Because Adjusted EBITDA eliminates these items, Akamai considers this financial measure to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statement of cash flows in the Company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and our expectations concerning the acquisition of Speedera. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, failure to realize our expectations with respect to the acquisition of Speedera, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, inability to service and repay our outstanding debt and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050727170042.txt.gz
TIME:20050727170042
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On July 21, 2005, the Compensation Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") granted options with incentive-based vesting acceleration provisions to Akamai employees including the following executive officers: Lisa Arthur, George Conrades, Melanie Haratunian, Robert Hughes, Paul Sagan and Chris Schoettle. The options have the following base vesting schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the date of grant and the remaining 75% vest in equal quarterly installments of 6.25% thereafter. In addition, vesting shall accelerate, in whole or in part, for then-unvested options if Akamai achieves enumerated revenue and earnings per share objectives before or during the fiscal year ending December 31, 2007. The terms of the option agreements are more fully described in the form of incentive stock option agreement attached hereto, and incorporated by reference herein, as Exhibit 99.1 (the "Form Agreement").
     In addition, on July 1, 2005, the Compensation Committee approved a compensation package for the Executive Chairman of the Board of Directors, George Conrades. The Executive Chairman shall be paid the following annual compensation: $20,000 in cash and $180,000 in deferred stock units (with the number of units issued based on the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock on the date of grant).
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
1. .
Grant of Option
     This Incentive Stock Option Agreement (this "Agreement") evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), on Grant_Date (the "Grant Date") to First_ Last, an employee of the Company (the "Participant"), of an option to purchase, in whole or in part, on the terms provided herein and in the Company's Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"), a total of Shares_Granted_ shares (the "Shares") of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") at Price_ per Share. Unless earlier terminated, this option shall expire on Expire (the "Final Exercise Date").
     It is intended that the option evidenced by this agreement shall, to the extent it so qualifies, be an incentive stock option as defined in Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended and any regulations promulgated there under (the "Code"). Schedule A hereto sets forth the number of shares with respect to which this option qualifies as an incentive stock option as of the date of grant. To the extent that the option does not on the date of grant, or hereafter ceases to, qualify as an incentive stock option, it shall be a non-qualified stock option. Except as otherwise indicated by the context, the term "Participant", as used in this option, shall be deemed to include any person who acquires the right to exercise this option validly under its terms.
2. .
Vesting Schedule
          (a)     ". This option will become exercisable ("vest") as to 25% of the original number of Shares on the first anniversary of the Grant Date and as to an additional 6.25% of the original number of Shares at the end of each successive full three-month period following the second anniversary of the Grant Date until the fourth anniversary of the Grant Date.
General
          (b)     ". In the event the Company achieves one of the performance targets set forth in clauses (i) through (viii) below during or prior to the fiscal year ending December 31, 2007 ("FY 2007"), the indicated portion of the option evidenced by this Agreement will vest on an accelerated basis effective on the 15 day following the Reporting Date (as defined below):
Accelerated Vesting upon Certain Corporate Milestones
th
               (i)     "In the event that the Company achieves both its Cash EPS Target (as defined below) and its Sales Revenue Target (as defined below) during the same fiscal year, this option will automatically vest as to 100% of the unvested Shares outstanding as of the Reporting Date.
 
               (ii)     "In the event that the Company achieves its Cash EPS Target and at least 92.135% but less than 100% of its Sales Revenue Target during the same fiscal year, this option will automatically vest as to 75% of the unvested Shares outstanding as of the Reporting Date.
               (iii)     "In the event that the Company achieves its Cash EPS Target but less than 92.135% of its Sales Revenue Target during the same fiscal year, this option will automatically vest as to 50% of the unvested Shares outstanding as of the Reporting Date.
               (iv)     "In the event that the Company achieves at least 93.333% but less than 100% of its Cash EPS Target and 100% of its Sales Revenue Target during the same fiscal year, this option will automatically vest as to 75% of the unvested Shares outstanding as of the Reporting Date.
               (v)     "In the event that the Company achieves less than 93.333% of its Cash EPS Target and 100% of its Sales Revenue Target during the same fiscal year, this option will automatically vest as to 50% of the unvested Shares outstanding as of the Reporting Date.
               (vi)     "In the event that the Company achieves at least 93.333% but less than 100% of its Cash EPS Target and at least 92.135% but less than 100% of its Sales Revenue Target during the same fiscal year, this option will automatically vest as to 50% of the unvested Shares outstanding as of the Reporting Date.
               (vii)     "In the event that the Company achieves at least 93.333% but less than 100% of its Cash EPS Target but less than 92.135% of its Sales Revenue Target during the same fiscal year, this option will automatically vest as to 25% of the unvested Shares outstanding as of the Reporting Date.
               (viii)     "In the event that the Company achieves less than 93.333% of its Cash EPS Target and at least 92.135% but less than 100% of its Sales Revenue Target during the same fiscal year, this option will automatically vest as to 25% of the unvested Shares outstanding as of the Reporting Date.
     The following definitions shall apply to this Section 2(b):
               (A)     "Cash EPS Target" shall mean the Company shall have earned annual earnings per diluted share (on a fiscal year basis) calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America excluding non-cash charges (e.g., income taxes, equity compensation expense and amortization of acquired intangible assets) of at least $XXXX per share as reported, (y) for so long as the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), in the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-K ("Public Company Financial Statements"), or (z) at such time as the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, in the Company's
 
regularly prepared annual audited financial statements prepared by management ("Private Company Financial Statements").
               (B)     "Sales Revenue Target" shall mean the Company shall have earned annual revenue (on a fiscal year basis) calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America of at least $XXXX million as reported, (y) for so long as the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, in the Company's Public Company Financial Statements or (z) at such time as the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, in the Company's Private Company Financial Statements.
               (C)     "Reporting Date" shall mean, in the event the Company achieves one of the targets described in clauses (i) through (viii) above, the date on which the Company files its annual Public Company Financial Statements for FY 2007 or, in the event that the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, the date on which audited annual Private Company Financial Statements for FY 2007 have been completed.
          (c)     The right of exercise shall be cumulative so that to the extent the option is not exercised in any period to the maximum extent permissible it shall continue to be exercisable, in whole or in part, with respect to all shares for which it is vested until the earlier of the Final Exercise Date or the termination of this option under Section 3 hereof or the Plan.
          (d)     . Upon a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), the number of Shares as to which this option has vested shall be calculated pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date.
Change in Control
3. .
Exercise of Option
          (a)     . In order to exercise this option, the Participant shall notify the Company's third-party stock option plan administrator, Charles Schwab & Co., or any successor appointed by the Company (the "Plan Administrator"), of the Participant's intent to exercise this option, and shall follow the procedures established by the Plan Administrator for exercising stock options under the Plan and provide payment in full in the manner provided in the Plan. The Participant may purchase less than the number of shares covered hereby, provided that no partial exercise of this option may be for any fractional share.
Form of Exercise
          (b)     . Except as otherwise provided in this Section 3, this option may not be exercised unless the Participant, at the time he or she exercises this option, is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company or any parent or subsidiary of the Company as defined in Section 424(e) or (f) of the Code (an "Eligible Participant").
Continuous Relationship with the Company Required
          (c)     . If the Participant ceases to be an Eligible Participant for any reason, then, except as provided in paragraphs (d) and (e) below, the right to exercise this option shall terminate three months after such cessation (but in no event
Termination of Relationship with the Company
 
after the Final Exercise Date), (i) this option shall be exercisable only to the extent that the Participant was entitled to exercise this option on the date of such cessation, and (ii) to the extent that the option or any portion thereof is exercised at any time later than three months after the date that the Participant ceases to be an employee of the Company or any parent or subsidiary of the Company as defined in Section 424(e) or (f) of the Code, the option shall be a non-qualified stock option. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Participant, prior to the Final Exercise Date, violates the non-competition or confidentiality provisions of any employment contract, confidentiality and nondisclosure agreement or other agreement between the Participant and the Company, the right to exercise this option shall terminate immediately upon such violation.
provided
that
          (d)     . If the Participant dies or becomes disabled (within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Code) prior to the Final Exercise Date while he or she is an Eligible Participant and the Company has not terminated such relationship for "cause" as specified in paragraph (e) below, this option shall be exercisable, within the period of one year following the date of death or disability of the Participant by the Participant, (i) this option shall be exercisable only to the extent that this option was exercisable by the Participant on the date of his or her death or disability, (ii) this option shall not be exercisable after the Final Exercise Date, and (iii) to the extent that the option or any portion thereof is exercised at any time later than one year after the Participant's termination as an employee of the Company or any parent or subsidiary of the Company (as defined in Section 424(e) or (f) of the Code) by reason of his or her disability (as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Code), the option shall be a non-qualified stock option.
Exercise Period Upon Death or Disability
provided
that
          (e)     . If the Participant, prior to the Final Exercise Date, is discharged by the Company for "cause" (as defined below), the right to exercise this option shall terminate immediately upon the effective date of such discharge. "Cause" shall mean willful misconduct by the Participant or willful failure by the Participant to perform his or her responsibilities to the Company (including, without limitation, breach by the Participant of any provision of any employment, consulting, advisory, nondisclosure, non-competition or other similar agreement between the Participant and the Company), as determined by the Company, which determination shall be conclusive. The Participant shall be considered to have been discharged for "cause" if the Company determines, prior to or simultaneously with the Participant's resignation, that discharge for cause was warranted.
Discharge for Cause
4. .
Withholding
     No Shares will be issued pursuant to the exercise of this option unless and until the Participant pays to the Company, or makes provision satisfactory to the Company for payment of, any federal, state or local withholding taxes required by law to be withheld in respect of this option.
5. .
Nontransferability of Option
 
     This option may not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged or otherwise encumbered by the Participant, either voluntarily or by operation of law, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution, and, during the lifetime of the Participant, this option shall be exercisable only by the Participant.
6. .
Disqualifying Disposition
     If the Participant disposes of Shares acquired upon exercise of this option within two years from the Grant Date (or, in the case of Shares acquired upon exercise of an Additional Grant, the date of the Addendum) or one year after such Shares were acquired pursuant to exercise of this option, the Participant shall notify the Company in writing of such disposition.
7. .
Provisions of the Plan
     This option is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is furnished to the Participant with this option.
 
          IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this option to be executed under its corporate seal by its duly authorized officer. This option shall take effect as a sealed instrument.
Dated: Grant_Date
     By accepting this grant, I acknowledge that I have read the Stock Option Plan, related prospectus, and grant agreement and agree to all terms and conditions set forth therein.
 
Number of shares as to which this option qualifies as an incentive stock option on the Grant Date:
ISO_
Number of shares as to which this option is a non-qualified stock option on the Grant Date:
NQSO_


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050804080027.txt.gz
TIME:20050804080027
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 8.01 Other Events
     Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced on August 4, 2005 that it will redeem all of its outstanding 5.5% Convertible Subordinated Notes Due 2007. Under the terms of the Indenture governing the 5.5% Notes, all of the $56.6 million principal amount of the 5.5% Notes outstanding on September 7, 2005 will be redeemed at a redemption price of 101.571% plus accrued interest to September 7, 2005. A copy of the press release announcing the planned redemption is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced it will redeem all of its outstanding 5.5% Convertible Subordinated Notes Due 2007.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  August 4, 2005 
Under the terms of the Indenture governing the 5.5% Notes, all of the $56.6 million in principal amount of the 5.5% Notes outstanding on September 7, 2005 will be redeemed at a redemption price of 101.571% plus accrued interest to September 7, 2005. The notice of redemption is expected to be delivered by the Trustee for the 5.5% Notes, U.S. Bank National Association, not later than August 8, 2005.
"Based on Akamai's recent financial performance and continued improvement in our profitability, we believe this is an excellent time to retire the remaining portion of our 5.5% notes," said Robert Cobuzzi, chief financial officer at Akamai. "We have made significant strides over the past two years to restructure and strengthen our balance sheet, and this step is an additional key piece of that process."
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,700 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is "." For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
About Akamai
The Trusted Choice for Online Business
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, lack of available cash reserves and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20050826170847.txt.gz
TIME:20050826170847
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
EXPLANATORY NOTE
On June 16, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai or the "Registrant") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, which excluded certain financial statements which were not available at the time of filing. By this amendment, Akamai is filing the required financial statements and pro forma financial information in connection with the acquisition of Speedera Networks, Inc.
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired
Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.3 and incorporated by reference herein are the audited financial statements of Speedera Networks, Inc. for the years ended June 30, 2004 and 2003. Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.4 and incorporated by reference herein are the unaudited financial statements of Speedera Networks, Inc. for the nine months ended March 31, 2005 and 2004.
(b) Pro Forma Financial Information
Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.5 and incorporated by reference herein is unaudited pro forma combined condensed consolidated financial information for Akamai and Speedera Networks, Inc for the year ended December 31, 2004 and the three months ended March 31, 2005.
(c) Exhibits
 
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 23.1 CONSENT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM We hereby consent to the incorporation by reference in the Registration Statements on Form S-3 (Nos. 333-45696, 333-53906, 333-113513 and 333-126114) and Form S-8 (Nos. 333-62072, 333-37810, 333-36518, 333-35464, 333-35470, 333-35462, 333-31668, 333-89887, 333-89889, 333-91558, 333-83502 and 333-116452) of Akamai Technologies, Inc. of our report dated September 30, 2003, except for Note 12, which is as of November 21, 2003, relating to the financial statements of Speedera Networks, Inc., which appears in this Amendment No. 1 to Current Report on Form 8-K of Akamai Technologies, Inc. dated August 26, 2005. /s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP Boston, Massachusetts August 26, 2005

EXHIBIT 23.2 CONSENT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM We hereby consent to the incorporation by reference in the Registration Statements on Form S-3 (Nos. 333-45696, 333-53906, 333-113513 and 333-126114) and Form S-8 (Nos. 333-62072, 333-37810, 333-36518, 333-35464, 333-35470, 333-35462, 333-31668, 333-89887, 333-89889, 333-91558, 333-83502 and 333-116452) of Akamai Technologies, Inc. of our report dated September 29, 2004, except for Note 11, which is as of October 14, 2004, relating to the financial statements of Speedera Networks, Inc., which appears in this Amendment No. 1 to the Current Report on Form 8-K of Akamai Technologies, Inc. /s/ BDO SEIDMAN, LLP San Francisco, California August 26, 2005

EXHIBIT 99.3 SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AS OF JUNE 30, 2004 AND 2003
INDEPENDENT AUDITORS' REPORT Board of Directors and Stockholders of Speedera Networks, Inc. We have audited the balance sheet of Speedera Networks, Inc. as of June 30, 2004, and the related statements of operations, mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock and stockholders' deficit, and cash flows for the year then ended. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audit. The financial statements of Speedera Networks, Inc. as of June 30, 2003, were audited by other auditors whose report dated September 30, 2003, except for Note 12, which is as of November 21, 2003, expressed an unqualified opinion on those statements. We conducted our audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States of America. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion. In our opinion, the 2004 financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Speedera Networks, Inc. at June 30, 2004, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for the year then ended in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. September 29, 2004, except for Note 11, which is as of October 14, 2004 /s/ BDO Seidman, LLP
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. BALANCE SHEETS The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. STATEMENTS OF MANDATORILY REDEEMABLE CONVERTIBLE PREFERRED STOCK AND STOCKHOLDERS' DEFICIT The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 1. THE COMPANY Speedera Networks, Inc. (the "Company") was incorporated in the state of Delaware on October 12, 1999. The Company provides services, powered by a next-generation internet content distribution network with global traffic management, through a subscription service. The Company's services are primarily designed to resolve network congestion by routing internet traffic and delivering content and transactions around busy or failed network segments. The Company has completed several rounds of private equity financing and debt financing. Since inception through June 30, 2004, the Company has incurred substantial losses and negative cash flows from operations. Management expected and has reached operating cash flow breakeven in fiscal 2004, however, they cannot guarantee that operating income and positive cash flows will continue in the foreseeable future because of additional costs and expenses related to marketing and other promotional activities, continued expansion of operations, continued development of the Company's software, web site and information technology infrastructure, expansion of product offerings and development of relationships with other businesses. Failure to generate sufficient revenues, raise additional capital or reduce certain discretionary spending could have a material adverse effect on the Company's ability to achieve its intended business objectives. 2. SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES USE OF ESTIMATES The preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates. Significant estimates used in these financial statements include, but are not limited to, allowance for doubtful accounts, contingencies, depreciation and amortization of property, equipment and capitalized software and the valuation allowance on deferred tax assets. REVENUE RECOGNITION The Company recognizes revenue from content delivery and streaming services based on the amount of data delivered and stored on its network. The service agreements generally commit the customer to a monthly minimum commitment plus additional fees for usage above the minimum commitment. Revenue is recognized for the greater of the actual usage or the monthly minimum commitment when all of the following conditions are met: the customer has signed a contract, the service has been delivered, the fee is fixed or determinable and collection is reasonably assured. Revenue from other services such as load balancing, monitoring and hosting is recognized each month, as performed, for the duration of the applicable contract provided that the fee is fixed or determinable and 1
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS collection is reasonably assured. The Company records installation and set-up fees as deferred revenue and recognizes these fees ratably over the life of the customer contract. COST OF REVENUE Cost of revenue consists primarily of fees paid to network providers for bandwidth and housing servers in third-party network data centers. Cost of revenue also includes network operation employee costs and cost of licenses. The Company enters into bandwidth contracts with third-party providers that generally commit the Company to pay minimum monthly fees plus additional fees for bandwidth usage above the committed usage. RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES The Company is subject to all of the risks inherent to a company conducting content distribution services over the Internet. These risks include, but are not limited to, a limited operating history, ability to generate profitable operations or to obtain additional financing, limited management resources, dependence upon consumer acceptance of the Internet and the changing nature of the content distribution services industry. The Company's operating results may be materially affected by the foregoing factors. FAIR VALUE OF FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS The reported amounts of certain of the Company's financial instruments, including cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable and accounts payable, approximate fair value due to their short maturities. The carrying amounts of notes payable approximate fair value because the contractual interest rates approximate the interest rates the Company could obtain on similar financing transactions. CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS The Company considers all highly liquid investments with an original maturity of three months or less when purchased to be cash equivalents. CONCENTRATIONS OF CREDIT RISK Financial instruments that potentially subject the Company to concentrations of credit risk consist of cash, cash equivalents and accounts receivable. The Company's cash and cash equivalents are deposited with two major financial institutions in the United States of America. At times, such deposits may be in excess of insured limits. Management believes that the Company's investments in cash equivalents are financially sound and have minimal credit risk. The Company's accounts receivable are derived from revenue earned from customers located in the U.S., Europe and Asia. The Company performs credit evaluations of its customers' financial condition and, generally, requires no collateral from its customers. For the years ended June 30, 2004 and June 30, 2003, no single customer accounted for greater than 10% of the Company's total revenues. At June 30, 2004 and June 30, 2003, no single customer accounted for greater than 10% of accounts receivable. 2
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS ALLOWANCE FOR DOUBTFUL ACCOUNTS The Company's allowance for doubtful accounts is an estimate consisting of specifically identified accounts receivable which management believes may be partially or wholly un-collectible and a general reserve based on the Company's experience in collecting customer accounts receivables. PROPERTY AND EQUIPMENT Property and equipment is stated at cost less accumulated depreciation and amortization. Depreciation and amortization of property and equipment is computed using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the respective assets as follows: Upon sale or retirement of assets, the cost and related accumulated depreciation and amortization are removed from the balance sheet and the resulting gain or loss is reflected in other income. Repairs and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred. ENGINEERING AND DEVELOPMENT EXPENSES Engineering and development costs are expensed as incurred, except for certain software development costs associated with internal use software. These costs are accounted for in accordance with Statement of Position ("SOP") 98-1 and Emerging Issues Task Force ("EITF") Issue No. 00 - 02, which require these costs to be charged to operations until certain capitalization criteria are met. During the years ended June 30, 2004 and 2003, software development costs of approximately $502,000 and $448,000, respectively, were capitalized and included in property and equipment. Total amortization of software development costs for the years ended June 30, 2004 and 2003 was approximately $781,000 and $994,000, respectively. ACCOUNTING FOR LONG-LIVED ASSETS The Company evaluates its long-lived assets for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset may not be recoverable. Recoverability is measured by comparison of the carrying from the asset. There have been no such impairments of long-lived assets as of June 30, 2004. ADVERTISING COSTS Advertising costs are expensed as incurred. Advertising costs for the years ended June 30, 2004 and 2003 were approximately $61,000 and $70,000, respectively. STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION The Company follows Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 148, Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation, Transition and Disclosure. SFAS No. 148 also requires that disclosures of the pro forma effect of using the fair value method of 3
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS accounting for stock-based employee compensation be displayed more prominently and in a tabular format. During the year ended June 30, 2004, there were no stock based awards to non-employees. Employee stock awards under the Company's compensation plans are accounted for in accordance with Accounting Principles Board Opinion No. 25, Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees, and related interpretations, including FASB Interpretation ("FIN") No. 44, Accounting for Certain Transactions Involving Stock Compensation (an Interpretation of APB Opinion No. 25), and related interpretations. The Company also provides the disclosures required by SFAS No. 123, Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation and related interpretations thereof. Had compensation expense for the Company's stock-based compensation plan been determined based on the fair value at the grant dates for the awards under a method prescribed by SFAS No. 123, the Company's net income (loss) for the periods presented would have been increased to the pro forma amounts indicated below (in thousands): These pro forma amounts may not be representative of the effects on pro forma net income (loss) for future years as options vest over several years and additional awards are generally made each year. Stock-based awards to nonemployees are accounted for under the provisions of SFAS No. 123 and EITF Issue No. 96-18, Accounting for Equity Instruments that are Issued to Other than Employees for Acquiring, or in Conjunction with Selling, Goods or Services. Compensation expense resulting from non-employee options is amortized under the provisions of FASB Interpretation No. 28, Accounting for Stock Appreciation Rights and Other Variable Stock Option or Award Plans - An Interpretation of APB Opinions No. 15 and 25, as amended. 4
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS STOCK OPTION PLAN On October 12, 1999, the Company adopted the "1999 Equity Incentive Plan" (the "Plan"). The Plan provides for the granting of stock options to employees and consultants of the Company. Options granted under the Plan may be either incentive stock options or non-qualified stock options. Incentive stock options ("ISOs") may be granted only to Company employees (including officers and directors who are also employees). Non-qualified stock options ("NSOs") may be granted to Company employees and consultants. As of June 30, 2004, the Company had reserved approximately 51,189,000 shares of common stock for issuance under the Plan (see also Note 11). Options under the Plan may be granted for periods of up to ten years and at prices no less than 85% of the estimated fair value of the shares on the date of grant as determined by the Board of Directors, provided, however, that (i) the exercise price of an ISO and NSO shall not be less than 100% and 85% of the estimated fair value of the shares on the date of grant, respectively, and (ii) the exercise price of an ISO and NSO granted to a 10% shareholder shall not be less than 110% of the estimated fair value of the shares on the date of grant. Options may have a maximum term of up to 10 years as determined by the Board of Directors. To date, options granted generally vest over four years. The following table summarizes activity under the Plan: 5
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS The options outstanding and exercisable by exercise price at June 30, 2004 are as follows: At June 30, 2004 approximately 13,604,000 options were exercisable. The fair value of each employee option grant is estimated on the date of grant using the minimum value method with the following assumptions: COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS) For the years ended June 30, 2004 and 2003, there was no difference between net income (loss) and comprehensive income (loss). RECLASSIFICATIONS Certain amounts reported in prior year have been reclassified to conform to the 2004 presentation. 6
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 3. BALANCE SHEET COMPONENTS 4. INCOME TAXES The provision for income taxes is summarized below: 7
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS The components of net deferred tax assets are as follows: Management believes that, based on a number of factors, it is more likely than not that the deferred tax assets will not be fully realizable. Accordingly, the Company has provided a full valuation allowance against its deferred tax assets as of June 30, 2004 and June 30, 2003. The Company's actual tax provision differs from the expected federal rate of 34% due primarily to state taxes of approximately $80,000, meals & entertainment of approximately $18,000, warrants of approximately $17,000 and the net change in valuation allowance for deferred tax assets net of true-up of approximately $(408,000). As of June 30, 2004, the Company had approximately $29 million and $28 million of federal and state net operating loss carryforwards available to offset future taxable income, respectively. The federal and state net operating losses will begin to expire in 2020 and 2008, respectively. Under the Tax Reform Act of 1986, the amount of benefit from net operating loss carryforwards may be impaired or limited in certain circumstances. Events which cause limitations in the amount of net operating losses that the Company may utilize in any one year include, but are not limited to, a cumulative ownership change of more than 50%, as defined, over a three year period. 5. BORROWINGS SUBORDINATED LOAN AND SECURITY AGREEMENT In April 2000, the Company entered into a subordinated loan and security agreement to borrow up to $5 million, in minimum advances of $250,000, at an interest rate of 12% per annum under which the Company borrowed the maximum aggregate amount. In March 2001, an agreement was made to amend the original terms of the subordinated loan and 8
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS security agreement. Pursuant to these amended terms, $2 million of the then outstanding principal was converted into shares of Series B mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.233 per share. The remaining principal balance of approximately $2.7 million was to be payable in monthly installments commencing on January 1, 2003 and any unpaid principal and interest was due in full on June 1, 2004. Accrued interest of approximately $298,000, for the months of February 2001 through December 2001 was paid in Series B preferred stock at a conversion rate of $0.233 per share. The remaining interest was to be paid in cash. In connection with this subordinated loan and security agreement, the Company issued a warrant to purchase shares of Series B mandatorily redeemable preferred stock (Note 7). In January 2002, the Company entered into an agreement to terminate the subordinated loan and security agreement. Pursuant to this termination, approximately $468,000 was paid in cash and approximately $272,000 was converted into shares of Series C mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.091 per share. The remaining principal and accrued interest of approximately $2.0 million was forgiven by the lender and recorded as a gain on the debt restructuring. The remaining unamortized loan fee of approximately $185,000 was offset to the gain on debt restructuring. PROMISSORY NOTE In May 2000, the Company entered into a promissory note agreement to borrow up to $10 million at an interest rate of 10.75% per annum under which the Company borrowed approximately $8.1 million. In March 2001, the Company entered into an agreement to amend the original terms of the promissory note. Pursuant to these amended terms, $2 million of the then outstanding principal was converted into shares of Series B mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.233 per share and approximately $408,000 of accrued interest converted into outstanding principal resulting in a note balance of approximately $6.5 million. Pursuant to the amended terms, interest was due and payable quarterly commencing on January 1, 2002. Principal was to be paid in cash in eighteen equal monthly installments beginning on January 1, 2003. In connection with this note, the Company issued a warrant to purchase shares of Series B mandatorily redeemable preferred stock (Note 7). In January 2002, the Company entered into an agreement to further amend the original terms of the promissory note. Pursuant to these amended terms, $700,000 was paid in cash and approximately $3.4 million of the then outstanding principal and interest was forgiven by the lender and recorded as a gain on debt restructuring, resulting in a note balance of approximately $3 million. The unamortized debt discount of approximately $245,000 was offset to the gain on debt restructuring. In November 2002, the Company entered into an agreement to terminate the promissory note. Pursuant to this termination, $700,000 was paid in cash and approximately $2.6 million of the remaining outstanding principal and interest was forgiven by the lender and recorded as a gain on debt restructuring. The unamortized debt discount of approximately $172,000 was offset to the gain on debt restructuring. 9
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS CREDIT FACILITIES In November 2003, the Company entered into a credit facility agreement with a bank. This agreement consists of an accounts receivable revolver, with maximum borrowings equal to the lesser of 80% of eligible receivables or $1.5 million, a non-formula term loan of $500,000, and a term loan of $500,000 collateralised by equipment purchases. The accounts receivable revolver bears interest equal to the prime rate in effect from time to time, plus three percent per annum, provided that the interest rate in effect on any day shall not be less than seven percent per annum. The non-formula term loan and the term loan bear interest at seven percent. The accounts receivable revolver expires in November 2004. The non-formula term loan and term loan mature in January 2006 and November 2006, respectively. As of June 30, 2004, there were no borrowings outstanding under the accounts receivable revolver and an outstanding balance of approximately $396,000 and $403,000 under the non-formula term loan and the term loan, respectively. The credit facility contains certain financial covenants, with which the Company was in compliance at June 30, 2004. In May 2004, an agreement was made to amend the original terms of the credit facility agreement above. In addition to the above loans the bank made a non-formula term loan (No. 2) of an amount not to exceed $1 million and a non-formula term loan (No. 3) of an amount not to exceed $500,000 to the Company. As of June 30, 2004, the outstanding balance for non-formula term loan No. 2 was $1 million and matures in June 2007. The non-formula term loan No. 3 shall be made in a single advance after September 16, 2004 and prior to March 31, 2005 given all terms and conditions are met (See note 11). Borrowings under these loans bear interest at a fixed rate equal to the prime rate in effect as of the date of the advance, plus three percent per annum, provided that the interest rate in effect on any day shall not be less than seven percent per annum. In conjunction with the November 2003 and May 2004 credit facilities with a bank, in addition to accounts receivable, substantially all of the Company's equipment and registered patents and trademarks are being used as collateral. Further, in conjunction with the November 2003 credit facility and May 2004 credit facility amendment, the Company issued warrants to the bank (Note 7). Principal payments under the bank loans are as follows: 10
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 6. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES BANDWIDTH USAGE AND CO-LOCATION COMMITMENTS The Company has commitments for bandwidth usage and co-location with network service providers that expire at various dates through 2005. For the year ending June 30, 2005, the minimum commitment is approximately $3,195,000. Some of these agreements may be amended to either increase or decrease the minimum commitments during the life of the contract. LEASE COMMITMENTS The Company leases its principal operating facilities under noncancelable operating leases. Rent expense was approximately $503,000 and $495,000 for the years ended June 30, 2004 and 2003, respectively. Future minimum lease payments under noncancelable operating leases are as follows (see also Note 11): CONTINGENCIES LITIGATION In June 2002, a competitor filed suit in California Superior Court against the Company, alleging theft of its trade secrets from an independent company that provides website performance testing services. In October 2002, the Company filed a cross-claim against the competitor seeking monetary damages and injunctive relief and alleging that the competitor engaged in various unfair trade practices, made false and misleading statements and engaged in unfair competition. In fiscal 2002 and 2003, the competitor filed suits against the Company for violations of certain patents held by the competitor. The Company has filed counterclaims in these cases, including that the competitor has infringed a patent that was issued to the Company. In January 2004, another competitor filed suit in United States District Court in Delaware against the Company, alleging infringement of certain patents held by the competitor. The Company filed a counterclaim against the competitor alleging infringement of certain patents held by the Company. The Company's management believe that they have meritorious defenses and counterclaims, and intend to vigorously defend these actions. During the year ended June 30, 2004, the Company incurred approximately $4 million in legal fees to defend the above 11
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS claims. The outcome is not known at this time and accordingly no amounts have been accrued in the accompanying financial statements. The Company is involved in various other lawsuits and claims arising from the conduct of its business. The Company's management believes that the disposition of these matters will not have a material effect on the financial position of the Company. INDEMNIFICATIONS FIN No. 45, Guarantor's Accounting and Disclosure Requirements for Guarantees, Including indirect Guarantees of Indebtedness of Others , requires that upon issuance of a guarantee, the guarantor must disclose and recognize a liability for the fair value of the obligation it assumes under that guarantee. As of June 30, 2004 and 2003, the Company's management believes the fair value of guarantees the Company issued or modified after December 31, 2002 were nominal. In the normal course of business to facilitate sales of its services, the Company indemnifies other parties, including business partners, customers, lessors, preferred stock holders and parties to other transactions with the Company, with respect to certain matters. The Company has agreed to hold the other party harmless against losses arising from a breach of representations or covenants, or out of intellectual property infringement or other claims made against certain parties. These agreements may limit the time within which an indemnification claim can be made and the amount of the claim. In addition, the Company has entered into indemnification agreements with an agent and an employee, and the Company's bylaws contain similar indemnification obligations to the Company's officers and directors. It is not possible to determine the maximum potential exposure or amount under these indemnification agreements due to the Company having no prior indemnification claims and the unique facts and circumstances involved in each particular agreement. However, the Company has an errors and omissions insurance policy that may enable it to recover a portion of any future amounts paid. 7. WARRANTS WARRANT ISSUED IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE SUBORDINATED LOAN AND SECURITY AGREEMENT In April 2000, the Company issued a warrant to purchase shares of Series B mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.233 per share. This warrant expires five years from the date of grant. The Company valued the warrant using the Black-Scholes option pricing model applying an expected life of five years, a weighted average risk free rate of 6.71%, a dividend yield of zero percent and volatility of 80%. The fair value of approximately $451,000 represents loan fees on the loan and was amortized over the loan term. During the year ended June 30, 2002, approximately $86,000 was amortized as interest expense and approximately $185,000 was offset to the gain on debt restructuring upon termination of the subordinated loan and security agreement. At June 30, 2004, none of the warrants issued had been exercised. 12
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS WARRANT ISSUED IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE PROMISSORY NOTE In May 2000, the Company issued a warrant to purchase shares of Series B mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.233 per share. This warrant expires four years from the date of grant. The Company valued the warrant using the Black-Scholes option pricing model applying an expected life of four years, a weighted average risk free rate of 6.75%, a dividend yield of zero percent and volatility of 80%. The fair value of approximately $878,000 represents additional interest on the promissory note and is being expensed over its term using the effective interest rate method. During the year ended June 30, 2002, approximately $175,000 was amortized as interest expense and approximately $245,000 was offset to the gain on debt restructuring upon amendment of the promissory note. During the year ended June 30, 2003, approximately $43,000 was amortized as interest expense and approximately $172,000 was offset to the gain on debt restructuring upon termination of the promissory note. At June 30, 2004, none of the warrants issued had been exercised. WARRANTS ISSUED IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE EQUIPMENT LEASE AGREEMENT In January 2000, the Company issued warrants to purchase shares of Series A mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.233 per share. These warrants expire five years from the date of grant. The Company valued the warrants using the Black-Scholes option pricing model applying expected lives of five years, a weighted average risk free rate of 6.62%, a dividend yield of zero percent and volatility of 80%. The fair value of approximately $52,000 represents loan fees on the loan and was amortized over the loan term. During the year ended June 30, 2002, approximately $9,000 was amortized as interest expense and approximately $22,000 was offset to the gain on debt restructuring upon termination of the lease agreement. At June 30, 2004, none of the warrants issued had been exercised. In April 2000, the Company issued a warrant to purchase shares of Series B mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.233 per share. This warrant expires five years from the date of grant. The Company valued the warrant using the Black-Scholes option pricing model applying an expected life of five years, a weighted average risk free rate of 6.76%, a dividend yield of zero percent and volatility of 80%. The fair value of approximately $496,000 represents loan fees on the loan and was amortized over the loan term. During the year ended June 30, 2002, approximately $81,000 was amortized as interest expense and approximately $243,000 was offset to the gain on debt restructuring upon termination of the lease agreement. At June 30, 2004, none of the warrants issued had been exercised. WARRANTS ISSUED IN CONJUNCTION WITH SERVICES RENDERED In January 2002, the Company issued warrants to purchase shares of Series C mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.09 per share in conjunction with services rendered in connection with the Company's debt restructuring. These warrants expire five years from the date of grant. The Company valued the warrants using the Black-Scholes option pricing model applying expected lives of four years, a weighted average risk free rate of 4.4%, a dividend yield of zero percent and volatility of 100%. All of the fair value 13
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS of approximately $97,500 was offset to the gain on debt restructuring in fiscal 2002. At June 30, 2004, none of the warrants issued had been exercised. In November 2003, the Company issued warrants to purchase shares of Series C mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.091 per share in conjunction with services rendered in connection with a credit facility. These warrants expire seven years from date of grant. The Company valued the warrants using the Black-Scholes option pricing model applying expected lives of four years, a weighted average risk free rate of 4.17%, a dividend yield of zero percent and volatility of 80%. The fair value of approximately $90,000 represents loan fees on the loan and is being amortized over the credit term. During the year ended June 30, 2004, approximately $35,000 was amortized. At June 30, 2004, none of the warrants issued had been exercised. In May 2004, the Company issued warrants to purchase shares of Series C mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock at $0.091 per share in conjunction with services rendered in connection with a credit facility. These warrants expire seven years from date of grant. The Company valued the warrants using the Black-Scholes option pricing model applying expected lives of four years, a weighted average risk free rate of 3.45%, a dividend yield of zero percent and volatility of 80%. The fair value of approximately $71,000 represents loan fees on the loan and is being amortized over the loan term. During the year ended June 30, 2004, approximately $2,000 was amortized. At June 30, 2004, none of the warrants issued had been exercised. The purchase price of the preferred stock for warrants issued in November 2003 and May 2004 is based on the holder being able to convert into the most recent round of financing or the next round of financing. In the event that the next round of financing, if any, is priced at below the holder's conversion price of $0.091 per share, then the Company would be required to issue additional warrants such that the holder maintains the same level of valuation. 8. MANDATORILY REDEEMABLE CONVERTIBLE PREFERRED STOCK Mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock ("Preferred Stock") at June 30, 2004 consists of the following: 14
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS The rights with respect to Series A, Series B and Series C Preferred Stocks are as follows: VOTING Each share of the Series A, Series B and Series C Preferred Stock has voting rights equal to an equivalent number of shares of common stock into which it is convertible and, except with respect to rights related to the election of directors and certain protective provisions, has the same voting rights and powers as shares of common stock. DIVIDENDS Holders of Series A Preferred Stock are entitled to receive non-cumulative dividends at the per annum rate of $0.06 per share. The dividends are payable when and if declared by the Board of Directors. No dividends on the Series A Preferred Stock have been declared by the Board of Directors from inception through June 30, 2004. Holders of Series B Preferred Stock are entitled to receive cumulative dividends at the per annum rate of 6% per share. The dividends are payable when declared by the Board of Directors. No dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock have been declared by the Board of Directors from inception through June 30, 2004. Holders of Series C Preferred Stock are entitled to receive cumulative dividends at the per annum rate of 12% per share, when declared by the Board of Directors. No dividends on the Series C Preferred Stock have been declared by the Board of Directors from inception through June 30, 2004. LIQUIDATION In the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company, including a merger, acquisition or sale of assets where the beneficial owners of the Company's common stock and Preferred Stock own less than a majority of the resulting voting power of the surviving entity. The holders of Series A Preferred Stock are entitled to receive, prior and in preference to the holders of common stock, an amount of $0.75 per share plus all declared but unpaid dividends on Series A Preferred Stock. The holders of Series B Preferred Stock are entitled to receive, prior and in preference to the holders of Series A Preferred Stock and common stock, $0.233 per share plus all declared or accrued but unpaid dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock. The holders of Series C Preferred Stock are entitled to receive, prior and in preference to the holders of Series A Preferred Stock, Series B Preferred Stock and common stock, $0.273 per share plus all declared or accrued but unpaid dividends on the Series C Preferred Stock. Should the Company's legally available assets be insufficient to satisfy the liquidation preferences of the Series C Preferred Stock, the funds will be distributed ratably among the holders of Series C Preferred Stock in proportion to the amount of such stock owned by each holder. Should the Company's legally available assets 15
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS be insufficient to satisfy the liquidation preferences of the Series B Preferred Stock after the full satisfaction of the liquidation preferences of the Series C Preferred Stock, such remaining funds will be distributed ratably among the holders of Series B Preferred Stock in proportion to the amount of such stock held by each holder. Should the Company's legally available assets be insufficient to satisfy the liquidation preferences of the Series A Preferred Stock after the full satisfaction of the liquidation preferences of the Series B and Series C Preferred Stock, such remaining funds will be distributed ratably among the holders of Series A Preferred Stock in proportion to the amount of such stock held by each holder. The remaining assets, if any, shall be distributed among the holders of common stock prorated based on the number of shares held by each holder of common stock. CONVERSION Each share of Series A, Series B and Series C Preferred Stock is convertible, at the option of the holder, according to a conversion ratio of two shares, one share and one share of common stock for one share of Series A, Series B and Series C Preferred Stock, respectively, subject to adjustment for dilution, common stock splits and declared or accrued but unpaid dividends. Each share of Series A, Series B and Series C Preferred Stock automatically converts into the number of shares of common stock into which such shares are convertible at the then effective conversion ratio upon the closing of a public offering of common stock at a per share price of at least $3.00 per share, with gross proceeds of at least $50 million. Each share of the Series A, Series B or Series C Preferred Stock automatically converts into the number or shares of common stock into which such shares are convertible at the then effective conversion ratio if the holders of a majority of the shares of the Series A, Series B or Series C Preferred Stock, respectively, consent to such conversion. REDEMPTION (SEE NOTE 11) Upon written request of a majority of the holders of the outstanding Series C Preferred Stock, the outstanding Series C Preferred Stock may be redeemed at any time after May 31, 2005. The Company shall redeem on the day which is one month following its receipt of such written redemption request and on the last day of each successive calendar quarter thereafter, a number of shares of Series C Preferred Stock equal to at least 12.5% of the then outstanding shares of Series C Preferred Stock, until all Series C Preferred Stock has been redeemed or converted to common stock. The redemption price shall be approximately $0.091 per share of Series C, plus any declared or accrued but unpaid dividends. Upon written request of a majority of the holders of the outstanding Series B Preferred Stock, and provided that no shares of Series C Preferred Stock are then outstanding, the outstanding Series B Preferred Stock may be redeemed at any time after May 31, 2005. The Company shall redeem on the day which is one month following its receipt of such written redemption request and on the last day of each successive calendar quarter thereafter, a number of shares of Series B Preferred Stock equal to at least 12.5% of the then outstanding shares of Series B Preferred Stock, until all Series B Preferred Stock has been redeemed or converted to common stock. The redemption price shall be approximately $0.233 per share of Series B, plus any declared or accrued but unpaid dividends. 16
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS Upon written request of a majority of the holders of the outstanding Series A Preferred Stock, and provided that no shares of Series C or Series B Preferred Stock are then outstanding, the outstanding Series A Preferred Stock may be redeemed at any time after May 31, 2005. The Company shall redeem on the day which is one month following its receipt of such written redemption request and on the last day of each successive calendar year thereafter, a number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock equal to at least 12.5% of the then outstanding shares of Series A Preferred Stock, until all shares of Series A Preferred Stock have been redeemed or converted to common stock. The redemption price shall be $0.75 per share of Series A Preferred Stock, plus any declared but unpaid dividends. 9. RESTRICTED COMMON STOCK In October 1999, the Company granted its founders 16,000,000 shares of restricted common stock subject to vesting. Under the terms of the related restricted stock agreements, the Company has the right to repurchase unvested shares of common stock at $0.005 per share, in the event that the founders cease to be employees of the Company. The fair value of the common stock is being amortized as compensation expense over a four-year vesting period. Compensation expense of $5,000 and $15,000 was recognized in the years ended June 30, 2004 and 2003, respectively. At June 30, 2004, there were no shares of common stock subject to repurchase rights of the Company. 10. EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLAN The Company sponsors a 401(k) defined contribution plan covering all employees. Contributions made by the Company are determined annually by the Board of Directors. No contributions have been made under this plan since inception. 11. SUBSEQUENT EVENTS FACILITY LEASE In July 2004, the Company entered into a noncancelable operating lease for its new facility in Bangalore, India. Future minimum lease payments under this lease are $112,000, $127,000, $133,000, $140,000, $147,000, and $12,000, during the fiscal years ending June 30 of 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009 and thereafter, respectively. STOCK OPTION PLAN In September 2004, the Company reserved an additional 20,600,000 shares of common stock for issuance under the "1999 Equity Incentive Plan" and granted approximately 20,779,000 of the then available shares under the Plan. CREDIT FACILITY BORROWING In September 2004, the Company borrowed the $500,000 available under the non-formula term loan No. 3 from the bank (see Note 5). 17
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REDEMPTION On October 14, 2004, the holders of Series A, Series B and Series C Preferred Stocks agreed to extend the earliest date at which they may redeem their shares of Mandatorily Redeemable Convertible Preferred Stock to November 15, 2005. 12. 2003 SUBSEQUENT EVENTS (AS OF NOVEMBER 21, 2003) PREFERRED STOCK In October 2003, the Company and one of its attorneys reached an agreement to exchange 7,732,332 shares of Series C preferred stock for $703,642 in outstanding legal fees due the attorney. CREDIT FACILITY In November 2003, the Company entered into a credit facility agreement with a bank, whereby the Company may borrow up to $2,500,000. The credit facility agreement permits borrowings under a) a $1,500,000 secured revolving line collateralized by eligible accounts receivable that matures 12 months from the date of documentation, b) a $500,000 non-formula term loan that is repayable in monthly installments over 24 months from the date of documentation, and c) a $500,000 secured loan collateralized by eligible equipment that is repayable in monthly installments over 36 months from the date of documentation. These borrowings bear interest at Prime + 3.00% (Prime is determined at the time of the borrowing, currently 4.00%) with a minimum rate of 7.00%. In connection with this credit facility, the Company issued a warrant to purchase shares of preferred stock at the lower of $0.091, or the price of a subsequent round of equity financing, if that round occurs prior to November 2010. The number of shares to be issued will be equal to $125,000 divided by the warrant price. REDEMPTION In November 2003, the holders of Series A, Series B and Series C Preferred Stock agreed to extend the earliest date at which they may redeem their shares of Mandatorily Redeemable Convertible Preferred Stock to May 31, 2005. 18
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. Financial Statements As of June 30, 2004 and 2003
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT AUDITORS To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Speedera Networks, Inc. In our opinion, the accompanying balance sheet and the related statements of operations, of mandatorily redeemable convertible preferred stock and stockholders' deficit and of cash flows present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Speedera Networks, Inc. (the "Company") at June 30, 2003, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for the year then ended, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management; our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audit. We conducted our audit of these statements in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States of America, which require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements, assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, and evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion. September 30, 2003, except for Note 12, which is as of November 21, 2003 /s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP

EXHIBIT 99.4 SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS MARCH 31, 2005 AND 2004 (UNAUDITED) (in thousands, except per share data) See accompanying notes to the unaudited condensed consolidated financial statements.
SPEEDERA NETWORKS,INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS FOR THE NINE MONTHS ENDED MARCH 31, 2005 AND 2004 (UNAUDITED) (in thousands) See accompanying notes to the unaudited condensed consolidated financial statements.
SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS FOR THE NINE MONTHS ENDED MARCH 31, 2005 AND 2004 (UNAUDITED) (in thousands) See accompanying notes to the unaudited condensed consolidated financial statements.
NOTE 1 - NATURE OF BUSINESS, BASIS OF PRESENTATION AND PRINCIPLES OF CONSOLIDATION Speedera Networks, Inc (the "Company" or "Speedera") was incorporated in the state of Delaware on October 12, 1999. The Company provides Internet content distribution services with global traffic management through a subscription service. The Company's services are primarily designed to resolve network congestion by routing internet traffic and delivering content and transactions around busy or failed network segments. The accompanying condensed consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Speedera and its wholly-owned subsidiaries. Intercompany transactions and balances have been eliminated in consolidation. In the opinion of management, these unaudited statements include all adjustments and accruals consisting only of normal recurring adjustments that are necessary for a fair presentation of the results of all interim periods reported herein. The results of operations for the interim periods presented are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for future periods. NOTE 2 - CONCENTRATION OF CREDIT RISK Financial instruments that potentially subject the Company to concentrations of credit risk consist of cash, cash equivalents and accounts receivables. The Company's cash and cash equivalents are deposited with two major financial institutions in the United States of America. At times, such deposits may be in excess of insured limits. Management believes that the Company's investments in cash and cash equivalents have minimal credit risk and the financial institutions that hold the Company's cash and cash equivalents are of high credit standing. The Company's accounts receivables are derived from revenue earned from customers located in the United States, Europe and Asia. The Company performs credit evaluations of its customers' financial condition and, generally, requires no collateral from its customers. For the nine months ended March 31, 2005 and 2004, no single customer accounted for greater than 10% of the Company's total revenues. At March 31, 2004, one customer accounted for 15% of accounts receivable. At March 31, 2005, no single customer accounted for greater than 10% of accounts receivable. NOTE 3 - ACCRUED EXPENSES Accrued expenses consist of the following (in thousands): NOTE 4 - BORROWINGS CREDIT FACILITIES In November 2003, the Company entered into a credit facility agreement with a bank. This agreement consists of an accounts receivable revolver, with maximum borrowings equal to the lesser of 80% of eligible receivables or $1.5 million, a non-formula term loan of $500,000, and a term loan of $500,000 collateralized by equipment purchases. The accounts receivable revolver bears interest equal to the prime rate in effect from time to time, plus three percent per annum, provided that the interest rate in effect on any day shall not be less than seven percent per annum. The non-formula term loan and the term loan bear interest at seven percent. The accounts receivable revolver expired in November 2004. The non-formula term loan and term loan mature in January 2006 and
November 2006, respectively. In connection with the acquisition of Speedera by Akamai, the credit facility agreement was terminated. Borrowings under these loans bear interest at a fixed rate equal to the prime rate in effect as of the date of the advance, plus three percent per annum, provided that the interest rate in effect on any day shall not be less than seven percent per annum. In conjunction with the November 2003 and May 2004 credit facilities with a bank, in addition to accounts receivable, substantially all of the Company's equipment and registered patents and trademarks were being used as collateral. Further, in conjunction with the November 2003 credit facility and May 2004 credit facility amendment, the Company issued warrants to the bank. In May 2004, an agreement was made to amend the original terms of the credit facility agreement above. In addition to the above loans the bank made a non-formula term loan (No. 2) of an amount not to exceed $1 million and a non-formula term loan (No. 3) of an amount not to exceed $500,000 to the Company. As of June 10, 2005, all borrowings under the credit facility were repaid as part of the merger agreement with Akamai Technologies, Inc. NOTE 5 - COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES BANDWIDTH USAGE AND CO-LOCATION COMMITMENTS The Company has commitments for bandwidth usage and co-location with network service providers that expire at various dates through 2006. LEASE COMMITMENTS The Company leases its principal operating facilities under noncancelable operating leases. In March 2005, the Company renewed its existing lease for a term of 3 years. The renewal allows for a one-time lease buy-out at the end of March 2006 for a settlement amount of $40,000. As a result of the merger with Akamai Technologies, Inc., which was completed on June 10, 2005, the Company expects to terminate its lease arrangement at the end of March 2006. CONTINGENCIES LITIGATION The Company and Akamai were involved in lawsuits against each other regarding patent infringement and false advertising and trade secrets. Upon completion of the acquisition of Speedera by Akamai on June 10, 2005, all lawsuits between the parties were dismissed. In January 2004, another competitor filed suit in United States District Court in Delaware against the Company, alleging infringement of certain patents held by the competitor. The Company filed a counterclaim against the competitor alleging infringement of certain patents held by the Company. In February 2005, the Company reached a settlement agreement with the competitor. The settlement is payable on a quarterly basis, through February 2008. The settlement has been accrued as of March 31, 2005. INDEMNIFICATIONS FIN No. 45, Guarantor's Accounting and Disclosure Requirements for Guarantees, Including indirect Guarantees of Indebtedness of Others, requires that upon issuance of a guarantee, the guarantor must disclose and recognize a liability for the fair value of the obligation it assumes under that guarantee. As of March 31, 2005 and 2004, the Company's management believes the fair value of guarantees the Company issued or modified after December 31, 2002 were nominal. In the normal course of business to facilitate sales of its services, the Company indemnifies other parties, including business partners, customers, lessors, preferred stock holders and parties to other transactions with the Company, with respect to certain matters. The Company has agreed to hold the other party harmless against losses arising from a breach of representations or covenants, or out of intellectual property infringement or other claims made against certain parties. These agreements may limit the time within which an indemnification claim can be made and the amount of the claim. In addition, the Company has entered into indemnification agreements with an agent and an employee, and the Company's bylaws contain similar indemnification obligations to the Company's officers and directors. It is not possible to determine the maximum potential exposure or amount under these indemnification
agreements due to the Company having no prior indemnification claims and the unique facts and circumstances involved in each particular agreement. However, the Company has an errors and omissions insurance policy that may enable it to recover a portion of any future amounts paid.

EXHIBIT 99.5 AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. UNAUDITED PRO FORMA COMBINED CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS On June 10, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company" or "Akamai") acquired privately held Speedera Networks, Inc. ("Speedera"). The Company acquired all of the outstanding common and preferred stock, including vested and unvested stock options, of Speedera in exchange for approximately 10.6 million shares of Akamai common stock and 1.7 million Akamai stock options. The aggregate purchase price, net of cash received, was approximately $143.2 million, which consisted of $122.1 million in shares of common stock, $18.4 million in fair value of the Company's stock options and transaction costs of $2.7 million, which primarily consisted of fees for financial advisory and legal services. The purchase price allocation is preliminary and a final determination of required purchase accounting adjustment will be made upon the completion of the Company's evaluation of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed. The unaudited combined condensed pro forma balance sheet as of March 31, 2005 is based on the individual balance sheets of Akamai and Speedera and prepared as if the acquisition of Speedera had occurred on March 31, 2005. The unaudited combined condensed pro forma statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2004 and for the three months ended March 31, 2005, were prepared as if the acquisition of Speedera had occurred on January 1, 2004. The unaudited pro forma adjustments are based upon available information and assumptions that Akamai believes are reasonable. The unaudited pro forma combined condensed consolidated financial statements and related notes thereto should be read in conjunction with Akamai's historical consolidated financial statements as previously filed on Akamai's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") on March 16, 2005 and the Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the three months ended March 31, 2005, filed with the Commission on May 10, 2005. In addition, this unaudited combined condensed pro forma information should be read in conjunction with the historical condensed consolidated financial statements of Speedera included within this Amendment to Current Report on Form 8-K/A. The historical income statement of Speedera for the twelve months ended December 31, 2004 is based on combining the last six months of results of operation from Speedera's fiscal year ended June 30, 2004 with the first six months of results of operations from Speedera's fiscal year ended June 30, 2005. These unaudited combined condensed pro forma financial statements are prepared for informational purposes only and are not necessarily indicative of future results or of actual results that would have been achieved had the acquisition of Speedera been consummated as of January 1, 2004 for the unaudited combined condensed pro forma statements of operations and as of March 31, 2005 for the unaudited combined condensed pro forma balance sheets. The pro forma financial statements do not give effect to any cost savings or incremental costs that may result from the integration of Akamai and Speedera.
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. PRO FORMA COMBINED CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET MARCH 31, 2005 (UNAUDITED) (in thousands) See accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma combined condensed financial statements.
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. PRO FORMA COMBINED CONDENSED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2004 (UNAUDITED) (in thousands, except per share data) See accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma combined condensed financial statements.
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. PRO FORMA COMBINED CONDENSED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS FOR THE THREE MONTHS ENDED MARCH 31, 2005 (UNAUDITED) (in thousands, except per share data) See accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma combined condensed financial statements.
NOTE 1 - BASIS OF PRESENTATION The unaudited pro forma combined condensed statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2004 and for the three months ended March 31, 2005 give effect to the acquisition of Speedera by Akamai as if the acquisition had occurred on January 1, 2004. The unaudited pro forma combined condensed balance sheet as of March 31, 2005 gives effect to the above-mentioned acquisition as if it had occurred on March 31, 2005. The unaudited combined condensed pro forma financial information has been prepared on the same basis as Akamai's audited financial statements. The acquisition was accounted for using the purchase method of accounting and, accordingly, the respective assets acquired and liabilities assumed have been recorded at their fair value and consolidated into the net assets of Akamai. A summary of the preliminary purchase price allocation for the acquisition as if the purchase had occurred on March 31, 2005 is as follows (in thousands): Based upon the purchase price allocation, the total purchase price exceeded the net assets acquired and liabilities assumed when adjusted to fair market value and resulted in goodwill in the pro forma combined condensed financial information of approximately $92.8 million. The identified intangible assets acquired, including completed technologies, customer relationships and non-compete agreements were assigned fair values based upon an appraisal and totaled $43.2 million in aggregate. NOTE 2 - PRO FORMA ADJUSTMENTS Adjustments have been made to the unaudited pro forma combined financial information to reflect the following: (A) The elimination of the historic stockholders' deficit of Speedera. (B) The fixed assets were recorded at estimated fair market value of $2.8 million. (C) Record goodwill of $92.8 million for excess of the purchase price over the preliminary fair values of the assets acquired less the liabilities assumed.
(D) Record the preliminary estimate of fair value for intangible assets determined at the time of acquisition of $43.2 million. The following are identified intangible assets acquired and the respective estimated useful lives over which the assets will be amortized: The completed technologies and the non-compete agreements will be amortized on a straight-line basis over their expected useful lives. The customer relationships will be amortized at the ratio that current revenues generated from those customer relationships bear to the total estimated revenues to be generated from those relationships from the date of acquisition. Annual amortization expense from the customer relationships is expected to be $5.4 million for the remainder of 2005 and $6.6 million, $5.2 million, $4.5 million, $3.7 million and $3.1 million for each of the next five fiscal years, respectively. (E) Represents adjustment of deferred revenue to fair market value. (F) Reflects accruals for Akamai's direct costs of the acquisition of $1.4 million, $1.7 million of accrued restructuring liabilities consisting of employee severance and outplacement costs and $3.8 million of Speedera's transaction costs due at the acquisition date. (G) Record income taxes based on statutory rates applied to the net effect of changes in the results of operations. (H) Represents the amortization expense related to identified intangible assets acquired. (I) Represents elimination of Speedera's notes payable outstanding of $1.7 million and reduction in related interest expense during the pro forma periods presented that was repaid at the time of acquisition, which is directly attributable to the business combination. (J) Record depreciation expense for acquired fixed assets based on the estimate of fair values determined at the time of acquisition. Depreciation expense is calculated on straight-line basis over estimated useful lives of 12 to 48 months. As a result of recording Speedera's fixed assets at estimated fair market value, the depreciation expense included in the pro forma adjustments column was reduced for the periods presented in the pro forma statements of operations. (K) Record deferred compensation of $9.7 million related to the intrinsic value allocated to the unvested options issued in the acquisition that had yet to be earned as of the acquisition date. (L) Record deferred compensation expense related to options issued in the acquisition which had been earned over the periods presented in the statement of operations included in the unaudited pro forma combined condensed financial statements. (M) Record the issuance of 10.6 million shares of Akamai common stock of $122.1 million and $18.4 million in fair value of 1.7 million of exchanged stock options. (N) Reclassification of $1.2 million of Akamai transaction costs paid as of March 31, 2005 from other long-term assets to the total purchase consideration. (O) Record non-income tax expense, including property taxes and sales taxes, to conform with Akamai's policy on non-income tax reserves and accruals.
NOTE 3 - NET INCOME PER SHARE Pro forma basic net income per share is computed using the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the applicable quarter and assumes that common shares for the business combination were issued at the beginning of the period presented. Pro forma diluted net income per share is computed using the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the quarter, assuming the common shares for the business combination were issued at the beginning of the periods presented, plus the dilutive effect of potential common stock. Potential common stock consists of stock options, deferred stock units, warrants, unvested restricted common stock and convertible notes. The following table sets forth the components used in the computation of pro forma basic and diluted net income per common share (in thousands, except per share data): For the year ended December 31, 2004, the Company's 1% convertible senior notes are antidilutive under the sequential calculation of diluted share count in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 128, "Earnings per Share."


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20051020170025.txt.gz
TIME:20051020170025
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
     On October 14, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an employment offer letter agreement with J. Donald Sherman under the terms of which he will become the Company's Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer-Elect. The letter agreement sets forth the terms of Mr. Sherman's employment, including his cash and equity compensation, and further provides for Mr. Sherman to become the Company's Chief Financial Officer following the retirement of Robert Cobuzzi, the Company's current Chief Financial Officer. See Item 5.02 below. Under the terms of the employment offer letter agreement, Mr. Sherman will have an initial annual salary of $300,000 and will receive a $50,000 signing bonus and relocation assistance. Mr. Sherman will also be eligible for additional cash bonus and equity awards and will be eligible to participate in the Company's Executive Severance Pay Plan. A copy of the employment offer letter agreement is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. The foregoing description of the employment offer letter agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full text of such agreement set forth in Exhibit 99.1.
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
     On October 14, 2005, Robert Cobuzzi notified the Company of his intent to retire from his position as Chief Financial Officer effective on or about the date on which the Company files with the Securities and Exchange Commission its annual report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2005.
     On October 18, 2005, the Company issued a press release announcing Mr. Cobuzzi's retirement as its Chief Financial Officer. The Company simultaneously announced that J. Donald Sherman would succeed Mr. Cobuzzi as Chief Financial Officer following the effectiveness of Mr. Cobuzzi's resignation. See Item 1.01 above and Exhibit 99.1 for a description of the material terms of the employment agreement between the Company and Mr. Sherman.
     The full text of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
October 13, 2005
Mr. J Donald Sherman [address]
Dear J D:
On behalf of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (referred to in this letter collectively with its subsidiaries as the "Company"), I am pleased to confirm the offer of full-time employment with the Company that I made to you for the position of Chief Financial Officer in our Cambridge, Massacusetts office. Your title will be Senior Vice President and CFO-Elect until the Company completes its full year financial reporting and filing requirements for 2005 (which we anticipate will be completed on or before March 10, 2006); this interim title will not affect your compensation or other benefits summarized below. You will report to me in both capacities. This offer is contingent upon the following: (1) completion of an employment application, which is enclosed with this letter; (2) successful completion of a check of your business references; (3) your consent to and the successful completion of a background investigation conducted pursuant to the Company's standard procedures.
Your base salary will be $11,538.46 bi-weekly ($300,000.00 on an annualized basis). You will be eligible to receive an annual incentive bonus, based on performance against objectives set by me and the Board, of $200,000.00 starting in 2006. In addition, you will earn a one-time bonus of $50,000.00 payable in 2006 as part of the 2005 Executive Bonus Program. Your compensation shall be subject to review annually.
In addition, you will receive a one-time signing bonus of $50,000.00, payable within the first 60 days of your employment and you will also receive assistance with your relocation to the Greater Boston area.
In the event you leave the employ of the Company voluntarily during the first year of employment, you will be required to repay a pro-rated amount of the signing bonus and of the total dollar value of the relocation package and relocation expenses. After one year of employment, you would not be required to reimburse the company for any of your moving expenses.
As part of this employment offer, the Company will recommend to the Akamai Board of Directors that you be granted stock options under the Company's 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (the Plan) for the purchase of an aggregate of 75,000 shares of Common Stock of the Company, at an option price equal to the fair market value of the Common Stock as determined by the Board on the date the Board of Directors approves your stock options. If approved, your stock options at Akamai will vest over four years, provided you remain employed, all on a schedule beginning on the date your options are granted. The first 25 percent of the options will vest on the first anniversary of your Grant Date. An additional 6.25% of the original number of shares will vest at the end of each successive full three-
 
month period following the first anniversary of the Grant Date until the fourth anniversary of the Grant Date. Subject to Board approval, your options will be evidenced by a separate option agreement embodying these terms. You will also be eligible to receive such future stock option grants, as the Board of Directors shall from time to time deem appropriate.
     In addition, in early 2006 the Company will recommend to the Akamai Board of Directors that you be granted 25,000 restricted stock units under the Plan. If approved, your restricted stock units will vest over three years, provided you remain employed, all on a schedule beginning on the date your restricted stock units are granted. The first 34% of the restricted stock units will vest on the first anniversary of the grant date. An additional 8.25% of the original number of restricted stock units will vest at the end of each successive full three-month period following the first anniversary of the grant date until the third anniversary of the grant date. Subject to Board approval, your restricted stock units will be evidenced by a separate agreement embodying these terms.
     You will be eligible to participate in the Employee Stock Purchase Program beginning in the December 2005 offering period. This plan allows you to contribute between 0% and 15% of your salary through regular payroll deductions. The Akamai plan provides for a six month offering period. At the end of each six-month offering period, the money that has been deducted will be used to purchase shares of Akamai common stock at 85% of the Fair Market Value (FMV) of the Common Stock at the beginning of the offer period or end of the offer period, whichever is lower.
     You will be eligible to elect health insurance, dental insurance, life insurance, and short/long term disability coverage and other benefits that are and may become available generally to employees of the Company. Coverage takes effect the first of the month following date of hire. You will also be eligible to contribute to the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 401(k) Plan immediately upon employment.
     You will be eligible for a maximum of three weeks of vacation per year. The number of vacation days for which you are eligible in each year shall accrue at the rate of 1.25 days per month that you are employed and working during such year. Akamai also observes eleven holidays each year. This year nine of the holidays are scheduled days, while two holidays are floating days.
     As a condition of your employment, you will be required to execute a Non-Competition, Non-Solicitation, Proprietary and Confidential Information and Developments Agreement, and an Akamai Code of Business Conduct and Ethics. Both documents are enclosed in this offer package.
     You represent that you are not bound by any employment contract, restrictive covenant or other restriction preventing you from entering into this agreement or carrying out your responsibilities for the Company as contemplated hereby, or which is in any way inconsistent with any of the terms hereof.
 
Akamai Technologies is an at will employer which means that either you or Akamai may terminate the employment relationship at any time with or without notice and with or without reason. This letter is not to be construed as an agreement, either expressed or implied to employ you for any stated term. No employee, officer or other representative of Akamai, other than the Chief Executive Officer, has any authority to enter into any agreement to the contrary.
In the event that Akamai terminates your employment for reasons other than cause, you would be eligible for severance in accordance with the Akamai Technologies, Inc.'s Executive Severance Pay Plan And Summary Plan Description, a copy of which is enclosed, provided you meet the eligibility requirements of that plan.
In the event that there is a Change in Control, as that term is defined in the Akamai Technologies, Inc. Second Amended And Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, a copy of which is enclosed, and within the first ninety (90) days the surviving entity fails to offer to employ you in a position with responsibilities that are commensurate (but not necessarily identical) with your responsibilities at Akamai, and as a result your employment terminates involuntarily, you will receive an amount equal to one year of your then-base salary provided you sign a separation agreement acceptable to Akamai that includes, among other things, a full release, a one-year non-competition clause, a future cooperation clause, and a non-disparagement clause. Whether you have been offered a position with commensurate responsibilities is to be determined without regard to the title or reporting relationship of the new position.
This employment offer from Akamai Technologies is contingent upon your submitting an I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification Form acceptable to Akamai Technologies, Inc. on your date of employment. New hire orientations are held every Monday in Cambridge at 1:30 pm. If you are in a different location, a conference bridge will be set up and instructions for dialing in will be provided.
You must be prepared to offer proof of your employability in the United States in accordance with the requirements listed on the I-9 Form on your first day of employment. You will not be placed on the Akamai payroll as an active employee until you have provided this documentation.
Please accept Akamai's offer of employment by signing the enclosed copy of this letter and the agreements attached and returning all documents to . Sincerely,
Mark Minichiello, Akamai Technologies, 8 Cambridge Center, 7
floor, Cambridge, MA, 02142
th
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
/s/ Paul Sagan Paul Sagan Chief Executive Officer
 
psagan@akamai.com
Enclosures:
I hereby accept employment with Akamai Technologies, Inc.

 
 Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today announced two key executive appointments and a planned transition in leadership of the Company's finance organization. Robert Cobuzzi, Akamai's current Chief Financial Officer, will retire early next year and will be replaced by J. Donald (J.D.) Sherman; and Michael M. Afergan will become the Company's new Chief Technology Officer, effective immediately, filling an open position.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  October 18, 2005
Mr. Sherman currently is the chief financial executive of IBM's $21 billion Systems and Technology Group. Previously, Mr. Sherman held a number of senior executive positions in Finance at IBM, including Vice President of the Server Division, and Assistant Controller for Corporate Financial Strategy and Budgets. He has an M.B.A. from the University of Chicago and a B.A. in Economics from Emory University.
"I am delighted to welcome J.D. Sherman to Akamai," said Paul Sagan, Akamai's President and CEO. "J.D. is an accomplished finance executive with broad knowledge of the information technology industry. We believe Akamai will benefit from J.D's experience and insights into the future of Internet-based enterprise computing and the direction of the I.T marketplace in general."
Regarding his decision to come to Akamai, Mr. Sherman said, "I'm very excited to join the Akamai team. Akamai has a strong and unique position in an incredibly important industry, and I'm looking forward to helping lead the company's financial direction as it continues to grow."
Mr. Cobuzzi joined Akamai in 2002 and has indicated he plans on retiring in 2006 after completing the Company's full-year financial reporting and filing requirements for 2005. Mr. Sherman will join Akamai next month in an interim position, as Senior Vice President and CFO-Elect, to allow for a smooth transition to his role as Akamai's CFO following Mr. Cobuzzi's retirement.
 
"I want to thank Bob for all he has contributed to Akamai," Sagan said. "He joined the Company at a time when we were undertaking a crucial restructuring. Bob has been instrumental in implementing changes and executing strategies that enabled us to achieve significant revenue growth and profitability."
Regarding his tenure at Akamai, Mr. Cobuzzi said, "It has been an honor to work with such an accomplished team of professionals at Akamai, and I am looking forward to working closely with J.D. to help ensure a successful transition."
Mr. Afergan, the Company's new CTO, is a veteran of Akamai's distinguished engineering organization. He joined Akamai in 1999 and has served in various roles within Akamai's Engineering and Product Management departments, including Director of Technology Strategy and Director of Load Balancing and Mapping. In these roles, he was instrumental in helping to drive innovation based on customer requirementsworking on a variety of Akamai's products and directly with many of Akamai's largest customers.
Mr. Afergan returned to graduate school in September 2003, and has come back to Akamai full time after receiving his PhD in Computer Science from MIT, where his research focused on networking and distributed systems. In his new role as CTO, Mr. Afergan will work with Akamai Engineering and Product Management to develop and articulate the Company's technical vision and strategy. He will report directly to Mr. Sagan.
"The role of CTO has always been a position of high regard and importance at Akamai," Sagan said. "Mike's primary responsibility will be to drive profitable revenue growth through new services, features, functionality, and partnerships, and to identify key customer and market opportunities. Mike is respected throughout the organization, and he possesses a unique combination of technical and strategic capabilities required to further develop, grow and lead Akamai's innovative set of offerings."
Mr. Afergan previously ran a software consulting company, provided technology training internationally, and served as a teaching fellow and guest lecturer at Harvard University. He has authored several academic papers, trade magazine articles, and books including Java Quick Reference (Macmillan), which has been translated into six languages. Mr. Afergan holds an A.B. and S.M. from Harvard, both in Computer Science.
On assuming the role of CTO at Akamai, Mr. Afergan said, "I am excited to return to a company with such a talented and innovative team that continues to address important business issues for our customers. As CTO, I look forward to playing a role in helping Akamai to capitalize on the tremendous opportunities that lie ahead."
"I am very pleased to announce these two key executive appointments," Mr. Sagan concluded. "J.D. and Mike will enhance Akamai's senior management team and we are looking forward to their contributions."
Akamai will hold its next regularly scheduled investor conference call on October 25 at 4:30 p.m. ET. The call will include the Company's third quarter 2005 financial results.
th
 
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,700 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is "." For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
The Trusted Choice for Online Business
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, inability to anticipate and react to changes in the market and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20051025160617.txt.gz
TIME:20051025160617
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On October 25, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2005. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2005. Revenue for the third quarter 2005 was $75.7 million, a 17 percent increase over second quarter 2005 revenue of $64.6 million, and a 42 percent increase over third quarter 2004 revenue of $53.3 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
October 25, 2005
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the third quarter of 2005 was $272.3 million, or $1.71 per diluted share. The Company's GAAP net income included a benefit of $255.3 million, or approximately $1.59 per diluted share, primarily related to the recognition of the Company's net operating loss carryforward as a result of the release of a tax valuation allowance. The Company previously had discussed its expectation that the tax valuation allowance would be released in the second half of 2005. The Company has concluded, pursuant to Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 109, that the valuation allowance should be released primarily as a result of achieving sustained profitability.
Normalized net income* was $22.0 million, or $0.14 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2005, a 29 percent increase over second quarter 2005 normalized net income of $17.1 million, or $0.12 per diluted share, and an 80 percent improvement over 2004 third quarter normalized earnings of $12.2 million, or $0.09 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the third quarter of 2005 of $27.7 million represented an increase of 55 percent year-over-year, and 22 percent over the prior quarter. Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenue was 37 percent, up from 34 percent a year ago, and 35 percent in the prior quarter. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
 
"We're very pleased with our third quarter results," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "Many of our enterprise customers have continued to increase their use of the Internet, and Akamai brings improved Internet performance and reliability to their critical business processes."
Cash from operations was $19.5 million in the third quarter, as compared to second quarter 2005 cash from operations of $16.9 million. During the quarter, the Company redeemed the remaining $56.6 million of its outstanding 5.5% convertible debt. On a year-to-date basis, cash from operations was $55.1 million, as compared to $35.7 million in the first nine months of 2004.
At September 30, 2005, the Company had approximately 139.7 million shares of common stock outstanding.
Customers
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the third quarter increased by 94 to a record 1,830, a 5 percent increase over second quarter 2005, and a 45 percent increase year-over-year.
"Strong growth in our customer base reflects increasing trust in Akamai to accelerate the on-line delivery of mission critical content and Web-based applications by businesses and government agencies," Sagan said.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 24 percent and 20 percent, respectively, of revenue for the third quarter of 2005.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 9875106.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,800 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
 
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance and loss on early extinguishment of debt.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and
 
impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures. Because Adjusted EBITDA eliminates these items, Akamai considers this financial measure to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statement of cash flows in the Company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations as to continued profitability. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, failure to realize our expectations with respect to the acquisition of Speedera, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, inability to service and repay our outstanding debt and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20051102164603.txt.gz
TIME:20051102164603
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 8.01 Other Events.
     On October 31, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an underwriting agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. (the "Underwriter"), in connection with the public offering (the "Offering") of 12,000,000 shares (the "Shares") of the Company's common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Common Stock"). The Underwriter has agreed to purchase the Shares from the Company at a price of $16.855 per share. Under the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, the Company has granted to the Underwriter an option, exercisable for 30 days after October 31, 2005, to purchase up to an additional 1,800,000 shares of Common Stock solely for the purpose of covering overallotments, if any. The Offering is being made pursuant to the Company's effective shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333- 53906) filed on January 18, 2001 with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus supplement dated October 31, 2005. A copy of the Underwriting Agreement is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. The above description of the material terms of the Underwriting Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to such exhibit.
     On November 1, 2005, the Company also issued a press release announcing the pricing of the Offering. A copy of the press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a)   Financial Statements.
             None.
(b)    Pro Forma Financial Information
             None.
(c)    Exhibits:
             See Exhibit Index attached hereto.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
1.1       Underwriting Agreement, dated October 31, 2005, by and between Akamai Technologies, Inc. and Deutsche Bank Securities Inc.
5.1       Opinion of Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP.
23.1     Consent of Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP (contained in exhibit 5.1).
99.1     Press Release issued by Akamai Technologies, Inc. on November 1, 2005.

EXECUTION VERSION 12,000,000 Shares AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. Common Stock ($0.01 Par Value) UNDERWRITING AGREEMENT October 31, 2005 Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. 60 Wall Street New York, NY 10005 Ladies and Gentlemen: Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to sell to Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. (the "Underwriter") an aggregate of 12,000,000 shares of the Company's Common Stock, $0.01 par value (the "Firm Shares"). The Company also proposes to sell at the Underwriter's option an aggregate of up to 1,800,000 additional shares of the Company's Common Stock (the "Option Shares") as set forth below. The Firm Shares and the Option Shares, to the extent the aforementioned option is exercised, are collectively referred to herein as the "Shares." The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") a registration statement, including a prospectus, on Form S-3 (File No. 333-53906), relating to the Shares. The registration statement as amended to the date of this Agreement, including the information (if any) deemed to be part of the registration statement at the time of effectiveness pursuant to Rule 430A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), is hereinafter referred to as the "Registration Statement," and the related prospectus covering the Shares in the form contained in the Registration Statement at the time of effectiveness is hereinafter referred to as the "Base Prospectus." The Base Prospectus, as supplemented by the prospectus supplement specifically relating to the Shares in the form first used to confirm sales of the Shares is hereinafter referred to as the "Prospectus," and the term "preliminary prospectus" means any preliminary form of the Prospectus. As used herein, the terms "Registration Statement," "Base Prospectus," "Prospectus" and "preliminary prospectus" shall include in each case the documents, if any, incorporated therein by reference. If the Company has filed an abbreviated registration statement to register additional shares of Common Stock pursuant to Rule 462(b) under the Securities Act (the "Rule 462 Registration Statement"), then any reference herein to the term "Registration Statement" shall be deemed to include such
Rule 462 Registration Statement. The terms "supplement," "amendment" or "amend" as used in this Agreement with respect to the Registration Statement, Base Prospectus, Prospectus or preliminary prospectus shall include all documents subsequently filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), that are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein. In consideration of the mutual agreements contained herein and of the interests of the parties in the transactions contemplated hereby, the parties hereto agree as follows: 1. REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE COMPANY. (a) The Company represents and warrants to the Underwriter as follows: (i) At the time the Registration Statement was filed with the Commission, the Company met the applicable eligibility requirements for use of Form S-3; the Registration Statement has become effective; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect, and no proceedings for such purpose are pending before or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened by the Commission. (ii) (A) Each document, if any, filed or to be filed pursuant to the Exchange Act and incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement complied or will comply when so filed in all material respects with the Exchange Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, (B) the Registration Statement, when it became effective, did not contain and, as amended or supplemented, if applicable, will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (C) the Registration Statement and the Prospectus comply and, as amended or supplemented, if applicable, will comply in all material respects with the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and (D) the Prospectus does not contain and, as amended or supplemented, if applicable, will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, provided, however, that the Company makes no representations or warranties as to information contained in or omitted from the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, or any such amendment or supplement, in reliance upon, and in conformity with, written information furnished to the Company by or on behalf of the Underwriter specifically for use therein. (iii) The Company has been duly organized and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware, with corporate power and authority to own or lease its properties and conduct its business as described in the Prospectus. Each of the subsidiaries of the Company as listed in Schedule I hereto (collectively, the "Subsidiaries") has been duly organized and is validly existing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization as an entity of the type specified in such Schedule I and is in good standing under such laws (to the extent such status exists under such laws), with corporate or similar power and authority to own or lease its properties and conduct its business as described in the Prospectus. The Subsidiaries are the only subsidiaries, direct or indirect, of the Company. The Company and each 2
of the Subsidiaries are duly qualified to transact business in all jurisdictions in which the conduct of their business requires such qualification, except for such jurisdictions where the failure to so qualify would not, individually or in the aggregate, result in any material adverse change in the business, financial condition, results of operations or prospects of the Company or its Subsidiaries, taken together as a whole (a "Material Adverse Change"). The outstanding shares of capital stock or other ownership interests of each of the Subsidiaries have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and non-assessable (to the extent such status exists under the laws of the jurisdictions in which the Subsidiaries are organized) and are owned by the Company or another Subsidiary free and clear of all liens, encumbrances and equities and claims; and no options, warrants or other rights to purchase, agreements or other obligations to issue or other rights to convert any obligations into shares of capital stock or ownership interests in the Subsidiaries are outstanding. (iv) The outstanding shares of Common Stock of the Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable; the Shares have been duly authorized and when issued and paid for as contemplated herein will be validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable; and no preemptive rights of stockholders exist with respect to any of the Shares or the issue and sale thereof. Neither the filing of the Registration Statement nor the offering or sale of the Shares as contemplated by this Agreement gives rise to any rights, other than those which have been waived or satisfied, for or relating to the registration of any shares of Common Stock of the Company. (v) The information set forth under the caption "Capitalization" in the Prospectus is true and correct as of the date or dates indicated. All of the Shares conform to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus. Except as described in the Prospectus and except as has been granted under the (i) the Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, (ii) the 2001 Incentive Stock Option Plan, and (iii) the 1999 Employee Stock Purchase Plan, , (A) there are no outstanding securities of the Company convertible or exchangeable into or evidencing the right to purchase or subscribe for any shares of capital stock of the Company and (B) there are no outstanding or authorized options, warrants or rights of any character obligating the Company to issue any shares of its capital stock or any securities convertible or exchangeable into or evidencing the right to purchase or subscribe for any shares of such stock. (vi) The Commission has not issued an order preventing or suspending the use of the Prospectus relating to the proposed offering of the Shares nor instituted, to the Company's knowledge, proceedings for that purpose. (vii) The consolidated financial statements of the Company and the Subsidiaries, together with related notes included in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, present fairly in all material respects the financial position, the results of operations and cash flows of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries, at the indicated dates and for the indicated periods. Such financial statements have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted principles of accounting, consistently applied throughout the periods involved, except as disclosed therein, and all adjustments necessary for a fair presentation of results for such periods have been made. The summary financial data included in the Prospectus present fairly, on the basis stated in the Prospectus, the information shown therein and such data have been compiled on a basis 3
consistent with the financial statements presented therein and the books and records of the Company. The pro forma financial statements and other pro forma financial information included in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus present fairly the information shown therein, have been prepared in accordance with the Commission's rules and guidelines with respect to pro forma financial statements, have been properly compiled on the pro forma bases described therein, and, in the opinion of the Company, the assumptions used in the preparation thereof are reasonable and the adjustments used therein are appropriate to give effect to the transactions or circumstances referred to therein. (viii) To the Company's knowledge after reasonable inquiry, (a) PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, who have certified certain of the financial statements filed with the Commission as part of the Prospectus, are independent public accountants as required by the Securities Act and the and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and Rule 3600T of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (the "PCAOB") and (b) BDO Seidman, LLP, who have certified certain of the financial statements of Speedera Networks, Inc. as independent certified public accountants with respect to the Company under Rule 101 of the AICPA's Code of Professional Conduct, and its interpretations and rulings. (ix) There is no legal or governmental proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any of the Subsidiaries which if determined adversely to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is reasonably likely to result in any Material Adverse Change or might prevent the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, except as set forth in the Prospectus. (x) The Company and the Subsidiaries have good and valid title to all of the properties and assets reflected in the consolidated financial statements hereinabove described or described in the Prospectus as owned by them, subject to no lien, mortgage, pledge, charge or encumbrance of any kind except those reflected in such financial statements or described in the Prospectus or which do not materially affect the value of such properties and assets and do not interfere with the use made and proposed to be made of such properties and assets by the Company and the Subsidiaries. The Company and the Subsidiaries occupy their leased real properties under valid and binding leases, with such exceptions as are not reasonably likely to result in a Material Adverse Change and do not materially interfere with the use made and proposed to be made of such properties by the Company and the Subsidiaries, except as described in the Prospectus. (xi) Since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus, as it may be amended or supplemented, (i) there has not occurred any Material Adverse Change or any development that is reasonably likely to result in a Material Adverse Change, whether or not occurring in the ordinary course of business, and there has not been any material transaction entered into, other than transactions in the ordinary course of business and changes and transactions described in the Prospectus, as it may be amended or supplemented and (ii) neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has incurred any material liability, direct or contingent, nor entered into any material transaction other than in the ordinary course of business. (xii) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will not conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust 4
or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or by which the Company or any Subsidiary or any of their respective properties is bound, or of the Certificate of Incorporation of the Company, as amended and/or restated (the "Charter") or By-Laws of the Company, as amended and/or restated (the "By-Laws"), or any law, order, rule or regulation judgment, order, writ or decree applicable to the Company or any Subsidiary of any court or of any government, regulatory body or administrative agency or other governmental body having jurisdiction. (xiii) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company. (xiv) Each approval, consent, order, authorization, designation, declaration or filing by or with any regulatory, administrative or other governmental body necessary in connection with the execution and delivery by the Company of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions herein contemplated (except for (A) the filing of the Prospectus specifically relating to the Shares with the Commission, (B) the electronic filing on COBRADesk, including the filing of the Prospectus and other documents necessary for the review of the offering of the Shares in accordance with Rule 2710 of the Conduct Rules of the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. (the "NASD") (C) letter from the NASD confirming that the NASD shall not have raised any objection with respect to the fairness and reasonableness of the underwriting terms and arrangements or (D) such additional steps as may be necessary to qualify the Shares for public offering by the Underwriter under State securities or Blue Sky laws) has been obtained or made and is in full force and effect. (xv) The Company and each of the Subsidiaries possess all certificates, authorizations and permits issued by the appropriate federal, state or foreign regulatory authorities necessary to conduct its business, other than those which, if not so possessed, would not result in a Material Adverse Change, and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authorization or permit which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would result in a Material Adverse Change, except as described the Prospectus. (xvi) The Company and each of the Subsidiaries own or possess, or believes that it would be able to license on reasonable and customary terms, all material patents, patent rights, licenses, inventions, copyrights, know-how (including trade secrets and other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures), trademarks, service marks and trade names currently employed by it in connection with the business now operated by it in the manner in which it is conducted, and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries have received any notice of infringement of, or conflict with, asserted rights of others with respect to any of the foregoing which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would be reasonably likely to result in a Material Adverse Change. (xvii) Neither the Company, nor to the Company's knowledge, any of its affiliates, has taken or intends to take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to cause or result in, or which has constituted or which might reasonably be expected to constitute, the stabilization or 5
manipulation of the price of the shares of the Company's Common Stock to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares. The Company acknowledges that the Underwriter may engage in passive market making transactions in the Shares on the Nasdaq National Market in accordance with Regulation M under the Exchange Act. (xviii) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is an "investment company" within the meaning of such term under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "1940 Act") and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder or, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Shares contemplated hereunder and the application of the net proceeds from such sale as described in the Prospectus, will be required to register as an "investment company" pursuant to the 1940 Act. (xix) The Company and each of its Subsidiaries maintains a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals. (xx) The Company is not aware of (i) any significant deficiencies or material weaknesses in the design or operation of its internal controls over financial reporting which are reasonably likely to adversely affect its ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information or (ii) any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a role in the registrant's internal control over financial reporting. The Company is not aware of any change in its internal controls over financial reporting that has occurred since the date of the most recent evaluation of such internal controls that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal controls over financial reporting. (xxi) The Company and each of its Subsidiaries (i) is in compliance with any and all applicable foreign, federal, state and local laws and regulations relating to the protection of human health and safety, the environment or hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants (the "Environmental Laws"), (ii) has received all permits, licenses or other approvals required of it under applicable Environmental Laws to conduct its business and (iii) is in compliance with all terms and conditions of any such permit, license or approval, except where such noncompliance with Environmental Laws, failure to receive required permits, licenses or other approvals or failure to comply with the terms and conditions of such permits, licenses or approvals would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in a Material Adverse Change. 6
(xxii) There are no costs or liabilities associated with Environmental Laws (including, without limitation, any capital or operating expenditures required for clean-up, closure of properties or compliance with Environmental Laws or any permit, license or approval, any related constraints on operating activities and any potential liabilities to third parties) which would, singly or in the aggregate, result in a Material Adverse Change. (xxiii) No material labor dispute with the employees of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries exists, except as described in the Prospectus, or, to the knowledge of the Company, is imminent; and the Company is not aware of any existing, threatened or imminent labor disturbance by the employees of any of its principal suppliers, manufacturers or contractors that could result in a Material Adverse Change. (xxiv) The Company and each of its Subsidiaries are insured by the insurers of recognized financial responsibility against such losses and risks and in such amounts as, in the Company's reasonable judgment, are prudent and customary in the businesses in which they are engaged; neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has been refused any insurance coverage sought or applied for; and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any reason to believe that it will not be able to renew its existing insurance coverage as and when such coverage expires or to obtain similar coverage from similar insurers as may be necessary to continue its business at a cost that would not result in a Material Adverse Change, except as described in the Prospectus. (xxv) There are no contracts, agreements or understandings between the Company and any person granting such person the right to require the Company to file a registration statement under the Securities Act with respect to any securities of the Company, except as has been satisfied or waived. No such contract, agreement or understanding contains a provision requiring the Company to include such securities with the Shares registered pursuant to the Registration Statement. (xxvi) The Company has established and maintains and evaluates "disclosure controls and procedures" (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15 and 15d-15 under the Exchange Act) and "internal control over financial reporting" (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15 and 15d-15 under the Exchange Act); such disclosure controls and procedures are designed to ensure that material information relating to the Company, including its consolidated Subsidiaries, is made known to the Company's Chief Executive Officer and its Chief Financial Officer by others within those entities, and such disclosure controls and procedures are effective to perform the functions for which they were established. (xxvii) Solely to the extent that the Sarbanes-Oxley Act has been applicable to the Company, there is and has been no failure on the part of the Company to comply in all material respects with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act. The Company has taken all necessary actions to ensure that it is in compliance with all provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act that are in effect and with which the Company is required to comply and is actively taking steps to ensure that it will be in compliance with other provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act not currently in effect or which will become applicable to the Company. (xxviii) There are no relationships or related-party transactions involving the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any other person required to be described in the Prospectus which have not been described as required. 2. Purchase, Sale and Delivery of the Firm Shares and the Option shares. 7
(a) On the basis of the representations, warranties and covenants herein contained, and subject to the conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to sell to the Underwriter and the Underwriter agrees to purchase, at a price of $16.855 per Share, the Firm Shares. (b) Payment for the Firm Shares to be sold hereunder is to be made in Federal (same day) funds to an account designated by the Company against delivery of certificates for the account of the Underwriter. Such payment and delivery are to be made through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company at 10:00 a.m., New York time, on the third business day after the date of this Agreement or at such other time and date not later than five business days thereafter as you and the Company shall agree upon, such time and date being herein referred to as the "Closing Date." (As used herein, "business day" means a day on which the New York Stock Exchange is open for trading and on which banks in New York are open for business and not permitted by law or executive order to be closed.) (c) In addition, on the basis of the representations and warranties herein contained and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company hereby grants an option to the Underwriter to purchase the Option Shares at the price per Share as set forth in the first paragraph of this Section 2. The option granted hereby may be exercised in whole or in part by giving written notice (i) at any time before the Closing Date and (ii) only once thereafter within 30 days after the date of this Agreement, to the Company, setting forth the number of Option Shares as to which the Underwriter is exercising the option and the time and date at which such certificates are to be delivered. The time and date at which certificates for Option Shares are to be delivered shall be determined by the Underwriter but shall not be earlier than three nor later than 10 full business days after the exercise of such option, nor in any event prior to the Closing Date (such time and date being herein referred to as the "Option Closing Date"). If the date of exercise of the option is three or more days before the Closing Date, the notice of exercise shall set the Closing Date as the Option Closing Date. The option with respect to the Option Shares granted hereunder may be exercised only to cover over-allotments in the sale of the Firm Shares by the Underwriter. You may cancel such option at any time prior to its expiration by giving written notice of such cancellation to the Company. To the extent, if any, that the option is exercised, payment for the Option Shares shall be made on the Option Closing Date in Federal (same day) funds drawn to the order of the Company for the Option Shares to be sold by it against delivery of certificates therefor through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company, New York, New York. 3. Offering by the Underwriter. It is understood that the Underwriter is to make a public offering of the Firm Shares as soon as the Underwriter deems it advisable to do so. The Firm Shares are to be initially offered to the public at the offering price set forth in the Prospectus. 4. Covenants of the Company. (a) The Company covenants and agrees with the Underwriter that: (i) The Company will (A) use its best efforts to prepare and timely file with the Commission under Rule 424(b) of the rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated 8
pursuant to the Securities Act a Prospectus in a form approved by the Underwriter containing information previously omitted at the time of effectiveness of the Registration Statement and (B) not file any amendment to the Registration Statement or supplement to the Prospectus of which the Underwriter shall not previously have been advised and furnished with a copy or to which the Underwriter shall have reasonably objected in writing or which is not in compliance with the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder. (ii) The Company will advise the Underwriter promptly of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or the use of the Prospectus or of the institution of any proceedings for that purpose. The Company will use its reasonable best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such stop order preventing or suspending the use of the Prospectus and to obtain as soon as possible the lifting thereof, if issued. (iii) The Company will cooperate with the Underwriter in endeavoring to qualify the Shares for sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions as the Underwriter may reasonably have designated in writing and will make such applications, file such documents, and furnish such information as may be reasonably required for that purpose, provided the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction where it is not now so qualified or required to file such a consent. The Company will, from time to time, prepare and file such statements, reports, and other documents, as are or may be required to continue such qualifications in effect for so long a period as the Underwriter may reasonably request for distribution of the Shares. (iv) The Company will deliver to, or upon the order of, the Underwriter, from time to time, as many copies of any preliminary prospectus as the Underwriter may reasonably request. The Company will deliver to, or upon the order of, the Underwriter during the period when delivery of a Prospectus is required under the Securities Act, as many copies of the Prospectus in final form, or as thereafter amended or supplemented, as the Underwriter may reasonably request. (v) The Company will comply with the Securities Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, and the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, so as to permit the completion of the distribution of the Shares as contemplated in this Agreement and the Prospectus. If during the period in which a prospectus is required by the Securities Act to be delivered by the Underwriter or dealer, any event shall occur as a result of which it becomes necessary to amend or supplement the Prospectus in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing at the time the Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading, or, if it is necessary at any time to amend or supplement the Prospectus to comply with any law, the Company promptly will prepare and file with the Commission an appropriate amendment to the Registration Statement or supplement to the Prospectus so that the Prospectus as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances when it is so delivered, be misleading, or so that the Prospectus will comply with the law. (vi) The Company will make generally available to its security holders, as soon as it is practicable to do so, but in any event not later than 15 months after the effective date of 9
the Registration Statement, an earnings statement (which need not be audited) in reasonable detail, covering a period of at least 12 consecutive months beginning after the effective date of the Registration Statement, which earnings statement shall satisfy the requirements of Section 11(a) of the Act and Rule 158 of the Rules and Regulations and will advise you in writing when such statement has been so made available. (vii) No offering, sale, short sale or other disposition of any shares of Common Stock of the Company or other securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for shares of the Company's Common Stock or derivative of such Common Stock (or agreement for such), including the filing of any registration statement under the Securities Act (other than registration statements on Form S-8) or any other arrangement that transfers to another, in whole or in part, any of the economic consequences of ownership of Common Stock of the Company, will be made for a period of 90 days after the date of this Agreement, directly or indirectly, by the Company otherwise than hereunder or with the prior written consent of the Underwriter, provided, however, that the Company may (A) grant stock options, restricted stock, deferred stock units or other stock-based awards to employees, consultants or directors pursuant to the terms of its plans in effect on the date hereof and described in the Prospectus or incorporated by reference therein, (B) issue shares of its Common Stock pursuant to: (1) the exercise of such options and stock-based awards, (2) the exercise of any employee stock options outstanding on the date hereof and (3) the distribution of vested deferred stock units in effect as of the date hereof, (C) issue shares of its Common Stock upon the conversion of convertible securities issued prior to the date hereof and described in the Prospectus or incorporated by reference therein, (D) issue shares of its Common Stock or other securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for shares of its Common Stock or derivative of its Common Stock (or enter into agreements for such) in connection with one or more acquisitions by the Company of assets, capital stock or businesses of unaffiliated persons or entities (whether by mergers, exchanges of stock or otherwise), or in connection with the entering into of one or more strategic partnering agreements with unaffiliated entities, or (E) issue shares in connection with the acquisition by the Company or one of its Subsidiaries of the assets or capital stock of another person or entity, whether through merger, asset acquisition, stock purchase or otherwise, provided that, in the case of clauses (D) and (E), each person or entity receiving any such securities of the Company (or entering into any agreement for such) pursuant to any such acquisition or agreement shall enter into a letter agreement with transfer restriction terms (including a lock-up period continuing for 90 days after the date of this Agreement) equivalent to those set forth above in this sentence. (viii) The Company will use its best efforts to list the Shares for quotation on the Nasdaq National Market. (ix) The Company has caused each of its directors listed on Schedule II hereto to furnish to you, on or prior to the date of this Agreement, a letter or letters, in the form attached hereto as Exhibit I, pursuant to which each such person has agreed not to offer, sell, sell short or otherwise dispose of any shares of Common Stock of the Company or other capital stock of the Company, or any other securities convertible, exchangeable or exercisable for such Common Stock or derivative of such Common Stock owned by such person or request the registration for the offer or sale of any of the foregoing (or as to which such person has the right to direct the 10
disposition of) for a period of 90 days after the date of this Agreement, directly or indirectly, except with the prior written consent of the Underwriter ("Lockup Agreements"). (x) The Company shall apply the net proceeds of the sale of Shares as set forth in the Prospectus. (xi) The Company shall not invest, or otherwise use the proceeds received by the Company from its sale of the Shares in such a manner as would require the Company or any of the Subsidiaries to register as an investment company under the 1940 Act. 5. Costs and Expenses. The Company will pay all costs, expenses and fees incident to the performance of the obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the following: accounting fees of the Company; the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Company; the cost of printing and delivering to, or as requested by, the Underwriter copies of the Registration Statement, Preliminary Prospectuses, the Prospectus, this Agreement, the Underwriter's Selling Memorandum (if any), the Underwriters' Invitation Letter (if any), the Listing Application and any supplements or amendments thereto; the filing fees of the Commission; the filing fees and expenses (including reasonable legal fees and disbursements) incident to securing any required review by the NASD of the terms of the sale of the Shares; the Listing Fee of the Nasdaq National Market; and the expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriter incurred in connection with the qualification of the Shares under State securities or Blue Sky laws. The Company shall not, however, be required to pay for any of the Underwriter's expenses (other than to the extent set forth in the preceding sentence with respect to expenses related to qualification under NASD regulations and State securities or Blue Sky laws) except that, if this Agreement shall not be consummated, in accordance with the terms hereof, because the conditions in Section 6 hereof are not satisfied, unless such failure is due primarily to the default or omission of the Underwriter, or because this Agreement is terminated by the Underwriter pursuant to Section 10 hereof, or by reason of any failure, refusal or inability on the part of the Company to perform any undertaking or satisfy any condition of this Agreement or to comply with any of the terms hereof on their part to be performed, unless such failure, refusal or inability is due primarily to the default or omission of the Underwriter, the Company shall reimburse the Underwriter for reasonable out-of-pocket expenses, including reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel, reasonably incurred in connection with investigating, marketing and proposing to market the Shares or in contemplation of performing its obligations hereunder. 6. Conditions of Obligations of the Underwriter. The obligation of the Underwriter to purchase the Firm Shares on the Closing Date and the Option Shares, if any, on the Option Closing Date are subject to the accuracy, as of the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, of the representations and warranties of the Company contained herein, and to the performance in all material respects by the Company of its covenants and obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions: 11
(a) The Registration Statement and all post-effective amendments thereto shall have become effective and any and all filings required by Rule 424 and Rule 430A of the Securities Act shall have been made within the applicable time period prescribed by, and in compliance with the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated under the Securities Act, and any request of the Commission for additional information (to be included in the Registration Statement or otherwise) shall have been disclosed to the Underwriter and complied with to its reasonable satisfaction. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, as amended from time to time, shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been taken or, to the knowledge of the Company, shall be contemplated or threatened by the Commission and no injunction, restraining order or order of any nature by a Federal or State court of competent jurisdiction shall have been issued as of the Closing Date which would prevent the issuance of the Shares. (b) The Underwriter shall have received on the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, the opinions of Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP, counsel for the Company, dated the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, addressed to the Underwriter substantially to the effect that: (i) The Company is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware and has the corporate power and authority to carry on its business and to own, lease and operate its properties, as such business and properties are described in the Prospectus. (ii) The Company is duly qualified and is in good standing as a foreign corporation authorized to do business in the States identified in such opinion. (iii) The Shares to be sold by the Company have been duly authorized and, when issued and delivered to the Underwriter against payment therefor as provided by this Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and non assessable, and the issuance of such Shares will not be subject to any preemptive rights under the Delaware General Corporation Law statute or the Charter of the Company. (iv) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company. (v) Except as may be required under the Securities Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, no filing with, or authorization, approval, consent, license, order, registration, qualification or decree of, any United States federal or Massachusetts state governmental authority or agency is necessary for the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the issuance, sale and delivery of Shares by the Company to the Underwriter pursuant to this Agreement. (vi) The statements in the Prospectus under the captions "Description of Common Stock and Preferred Stock", insofar as such statements constitute matters of law or legal conclusions are correct in all material respects. 12
(vii) The Company is not and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Shares and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Prospectus, will not be an "investment company," as such term is defined in the 1940 Act. In addition to the matters set forth above, such counsel shall confirm to you as follows: In the course of acting as counsel for the Company in connection with the preparation of the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, such counsel participated in conferences with officers and other representatives of the Company, representatives of and counsel for the Underwriter and representatives of the independent public accountants of the Company, during which the contents of the Registration Statement and the Prospectus were discussed. While the limitations inherent in the independent verification of factual matters and the character of determinations involved in the registration process are such that such counsel does not pass upon or assume any responsibility for the accuracy, completeness or fairness of the statements contained in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus (except to the extent expressly set forth pursuant to paragraph (vi) above), subject to the foregoing and based on such participation and discussions: (A) the Registration Statement, as of its effective date, and the Prospectus, as of the date thereof (except for the financial statements, including the notes thereto, and other financial, statistical and accounting data and information, and information relating to the Underwriter and the method of distribution of the Shares by the Underwriter included therein or omitted therefrom, as to which such counsel need express no view) appear on their face to be appropriately responsive in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, (B) no facts have come to the attention of such counsel that have caused such counsel to believe that (1) the Registration Statement, at the time the Registration Statement became effective, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading (except as set forth in the parenthetical in clause (A) above) or (2) the Prospectus, as of the date it was filed with the Commission pursuant to Rules 424(b) under the Securities Act and as of the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, contained or contains an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (except as set forth in the parenthetical in clause (A) above), (C) such counsel is not aware of any contract or other document of a character required by the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement that is not so filed, and (D) such counsel is not aware of any action, proceeding or litigation pending, contemplated or threatened against the Company before any court or governmental or administrative agency or body that is required by the Securities Act or the rules and regulations thereunder to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus that is not so described. (c) The Underwriter shall have received on the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, the opinion of Melanie Haratunian, General Counsel for the Company, 13
dated the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, addressed to the Underwriter to the effect that the execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby will not conflict with or constitute a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or a default under the Charter, By-Laws, any indenture, loan agreement, mortgage, lease or other agreement or instrument that is material to the Company. (d) The Underwriter shall have received on the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, an intellectual property opinion of The Law Offices of David Judson, intellectual property counsel for the Company, dated the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, addressed to the Underwriter (and stating that it may be relied upon by counsel to the Underwriter) substantially in a form previously approved by you. (e) The Underwriter shall have received from Ropes & Gray LLP, counsel for the Underwriter, an opinion dated the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, substantially to the effect that: (i) The Company is validly existing as a corporation and in good standing under Delaware law. (ii) The Shares have been duly authorized and, when issued and delivered in accordance with the terms of this Agreement against payment of the consideration set forth therein, will be validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable. (iii) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company. In addition to the matters set forth above, such opinion shall also include a statement that no facts have come to the attention of such counsel that have caused such counsel to believe that (i) the Registration Statement (as amended by any post-effective amendment filed prior to the date of such opinion), at the time the Registration Statement (or such post-effective amendment) became effective, and the Registration Statement as supplemented by the Prospectus and the Prospectus (as supplemented) specifically relating to the Shares, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or (ii) the Prospectus, as of the date it was filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act and as of the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, contained or contains an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (except that, in the case of clauses (i) and (ii) above, such counsel need express no view as to financial statements and related notes and other financial, statistical and accounting data and information therein). With respect to such statement, Ropes & Gray LLP may state that their belief is based upon the procedures set forth therein, but is without independent check and verification. (f) You shall have received, on each of the date hereof, the Closing Date and, if applicable, the Option Closing Date, a letter dated the date hereof, the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, in form and substance satisfactory to you, of 14
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP confirming that they are independent public accountants within the meaning of the Securities Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and stating that in their opinion the financial statements examined by them and included in the Registration Statement comply in form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the Securities Act and the related published rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder; and containing such other statements and information as is ordinarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to Underwriter with respect to the financial statements and certain financial and statistical information contained in the Registration Statement and Prospectus. (g) The Underwriter shall have received on the Closing Date and, if applicable, the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, a certificate or certificates of the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer of the Company to the effect that as of the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, each of them represents on behalf of the Company that the representations and warranties of the Company contained in Section 1 hereof are true and correct as of the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be. (h) You shall have received on the date hereof a letter of BDO Seidman, LLP, dated October 26, 2005, in the form attached hereto as Exhibit II. (i) The Company shall have furnished to the Underwriter such further certificates and documents confirming the representations and warranties, covenants and conditions contained herein and related matters as the Underwriter may reasonably have requested. (j) The Firm Shares and Option Shares, if any, have been approved for quotation upon notice of issuance on the Nasdaq National Market. (k) The Lockup Agreements described in Section 4(ix) are in full force and effect. If any of the conditions hereinabove provided for in this Section 6 shall not have been fulfilled when and as required by this Agreement to be fulfilled, the obligations of the Underwriter hereunder may be terminated by the Underwriter by notifying the Company of such termination in writing at or prior to the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be. In such event, the Company and the Underwriter shall not be under any obligation to each other (except to the extent provided in Sections 5 and 8 hereof). 7. Conditions of the Obligations of the Company. The obligations of the Company to sell and deliver the Shares required to be delivered as and when specified in this Agreement are subject to the conditions that: (a) at the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and in effect or proceedings therefor initiated or threatened. 15
(b) the Underwriter provide a letter acknowledging and agreeing that the only information furnished or to be furnished by the Underwriter to the Company for inclusion in any Prospectus or the Registration Statement consists of the information set forth in the third, tenth and twelfth paragraphs under the caption "Underwriting" in the Prospectus. 8. Indemnification. (a) The Company agrees: (i) to indemnify and hold harmless the Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls the Underwriter within the meaning of either Section 15 of the Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which such Underwriter or any such controlling person may become subject under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon (A) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto and (B) the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances under which they were made; provided, however, that the Company will not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability of the Underwriter or controlling person arises out of or is based upon (A) an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in, or the omission or alleged omission of a material fact from, any Preliminary Prospectus that was corrected in the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, if such Underwriter sold Shares to the person alleging such loss, claim, damage or liability without sending or giving, at or prior to the written confirmation of the sale of such Shares, a copy of the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, but only if the Company has previously furnished copies of the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement to the Underwriter, or (B) an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement contained in, or the omission or alleged omission of a material fact from, the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus, or such amendment or supplement, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or through the Underwriter specifically for use in the preparation thereof; and (ii) except as otherwise provided in Section 8(a)(i), to reimburse the Underwriter and each such controlling person upon demand for any reasonable legal or other out-of-pocket expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage or liability, action or proceeding or in responding to a subpoena or governmental inquiry related to the offering of the Shares, whether or not such Underwriter or controlling person is a party to any action or proceeding. In the event that it is finally judicially determined that the Underwriter was not entitled to receive payments for legal and other expenses pursuant to this subparagraph, the Underwriter will promptly return all sums that had been advanced pursuant hereto. (b) The Underwriter will indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors, each of its officers who have signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Securities Act, against any losses, claims, 16
damages or liabilities to which the Company or any such director, officer, or controlling person may become subject under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, or (ii) the omission or the alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances under which they were made; and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company or any such director, officer, or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability, action or proceeding; provided, however, that the Underwriter will be liable in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission has been made in the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or such amendment or supplement, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or through the Underwriter specifically for use in the preparation thereof. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Underwriter may otherwise have. (c) In case any proceeding (including any governmental investigation) shall be instituted involving any person in respect of which indemnity may be sought pursuant to this Section 8, such person (the "indemnified party") shall promptly notify the person against whom such indemnity may be sought (the "indemnifying party") in writing. No indemnification provided for in Sections 8(a)(i), 8(a)(ii) or 8(b) shall be available to any party who shall fail to give notice as provided in this Section 8(c) if the party to whom notice was not given was unaware of the proceeding to which such notice would have related and was materially prejudiced by the failure to give such notice, but the failure to give such notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party or parties from any liability which it or they may have to the indemnified party for contribution or otherwise than on account of the provisions of Sections 8(a)(i), 8(a)(ii) or 8(b). In case any such proceeding shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party and shall pay as incurred the fees and disbursements of such counsel related to such proceeding. In any such proceeding, any indemnified party shall have the right to retain its own counsel at its own expense. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the indemnifying party shall pay as incurred (or within 30 days of presentation) the reasonable fees and expenses of the counsel retained by the indemnified party in the event (i) the indemnifying party and the indemnified party shall have mutually agreed to the retention of such counsel, (ii) the named parties to any such proceeding (including any impleaded parties) include both the indemnifying party and the indemnified party and representation of both parties by the same counsel would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between them or (iii) the indemnifying party shall have failed to assume the defense and employ counsel acceptable to the indemnified party within a reasonable period of time after notice of commencement of the action. It is understood that the indemnifying party shall not, in connection with any proceeding or related proceedings in the same jurisdiction, be liable for the reasonable fees and expenses of more than one separate firm for all such indemnified parties. Such firm shall be designated in writing by the Underwriter in the case of party indemnified pursuant to Section 8(a) and by the Company in the case of a party indemnified 17
pursuant to Section 8(b). The indemnifying party shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify the indemnified party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. In addition, the indemnifying party will not, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment in any pending or threatened claim, action or proceeding of which indemnification may be sought hereunder (whether or not any indemnified party is an actual or potential party to such claim, action or proceeding) unless such settlement, compromise or consent includes an unconditional release of the indemnified party from all liability arising out of such claim, action or proceeding. (d) To the extent the indemnification provided for in this Section 8 is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under Section 8(a) or (b) above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) referred to therein, then the indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriter on the other from the offering of the Shares. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law then the indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriter on the other in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriter on the other shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from the offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company bear to the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriter, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover page of the Prospectus. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company on the one hand or the Underwriter on the other and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The Company and the Underwriter agree that it would not be just and equitable if contributions pursuant to this Section 8(d) were determined by pro rata allocation or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Section 8(d). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) referred to above in this Section 8(d) shall be deemed to include any reasonable legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), (i) the Underwriter shall not be required to contribute any amount in excess of the underwriting discounts and commissions applicable to the Shares purchased by the Underwriter, and (ii) no person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. 18
(e) In any proceeding relating to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus or any supplement or amendment thereto, each party against whom contribution may be sought under this Section 8 hereby consents to the jurisdiction of any court having jurisdiction over the other contributing party, agrees that process issuing from such court may be served upon it by the other contributing party and consents to the service of such process and agrees that the other contributing party may join it as an additional defendant in any such proceeding in which such other contributing party is a party. (f) Any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses for which an indemnified party is entitled to indemnification or contribution under this Section 8 shall be paid by the indemnifying party to the indemnified party as such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses are incurred. The indemnity and contribution agreements contained in this Section 8 and the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Agreement shall remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of (i) any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or any person controlling the Underwriter, the Company, its directors or officers or any persons controlling the Company, (ii) acceptance of any Shares and payment therefor hereunder, and (iii) any termination of this Agreement. A successor to the Underwriter, or any person controlling the Underwriter, or to the Company, its directors or officers, or any person controlling the Company, shall be entitled to the benefits of the indemnity, contribution and reimbursement agreements contained in this Section 8. 9. Notices. All communications hereunder shall be in writing and, except as otherwise provided herein, will be mailed or delivered and confirmed as follows: if to the Underwriter, to Deutsche Bank Securities Inc.,Underwriter address] and Ropes & Gray LLP, One International Place, Boston, Massachusetts 02110, Attention: Keith F. Higgins, Esq.; if to the Company, to Akamai Technologies, Inc., 8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142, Attention: General Counsel, with a copy to Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP, 60 State Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02109, Attention: Susan W. Murley, Esq. 10. Termination. This Agreement may be terminated by you by notice to the Company (a) at any time prior to the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date (if different from the Closing Date and then only as to Option Shares) if any of the following has occurred: (i) since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus, any Material Adverse Change, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, (ii) any outbreak or escalation of hostilities or declaration of war or national emergency or other national or international calamity or crisis or change in economic or political conditions if the effect of such outbreak, escalation, declaration, emergency, calamity, crisis or change on the financial markets of the United States would, in your reasonable judgment, make it impracticable or inadvisable to market the Shares or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Shares, or (iii) suspension of trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange, the American Stock Exchange or the Nasdaq National Market or limitation on prices (other than limitations on hours or numbers of days of trading) for securities on either such Exchange or National Market, (iv) the enactment, publication, decree or other promulgation of any statute, 19
regulation, rule or order of any court or other governmental authority which in your opinion materially and adversely affects or may materially and adversely affect the business or operations of the Company, (v) the declaration of a banking moratorium by United States or New York State authorities, (vi) any downgrading, or placement on any watch list for possible downgrading, in the rating of any of the Company's debt securities by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the Exchange Act), (vii) the suspension of trading of the Company's Common Stock by the Nasdaq National Market, the Commission, or any other governmental authority or (viii) the taking of any action by any governmental body or agency in respect of its monetary or fiscal affairs which in your reasonable opinion has a material adverse effect on the securities markets in the United States; or (b) as provided in Section 6 of this Agreement. 11. Successors. This Agreement has been and is made solely for the benefit of the Underwriter and the Company and their respective successors, executors, administrators, heirs and assigns, and the officers, directors and controlling persons referred to herein, and no other person will have any right or obligation hereunder. No purchaser of any of the Shares from the Underwriter shall be deemed a successor or assign merely because of such purchase. 12. Miscellaneous. The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Underwriter in providing investment banking services to the Company in connection with the offering, including in acting pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, has acted and is acting as an independent contractor and not as a fiduciary and the Company does not intend such Underwriter to act in any capacity other than independent contractor, including as a fiduciary or in any other position of higher trust. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of New York without regard to the conflict of laws provisions thereof. If the foregoing letter is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to us the enclosed duplicates hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement between the Company and the Underwriter in accordance with its terms. [reminder of this page intentionally left blank] 20
Very truly yours, AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: /s/ Paul Sagan -------------------------------------- Paul Sagan, Chief Executive Officer The foregoing Underwriting Agreement is hereby confirmed and accepted as of the date first above written. DEUTSCHE BANK SECURITIES INC. By: /s/ Michael P. Murray -------------------------- Michael P. Murray, Managing Director By: /s/ Edward R. Arnstein -------------------------- Edward R. Arnstein, Director 21
SCHEDULE I SCHEDULE OF SUBSIDIARIES AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES Ltd. -- Incorporated in the United Kingdom AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES GMBH -- Incorporated in Germany AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES SARL -- Incorporated in France AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES NETHERLANDS BV - Incorporated in the Netherlands AKAMAI INTERNAIONAL BV - Incorporated in the Netherlands AKAMAI SECURITIES TRUST -- Registered in Massachusetts K STREAMING LLC - Organized in Delaware AKAMAI SALES LLC - Organized in Delaware AKAMAI JAPAN KK - Incorporated in Japan KAHUA HK LIMITED - Organized in Hong Kong SPEEDERA NETWORKS, INC. - Incorporated in Delaware AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES INDIA PRIVATE LTD. - Incorporated in India 22
SCHEDULE II SCHEDULE OF PARTIES SUBJECT TO LOCK-UP AGREEMENTS William A. Halter Peter J. Kight Frederic V. Salerno George H. Conrades Martin M. Coyne II C. Kim Goodwin Ronald Graham F. Thomas Leighton Paul Sagan Naomi O. Seligman Lisa Arthur Melanie Haratunian Robert Hughes Chris Schoettle Robert Cobuzzi Cathy Welsh 23
EXHIBIT I FORM OF LOCK-UP AGREEMENT October 31, 2005 Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. 60 Wall Street New York, NY 10005 Dear Sirs and Mesdames: The undersigned understands that Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "COMPANY"), proposes to enter into an underwriting agreement (the "UNDERWRITING AGREEMENT") with an underwriter (the "UNDERWRITER") of a proposed offering (the "OFFERING") of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company (the "COMMON STOCK"). To induce the Underwriter to continue its efforts in connection with the Offering, the undersigned hereby agrees that, without the prior written consent and waiver of the Underwriter, the undersigned will not, during the period commencing on the date hereof and ending on January 30, 2006, (1) offer, pledge, sell, contract to sell, sell any option or contract to purchase, purchase any option or contract to sell, grant any option, right or warrant to purchase, lend, or otherwise transfer or dispose of, directly or indirectly, any shares of Common Stock or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock, or (2) enter into any swap or other arrangement that transfers to another, in whole or in part, any of the economic consequences of ownership of Common Stock, whether any such transaction described in clause (1) or (2) above is to be settled by delivery of Common Stock or such other securities, in cash or otherwise. The foregoing sentence shall not apply to (i) dispositions of shares of Common Stock pursuant to a written plan for trading securities that is designed to satisfy the requirements of Rule 10b5-1 promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "EXCHANGE ACT") and is existing on the date hereof and (ii) transactions relating to shares of Common Stock or other securities acquired by the undersigned in open market transactions or the sale or transfer of shares to the acquiror in connection with the sale of the Company pursuant to a merger, sale of stock, sale of assets or otherwise. In addition, the undersigned agrees that, without the prior written consent of the manager or managers, it will not, during the period commencing on the date hereof and ending on January 30, 2006, make any demand for or exercise any right with respect to, the registration of any shares of Common Stock or any security convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Common Stock, cause to be filed a registration statement with respect to Common Stock or such securities or publicly announce the intention to do any of the foregoing . 24
Notwithstanding the foregoing: (i) bona fide gifts and transfers by will or intestacy; or (ii) dispositions or transfers to (A) the undersigned's members, partners, stockholders, affiliates or immediate family, (B) trusts, family limited partnerships or family limited liability companies for the direct or indirect benefit of the undersigned and/or members of the undersigned's immediate family, or (C) a trust or other entity for charitable and/or estate or financial planning purposes, shall not be prohibited by this agreement; provided, that in the case of any transfer or disposition pursuant to clauses (i) or (ii) of this sentence, each donee or transferee shall agree in writing to be bound by the foregoing in the same manner as it applies to the undersigned. For purposes hereof, "immediate family" shall mean the undersigned and the spouse, any lineal descendant, father, mother, brother or sister of the undersigned and any lineal descendant, father, mother, brother or sister of the undersigned's spouse. The undersigned agrees that the terms of this lock-up supersede the terms of any and all other lock-ups relating to Common Stock of the Company entered into by the undersigned prior to the date hereof. If (1) the Company notifies you in writing that it does not intend to proceed with the Offering, (2) the registration statement or prospectus filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission with respect to the Offering is withdrawn, (3) for any reason the Underwriting Agreement shall be terminated prior to the Closing Date (as defined in the Underwriting Agreement), or (4) the Closing Date shall not have occurred by November 15, 2005, this agreement shall be terminated and the undersigned shall be released from any obligations hereunder. [REMAINDER OF THIS PAGE INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK] 25
The undersigned executes this lock-up agreement as of the date above written. Very truly yours, ------------------------------------ (Print Name - Individual or Entity) ------------------------------------ (Signature) ------------------------------------ (Title, if applicable) ------------------------------------ ------------------------------------ ------------------------------------ (Address) 26

 
November 2, 2005
Akamai Technologies, Inc. 8 Cambridge Center Cambridge, MA 02142
Ladies and Gentlemen:
This opinion is furnished to you in connection with (i) the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-53906) (the "Registration Statement") filed by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), for the registration of shares of common stock, $0.01 par value per share (the "Common Stock"), preferred stock, $0.01 per value per share, debt securities and warrants of the Company, all of which may be issued from time to time on a delayed or continuous basis pursuant to Rule 415 under the Securities Act at an aggregate initial offering price not to exceed $500,000,000; and (ii) the prospectus supplement, dated October 31, 2005 (the "Prospectus Supplement") relating to the issue and sale of up to 13,800,000 shares of Common Stock of the Company (the "Shares") (including 1,800,000 Shares issuable upon exercise of an over-allotment option granted to the Underwriter (as defined below)).
The Shares are to be sold by the Company pursuant to an underwriting agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") entered into by and between the Company and Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. (the "Underwriter"), which has been filed as Exhibit 1.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K, dated October 31, 2005, as filed with the Commission on the date hereof.
We are acting as counsel for the Company in connection with the issue and sale by the Company of the Shares. We have examined signed copies of the Registration Statement and a copy of the Prospectus Supplement, each as filed with the Commission. We have also examined and relied upon the Underwriting Agreement, minutes of meetings of the stockholders and the Board of Directors, including committees thereof, of the Company as provided to us by the Company, the Certificate of Incorporation and By-Laws of the Company, each as restated and/or amended to date, and such other documents as we have deemed necessary for purposes of rendering the opinions hereinafter set forth.
In our examination of the foregoing documents, we have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the conformity to original documents of all documents submitted to us as copies, the authenticity of the originals of such latter documents and the legal competence of all signatories to such documents.
We express no opinion herein as to the laws of any state or jurisdiction other than the state laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware and the federal laws of the United States of America.
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. November 2, 2005 Page 2
Based upon and subject to the foregoing, we are of the opinion that the Shares have been duly authorized for issuance and, when the Shares are issued and paid for in accordance with the terms and conditions of the Underwriting Agreement, the Shares will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
It is understood that this opinion is to be used only in connection with the offer and sale of the Shares while the Registration Statement is in effect and may not be used, quoted or relied upon for any other purpose nor may this opinion be furnished to, quoted to or relied upon by any other person or entity, for any purpose, without our prior written consent.
Please note that we are opining only as to the matters expressly set forth herein, and no opinion should be inferred as to any other matters. This opinion is based upon currently existing statutes, rules, regulations and judicial decisions, and we disclaim any obligation to advise you of any change in any of these sources of law or subsequent legal or factual developments which might affect any matters or opinions set forth herein.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion in accordance with the requirements of Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K under the Securities Act with the Commission as an exhibit to the Current Report on Form 8-K to be filed by the Company in connection with the issue and sale of the Shares and to the use of our name in the Prospectus Supplement under the caption "Legal Matters." In giving such consent, we do not hereby admit that we are in the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act or the rules and regulations of the Commission.
Very truly yours,
Wilmer Cutler Pickering
Hale and Dorr LLP

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
     
AKAMAI ANNOUNCES PRICING OF PUBLIC OFFERING OF COMMON STOCK
 Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), announced today a public offering of 12,000,000 shares of its common stock. The Company anticipates receiving gross proceeds from this offering of approximately $208 million, based on yesterday's closing sale price of the Company's common stock of $17.34 per share, before discount to the underwriter and other expenses of the offering. Akamai has granted to the underwriter a 30-day option to purchase up to 1,800,000 additional shares of common stock to cover over-allotments, if any. Akamai expects the issuance and delivery of the shares to occur on November 3, 2005.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  November 1, 2005
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. served as the underwriter of the offering.
This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be the sale of any of these securities in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to the registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction. The offering was made only by means of a prospectus. A copy of the final prospectus relating to these securities may be obtained from Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. (60 Wall Street, New York, New York, 10005).
Statements in this press release contain "forward-looking" information within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Such statements involve a number of risks and uncertainties. Those factors include conditions in the financial markets and customary offering closing conditions. Please see Akamai's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission for certain other factors that may affect forward-looking information.
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,800 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
About Akamai
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20051103170027.txt.gz
TIME:20051103170027
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 8.01 Other Events.
     On November 3, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") completed the public offering of 12,000,000 shares of its common stock. Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. served as the underwriter of the offering. On November 3, 2005, the Company issued a press release announcing the completion of the offering. A copy of the press release is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), today announced it has completed the previously-announced public offering of 12,000,000 shares of its common stock.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  November 3, 2005
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. acted as the underwriter for the offering.
A copy of the final prospectus relating to these securities may be obtained from Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. (60 Wall Street, New York, New York, 10005).
This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any state or jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction.
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,800 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
About Akamai
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20060208161521.txt.gz
TIME:20060208161521
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On February 8, 2006, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
Exhibit 99.1
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2005. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2005 was $82.7 million, a 9 percent increase over the previous quarter's revenue of $75.7 million, and a 44 percent increase over fourth quarter 2004 revenue of $57.6 million. Total revenue for 2005 was $283.1 million, a 35 percent increase over 2004 revenue of $210.0 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 8, 2006
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the fourth quarter of 2005 was $25.8 million, or $0.16 per diluted share. Full-year net income for 2005 was $328.0 million, or $2.11 per diluted share, including a $258.8 million benefit from the release of a tax valuation allowance.
"2005 was the best year in the history of Akamai as we demonstrated the power of the Akamai business model by delivering strong revenue growth, high profit margins, sustained cash flow, and increasing profitability," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We benefited from broad customer adoption of our global platform and services, and we believe our demonstrated ability to innovate will continue to drive our success in the future."
 
The Company generated normalized net income* of $26.2 million, or $0.16 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2005, a 19 percent increase over the prior quarter normalized net income of $22.0 million, or $0.14 per diluted share. Full-year normalized net income for 2005 was $79.5 million, or $0.52 per diluted share, an improvement of $37.0 million over 2004. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2005 was $30.6 million, up from $27.7 million in the prior quarter, and $18.6 million in the fourth quarter of 2004. Adjusted EBITDA was $101.4 million for the full year, up from $69.1 million in 2004. Adjusted EBITDA margins improved to 36 percent in 2005, up from 33 percent in 2004. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations for the fourth quarter of 2005 was $27.7 million, a 42 percent increase over the prior quarter's cash from operations of $19.5 million, and a 78 percent increase over the fourth quarter of 2004. Full-year 2005 cash from operations was $82.8 million, up 62 percent over the prior year.
At December 31, 2005, the Company had approximately 152.9 million shares of common stock outstanding, including shares from the Company's most recent equity offering. At year-end, the Company had approximately $314 million of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the fourth quarter increased by 80 to a record 1,910, a 4 percent increase over third quarter 2005.
Customers
"We have grown our recurring customer base by 46 percent year-over-year," Sagan said. "This is the result of momentum in important industries that increasingly rely on the Internet, including media and entertainment, online commerce, and software distribution, as well as adoption by major enterprises of our new application acceleration technology."
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 24 percent and 21 percent, respectively, of revenue for the fourth quarter and full-year 2005.
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 4080712.
Quarterly Conference Call
www.akamai.com
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. More than 1,900 organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
About Akamai
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
 
Financial Statements
 
* Includes depreciation (see supplemental tables for figures)
 
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. This measure is also used by management in their financial and operating decision-making.
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the company's historical operating trend.
 
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statement of cash flows in the company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20060217163259.txt.gz
TIME:20060217163259
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On February 15, 2006, the Compensation Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") adopted cash and equity compensation programs for 2006 for the following executive officers: Paul Sagan, Melanie Haratunian, Robert Hughes, Chris Schoettle, J. Donald Sherman and Cathy Welsh (collectively, the "Executives").
     Each of the cash incentive components provides for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, each Executive's bonus is weighted as follows: 80% based on Akamai achievement of revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal year 2006 and 20% based on achievement of individual or departmental performance goals. For Mr. Sagan, the target cash bonus is equal to 100% of his base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 200% of his base salary. For Ms. Haratunian, the target cash bonus is equal to 40% of her base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 80% of her base salary. For Mr. Hughes, the target cash bonus is equal to 100% of his base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 200% of his base salary. For Mr. Schoettle, the target cash bonus is equal to 67% of his base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 125% of his base salary. For Mr. Sherman, the target cash bonus is equal to 67% of his base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 125% of his base salary. For Ms. Welsh, the target cash bonus is equal to 40% of her base salary, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 80% of her base salary.
     Each Executive was also granted stock options and restricted stock units as follows:
     The options have an exercise price of $25.77 per share, which is equal to the closing sale price of the Company's common stock on February 15, 2006, and vest in accordance with the following schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the date of grant and the remaining 75% vest in equal quarterly installments of 6.25% thereafter. Options are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of incentive stock option agreement previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
     Each Restricted Stock Unit ("RSU") represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting. Base RSUs vest in 33% installments on the first business day of each of 2007, 2008 and 2009. The terms of the base RSUs are more fully described in the form of restricted stock unit agreement attached hereto, and incorporated by reference herein, as Exhibit 99.1.
     Performance-Based RSUs will only vest to the extent that the Company exceeds specified cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2006, 2007 and 2008. The maximum number of performance-based RSUs that may vest is equal to 300% of the number of base RSUs granted on the same date; such maximum vesting would only occur if the Company meets or exceeds 110% of both its cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2006, 2007 and 2008. No performance-based RSUs will vest if the Company fails to exceed the applicable targets. If the Company's cumulative revenue and/or earnings per share results for the applicable years is between
Table of Contents
100% and 110% of the targets, the holder would receive between zero RSUs and the maximum deliverable amount set forth above. The terms of the base RSUs are more fully described in the form of restricted stock unit agreement attached hereto, and incorporated by reference herein, as Exhibit 99.2.
     The foregoing descriptions of the RSU agreements are qualified in their entirety by the full text of Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
     1. .
Grant of Award
     This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on , 2006 (the "Grant Date") to (the "Participant") of restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and the Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
                    
                    
                    
                    
     2. .
Vesting; Forfeiture
     Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and provided that the Participant continues to provide services until the Vesting Date (as defined below):
          (a) This award shall vest as to one-third of the original number of RSUs on each of the following dates: the first business day after January 1, 2007, the first business day after January 1, 2008 and the first business day after January 1, 2009. The date on which RSUs vest may be referred to herein as the "Vesting Date."
          (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company.
          (c) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated for any reason, including by reason of death or disability, other than "Cause" (as defined below), then the number of RSUs which shall be vested shall be the number that are vested as of the date of actual termination. For purposes of this Section 2, "Cause" shall mean unsatisfactory job performance (as determined by the Company), willful misconduct, fraud, gross negligence, disobedience or dishonesty. In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company is terminated for Cause, all unvested RSUs shall be forfeited effective as of the date of termination.
          (d) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
     3. 
Distribution of Shares.
          (a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs after a vesting date but before distribution of the corresponding Shares), the Shares of Common Stock represented by RSUs that vested on such vesting date as soon as administratively practicable after each vesting date (each such date of distribution is hereinafter referred to as a "Settlement Date") but in any event within the period ending on the later to occur of the date that is
 
75 days from the end of (i) Participant's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date or (ii) the Company's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date.
          (b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
     4. .
Restrictions on Transfer
     The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
     5. 
Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights.
     Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
     6. .
Provisions of the Plan; Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event
          (a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
          (b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
          (c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), each RSU shall become exercisable, realizable or vested as to number of RSUs as would be vested pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date.
     7. .
Withholding Taxes
          (a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
          (b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate
 
arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
          (c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
          (d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
          (e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
          (f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
          (g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
     8. .
Miscellaneous
          (a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
          (b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
 
          (c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
          (d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
          (e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
          (f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
          (g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
          (h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
          (i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
          (j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
          (k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
     The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
     I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed), the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
     I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
     I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.

 
Exhibit 99.2
     1. .
Grant of Award
     This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on , 2006 (the "Grant Date") to (the "Participant") of restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and the Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive a number of shares of common stock, par value $.01 per share ("Common Stock"), of the Company calculated pursuant to Section 2 of this Agreement. The minimum number of shares issuable is zero; the maximum number of shares issuable is equal to 300% of the number of shares issuable in respect of the other Restricted Stock Unit Agreement entered into by the Participant and Employee on the Grant Date above (the "Maximum RSU Bonus Award"). The shares, if any, of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
                    
                    
     2. .
Vesting; Forfeiture
     Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and provided that the Participant continues to provide services until the Vesting Date (as defined in attached hereto) :
Schedule 1
          (a) On the 2008 Reporting Date, this award shall vest if, and to the extent that, the Company achieves the financial performance criteria set forth in to this Agreement which is incorporated by reference herein; the number of Shares issuable upon vesting shall be calculated based on the calculations provided for in . The "2008 Reporting Date" shall mean the date on which the Company files its annual Public Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2008 or completes its annual Private Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2008, as applicable. If, on December 31, 2008, the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-K shall constitute its "Public Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. If, on December 31, 2008, the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, the Company's regularly prepared annual audited financial statements prepared by management shall be its "Private Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. The applicable financial statements may be referred to herein as the "2008 Financial Statements."
Schedule 1
Schedule 1
          (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company.
          (c) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated for any reason, including by reason of death or disability, before December 31, 2008, then nothing shall be vested unless a Change of Control Event (as defined in the Plan) has occurred prior thereto. If the Participant dies or becomes disabled between December 31, 2008 and the 2008 Reporting Date, he or she shall be deemed to have been employed as of the 2008 Reporting Date.
 
          (d) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
     3. 
Distribution of Shares.
          (a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs on or after December 31, 2008, the Shares of Common Stock represented by vested RSUs within 30 days of the 2008 Reporting Date).
          (b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
     4. .
Restrictions on Transfer
     The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
     5. 
Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights.
     Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
     6. .
Provisions of the Plan; Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event
          (a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
          (b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
          (c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), vesting of each RSU shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of to this Agreement.
Schedule 1
     7. .
Withholding Taxes
          (a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any
 
dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
          (b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
          (c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
          (d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
          (e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
          (f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
          (g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
     8. .
Miscellaneous
          (a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
 
          (b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
          (c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
          (d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
          (e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
          (f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
          (g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties and supersede all prior agreements and understandings relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
          (h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
          (i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
          (j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
          (k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the
Electronic Delivery
 
Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
     The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
     I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed), the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
     I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
     I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
A.
Overview
     The RSUs shall vest only upon the Company's achievement of certain financial metrics based on target cumulative Revenue of $1,337.7 million and target cumulative Normalized EPS of $2.59 per share over the Company's fiscal years 2006, 2007 and 2008. The Company's performance measured against each metric shall be equally weighted to enable comparison as a percentage of a combined target. For purposes of this Agreement, such metrics shall have the following meanings:
     "Revenue" shall mean the Company's cumulative annual revenue for fiscal years 2006, 2007 and 2008 calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America as reported in the 2008 Financial Statements.
     "Normalized EPS" shall mean the Company's shall mean the Company's cumulative annual earnings per diluted share for fiscal years 2006, 2007 and 2008 excluding cumulative amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, and loss on early extinguishment of debt.
     "Vesting Date" shall mean the 2008 Reporting Date or, if earlier, the date of a Change of Control Event.
B.
Calculation of Percentages
     The Company's Revenue shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative revenue for fiscal years 2006, 2007 and 2008 of $1,337.7 million and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Revenue Percentage Component"). The Company's Normalized EPS shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative normalized earnings per share, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America, as reported in the 2008 Financial Statements for fiscal years 2006, 2007 and 2008 of $2.59 and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Normalized EPS Component"). The sum of the Revenue Percentage Component and the Normalized EPS Component shall be the "Actual Percentage of Targets."
C.
Vesting Amounts
     1. If the Actual Percentage of Targets fails to exceed 100%, then none of the RSUs shall vest and zero Shares shall be distributed in respect thereof.
     2. If the Actual Percentage of Targets equals 105%, then one-third of the Maximum RSU Bonus Award (the "Intermediate RSU Bonus Award") shall vest.
     3. If the Actual Percentage of Targets equals 110% or more, then the Maximum RSU Bonus Award shall vest.
     4. If the Actual Percentage of Targets is between 100% and 105%, then a number of RSUs equal to the product of the Intermediate RSU Bonus Award multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which is the Actual Percentage of Targets Revenue minus 100% and the denominator is 5% shall vest.
     5. If the Actual Percentage of Targets is between 105% and 110%, then a number of RSUs equal to the following shall vest: the sum of (a) the Intermediate RSU Bonus Award plus (b) the product
 
of (i) the difference between the Maximum RSU Bonus Award and the Intermediate RSU Bonus Award multiplied by (ii) a fraction the numerator of which is the Actual Percentage of Targets Revenue minus 105% and the denominator is 5% shall vest.
D.
Effect of an Acquisition by the Company
     In the event that the Company enters into an Acquisition Transaction during 2006, then Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be adjusted to give effect to such Acquisition Transaction. An "Acquisition Transaction" means (i) the purchase by the Company of more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange which results in the Company acquiring more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, or (iii) the purchase or other acquisition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the ordinary course of business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 50% of another entity's total assets or assets that account for more than 50% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of such entity.
     As soon as practicable following the closing of an Acquisition Transaction, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company shall make a determination of the estimated impact of the Acquisition Transaction on the Company's cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS through 2008. If the Acquisition Transaction is estimated to be accretive, then:
     (i) in calculating Revenue for purposes of determining the Revenue Percentage Component, reported Revenue shall be reduced by the amount of estimated revenue contribution from the Acquisition Transaction; and
     (ii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2008 Financial Statements, shall be reduced by the amount of the estimated Normalized EPS contribution from the Acquisition Transaction.
If the Acquisition is estimated to be non-accretive, then:
     (iii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2008 Financial Statements, shall be increased by the amount of the estimated negative Normalized EPS impact from the Acquisition Transaction.
All determinations of the Compensation Committee regarding the estimated impact of an Acquisition Transaction shall be final, binding and non-appealable. This Agreement shall be deemed to be automatically amended, without further action by the Company or the Participant, to give effect to any adjustments required by this Section D.
E.
Effect of a Change in Control Event
     If there is a Change of Control Event, the RSUs shall vest as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event and Participant shall be entitled to receive a pro rated number of Shares based on the amount of time elapsed between the Grant Date and December 31, 2008. The number of Shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs, if any, shall be calculated based on a pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets calculated as follows:
     (i) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2006, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results during the twelve-month period ending on the last day of the most recently reported fiscal quarter prior to the closing date of the Change
 
of Control Event. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
     (ii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2007, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal year 2006. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
     (iii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2008, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal years 2006 and 2007 plus an amount equal to the Revenue and Normalized EPS for 2008 that would result if the rate of growth (loss) for Revenue and Normalized EPS, respectively, between 2006 and 2007 were to continue for 2008. Such sums shall be used for calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
Once the pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets has been determined and the number of Shares, if any, that would have been issuable in respect of the RSUs on the 2008 Reporting Date (the "Pro Forma Distribution Amount") calculated, the actual number of Shares issuable shall be adjusted proportionally based on the percentage of the three-year calculation period that has elapsed as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event (e.g., if the closing date of the Change in Control Event were April 1, 2007, the number of Shares issuable would be 41.7% (15 months/36 months) of the total Pro Forma Distribution Amount).


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20060308163921.txt.gz
TIME:20060308163921
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
        Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
        Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
        Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
        Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On March 3, 2006, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") approved the grant of 25,000 restricted stock units to J. Donald Sherman, Akamai's Senior Vice President and CFO-Elect as contemplated by Mr. Sherman's employment offer letter with Akamai dated October 13, 2005. Mr. Sherman's Restricted Stock Unit Agreement provides that the RSUs shall vest as to 34% of the original number of RSUs on March 3, 2007. The remaining 66% will vest in equal installments of 8.25% at the end of each successive full three-month period following the first anniversary of the grant date until the third anniversary of the grant date. The foregoing description of Mr. Sherman's restricted stock unit agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the form of such agreement set forth in Exhibit 99.1.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
Exhibit 99.1
     1. .
Grant of Award
     This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on March 3, 2006 (the "Grant Date") to J. Donald Sherman (the "Participant") of 25,000 restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and the Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
     2. .
Vesting; Forfeiture
     Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and provided that the Participant continues to provide services until the Vesting Date (as defined below):
          (a) This award shall vest as to 34% of the original number of RSUs on March 3, 2007. The remaining 66% will vest in equal installments of 8.25% at the end of each successive full three-month period following the first anniversary of the grant date until the third anniversary of the grant date. Each date on which RSUs vest may be referred to herein as the "Vesting Date."
          (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company.
          (c) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated for any reason, including by reason of death or disability, other than "Cause" (as defined below), then the number of RSUs which shall be vested shall be the number that are vested as of the date of actual termination. For purposes of this Section 2, "Cause" shall mean unsatisfactory job performance (as determined by the Company), willful misconduct, fraud, gross negligence, disobedience or dishonesty. In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company is terminated for Cause, all unvested RSUs shall be forfeited effective as of the date of termination.
          (d) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
     3. 
Distribution of Shares.
          (a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs after a vesting date but before distribution of the corresponding Shares), the Shares of Common Stock represented by RSUs that vested on such vesting date as soon as administratively practicable after each vesting date (each such date of distribution is hereinafter referred to as a "Settlement Date") but in any event within the period ending on the later to occur of the date that is
 
75 days from the end of (i) Participant's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date or (ii) the Company's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date.
          (b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
     4. .
Restrictions on Transfer
     The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
     5. .
Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights
     Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
     6. .
Provisions of the Plan; Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event
          (a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
          (b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
          (c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), each RSU shall become exercisable, realizable or vested as to number of RSUs as would be vested pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date.
     7. .
Withholding Taxes
          (a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
          (b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate
 
arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
          (c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
          (d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
          (e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
          (f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
          (g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
     8. .
Miscellaneous
          (a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
          (b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
 
          (c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
          (d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
          (e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
          (f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
          (g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
          (h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
          (i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
          (j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
          (k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
     The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
     I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed), the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
     I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
     I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20060426160222.txt.gz
TIME:20060426160222
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02    Results of Operations and Financial Condition
          On April 26, 2006, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2006. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
          The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.    Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
99.1      Press Release dated April 26, 2006.
Table of Contents
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2006. Revenue for first quarter 2006 was $90.8 million, a 10 percent increase over fourth quarter 2005 revenue of $82.7 million, and a 51 percent increase over first quarter 2005 revenue of $60.1 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 26, 2006
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the first quarter of 2006 was $11.5 million, or $0.07 per diluted share. GAAP net income in the first quarter includes equity-related compensation charges of approximately $7.1 million, or $0.04 per diluted share, on a pre-tax basis, reflecting the Company's adoption of Financial Accounting Standard 123R on January 1, 2006. GAAP net income also reflects a book tax rate of approximately 45 percent.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $29.4 million, or $0.17 per normalized diluted share*, in the first quarter of 2006, a 12 percent increase over fourth quarter 2005 normalized net income of $26.2 million, or $0.16 per diluted share, and a 105 percent improvement over 2005 first quarter normalized earnings of $14.3 million, or $0.10 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We had a very strong quarter, delivering higher than expected revenue growth," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We benefited from strong demand for our core content delivery services as more and more enterprises continue to move critical business processes online, especially in the area of digital media and entertainment content."
 
Adjusted EBITDA* for the first quarter of 2006 was $33.4 million, up 9 percent from $30.6 million in the prior quarter, and up from $20.4 million in the first quarter of 2005. Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenue was 37 percent, consistent with the prior quarter and up from 34 percent a year ago. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $33.2 million in the first quarter, as compared to $27.7 million in the fourth quarter 2005 and $18.7 million in the same period last year.
At March 31, 2006, the Company had approximately 154 million shares of common stock outstanding.
Customers
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the first quarter increased by 71 to a record 1,981, a 4 percent increase over fourth quarter 2005, and a 46 percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States each accounted for 23 percent of revenue for the first quarter of 2006.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 7504579.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
 
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
* Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the non-GAAP financial metrics we have included are helpful to management and investors because they provide additional insight into our operations. Set forth below are definitions of the non-GAAP terms we use and explanations of some of the benefits provided by those metrics.
 
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, equity-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, utilization of tax NOL carryforward and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures. Because Adjusted EBITDA eliminates these items, Akamai considers this financial measure to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statement of cash flows in the Company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized diluted share" as diluted common shares outstanding used in the GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized diluted shares to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, utilization of tax NOL carryforward and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations as to continued profitability. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission or server capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20060526160058.txt.gz
TIME:20060526160058
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01      Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On May 23, 2006, the stockholders of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") approved the adoption of the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2006 Stock Incentive Plan (the "2006 Plan"). The 2006 Plan allows for the issuance of up to 7.5 million shares of Akamai common stock, subject to adjustment, in the form of options, shares of restricted stock, restricted stock units, deferred stock units and other equity awards. The foregoing description of the 2006 Plan is qualified in its entirety by the full text of Exhibit 10.1 hereto.
     On May 23, 2006, as part of its annual director compensation review, the Akamai Board of Directors approved changes in the annual equity compensation of its Executive Chairman and the non-employee members of the Board of Directors. The Executive Chairman and each non-employee director will now be issued a number of deferred stock units ("DSUs") having a value of $120,000 based on the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock on the date of its annual meeting of stockholders. In addition, Akamai's Executive Chairman and its Lead Director are entitled to $40,000 of additional compensation, of which $20,000 is paid in cash and $20,000 is paid in DSUs. Chairs of the Audit Committee and the Compensation Committee are entitled to $25,000 in additional compensation, of which $5,000 in paid in cash and $20,000 is paid in DSUs. The Chair of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee is entitled to $10,000 of additional compensation, of which $5,000 is paid in cash and $5,000 is paid in DSUs. The foregoing description of the amended compensation plan for the Executive Chairman and non-employee directors is qualified in its entirety by the full text of Exhibit 10.2 hereto.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

EXHIBIT 10.1 AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. 2006 STOCK INCENTIVE PLAN 1. Purpose The purpose of this 2006 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan") of Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company" or "Akamai"), is to advance the interests of the Company's stockholders by enhancing the Company's ability to attract, retain and motivate persons who are expected to make important contributions to the Company and by providing such persons with equity ownership opportunities and performance-based incentives that are intended to align their interests with those of the Company's stockholders. Except where the context otherwise requires, the term "Company" shall include any of the Company's present or future parent or subsidiary corporations as defined in Sections 424(e) or (f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Code") and any other business venture (including, without limitation, joint venture or limited liability company) in which the Company has a controlling interest, as determined by the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board"). 2. Eligibility Except as otherwise provided in Section 5(b), all of the Company's employees, officers, directors, consultants and advisors are eligible to receive options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock, restricted stock units and other stock-based awards (each, an "Award") under the Plan. Each person who receives an Award under the Plan is deemed a "Participant". 3. Administration and Delegation (a) Administration by Board of Directors. The Plan will be administered by the Board. Subject to and consistent with the provisions of the Plan, the Board shall have the authority and discretion to: (i) determine which eligible employees, officers, directors, consultants and advisors will receive Awards, (ii) determine the number of shares of Common Stock (as hereinafter defined), cash, or other consideration to be covered by each Award, (iii) determine the terms and conditions of any Award (including Fair Market Value (as hereinafter defined), the exercise price, the vesting schedule, the term of the Award, and the period following termination from employment or service during which an Award may be exercised), (iv) approve forms of Award agreements and other documentation for use under the Plan, (v) adopt, alter, and repeal administrative rules, guidelines, and practices governing the operation of the Plan, (vi) interpret the provisions of the Plan and any Award documentation and remedy any ambiguities, omissions, or inconsistencies therein, (vii) modify or amend Awards, or grant waivers of Plan or Award conditions, (viii) determine the nature and provisions of Other Stock Unit Awards (as hereinafter defined) permitted pursuant to Section 8, and (ix) make all other determinations necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan. All decisions by the Board shall be made in the Board's sole discretion and shall be final and binding on all persons having or claiming any interest in the Plan or in any Award. No director or person acting pursuant to the authority delegated by the Board shall be liable for any action or determination relating to or under the Plan made in good faith. (b) Appointment of Committees. To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Board may delegate any or all of its powers under the Plan to one or more committees or subcommittees of the Board (a "Committee"). All references in the Plan to the "Board" shall mean the Board or a Committee of the Board or the officers referred to in Section 3(c) to the extent that the Board's powers or authority under the Plan have been delegated to such Committee or officers. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for purposes of granting Awards to directors, the Committee shall mean the Compensation Committee.
(c) Delegation to Officers. To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Board may delegate to one or more officers of the Company the power to grant Awards to employees or officers of the Company or any of its present or future subsidiary corporations and to exercise such other powers under the Plan as the Board may determine, provided that the Board shall fix the terms of the Awards to be granted by such officers (including the exercise price of such Awards, which may include a formula by which the exercise price will be determined) and the maximum number of shares subject to Awards that the officers may grant; provided further, however, that no officer shall be authorized to grant Awards to any "executive officer" of the Company (as defined by Rule 3b-7 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act")) or to any "officer" of the Company (as defined by Rule 16a-1 under the Exchange Act). 4. Stock Available for Awards (a) Number of Shares. Subject to adjustment under Section 9, Awards may be made under the Plan for up to 7,500,000 shares of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Company (the "Common Stock"). Subject to adjustment under Section 9, up to 7,500,000 shares of Common Stock may be issued upon exercise of Incentive Stock Options (as hereinafter defined) granted under the Plan. If any Award granted under this Plan or any stock award granted under the Company's Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (the "1998 Plan") expires or is terminated, surrendered or canceled without having been fully exercised, is forfeited in whole or in part, is settled in cash or otherwise, or results in any Common Stock not being issued, the unused Common Stock covered by such Award or any award issued under the 1998 Plan shall revert or again be available for the grant of Awards under the Plan. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Section 4(a), any shares not issued or delivered as a result of the net settlement of any outstanding Stock Appreciation Right, any shares tendered in payment of an Option's exercise price (whether by attestation or actual delivery), any shares tendered or withheld to satisfy a tax withholding on an Award, and any shares repurchased by the Company using Option proceeds shall not revert or again be available for the grant of Awards under the Plan. In the case of Incentive Stock Options (as hereinafter defined), the foregoing provisions shall be subject to any limitations under the Code. Shares issued under the Plan may consist in whole or in part of authorized but unissued shares, treasury shares or shares purchased on the open market. (b) Sub-limits. Subject to adjustment under Section 9, the following sub-limits on the number of shares subject to Awards shall apply: (1) Section 162(m) Per-Participant Limit. The maximum number of shares of Common Stock with respect to which Awards may be granted to any Participant under the Plan shall be 1,000,000 per calendar year. For purposes of the foregoing limit, the combination of an Option in tandem with an SAR (as each is hereafter defined) shall be treated as a single Award. The per-Participant limit described in this Section 4(b)(1) shall be construed and applied consistently with Section 162(m) of the Code or any successor provision thereto, and the regulations thereunder ("Section 162(m)"). (2) Limit on Awards other than Options and SARS. The maximum number of shares with respect to which Awards other than Options and SARs may be granted shall be 90% of the total number of shares available for issuance under the Plan. (3) Limit on Awards to Directors. The maximum aggregate number of shares with respect to which Awards may be granted to directors who are not employees of the Company at the time of grant shall be 10% of the total number of shares available for issuance under the Plan. (c) Substitute Awards. In connection with a merger or consolidation of an entity with the Company or the acquisition by the Company of property or stock of an entity, the Board may grant Awards in substitution for any options or other stock or stock-based awards granted by such entity or an -2-
affiliate thereof. Substitute Awards may be granted on such terms as the Board deems appropriate in the circumstances, notwithstanding any limitations on Awards contained in the Plan. Substitute Awards shall not count against the overall share limit set forth in Section 4(a), except as may be required by reason of Section 422 and related provisions of the Code. 5. Stock Options (a) General. The Board may grant options to purchase Common Stock (each, an "Option") and determine the number of shares of Common Stock to be covered by each Option, the exercise price of each Option and the conditions and limitations applicable to the exercise of each Option, including conditions relating to applicable federal or state securities laws, as it considers necessary or advisable. An Option that is not intended to be an Incentive Stock Option (as hereinafter defined) shall be designated a "Nonstatutory Stock Option". (b) Incentive Stock Options. An Option that the Board intends to be an "incentive stock option" as defined in Section 422 of the Code (an "Incentive Stock Option") shall only be granted to employees of Akamai, any of Akamai's present or future parent or subsidiary corporations as defined in Sections 424(e) or (f) of the Code, and any other entities the employees of which are eligible to receive Incentive Stock Options under the Code, and shall be subject to and shall be construed consistently with the requirements of Section 422 of the Code. If the Fair Market Value (as defined below) of shares on the date of grant with respect to which Incentive Stock Options are exercisable for the first time by a Participant during any calendar year exceeds $100,000, the Options for the first $100,000 worth of shares to become exercisable in that calendar year will be Incentive Stock Options, and the Options for the shares with a Fair Market Value (as defined below) in excess of $100,000 that become exercisable in that calendar year will be Nonstatutory Stock Options. The Company shall have no liability to a Participant, or any other party, if an Option (or any part thereof) that is intended to be an Incentive Stock Option is not an Incentive Stock Option or for any action taken by the Board, including without limitation the conversion of an Incentive Stock Option to a Nonstatutory Stock Option. (c) Exercise Price. The Board shall establish the exercise price of each Option and specify such exercise price in the applicable option agreement; provided however, that the exercise price shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value (as defined below) on the date the Option is granted. (d) No Repricing of Options. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Plan, the Company shall not engage in any repricing of Options or SARs granted under this Plan without further stockholder approval. For this purpose, the term "repricing" shall mean any of the following or other action that has the same effect: (i) lowering the exercise price of an Option or a SAR after it is granted, (ii) any other action that is treated as a repricing under generally accepted accounting principles, or (iii) canceling an Option or a SAR at a time when its exercise price exceeds the fair market value of the underlying stock in exchange for another Option, SAR, Restricted Stock, or other equity of the Company, unless the cancellation and exchange occurs in connection with a merger, acquisition, spin-off, or similar corporate transaction (including any adjustment described in Section 9). (e) Duration of Options. Each Option shall be exercisable at such times and subject to such terms and conditions as the Board may specify in the applicable option agreement; provided however, that no Option will be granted for a term in excess of 7 years. (f) Exercise of Option. Options may be exercised by delivery to the Company of a written notice of exercise signed by the proper person or by any other form of notice (including electronic notice) approved by the Board together with payment in full as specified in Section 5(g) for the number of shares for which the Option is exercised. Shares of Common Stock subject to the Option will be delivered by the Company following exercise either as soon as practicable or, subject to such conditions as the Board -3-
shall specify, on a deferred basis (with the Company's obligation to be evidenced by an instrument providing for future delivery of the deferred shares at the time or times specified by the Board). (g) Payment Upon Exercise. Common Stock purchased upon the exercise of an Option granted under the Plan shall be paid for as follows: (1) in cash or by check, payable to the order of the Company; (2) except as may otherwise be provided in the applicable option agreement, by (i) delivery of an irrevocable and unconditional undertaking by a creditworthy broker to deliver promptly to the Company sufficient funds to pay the exercise price and any required tax withholding or (ii) delivery by the Participant to the Company of a copy of irrevocable and unconditional instructions to a creditworthy broker to deliver promptly to the Company cash or a check sufficient to pay the exercise price and any required tax withholding; (3) to the extent provided for in the applicable option agreement or approved by the Board, in its sole discretion, by delivery (either by actual delivery or attestation) of shares of Common Stock owned by the Participant valued at their fair market value as determined by (or in a manner approved by) the Board ("Fair Market Value") provided (i) such method of payment is then permitted under applicable law, (ii) such Common Stock, if acquired directly from the Company, was owned by the Participant for such minimum period of time, if any, as may be established by the Board in its discretion and (iii) such Common Stock is not subject to any repurchase, forfeiture, unfulfilled vesting or other similar requirements; (4) to the extent permitted by applicable law and provided for in the applicable option agreement or approved by the Board in its sole discretion, by (i) delivery of a promissory note of the Participant to the Company on terms determined by the Board, or (ii) payment of such other lawful consideration as the Board may determine; (5) to the extent permitted by applicable law and provided for in the applicable option agreement or approved by the Board in its sole discretion, by retaining shares of Common Stock otherwise issuable pursuant to the Option; (6) by any combination of the above permitted forms of payment. (h) No Reload Rights. No option granted under the Plan shall contain any provision entitling the grantee to the automatic grant of additional Options in connection with any exercise of the original Option. 6. Stock Appreciation Rights. (a) General. The Board may grant Awards consisting of a Stock Appreciation Right, "SAR", entitling the holder, upon exercise, to receive an amount in Common Stock determined by reference to appreciation, from and after the date of grant, in the fair market value of a share of Common Stock. The date as of which such appreciation or other measure is determined shall be the exercise date. (b) Grants. Stock Appreciation Rights may be granted in tandem with, or independently of, Options granted under the Plan. (1) Tandem Awards. When Stock Appreciation Rights are expressly granted in tandem with Options, (i) the Stock Appreciation Right will be exercisable only at such time or times, and to the extent, that the related Option is exercisable (except to the extent designated by the Board in connection with an Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event) and will be exercisable in accordance -4-
with the procedure required for exercise of the related Option; (ii) the Stock Appreciation Right will terminate and no longer be exercisable upon the termination or exercise of the related Option, except to the extent designated by the Board in connection with an Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event and except that a Stock Appreciation Right granted with respect to less than the full number of shares covered by an Option will not be reduced until the number of shares as to which the related Option has been exercised or has terminated exceeds the number of shares not covered by the Stock Appreciation Right; (iii) the Option will terminate and no longer be exercisable upon the exercise of the related Stock Appreciation Right; and (iv) the Stock Appreciation Right will be transferable only with the related Option. (2) Independent SARs. A Stock Appreciation Right not expressly granted in tandem with an Option will become exercisable at such time or times, and on such conditions, as the Board may specify in the SAR Award. (c) Grant Price. The grant price or exercise price of a SAR shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value per share of Common Stock on the date of grant of the SAR. (d) Term. The term of a SAR shall not be more than 7 years from the date of grant. (e) Exercise. Stock Appreciation Rights may be exercised by delivery to the Company of a written notice of exercise signed by the proper person or by any other form of notice (including electronic notice) approved by the Board, together with any other documents required by the Board. 7. Restricted Stock; Restricted Stock Units Stock; Deferred Stock Units. (a) General. The Board may grant Awards entitling recipients to acquire shares of Common Stock ("Restricted Stock"), subject to the right of the Company to repurchase all or part of such shares at their issue price or other stated or formula price (or to require forfeiture of such shares if issued at no cost) from the recipient in the event that conditions specified by the Board in the applicable Award are not satisfied prior to the end of the applicable restriction period or periods established by the Board for such Award. Instead of granting Awards for Restricted Stock, the Board may grant Awards entitling the recipient to receive shares of Common Stock to be delivered at the time such shares of Common Stock vest ("Restricted Stock Units" or "Deferred Stock Units"). (Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Deferred Stock Units are each referred to herein as a "Restricted Stock Award".) (b) Terms and Conditions for all Restricted Stock Awards. The Board shall determine the terms and conditions of a Restricted Stock Award, including the conditions for vesting and repurchase (or forfeiture) and the issue price, if any. (c) Additional Provisions Relating to Restricted Stock. (1) Dividends. Participants holding shares of Restricted Stock will be entitled to all ordinary cash dividends paid with respect to such shares, unless otherwise provided by the Board. If any such dividends or distributions are paid in shares, or consist of a dividend or distribution to holders of Common Stock other than an ordinary cash dividend, the shares, cash or other property will be subject to the same restrictions on transferability and forfeitability as the shares of Restricted Stock with respect to which they were paid. Each dividend payment will be made no later than the end of the calendar year in which the dividends are paid to shareholders of that class of stock or, if later, the 15th day of the third month following the date the dividends are paid to shareholders of that class of stock. (2) Stock Certificates. The Company may require that any stock certificates issued in respect of shares of Restricted Stock shall be deposited in escrow by the Participant, together with a -5-
stock power endorsed in blank, with the Company (or its designee). At the expiration of the applicable restriction periods, the Company (or such designee) shall deliver the certificates no longer subject to such restrictions to the Participant or if the Participant has died, to the beneficiary designated, in a manner determined by the Board, by a Participant to receive amounts due or exercise rights of the Participant in the event of the Participant's death (the "Designated Beneficiary"). In the absence of an effective designation by a Participant, "Designated Beneficiary" shall mean the Participant's estate. (d) Additional Provisions Relating to Deferred Stock Units and Restricted Stock Units. (1) Settlement. Upon the vesting of and/or lapsing of any other restrictions (i.e., settlement) with respect to each Restricted Stock Unit or Deferred Stock Unit, the Participant shall be entitled to receive from the Company one share of Common Stock or an amount of cash equal to the Fair Market Value of one share of Common Stock, as provided in the applicable Award agreement. The Board may, in its discretion, provide that settlement of Restricted Stock Units and Deferred Stock Units shall be deferred, on a mandatory basis or at the election of the Participant. (2) Voting Rights. A Participant shall have no voting rights with respect to any Restricted Stock Units or Deferred Stock Units. (3) Dividend Equivalents. To the extent provided by the Board, in its sole discretion, a grant of Restricted Stock Units or Deferred Stock Units may provide Participants with the right to receive an amount equal to any dividends or other distributions declared and paid on an equal number of outstanding shares of Common Stock ("Dividend Equivalents"). Dividend Equivalents may be paid currently or credited to an account for the Participants, may be settled in cash and/or shares of Common Stock and may be subject to the same restrictions on transfer and forfeitability as the Restricted Stock Units or Deferred Stock Units with respect to which paid, as determined by the Board in its sole discretion, subject in each case to such terms and conditions as the Board shall establish, in each case to be set forth in the applicable Award agreement. To the extent Dividend Equivalents are paid, any payments will be made no later than the end of the calendar year in which the dividends are paid to shareholders of that class of stock or, if later, the 15th day of the third month following the date the dividends are paid to shareholders of that class of stock. 8. Other Stock Unit Awards. Other Awards of shares of Common Stock, and other Awards that are valued in whole or in part by reference to, or are otherwise based on, shares of Common Stock or other property, may be granted hereunder to Participants ("Other Stock Unit Awards"), including without limitation Awards entitling recipients to receive shares of Common Stock to be delivered in the future. Such Other Stock Unit Awards shall also be available as a form of payment in the settlement of other Awards granted under the Plan or as payment in lieu of compensation to which a Participant is otherwise entitled. Other Stock Unit Awards may be paid in shares of Common Stock or cash, as the Board shall determine. Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Board shall determine the terms and conditions of each Other Stock Unit Award, including any purchase price applicable thereto. 9. Adjustments for Changes in Common Stock and Certain Other Events. (a) Changes in Capitalization. In the event of any stock split, reverse stock split, stock dividend, recapitalization, combination of shares, reclassification of shares, spin-off or other similar change in capitalization or event, or any dividend or distribution to holders of Common Stock other than an ordinary cash dividend, (i) the number and class of securities available under this Plan, (ii) the sub-limits set forth in Section 4(b), (iii) the number and class of securities and exercise price per share of each outstanding Option, (iv) the share- and per-share provisions and the exercise price of each Stock -6-
Appreciation Right, (v) the number of shares subject to and the repurchase price per share subject to each outstanding Restricted Stock Award and (vi) the share- and per-share-related provisions and the purchase price, if any, of each outstanding Other Stock Unit Award, shall be appropriately adjusted by the Company (or substituted Awards may be made, if applicable) to the extent determined by the Board. If this Section 9(a) applies and Section 9(c) also applies to any event, Section 9(c) shall be applicable to such event, and this section 9(a) shall not be applicable. (b) Liquidation or Dissolution. In the event of a proposed liquidation or dissolution of the Company, the Board shall upon written notice to the Participants provide that all then unexercised Options will (i) become exercisable in full as of a specified time at least 10 business days prior to the effective date of such liquidation or dissolution and (ii) terminate effective upon such liquidation or dissolution, except to the extent exercised before such effective date. The Board may specify the effect of a liquidation or dissolution on any Restricted Stock Award or other Award granted under the Plan at the time of the grant of such Award. (c) Acquisition and Change in Control Events (1) Definitions (a) An "Acquisition Event" shall mean: (i) any merger or consolidation of the Company with or into another entity as a result of which the Common Stock is converted into or exchanged for the right to receive cash, securities or other property or is cancelled; or (ii) any exchange of shares of Common Stock of the Company for cash, securities or other property pursuant to a statutory share exchange transaction. (b) A "Change in Control Event" shall mean: (i) any merger or consolidation which results in the voting securities of the Company outstanding immediately prior thereto representing immediately thereafter (either by remaining outstanding or by being converted into voting securities of the surviving or acquiring entity) less than 50% of the combined voting power of the voting securities of the Company or such surviving or acquiring entity outstanding immediately after such merger or consolidation; (ii) the acquisition by an individual, entity or group (within the meaning of Section 13(d)(3) or 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) (a "Person") of beneficial ownership of any capital stock of the Company if, after such acquisition, such Person beneficially owns (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act) 50% or more of either (A) the then-outstanding shares of Common Stock of the Company (the "Outstanding Company Common Stock") or (B) the combined voting power of the then-outstanding voting securities of the Company entitled to vote generally in the election of directors (the "Outstanding Company Voting Securities"); provided, however, that for -7-
purposes of this subsection (ii), the following acquisitions shall not constitute a Change in Control Event: (A) any acquisition directly from the Company, (B) any acquisition by the Company, (C) any acquisition by any employee benefit plan (or related trust) sponsored or maintained by the Company or any corporation controlled by the Company, or (D) any acquisition by any corporation pursuant to a transaction which results in all or substantially all of the individuals and entities who were the beneficial owners of the Outstanding Company Common Stock and Outstanding Company Voting Securities immediately prior to such transaction beneficially owning, directly or indirectly, more than 50% of the then-outstanding shares of common stock and the combined voting power of the then-outstanding voting securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors, respectively, of the resulting or acquiring corporation in such transaction (which shall include, without limitation, a corporation which as a result of such transaction owns the Company or substantially all of the Company's assets either directly or through one or more subsidiaries) in substantially the same proportions as their ownership, immediately prior to such transaction, of the Outstanding Company Common Stock and Outstanding Company Voting Securities, respectively; (iii) any sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company; or (iv) the complete liquidation of the Company. (2) Effect on Options (a) Acquisition Event. Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes a Change in Control Event), or the execution by the Company of any agreement with respect to an Acquisition Event (regardless of whether such event will result in a Change in Control Event), the Board shall provide that all outstanding Options shall be assumed, or equivalent options shall be substituted, by the acquiring or succeeding corporation (or an affiliate thereof); provided that if such Acquisition Event also constitutes a Change in Control Event, except to the extent specifically provided to the contrary in the instrument evidencing any Option or any other agreement between a Participant and the Company, such assumed or substituted options shall be immediately exercisable in full upon the occurrence of such Acquisition Event. For purposes hereof, an Option shall be considered to be assumed if, following consummation of the Acquisition Event, the Option confers the right to purchase, for each share of Common Stock subject to the Option immediately prior to the consummation of the Acquisition Event, the consideration (whether cash, securities or other property) received as a result of the Acquisition Event by holders of Common Stock for each share of Common Stock held immediately prior to the consummation of the Acquisition Event (and if holders were offered a choice of consideration, the type of consideration chosen by the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of Common Stock); provided, however, that if the consideration received as a result of the Acquisition Event is not solely common stock of the acquiring or succeeding corporation (or an affiliate thereof), the Company may, with the consent of the acquiring or succeeding corporation, provide for the consideration to be received upon the exercise of Options to consist solely of common stock of the acquiring or succeeding corporation (or an affiliate thereof) equivalent in fair market value to the per share consideration received by holders of outstanding shares of Common Stock as a result of the Acquisition Event. -8-
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the acquiring or succeeding corporation (or an affiliate thereof) does not agree to assume, or substitute for, such Options, then the Board shall, upon written notice to the Participants, provide that all then unexercised Options will become exercisable in full as of a specified time prior to the Acquisition Event and will terminate immediately prior to the consummation of such Acquisition Event, except to the extent exercised by the Participants before the consummation of such Acquisition Event; provided, however, in the event of an Acquisition Event under the terms of which holders of Common Stock will receive upon consummation thereof a cash payment for each share of Common Stock surrendered pursuant to such Acquisition Event (the "Acquisition Price"), then the Board may instead provide that all outstanding Options shall terminate upon consummation of such Acquisition Event and that each Participant shall receive, in exchange therefor, a cash payment equal to the amount (if any) by which (A) the Acquisition Price multiplied by the number of shares of Common Stock subject to such outstanding Options (whether or not then exercisable), exceeds (B) the aggregate exercise price of such Options. (b) Change in Control Event that is not an Acquisition Event. Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event that does not also constitute an Acquisition Event, except to the extent specifically provided to the contrary in the instrument evidencing any Option or any other agreement between a Participant and the Company, all Options then-outstanding shall automatically become immediately exercisable in full. (3) Effect on Restricted Stock Awards (a) Acquisition Event that is not a Change in Control Event. Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event that is not a Change in Control Event, the repurchase and other rights of the Company under each outstanding Restricted Stock Award shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such Restricted Stock Award. (b) Change in Control Event. Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), except to the extent specifically provided to the contrary in the instrument evidencing any Restricted Stock Award or any other agreement between a Participant and the Company, all restrictions and conditions on all Restricted Stock Awards then-outstanding shall automatically be deemed terminated or satisfied. (4) Effect on Other Awards (a) Acquisition Event that is not a Change in Control Event. The Board may specify at the time of grant the effect of an Acquisition Event that is not a Change in Control Event on any SAR and Other Stock Unit Award granted under the Plan at the time of the grant of such Award. (b) Change in Control Event. Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), except to the extent specifically provided to the contrary in the instrument evidencing any SAR or Other Stock Unit Award or any other agreement between a Participant and the Company, all other Awards shall become exercisable, realizable or vested in full, or shall be free of all conditions or restrictions, as applicable to each such Award. 10. General Provisions Applicable to Awards (a) Transferability of Awards. Awards shall not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged or otherwise encumbered by the person to whom they are granted, either voluntarily or by operation of law, -9-
except by will or the laws of descent and distribution or, other than in the case of an Incentive Stock Option, pursuant to a qualified domestic relations order, and, during the life of the Participant, shall be exercisable only by the Participant; provided, however, that the Board may permit or provide in an Award for the gratuitous transfer of the Award by the Participant to or for the benefit of any immediate family member, family trust or other entity established for the benefit of the Participant and/or an immediate family member thereof if, with respect to such proposed transferee, the Company would be eligible to use a Form S-8 for the registration of the sale of the Common Stock subject to such Award under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, provided that Incentive Stock Options may be transferable only to the extent permitted by the Code; provided, further, that the Company shall not be required to recognize any such transfer until such time as the Participant and such permitted transferee shall, as a condition to such transfer, deliver to the Company a written instrument in form and substance satisfactory to the Company confirming that such transferee shall be bound by all of the terms and conditions of the Award. References to a Participant, to the extent relevant in the context, shall include references to authorized transferees. (b) Documentation. Each Award shall be evidenced in such form (written, electronic or otherwise) as the Board shall determine. Each Award may contain terms and conditions in addition to (but, except as expressly contemplated by another provision herein, not inconsistent with) those set forth in the Plan. (c) Board Discretion. Except as otherwise provided by the Plan, each Award may be made alone or in addition or in relation to any other Award. The terms of each Award need not be identical, and the Board need not treat Participants uniformly. (d) Termination of Status. The Board shall determine the effect on an Award of the disability, death, termination of employment, authorized leave of absence or other change in the employment or other status of a Participant and the extent to which, and the period during which, the Participant, or the Participant's legal representative, conservator, guardian or Designated Beneficiary, may exercise rights under the Award. (e) Withholding. Each Participant shall pay to the Company, or make provision satisfactory to the Company for payment of, any taxes required by law to be withheld in connection with an Award to such Participant. Except as the Board may otherwise provide in an Award, for so long as the Common Stock is registered under the Exchange Act, Participants may satisfy such tax obligations in whole or in part by delivery of shares of Common Stock, including shares retained from the Award creating the tax obligation, valued at their Fair Market Value; provided, however, except as otherwise provided by the Board, that the total tax withholding where stock is being used to satisfy such tax obligations cannot exceed the Company's minimum statutory withholding obligations (based on minimum statutory withholding rates for federal and state tax purposes, including payroll taxes, that are applicable to such supplemental taxable income). Shares surrendered to satisfy tax withholding requirements cannot be subject to any repurchase, forfeiture, unfulfilled vesting or other similar requirements. The Company may, to the extent permitted by law, deduct any such tax obligations from any payment of any kind otherwise due to a Participant. (f) Amendment of Award. Except as provided in Section 5(d), the Board may amend, modify or terminate any outstanding Award, including but not limited to, substituting therefor another Award of the same or a different type, changing the date of exercise or realization, and converting an Incentive Stock Option to a Nonstatutory Stock Option, provided either (i) that the Participant's consent to such action shall be required unless the Board determines that the action, taking into account any related action, would not materially and adversely affect the Participant or (ii) that the change is permitted under Section 9 hereof. -10-
(g) Conditions on Delivery of Stock. The Company will not be obligated to deliver any shares of Common Stock pursuant to the Plan or to remove restrictions from shares previously delivered under the Plan until (i) all conditions of the Award have been met or removed to the satisfaction of the Company, (ii) in the opinion of the Company's counsel, all other legal matters in connection with the issuance and delivery of such shares have been satisfied, including any applicable securities laws and any applicable stock exchange or stock market rules and regulations, and (iii) the Participant has executed and delivered to the Company such representations or agreements as the Company may consider appropriate to satisfy the requirements of any applicable laws, rules or regulations. (h) Acceleration. Except as set forth in Section 10(j), the Board may at any time provide that any Award shall become immediately exercisable in full or in part, free of some or all restrictions or conditions, or otherwise realizable in full or in part, as the case may be. (i) Performance Awards. (1) Grants. Restricted Stock Awards and Other Stock Unit Awards under the Plan may be made subject to the achievement of performance goals pursuant to this Section 10(i) ("Performance Awards"), subject to the limit in Section 4(b)(1) on shares covered by such grants. (2) Committee. Grants of Performance Awards to any Covered Employee intended to qualify as "performance-based compensation" under Section 162(m) ("Performance-Based Compensation") shall be made only by a Committee (or subcommittee of a Committee) comprised solely of two or more directors eligible to serve on a committee making Awards qualifying as "performance-based compensation" under Section 162(m). In the case of such Awards granted to Covered Employees, references to the Board or to a Committee shall be deemed to be references to such Committee or subcommittee. "Covered Employee" shall mean any person who is a "covered employee" under Section 162(m)(3) of the Code. (3) Performance Measures. For any Award that is intended to qualify as Performance-Based Compensation, the Committee shall specify that the degree of granting, vesting and/or payout shall be subject to the achievement of one or more objective performance measures established by the Committee, which shall be based on the relative or absolute attainment of specified levels of one or any combination of the following: (a) net income, (b) earnings before or after discontinued operations, interest, taxes, depreciation and/or amortization, (c) operating profit before or after discontinued operations and/or taxes, (d) revenue, (e) sales growth, (f) earnings growth, (g) cash flow or cash position, (h) gross margins, (i) stock price, (j) market share, (k) return on sales, assets, equity or investment, (l) improvement of financial ratings, (m) achievement of balance sheet or income statement objectives, (n) total shareholder return, or (o) earnings per share and may be absolute in their terms or measured against or in relationship to other companies comparably, similarly or otherwise situated. Such performance measures may be adjusted to exclude any one or more of (I) extraordinary items, (II) gains or losses on the dispositions of discontinued operations, (III) the cumulative effects of changes in accounting principles, (IV) the writedown of any asset, (V) charges for restructuring and rationalization programs, (VI) other non-cash charges or items, and (VII) gains or losses relating to financing or investment activities. Such performance measures: (A) may vary by Participant and may be different for different Awards; (B) may be particular to a Participant or the department, branch, line of business, subsidiary or other unit in which the Participant works and may cover such period as may be specified by the Committee; and (C) shall be set by the Committee within the time period prescribed by, and shall otherwise comply with the requirements of, Section 162(m). Awards that are not intended to qualify as Performance-Based Compensation may be based on these or such other performance measures as the Board may determine. -11-
(4) Adjustments. Notwithstanding any provision of the Plan, with respect to any Performance Award that is intended to qualify as Performance-Based Compensation, the Committee may adjust downwards, but not upwards, the cash or number of Shares payable pursuant to such Award, and the Committee may not waive the achievement of the applicable performance measures except in the case of the death or disability of the Participant. (5) Other. The Committee shall have the power to impose such other restrictions on Performance Awards as it may deem necessary or appropriate to ensure that such Awards satisfy all requirements for Performance-Based Compensation. Prior to the payment of any Award subject to this Section 10(i), the Committee shall certify in writing (which may be satisfied by the inclusion of such a determination in the minutes of a meeting of such Committee) that the performance goals and other material terms applicable to such Award were satisfied. (j) Minimum Vesting Requirements for Full Value Awards. Each Restricted Stock Award and Other Stock Unit Award (other than those Restricted Stock Awards and Other Stock Unit Awards which may only be settled in cash) granted under the Plan (each, a "Full Value Award") shall vest in accordance with a schedule that does not permit such Full Value Award to vest in full prior to the third anniversary of the date of grant of the Award. This minimum vesting requirement shall not, however, preclude the Board from exercising its discretion to (i) accelerate the vesting of any Full Value Award upon retirement, termination of employment by the Company, death or disability, (ii) accelerate the vesting of any Full Value Award in accordance with Section 9(c), (iii) establish a shorter vesting schedule for any Full Value Award granted to an advisor, consultant, director, or newly-hired employee, (iv) establish a shorter vesting schedule for any Full Value Award that is granted in exchange for or in lieu of the right to receive the payment of an equivalent amount of salary, bonus, directors' fees, or other cash compensation, (v) establish a shorter performance-based vesting schedule in accordance with Section 10(i) or otherwise (but in each case of not less than one year), or (vi) vest up to 1,000 shares per year for each Participant; provided, however, that the aggregate number of Full Value Awards that may be granted under clauses (iii) and (vi) above shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the number of shares available for issuance under the Plan. (k) Limitation Following a Hardship Distribution. To the extent required to comply with Treasury Regulation Section 1.401(k)-1(d)(2)(iv)(B)(4), or any amendment or successor thereto, a Participant's "elective and employee contributions" (within the meaning of such Treasury Regulation) under the Plan shall be suspended for a period of twelve months following such Participant's receipt of a hardship distribution made in reliance on such Treasury Regulation from any plan containing a cash or deferred arrangement under Section 401(k) of the Code maintained by the Company or a related party within the provisions of Section 414 of the Code. 11. Miscellaneous (a) No Right To Employment or Other Status. No person shall have any claim or right to be granted an Award, and the grant of an Award shall not be construed as giving a Participant the right to continued employment or any other relationship with the Company. The Company expressly reserves the right at any time to dismiss or otherwise terminate its relationship with a Participant free from any liability or claim under the Plan, except as expressly provided in the applicable Award. (b) No Rights As Stockholder. Subject to the provisions of the applicable Award, no Participant or Designated Beneficiary shall have any rights as a stockholder with respect to any shares of Common Stock to be distributed with respect to an Award until becoming the record holder of such shares. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the Company effects a split of the Common Stock by means of a stock dividend and the exercise price of and the number of shares subject to such Option are adjusted as of the date of the distribution of the dividend (rather than as of the record date for such -12-
dividend), then an optionee who exercises an Option between the record date and the distribution date for such stock dividend shall be entitled to receive, on the distribution date, the stock dividend with respect to the shares of Common Stock acquired upon such Option exercise, notwithstanding the fact that such shares were not outstanding as of the close of business on the record date for such stock dividend. (c) Effective Date and Term of Plan. The Plan shall become effective on the date the Plan is approved by the Company's stockholders (the "Effective Date"). No Awards shall be granted under the Plan after the completion of 10 years from the Effective Date, but Awards previously granted may extend beyond that date. (d) Amendment of Plan. The Board may amend, suspend or terminate the Plan or any portion thereof at any time provided that (i) to the extent required by Section 162(m), no Award granted to a Participant that is intended to comply with Section 162(m) after the date of such amendment shall become exercisable, realizable or vested, as applicable to such Award, unless and until such amendment shall have been approved by the Company's stockholders if required by Section 162(m) (including the vote required under Section 162(m)); (ii) no amendment that would require stockholder approval under the rules of the NASDAQ Stock Market ("NASDAQ") may be made effective unless and until such amendment shall have been approved by the Company's stockholders; and (iii) if the NASDAQ amends its corporate governance rules so that such rules no longer require stockholder approval of material amendments to equity compensation plans, then, from and after the effective date of such amendment to the NASDAQ rules, no amendment to the Plan (A) materially increasing the number of shares authorized under the Plan (other than pursuant to Section 9), (B) expanding the types of Awards that may be granted under the Plan, (C) materially expanding the class of participants eligible to participate in the Plan, or (D) materially increasing benefits generally available to Participants shall be effective unless stockholder approval is obtained. In addition, if at any time the approval of the Company's stockholders is required as to any other modification or amendment under Section 422 of the Code or any successor provision with respect to Incentive Stock Options, the Board may not effect such modification or amendment without such approval. (e) Provisions for Foreign Participants. The Board may modify Awards or Options granted to Participants who are foreign nationals or employed outside the United States or establish subplans or procedures under the Plan to recognize differences in laws, rules, regulations or customs of such foreign jurisdictions with respect to tax, securities, currency, employee benefit or other matters. (f) Compliance With Code Section 409A. No Award shall provide for deferral of compensation that does not comply with Section 409A of the Code, unless the Board, at the time of grant, specifically provides that the Award is not intended to comply with Section 409A of the Code. The Company shall have no liability to a Participant, or any other Party if an Award that is intended to be exempt from, or compliant with, Section 409A is not so exempt or compliant or for any action taken by the Board. (g) Governing Law. The provisions of the Plan and all Awards made hereunder shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such state that would require the application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such state. -13-

Exhibit 10.2 SUMMARY OF COMPENSATION FOR THE EXECUTIVE CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS AND THE NON-EMPLOYEE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. The Executive Chairman of the Board of Directors and the non-employee directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") are entitled to annual compensation of $140,000, of which $20,000 is paid in cash and $120,000 is paid in deferred stock units ("DSUs") representing the right to acquire shares of Akamai common stock. The number of DSUs issued is based on the fair market value of Akamai's common stock on the date of its annual stockholders meeting. For so long as the person remains a director, DSUs will vest over a two-year period. In addition, Akamai's Executive Chairman and its Lead Director are entitled to $40,000 of additional compensation, of which $20,000 is paid in cash and $20,000 is paid in DSUs. Chairs of the Audit Committee and the Compensation Committee are entitled to $25,000 in additional compensation, of which $5,000 in paid in cash and $20,000 is paid in DSUs. The Chair of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee is entitled to $10,000 of additional compensation, of which $5,000 is paid in cash and $5,000 is paid in DSUs. Each non-employee director is eligible to receive fair market value options to purchase 50,000 shares of its common stock when he or she joins the Board of Directors. Akamai also reimburses directors for reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred in attending meetings of the Board of Directors.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20060721163022.txt.gz
TIME:20060721163022
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On July 18, 2006, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee") of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") approved an amendment to Akamai Technologies, Inc.'s Executive Severance Pay Plan (the "Severance Plan"). Eligible participants in the Severance Plan consist of members of Akamai's executive management group, currently referred to as the Office of the CEO, other than the Chief Executive Officer and the Executive Chairman. The amendment provides for the payment of an amount equal to the eligible participant's target bonus upon a triggering event. Eligible participants under the plan who are terminated for any reason other than "cause" (as defined in the Severance Plan) and have signed a mutually acceptable separation agreement shall hereafter be entitled to (i) a lump sum payment equal to one year of the participant's then-current base salary; (ii) a lump sum payment equal to the annual incentive bonus at target that would have been payable to the executive under Akamai's then-current Executive Bonus Plan, if any, in the year of the executive's termination had both Akamai and the executive achieved the target bonus objectives set forth in such executive's bonus plan during such year; and (iii) reimbursement of up to 12 times the monthly premium for continued health and dental insurance coverage.
     On July 18, 2006, the Compensation Committee approved change in control agreements for members of the executive management group, currently referred to as the Office of the CEO, other than the Chief Executive Officer and the Executive Chairman. If such an individual is terminated without cause or resigns for "good reason" (as defined in the change in control agreement) within 12 months of a change in control of Akamai, he or she shall be entitled to (i) a lump sum payment equal to one year of the participant's then-current base salary; (ii) a lump sum payment equal to the annual incentive bonus at target that would have been payable to the executive under Akamai's then-current Executive Bonus Plan, if any, in the year of the executive's termination had both Akamai and the executive achieved the target bonus objectives set forth in such executive's bonus plan during such year; (iii) reimbursement of up to 12 times the monthly premium for continued health and dental insurance coverage; and (iv) accelerated vesting of all outstanding stock options held by the Executive as of the date his or her employment terminates. The change in control agreements are supplemental to, and not in replacement of, the change in control provisions reflected in agreements governing equity awards granted to such individuals; however, the change in control agreements replace and supersede any other existing employment offer letters or similar agreements with such individuals. Furthermore, receipt of any benefits under the terms of a change in control agreement would preclude the ability to receive benefits under the Severance Plan.
     On July 18, 2006, the Compensation Committee also approved an amendment to the employment agreement between the Company and Paul Sagan, its Chief Executive Officer. The agreement was revised to provide that if Mr. Sagan terminates his employment under certain circumstances following a change in control of Akamai, vesting of all outstanding unvested options held by him as of the termination date shall accelerate.
Table of Contents


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20060726160622.txt.gz
TIME:20060726160622
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On July 26, 2006, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2006. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2006. Revenue for second quarter 2006 was $100.6 million, an 11 percent increase over first quarter 2006 revenue of $90.8 million, and a 56 percent increase over second quarter 2005 revenue of $64.6 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
July 26, 2006
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the second quarter of 2006 was $11.3 million, or $0.07 per diluted share. GAAP net income in the second quarter includes equity-related compensation charges of approximately $13.2 million, or $0.07 per diluted share, on a pre-tax basis, reflecting the Company's adoption of Financial Accounting Standard 123R on January 1, 2006. GAAP net income also reflects a book tax rate of approximately 45 percent.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $35.8 million, or $0.20 per normalized diluted share*, in the second quarter of 2006, a 22 percent increase over first quarter 2006 normalized net income of $29.4 million, or $0.17 per diluted share, and a 110 percent improvement over 2005 second quarter normalized earnings of $17.1 million, or $0.12 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We had an exceptionally strong quarter, exceeding our growth expectations," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We experienced robust demand for our services across many verticals, with heavier than expected customer usage resulting in part from the explosion in digital media consumption and the continued proliferation of broadband around the world. Akamai is helping our customers leverage the low-cost, global reach of the Internet to optimize the performance of their content and business applications and create more profitable online business models."
 
Adjusted EBITDA* for the second quarter of 2006 was $40.0 million, up 20 percent from $33.4 million in the prior quarter, and up from $22.7 million in the second quarter of 2005. Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenue was 40 percent, up from 37 percent in the prior quarter and up from 35 percent a year ago. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $27.7 million in the second quarter, as compared to $33.2 million in the first quarter 2006 and $16.9 million in the same period last year. Cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities totaled $367 million at the end of the period.
At June 30, 2006, the Company had approximately 155 million shares of common stock outstanding.
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the second quarter increased by 79 to a record 2,060, a four percent increase over first quarter 2006, and a 19 percent increase year-over-year.
Customers
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States each accounted for 22 percent of revenue for the second quarter of 2006.
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 2001832.
Quarterly Conference Call
www.akamai.com
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
About Akamai
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
 
Financial Statements
 
* Includes equity-related compensation (see supplemental table for figures)  Includes depreciation (see supplemental table for figures)
 
 
* Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the non-GAAP financial metrics we have included are useful to management and investors because they provide additional insight into our operations as well as help us assess and monitor developments in our business. Set forth below are definitions of the non-GAAP terms we use and explanations of some of the benefits provided by those metrics.
 
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, equity-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, utilization of tax NOL carryforward and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures. Because Adjusted EBITDA eliminates these items, Akamai considers this financial measure to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statement of cash flows in the Company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, utilization of tax NOL carryforward and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized diluted share" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized diluted shares to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and our ability to help our customers create profitable online business models. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission or server capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, and subsequent quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20060926163116.txt.gz
TIME:20060926163116
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into Material Definitive Agreement
     On September 20, 2006, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") adopted a policy (the "Policy") with respect to the payment of compensation to a director upon such director's departure from the Board. Pursuant to the Policy, upon a director's departure from the Board, such director will receive a cash payment equal to the pro-rated annual cash retainer payable to such director under our non-employee director compensation plan and 100% of the unvested shares underlying deferred stock units held by such director will accelerate at the time of departure and become exercisable in full. In addition, if a director has completed three years of Board service at the time of departure, 100% of the vested options initially granted to such director upon joining the Board will accelerate at the time of departure and become exercisable in full. The Policy will only apply to directors who are in good standing as determined by the Board at the time of his/her departure. The Board adopted the Policy at the recommendation of the Compensation Committee of the Board.
     On September 20, 2006, the Board also approved a change in the equity compensation of the non-employee members of the Board. Each non-employee director will now be issued a stock option to purchase 25,000 shares of Akamai common stock on the date of such director's initial appointment to the Board; however, the Compensation Committee retains the right to issue a different number of options in the exercise of its discretion. This option will vest 25% on the date of grant and in equal installments of 6.25% quarterly thereafter and will have an exercise price equal to the closing price of our common stock on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the date of the grant of such stock option. The Board adopted this change in the equity compensation of the non-employee members of the Board at the recommendation of the Compensation Committee.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20061020161523.txt.gz
TIME:20061020161523
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
 
Item
5.02      Departure of Directors of Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
          (b)      On October 18, 2006, C. Kim Goodwin notified Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") that she is voluntarily resigning from the Board of Directors effective as of November 15, 2006. Ms. Goodwin has been a director of Akamai since 2004 and was recently named Managing Director and Head of Equities for Credit Suisse's Asset Management business, based in Europe.
          (d)      On October 18, 2006, the Board of Directors of the Company voted to increase the size of the Board of Directors to 11 members and elected Geoffrey A. Moore as a director to fill the newly-created vacancy. Mr. Moore was designated as a Class I member of the Board of Directors and was elected to serve until the 2009 Annual Meeting of Stockholders or his successor is duly appointed and qualified. Mr. Moore, a business strategy consultant and a Managing Director at TCG Advisors, was recommended to the Board of Directors by Akamai's Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee.
          There are no arrangements or understandings between Mr. Moore and any other person pursuant to which Mr. Moore was elected as a director. Mr. Moore has not yet been appointed to any Board committees. Akamai's Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee has recommended to the Board of Directors that Mr. Moore be appointed to the Audit Committee and the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee. There are no transactions in which Mr. Moore has an interest requiring disclosure under Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K.
 
Item
9.01      Financial Statements and Exhibits
          A copy of the press release issued by the Company announcing Mr. Moore's election and Ms. Goodwin's resignation is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Table of Contents
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today announced the election to its Board of Directors of Geoffrey A. Moore, the well-known business strategy consultant, best-selling author, and a Managing Director at TCG Advisors.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  October 18, 2006 
Moore has made the understanding and utilization of "disruptive technologies" the core of his life's work. His books, and are best sellers and required reading at leading business schools. His most recent book, was published in January of 2006.
Crossing the Chasm, Inside the Tornado, The Gorilla Game
Living on the Fault Line
Dealing with Darwin: How Great Companies Innovate at Every Phase of Their Evolution,
"It is an honor to welcome Geoffrey to our Board of Directors," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "Geoffrey's vast expertise in the dynamics of developing and marketing high-tech products will be an important asset to Akamai as we seek to achieve our goal of providing the best possible services to enable our customers to grow their online businesses."
"Akamai is one of the best examples of a business that has successfully taken its core offering across the chasm,' turning early adopters into widespread supporters of its unique technology," said Moore. "Akamai has been achieving market successes as the leader in the tornado' market of digital content distribution and application acceleration services. I am looking forward to helping the company capitalize even further on this large-scale opportunity."
Moore divides his time between consulting on business transformation challenges in his practice at TCG Advisors, where he advises established enterprises on strategy and innovation, and his role as venture partner at Mohr Davidow Ventures, where he works with entrepreneurial management teams to help them bring "disruptive innovations" to market. He provides marketing strategy and organizational services to many leading high technology companies. Prior to TCG Advisors and the founding of The Chasm Group, Moore was a principal and partner at Regis McKenna, Inc., a leading high-tech marketing and communications company. He holds a bachelors degree from Stanford University and a Ph.D. from the University of Washington.
 
Akamai also announced that C. Kim Goodwin is resigning from its Board of Directors effective as of November 15, 2006 as a result of her appointment to a senior position in Credit Suisse's Asset Management business, based in Europe. She joined Akamai's Board in February 2004. In her new role at Credit Suisse, Goodwin will be responsible for the management of all Credit Suisse equity products in the Americas, Europe and Asia Pacific, as well as all multi-country equity products.
"I want to thank Kim for her tremendous contributions to Akamai," Sagan said. "She has been instrumental in providing insightful strategic guidance that contributed to Akamai's success over the past several years. We will miss her, and we wish her great success with her new endeavor."
"I thoroughly enjoyed my experience on the Akamai Board, and am leaving only because my new position in Europe precludes being able to continue to fully serve the interests of Akamai shareholders," Goodwin said. "I have complete confidence in the Company's management and strategy, and I wish them well in the future."
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
About Akamai
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20061026160324.txt.gz
TIME:20061026160324
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02      Results of Operations and Financial Condition
          On October 26, 2006, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2006. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
          The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.      Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c)   Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
99.1      Press Release dated October 26, 2006.
Table of Contents
          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents
99.1      Press Release dated October 26, 2006

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2006. Revenue for third quarter 2006 was $111.5 million, an 11 percent increase over second quarter 2006 revenue of $100.6 million, and a 47 percent increase over third quarter 2005 revenue of $75.7 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
October 26, 2006
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the third quarter of 2006 was $14.0 million, or $0.08 per diluted share. GAAP net income in the third quarter included equity-related compensation charges of approximately $14.6 million, or $0.08 per diluted share, on a pre-tax basis, reflecting the Company's adoption of Financial Accounting Standard 123R on January 1, 2006. GAAP net income also reflected a book tax rate of approximately 45 percent.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $41.8 million, or $0.24 per normalized diluted share*, in the third quarter of 2006, a 17 percent increase over second quarter 2006 normalized net income of $35.8 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, a 90 percent improvement over 2005 third quarter normalized earnings of $22.0 million, or $0.14 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We had another exceptionally strong quarter," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We continued to experience healthy demand across our customer base, building on the momentum we achieved during the first half of the year. Key sectors, including media and entertainment, high technology, commerce, and public sector all posted solid results."
 
Adjusted EBITDA* for the third quarter of 2006 was $46.8 million, up 17 percent from $40.0 million in the prior quarter, and up from $27.7 million in the third quarter of 2005. Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenue was 42 percent, up from 40 percent in the prior quarter, and up from 37 percent a year ago. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $48.5 million in the third quarter, as compared to $27.7 million in the second quarter 2006, and $19.5 million in the same period last year. Cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities totaled $416 million at the end of the period, up from $367 million at the end of the second quarter of 2006.
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the third quarter increased by 84 to a record 2,144. Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 20 percent and 22 percent, respectively, of revenue for the third quarter of 2006.
At September 30, 2006, the Company had approximately 156.2 million shares of common stock outstanding.
For purposes of year-over-year comparison of the Company's GAAP results, net income for the three-month period that ended September 30, 2005, included a non-cash, non-recurring benefit of $255.3 million, or approximately $1.59 per diluted share, primarily related to the recognition of the Company's net operating loss carryforward as a result of the release of a tax valuation allowance.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 7890805.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com.
 
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the non-GAAP financial metrics we have included are useful to management and investors because they provide additional insight into our operations as well as help us assess and monitor developments in our business. Set forth below are definitions of the non-GAAP terms we use and explanations of some of the benefits provided by those metrics.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, equity-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures. Because Adjusted EBITDA eliminates these items, Akamai considers this financial measure to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated statement of cash flows in the Company's most recent annual report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized diluted share" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized diluted shares to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
 
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and our ability to help our customers create profitable online business models. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission or server capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, and subsequent quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
 
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20061121181432.txt.gz
TIME:20061121181432
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 8.01 Other Events
     On November 20, 2006, Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Akamai"), announced that it had entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated November 17, 2006 (the "Merger Agreement") by and among Akamai, Nantucket Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Akamai, Nine Systems Corporation, a Delaware corporation ("Nine Systems"), and the principal stockholders of Nine Systems. Under the Merger Agreement, Akamai will acquire all of the outstanding equity of Nine Systems in exchange for approximately 3.1 million shares of Akamai's common stock and approximately $7 million in cash, subject to certain closing adjustments. The closing of the merger is subject to customary closing conditions including obtaining the approval of Nine Systems' stockholders.
     A copy of the press release announcing the signing of the Merger Agreement is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) and Nine Systems Corp., Inc. announced today that the two companies have signed a definitive agreement for Akamai to acquire Nine Systems in a merger transaction. The closing of the transaction, which is subject to customary closing conditions, including the approval of Nine Systems' stockholders, is expected by year-end. The acquisition is expected to be accretive to Akamai earnings on a normalized, diluted per share basis* in 2007.
CAMBRIDGE, MA and SAN DIEGO, CA
November 20, 2006
The acquisition of Nine Systems provides Akamai with a robust rich media management framework upon which services can be built to enable customers to more effectively control and monetize their digital assets. Akamai plans to integrate Nine Systems' Stream OS, a suite of configurable rich media management tools that enable easy production and publishing of content online, into the global Akamai network. Akamai's goal is to provide customers worldwide with a unified solution for managing content and controlling delivery across the industry's most pervasive rich media distribution platform.
"We are excited about offering a new and comprehensive solution for the delivery, management, and control of online media assets," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "Nine Systems has established itself as a leader in the creation of powerful Web-based tools for businesses to easily produce, publish, and distribute their streaming and downloadable media. Integrating Stream OS into our delivery network will allow Akamai to more fully support asset control, rights management, and media reporting to better enable our customers' digital media businesses."
"This is a big win for our customers, and for companies requiring rich media management, publishing, and robust delivery," said Troy Snyder, president and CEO of Nine Systems. "Nine Systems' rich media publishing and management tools already power the online media experience for some of today's best known companies in the music, broadcast, sports, entertainment, inspirational, advertising, education, and government markets. By joining forces with Akamai, our customers will have access to the leader in accelerating content and applications online, supported by a combination of the most experienced teams in the industry."
 
Sagan continued, "We believe that as our business supporting media clients grows and their needs advance, the combined Akamai and Nine Systems rich media framework will allow us to develop the best solutions to help our customers simplify the control, management, distribution, reporting, and monetization of digital assets on the Internet."
Under terms of the agreement, Akamai will acquire all of the outstanding common stock, preferred stock, and vested and unvested stock options of Nine Systems by issuing approximately 3.1 million shares of Akamai common stock and approximately $7 million in cash, subject to certain closing adjustments. The merger transaction is expected to be accounted for by Akamai under the purchase method of accounting.
About Nine Systems
Nine Systems is the leader in providing a comprehensive solution for rich media production, publishing and distribution in today's most popular formats. Nine Systems' large selection of rich media management tools allows content owners to control all aspects of their media in a robust, yet easy to use application, Stream OS. Nine Systems powers the online media experience for many of today's best-known brands including Universal Music Group, the NBA, CinemaNow, CBS SportsLine and EMI Music. Privately held, Nine Systems is headquartered in San Diego, California, with a Network Operations Center (NOC) in Denver, Colorado, and sales offices around the U.S. For more information, visit .
www.ninesystems.com
Merriman Curhan Ford & Co. (AMEX: MEM) was the acting advisor to Nine Systems in the merger transaction.
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about the anticipated closing of the acquisition, the expectations with respect to integration of the Nine Systems technology and resulting benefits and the expected future business and financial performance of Akamai resulting from and following the acquisition. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, inability to successfully integrate the technology of Nine Systems or to develop products based on the technology, material adverse changes in the financial conditions or operations of Nine Systems, substantial delay in the expected closing of the proposed merger, inability to secure all consents and stockholder approvals necessary to effect the proposed merger and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20061128160609.txt.gz
TIME:20061128160609
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors of Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
     As previously reported on the Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 20, 2006, Geoffrey A. Moore was appointed as a director of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") on October 18, 2006. On November 21, 2006, on the recommendation of its Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, the Company's Board of Directors appointed Mr. Moore to serve on the Audit Committee and the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of the Board of Directors.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20061222160628.txt.gz
TIME:20061222160628
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors of Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
     (b) On December 19, 2006, William A. Halter voluntarily resigned from the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") effective as of January 9, 2007. In November, Mr. Halter was elected to serve as Lieutenant Governor of the State of Arkansas and will be sworn into office on January 9, 2007.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20061227170626.txt.gz
TIME:20061227170626
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
EXPLANATORY NOTE
On June 16, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai or the "Registrant") filed a Current Report on Form 8-K relating to its acquisition of Speedera Networks Inc. ("Speedera") that excluded certain financial statements that were not available at the time of filing. On August 26, 2005, Akamai amended the original Current Report on Form 8-K (the "Form 8-K/A") to include required financial statements and pro forma financial information in connection with the Speedera acquisition. By this amendment, Akamai is filing supplemental pro forma financial information in connection with the Speedera acquisition that includes an unaudited combined condensed pro forma statement of operations for the full year ended December 1, 2005, prepared as if the acquisition of Speedera had occurred on January 1, 2005.
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(b) Pro Forma Financial Information
Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.6 and incorporated by reference herein is unaudited pro forma combined condensed consolidated financial information for Akamai and Speedera for the year ended December 31, 2005.
(c) Exhibits
 
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
EXHIBIT 99.6
     On June 10, 2005, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company" or "Akamai") acquired privately-held Speedera Networks, Inc. ("Speedera"). The Company acquired all of the outstanding common and preferred stock, including vested and unvested stock options, of Speedera in exchange for approximately 10.6 million shares of Akamai common stock and 1.7 million Akamai stock options. The aggregate purchase price, net of cash received, was approximately $142.2 million, which consisted of $121.5 million in shares of common stock, $18.2 million in fair value of the Company's stock options and transaction costs of $2.5 million, which primarily consisted of fees for financial advisory and legal services.
     The unaudited combined condensed pro forma statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2005, was prepared as if the acquisition of Speedera had occurred on January 1, 2005.
     The unaudited pro forma adjustments are based upon available information and assumptions that Akamai believes are reasonable. The unaudited pro forma combined condensed consolidated financial statements and related notes thereto should be read in conjunction with Akamai's historical consolidated financial statements as previously filed on Akamai's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") on March 16, 2006. In addition, this unaudited combined condensed pro forma information should be read in conjunction with the historical condensed consolidated financial statements of Speedera included within this Amendment to Current Report on Form 8-K/A. The historical income statement of Speedera for the twelve months ended December 31, 2005 represents the results of operation from January 1, 2005 to June 10, 2005. Activity associated with Speedera subsequent to June 10, 2005 is included as part of Akamai's results of operations.
     These unaudited combined condensed pro forma financial statements are prepared for informational purposes only and are not necessarily indicative of future results or of actual results that would have been achieved had the acquisition of Speedera been consummated as of January 1, 2005. The pro forma financial statements do not give effect to any cost savings or incremental costs that may result from the integration of Akamai and Speedera.
 
 
Note 1  Basis of Presentation
     The unaudited pro forma combined condensed statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2005 gives effect to the acquisition of Speedera by Akamai as if the acquisition had occurred on January 1, 2005. The historic income statement of Speedera for the twelve months ended December 31, 2005 represents the results of operation from January 1, 2005 to June 10, 2005.
     The unaudited combined condensed pro forma financial information has been prepared on the same basis as Akamai's audited financial statements. The acquisition was accounted for using the purchase method of accounting and, accordingly, the respective assets acquired and liabilities assumed have been recorded at their fair value and consolidated into the net assets of Akamai.
Note 2  Pro Forma Adjustments
     The pro forma adjustments have not been adjusted to eliminate $5.0 million of transaction costs incurred by Speedera which is directly attributable to the business combination. Adjustments have been made to the unaudited pro forma combined financial information to reflect the following:
 
Note 3  Net Income per Share
     Pro forma basic net income per share is computed using the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the applicable quarter and assumes that common shares for the business combination were issued at the beginning of the period presented. Pro forma diluted net income per share is computed using the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the year, assuming that common shares for the business combination were issued at the beginning of the period presented, plus the dilutive effect of potential common stock. Potential common stock consists of stock options, deferred stock units, unvested restricted common stock and convertible notes.
     The following table sets forth the components used in the computation of pro forma basic and diluted net income per common share (in thousands, except per share data):


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20070122170036.txt.gz
TIME:20070122170036
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
     Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
     Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
(e)
     On January 16, 2007, the Compensation Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai," the "Company," or the "Registrant") adopted cash and equity compensation programs for 2007 for the following executive officers: Paul Sagan, Chief Executive Officer; Melanie Haratunian, Vice President and General Counsel; Robert Hughes, Executive Vice President  Global Sales, Services & Marketing; Chris Schoettle, Executive Vice President  Technology & Networks; J. Donald Sherman, Chief Financial Officer; and Cathy Welsh, Chief Human Resources Officer (collectively, the "Executives").
     Each of the cash incentive components of the 2007 compensation program provides for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, each Executive's cash bonus is weighted as follows: 80% based on Akamai achievement of revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal year 2007 and 20% based on achievement of individual or departmental performance goals. For Mr. Sagan, the target cash bonus is equal to 100% of his base salary of $400,000, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 200% of his base salary. For Ms. Haratunian, the target cash bonus is equal to 40% of her base salary of $240,000, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 80% of her base salary. For Mr. Hughes, the target cash bonus is equal to 100% of his base salary of $350,000. Mr. Hughes's maximum cash bonus is tied to the amount of the Company's recognizable revenues in 2007; therefore, his maximum cash bonus is not estimable. For each of Mr. Schoettle and Mr. Sherman, the target cash bonus is equal to 67% of his base salary of $300,000, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 133% of his base salary. For Ms. Welsh, the target cash bonus is equal to 40% of her base salary of $220,000, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 80% of her base salary.
     Each Executive was also granted stock options and Restricted Stock Units ("RSUs") under the 2007 compensation program as follows:
     The options will have an effective date of February 9, 2007, the second day following the Company's release of financial results for fiscal year 2006. The exercise price for the options will be
Table of Contents
equal to the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on February 9, 2007. The options will vest in accordance with the following schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the effective date and the remaining 75% vest in equal quarterly installments of 6.25% thereafter. Options are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of incentive stock option agreement previously filed on August 20, 1999 with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
     Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting. Base RSUs vest in 33% annual installments on the second business day following the date on which the Company releases its financial results for the preceding fiscal year only if the Company achieved an enumerated revenue target during such preceding fiscal year. Performance-Based RSUs will only vest to the extent that the Company exceeds specified cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2007, 2008 and 2009. The maximum number of performance-based RSUs that may vest is equal to 300% of the number of base RSUs granted on the same date; such maximum vesting would only occur if the Company meets or exceeds 110% of both its cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2007, 2008 and 2009. No performance-based RSUs will vest if the Company fails to exceed the applicable targets. If the Company's cumulative revenue and/or earnings per share results for the applicable years is between 100% and 110% of the targets, the Executive would receive between zero RSUs and the maximum deliverable amount set forth above.
     The foregoing description of the RSUs is qualified in its entirety by the text of the relevant RSU agreement, each of which is filed herewith as Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2, respectively.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1 AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. Restricted Stock Unit Agreement Granted Under the Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan 1. Grant of Award. This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on January 16, 2007 (the "Grant Date") to ____________ (the "Participant") of ________ restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and the Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan. 2. Vesting; Forfeiture. Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and provided that the Participant continues to provide services until the Vesting Date (as defined below): (a) This award shall vest as to one-third of the original number of RSUs annually on the second business day following the date on which the Company releases its earnings results for the preceding fiscal year in the event that the Company achieved the following revenue metrics for the applicable fiscal year:
2007 $[**] 2008 $[**] 2009 $[**]
The date on which RSUs vest may be referred to herein as the "Vesting Date." If the Company does not meet the applicable revenue metric during a fiscal year, the 33% of RSUs eligible for vesting in connection therewith shall be forfeited. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company. (c) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated for any reason, including by reason of death or disability, other than "Cause" (as defined below), then the number of RSUs which shall be vested shall be the number that are vested as of the date of actual termination. For purposes of this Section 2, "Cause" shall mean unsatisfactory job performance (as determined by the Company), willful misconduct, fraud, gross negligence, disobedience or dishonesty. In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company is terminated for Cause, all unvested RSUs shall be forfeited effective as of the date of termination. (d) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
3. Distribution of Shares. (a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs after a Vesting Date but before distribution of the corresponding Shares), the Shares of Common Stock represented by RSUs that vested on such vesting date as soon as administratively practicable after each Vesting Date (each such date of distribution is hereinafter referred to as a "Settlement Date") but in any event within the period ending on the later to occur of the date that is 75 days from the end of (i) Participant's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date or (ii) the Company's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date. (b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed. 4. Restrictions on Transfer. The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution. 5. Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights. Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant. 6. Provisions of the Plan; Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event. (a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement. (b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU. (c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), each RSU shall become exercisable, realizable or vested as to number of RSUs as would be vested pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date. 7. Withholding Taxes. (a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock -2-
Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items. (b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability. (c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described. (d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order"). (e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7. (f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account. (g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act. 8. Miscellaneous. (a) No Rights to Employment. The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting -3-
schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all. (b) Severability. The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law. (c) Waiver. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company. (d) Binding Effect. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement. (e) Notice. All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e). (f) Pronouns. Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa. (g) Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation. This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan. (h) Amendment. The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement. (i) Governing Law. This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws. (j) Unfunded Rights. The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant -4-
shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company. (k) Electronic Delivery. The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company. -5-
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable. AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: ------------------------------------ Name: ---------------------------------- Title: --------------------------------- ---------------------------------------- [Name of Participant] Address: ------------------------------- -6-
IRREVOCABLE STANDING ORDER TO SELL SHARES The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement. I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I HEREBY DIRECT SCHWAB TO SELL, AT THE MARKET PRICE AND ON EACH VESTING DATE LISTED ABOVE (OR THE FIRST BUSINESS DAY THEREAFTER IF A VESTING DATE SHOULD FALL ON A DAY WHEN THE MARKET IS CLOSED), THE NUMBER OF SHARES THAT AKAMAI INFORMS SCHWAB IS SUFFICIENT TO SATISFY THE APPLICABLE WITHHOLDING TAXES, WHICH SHALL BE CALCULATED BASED ON THE CLOSING PRICE OF AKAMAI'S COMMON STOCK ON THE LAST TRADING DAY BEFORE EACH VESTING DATE. I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes. I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph. I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab. - ------------------------------------- Signature - ------------------------------------- Print Name -7-

EXHIBIT 99.2 AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. Performance Share Restricted Stock Unit Agreement Granted Under the Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan 1. Grant of Award. This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on ___________, 2007 (the "Grant Date") to ____________ (the "Participant") of restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and the Company's Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive a number of shares of common stock, par value $.01 per share ("Common Stock"), of the Company calculated pursuant to Section 2 of this Agreement. The minimum number of shares issuable is zero; the maximum number of shares issuable is equal to 300% of the number of shares issuable in respect of the other Restricted Stock Unit Agreement entered into by the Participant and Employee on the Grant Date above (the "Maximum RSU Bonus Award"). The shares, if any, of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan. 2. Vesting; Forfeiture. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement including, without limitation, Paragraph 2(c) below, this award shall vest on the 2009 Reporting Date if, and to the extent that, the Company achieves the financial performance criteria set forth in Schedule 1 to this Agreement. Such date may be referred to herein as a "Vesting Date." (b) The "2009 Reporting Date" shall mean the date on which the Company files its annual Public Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2009 or completes its annual Private Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2009, as applicable. If, on December 31, 2009, the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-K shall constitute its "Public Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. If, on December 31, 2009, the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, the Company's regularly prepared annual audited financial statements prepared by management shall be its "Private Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. The applicable financial statements may be referred to herein as the "2009 Financial Statements." (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company. (d) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated for any reason, including by reason of death or disability, before December 31, 2009, then nothing shall be vested unless a Change of Control Event (as defined in the Plan) has occurred prior thereto. If the Participant dies or becomes disabled between December 31, 2009 and the 2009 Reporting Date, he or she shall be deemed to have been employed as of the 2009 Reporting Date.
(a) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company. 3. Distribution of Shares. (a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs on or after December 31, 2009) the Shares of Common Stock represented by vested RSUs as follows within 30 days of the 2009 Reporting Date. (b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed. 4. Restrictions on Transfer. The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution. 5. Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights. Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant. 6. Provisions of the Plan; Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event. (a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement. (b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU. (c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), vesting of each RSU shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of Schedule 1 to this Agreement. 7. Withholding Taxes. (a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any -2-
dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items. (b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability. (c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described. (d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order"). (e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7. (f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account. (g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act. 8. Miscellaneous. (a) No Rights to Employment. The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all. -3-
(b) Severability. The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law. (c) Waiver. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company. (d) Binding Effect. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement. (e) Notice. All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e). (f) Pronouns. Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa. (g) Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation. This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties and supersede all prior agreements and understandings relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan. (h) Amendment. The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement. (i) Governing Law. This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws. (j) Unfunded Rights. The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company. (k) Electronic Delivery. The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may -4-
be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company. -5-
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable. AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC. By: ------------------------------------ Name: ---------------------------------- Title: --------------------------------- ---------------------------------------- [Name of Participant] Address: ------------------------------- -6-
IRREVOCABLE STANDING ORDER TO SELL SHARES The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement. I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I HEREBY DIRECT SCHWAB TO SELL, AT THE MARKET PRICE AND ON EACH VESTING DATE LISTED ABOVE (OR THE FIRST BUSINESS DAY THEREAFTER IF A VESTING DATE SHOULD FALL ON A DAY WHEN THE MARKET IS CLOSED) OR AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE THEREAFTER, THE NUMBER OF SHARES THAT AKAMAI INFORMS SCHWAB IS SUFFICIENT TO SATISFY THE APPLICABLE WITHHOLDING TAXES, WHICH SHALL BE CALCULATED BASED ON THE CLOSING PRICE OF AKAMAI'S COMMON STOCK ON THE LAST TRADING DAY BEFORE EACH VESTING DATE. I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes. I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph. I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab. - ------------------------------------- Signature - ------------------------------------- Print Name -7-
SCHEDULE 1 VESTING CRITERIA FOR RSUs A. Overview The RSUs shall vest only upon the Company's achievement of certain financial metrics based on target cumulative Revenue of $[**] million and target cumulative Normalized EPS of $[**] per share over the Company's fiscal years 2007, 2008 and 2009. The Company's performance measured against each metric shall be equally weighted to enable comparison as a percentage of a combined target. For purposes of this Agreement, such metrics shall have the following meanings: "Revenue" shall mean the Company's cumulative annual revenue for fiscal years 2007, 2008 and 2009 calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America as reported in the 2009 Financial Statements. "Normalized EPS" shall mean the Company's shall mean the Company's cumulative annual earnings per diluted share for fiscal years 2007, 2008 and 2009 excluding cumulative amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, non-cash income taxes and loss on early extinguishment of debt. "Vesting Amount" shall mean the aggregate amount, if any, issuable to the Participant based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS performance measured against the Actual Percentage of Targets defined below. B. Calculation of Percentages The Company's Revenue shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative revenue for fiscal years 2007, 2008 and 2009 of $[**] million and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Revenue Percentage Component"). The Company's Normalized EPS shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative normalized earnings per share, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America, as reported in the 2009 Financial Statements for fiscal years 2007, 2008 and 2009 of $[**] and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Normalized EPS Component"). The sum of the Revenue Percentage Component and the Normalized EPS Component shall be the "Actual Percentage of Targets." C. Vesting Amounts 1. If the Actual Percentage of Targets fails to exceed 100%, then none of the RSUs shall vest and zero Shares shall be distributed in respect thereof. 2. If the Actual Percentage of Targets equals 104.57%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal one-third of the Maximum RSU Bonus Award, as defined in Paragraph 1 of the Agreement (the "Intermediate RSU Bonus Award"), and shall vest. 3. If the Actual Percentage of Targets equals 109.27% or more, then the Vesting Amount shall equal the Maximum RSU Bonus Award, as defined in Paragraph 1 of the Agreement, and shall vest. 4. If the Actual Percentage of Targets is between 100% and 104.57%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal a number of RSUs equal to the product of the Intermediate RSU Bonus Award -8-
multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which is the Actual Percentage of Targets Revenue minus 100% and the denominator is 4.57% and shall vest. 5. If the Actual Percentage of Targets is between 104.57% and 109.27%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal the sum of (a) the Intermediate RSU Bonus Award plus (b) the product of (i) the difference between the Maximum RSU Bonus Award and the Intermediate RSU Bonus Award multiplied by (ii) a fraction the numerator of which is the Actual Percentage of Targets Revenue minus 104.57% and the denominator is 4.70%, and shall vest. D. Effect of an Acquisition by the Company In the event that the Company enters into an Acquisition Transaction during 2007, then Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be adjusted to give effect to such Acquisition Transaction. An "Acquisition Transaction" means (i) the purchase by the Company of more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange which results in the Company acquiring more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, or (iii) the purchase or other acquisition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the ordinary course of business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 50% of another entity's total assets or assets that account for more than 50% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of such entity. As soon as practicable following the closing of an Acquisition Transaction, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company shall make a determination of the estimated impact of the Acquisition Transaction on the Company's cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS through 2009. If the Acquisition Transaction is estimated to be accretive, then: (i) in calculating Revenue for purposes of determining the Revenue Percentage Component, reported Revenue shall be reduced by the amount of estimated revenue contribution from the Acquisition Transaction; and (ii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2009 Financial Statements, shall be reduced by the amount of the estimated Normalized EPS contribution from the Acquisition Transaction. If the Acquisition is estimated to be non-accretive, then: (iii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2009 Financial Statements, shall be increased by the amount of the estimated negative Normalized EPS impact from the Acquisition Transaction. All determinations of the Compensation Committee regarding the estimated impact of an Acquisition Transaction shall be final, binding and non-appealable. This Agreement shall be deemed to be automatically amended, without further action by the Company or the Participant, to give effect to any adjustments required by this Section D. E. Effect of a Change in Control Event (1) If there is a Change of Control Event prior to December 31, 2009, the RSUs shall vest as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event and Participant shall be entitled to receive a pro rated number of Shares based on the amount of time elapsed between the Grant Date and December 31, 2009. -9-
The number of Shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs, if any, shall be calculated based on a pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets calculated as follows: (i) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2007, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results during the twelve-month period ending on the last day of the most recently reported fiscal quarter prior to the closing date of the Change of Control Event. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets. (ii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2008, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal year 2007. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets. (iii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2009, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal years 2007 and 2008 plus an amount equal to the Revenue and Normalized EPS for 2009 that would result if the rate of growth (loss) for Revenue and Normalized EPS, respectively, between 2007 and 2008 were to continue for 2009. Such sums shall be used for calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets. Once the pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets has been determined and the number of Shares, if any, that would have been issuable in respect of the RSUs on the 2009 Reporting Date (the "Pro Forma Distribution Amount") calculated, the actual number of Shares issuable shall be adjusted proportionally based on the percentage of the three-year calculation period that has elapsed as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event (e.g., if the closing date of the Change in Control Event were April 1, 2008, the number of Shares issuable would be 41.7% (15 months/36 months) of the total Pro Forma Distribution Amount). (2) If (i) there is a Change of Control Event between January 1, 2010 and September 30, 2010; (ii) Participant meets the requirements of Paragraph 2(c) of this Agreement as of immediately prior to the Change of Control Event and (iii) Participant's employment is terminated by the surviving entity in the Change of Control transaction at any time during the period between the Change of Control Event and October 1, 2010 for any reason other than for Cause (as defined below), then the entire portion of the Vesting Amount that had not vested prior to Participation's termination shall vest in full as of the effective date of Participant's termination. For purposes of this Agreement, "Cause" shall mean (a) any act or omission by Participant that has an adverse effect on Akamai's business or on the employee's ability to perform services for Akamai, including, without limitation, the commission of any crime (other than ordinary traffic violations), or (b) refusal or failure to perform assigned duties, serious misconduct, or excessive absenteeism. Whether a Participant has been terminated for "Cause" shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Company's management or, in the case of an executive officer, the Board of Directors or a committee thereof. -10-


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20070207160526.txt.gz
TIME:20070207160526
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On February 7, 2007, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai") announced its financial results for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2006. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 8.01 Other Events
     On February 5, 2007, Akamai announced that it had entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated February 2, 2007 (the "Merger Agreement") by and among Akamai, Lode Star Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Akamai, Netli, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Netli"), certain employees of Netli, and the principal stockholders of Netli. Under the Merger Agreement, Akamai will acquire all of the outstanding equity of Netli in exchange for approximately 3.2 million shares of Akamai's common stock, subject to certain closing adjustments. The closing of the merger is subject to customary closing conditions including obtaining the approval of Netli's stockholders.
     A copy of the press release announcing the signing of the Merger Agreement is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) and Netli, Inc. announced today that the two companies have signed a definitive agreement for Akamai to acquire Netli in a merger transaction. The transaction, which is subject to customary closing conditions, including the approval of Netli's stockholders, is anticipated to close later this quarter. The acquisition is expected to be neutral to Akamai earnings on a normalized, diluted per share basis* in 2007.
CAMBRIDGE, MA and MOUNTAIN VIEW, CA
February 5, 2007
The acquisition of Netli is expected to enhance Akamai's application acceleration solutions, which improve the performance of Web- and other Internet-based applications. According to Gartner, a leading research firm, the market for application acceleration spending is forecasted to grow to $3.3 billion in 2010. Akamai and Netli's combined managed services will seek to address two important market segments identified by industry analysts  application delivery controllers and WAN optimization controllers.
By combining Netli's high performance communications protocol with Akamai's massive global scale and unique capabilities to route Internet traffic around points of congestion, Akamai expects to offer businesses the most comprehensive and effective managed services for accelerating applications. These services enable enterprises to improve the performance of dynamic, highly-interactive applications such as customer portals, collaboration platforms, e-learning environments, and business-to-business commerce.
Organizations often face conflicting technology challenges as they move business processes to the Internet to increase revenues, expand into new markets, streamline operations, enhance productivity, and ensure customer satisfaction. Confronted with the need to consolidate infrastructure to avoid the cost of global data center build-out, enterprises also must ensure users, customers, partners, and employees experience good performance, regardless of what online application they are trying to reach and where they are located worldwide. The acquisition of Netli, when completed, is expected to further establish Akamai as the leading managed service in the application acceleration space. Akamai's managed service provides customers an effective alternative to deploying costly and often ineffective hardware to improve performance of Internet applications.
 
"We are very encouraged by customer acceptance of our application acceleration services, and believe the alignment of Akamai and Netli will provide enterprises with even better solutions going forward in this important and emerging market," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "Akamai and Netli both emphasize leading-edge technology to help businesses deliver more effective, higher performing online applications, and we are confident that this combination will benefit our customers, employees, and shareholders."
"By joining forces with Akamai to address the large and quickly expanding application acceleration market, we believe our customers will gain access to an even larger global network and a wider portfolio of leading-edge services supported by a combination of the most experienced providers in the industry," said Gary Messiana, CEO of Netli. "Our people are very proud of our pioneering work to deliver proven and effective technology in the area of optimizing online application acceleration, and we look forward to working with Akamai to combine our technology and capabilities to create the strongest managed service offering in the industry."
Under terms of the agreement, Akamai will acquire all of the outstanding equity of Netli in exchange for approximately 3.2 million shares of Akamai common stock, subject to certain closing adjustments. The merger transaction is expected to be accounted for by Akamai under the purchase method of accounting.
Netli is a rapidly growing global service provider for accelerating applications and content over the Internet  enabling global e-business from centralized infrastructure. Netli provides network infrastructure as a service, on-demand optimizing application, and content delivery while shifting bandwidth, computing, and storage requirements to Netli infrastructure. The result is better utilization of capital budgets and resources by transferring the cost, risk, complexity, and management overhead of delivering enterprise-scale Web applications and content to Netli. The world's three biggest mobile phone suppliers, the largest technology reseller, the largest beauty products company, the two largest computer manufacturers, and the top two import auto manufacturers trust Netli for their application acceleration and content delivery needs. The company is headquartered in Mountain View, California, and was recently included in the AlwaysOn 100 list of the most innovative technology companies in the world.
About Netli
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
About Akamai
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities
 
Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about the anticipated closing of the acquisition, the expectations with respect to integration of the Netli technology and resulting benefits and the expected future business and financial performance of Akamai resulting from and following the acquisition. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, inability to successfully integrate the technology of Netli or to develop products based on the technology, material adverse changes in the financial conditions or operations of Netli, substantial delay in the expected closing of the proposed merger, inability to secure all consents and stockholder approvals necessary to effect the proposed merger and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
* In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the non-GAAP financial metrics we have included are useful to management and investors because they provide additional insight into our operations as well as help us assess and monitor developments in our business. Set forth below are definitions of the non-GAAP terms we use and explanations of some of the benefits provided by those metrics.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized diluted share" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized diluted shares to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.

 
EXHIBIT 99.2
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2006. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2006 was $125.7 million, a 13 percent increase over the previous quarter's revenue of $111.5 million, and a 52 percent increase over fourth quarter 2005 revenue of $82.7 million. Total revenue for 2006 was $428.7 million, a 51 percent increase over 2005 revenue of $283.1 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 7, 2007
Akamai's fourth quarter consolidated financial results include 18 days of activity from Nine Systems Corporation following the closing of Akamai's acquisition of Nine Systems on December 13, 2006. Nine Systems contributed approximately $800,000 of revenue during the fourth quarter of 2006.
"Akamai's strong growth in the fourth quarter was fueled by increased demand for our services across our customer base, especially in the digital media and online commerce markets," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "With these fourth quarter results, we reached a run rate of more than half a billion dollars on the top line, a milestone on the way to our billion dollar goal, while we continued to expand profitability."
 
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the fourth quarter of 2006 was $20.6 million, or $0.12 per diluted share. Full-year GAAP net income for 2006 was $57.4 million, or $0.34 per diluted share.
For purposes of year-over-year comparison of the Company's GAAP results, net income for 2005 included a non-cash, non-recurring benefit of $258.8 million, or approximately $1.65 per diluted share, primarily related to the recognition of the Company's net operating loss carryforward as a result of the release of a tax valuation allowance.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $47.5 million, or $0.27 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2006, a 14 percent increase over prior quarter normalized net income of $41.8 million, or $0.24 per diluted share. Full-year normalized net income grew 94 percent year-over-year to $154.5 million, or $0.88 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2006 was $53.0 million, up from $46.8 million in the prior quarter, and $30.6 million in the fourth quarter of 2005. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the fourth quarter was 42 percent, a 5 point improvement over the fourth quarter of last year. For the full year, adjusted EBITDA was $173.3 million, up from $101.4 million in 2005. Full year Adjusted EBITDA margin improved to 40 percent, up from 36 percent in 2005. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Full-year cash from operations was $132.0 million, or 31 percent of revenue, up 59 percent over the prior year. At year-end, the Company had approximately $434 million of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 160.1 million shares of common stock outstanding as of December 31, 2006.
Akamai added 78 net new customers under long-term services contracts during the fourth quarter of 2006, in addition to 125 recurring revenue customers from the Nine Systems acquisition, bringing Akamai's total year-end number of customers under long-term services contracts to 2,347.
Customers
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 20 percent and 22 percent, respectively, of revenue for full-year 2006.
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 5848965.
Quarterly Conference Call
www.akamai.com
 
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
About Akamai
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. This measure is also used by management in their financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, equity-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as equity-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized diluted shares" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized diluted shares to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
 
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, unexpected
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
 
expenses associated with the integration of Nine Systems, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20070319161226.txt.gz
TIME:20070319161226
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
Table of Contents
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
Table of Contents
    
ITEM 8.01
OTHER EVENTS
     On February 2, 2007, Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Akamai" or the "Registrant"), entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement"), by and among Akamai, Lode Star Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Akamai (the "Merger Sub"), Netli, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Netli"), the Non-competition Parties named therein and the Principal Stockholders named therein. A copy of the press release announcing completion of the acquisition is filed with this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
     The acquisition contemplated by the Merger Agreement closed on March 13, 2007. Upon closing, Netli, a provider of services for the delivery of applications and content over the Internet, became a wholly-owned subsidiary of Akamai. Shares of Netli capital stock issued and outstanding immediately prior to the closing were canceled and converted into the right to receive shares of Akamai common stock. Each outstanding option to purchase shares of Netli capital stock was assumed by Akamai and converted into an option to purchase shares of Akamai common stock.
     Under the terms of the Merger Agreement, Akamai issued approximately 2.8 million shares of its common stock to the holders of Netli capital stock and assumed Netli's outstanding options, which became options to purchase approximately 400,000 shares of Akamai common stock. Approximately 1.1 million of the shares issued at closing were placed in escrow primarily to secure the indemnification obligations of Netli's former stockholders. The Akamai securities were issued without registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), pursuant to the exemptions set forth in Section 4(2) of the Securities Act and Rule 506 of Regulation D. Under the terms of the Merger Agreement, Akamai has agreed to register with the Securities and Exchange Commission the shares of its common stock issued to former Netli stockholders in the merger. The terms of the issuance of Akamai securities are more fully described in Item 5 of Part II of the Registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 1, 2007.
     The terms of the Merger Agreement were determined on the basis of arms-length negotiations. Prior to the execution of the Merger Agreement, none of Akamai, any of its affiliates, any director or officer of Akamai or any associate of any such director or officer, had any material relationship with Netli.
(c) Exhibits.
99.1      Press Release dated March 14, 2007
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents
99.1     Press Release dated March 14, 2007

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) today announced it has completed its acquisition of Netli, Inc., a privately held company based in Mountain View, California. Akamai announced a definitive agreement on February 5, 2007 to acquire Netli in a merger transaction.
CAMBRIDGE, MA
March 14, 2007
Akamai acquired Netli in an effort to enhance its application acceleration solutions, which are designed to improve the performance of Web- and other Internet-based applications. By combining Netli's high performance communications protocol with Akamai's worldwide network of servers and unique capabilities to route Internet traffic around points of congestion, Akamai expects to offer businesses the most effective managed services for accelerating online applications.
"We believe the majority of today's successful enterprises doing business online require both content and application acceleration," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "With our acquisition of Netli now complete, we are excited to add more value to our portfolio of managed services. Netli has developed important technology and operational expertise in the area of application acceleration, and by combining our efforts we expect to offer a compelling and comprehensive set of solutions."
Under terms of the agreement, Akamai acquired all of the outstanding equity of Netli by issuing approximately 3.2 million shares of Akamai common stock in a private placement. The merger transaction will be accounted for by Akamai under the purchase method of accounting.
Akamai expects to provide an update on its integration plans for Netli during Akamai's next quarterly investor call.
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
About Akamai
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
 
     The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements regarding the expected benefits of the acquisition of Netli and Akamai's expected timing for an integration update. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, expectations regarding the performance of the combined business, difficulty in integrating Netli's operations with Akamai's, failure of Akamai's network infrastructure, continuing market acceptance of our services and those provided by Netli and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20070425151120.txt.gz
TIME:20070425151120
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
     
Item 2.02
Results of Operations and Financial Condition
     On April 25, 2007, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2007. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
     The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
     
Item 9.01.
Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
99.1     Press Release dated April 25, 2007.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents
99.1     Press Release dated April 25, 2007

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2007. Revenue for the first quarter 2007 was $139.3 million, an 11 percent increase over fourth quarter 2006 revenue of $125.7 million, and a 53 percent increase over first quarter 2006 revenue of $90.8 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 25, 2007
Akamai's first quarter consolidated financial results include 18 days of activity from Netli, Inc. following the closing of Akamai's acquisition of Netli on March 13, 2007. Netli contributed approximately $500,000 of revenue during the first quarter of 2007.
"Demand for our core content delivery and application acceleration services grew in all sectors of our business and helped us to achieve record performance in the first quarter," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "With our ongoing investment in internal research and development, along with key strategic acquisitions of Nine Systems, Netli, and most recently Red Swoosh, we continue to innovate to meet our customers' high expectations for quality delivery and enhanced functionality that will help them achieve their online business objectives."
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the first quarter of 2007 was $19.2 million, or $0.11 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $50.7 million, or $0.28 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2007, a seven percent increase over fourth quarter 2006 normalized net income of $47.5 million, or $0.27 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
 
Adjusted EBITDA* for the first quarter of 2007 was $58.8 million, up from $53.0 million in the fourth quarter 2006, and $33.4 million in the first quarter of 2006. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the first quarter was 42 percent, a 5 point improvement over the first quarter of last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $56.3 million, or 40 percent of revenue. At the end of the first quarter, the Company had approximately $480 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 164 million shares of common stock outstanding as of March 31, 2007.
Customers
Akamai added 89 net new customers under long-term services contracts during the first quarter of 2007 and Netli contributed an additional 45 net new customers, bringing Akamai's total quarter-end number of customers under long-term services contracts to 2,481.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 20 percent and 22 percent, respectively, of revenue for the first quarter 2007.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 3310990.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
 
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and
 
comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. This measure is also used by management in their financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized diluted shares" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized diluted shares to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
 
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by
 
these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, unexpected expenses associated with the acquisitions and integrations of Nine Systems, Netli and Red Swoosh, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20070718163237.txt.gz
TIME:20070718163237
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
(d) On July 16, 2007, the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") elected David W. Kenny as a director to fill a vacancy on its Board of Directors. Mr. Kenny was designated as a Class III member of the Board of Directors and was elected to serve until the 2008 Annual Meeting of Stockholders or his successor is duly appointed and qualified. Mr. Kenny is Chairman and CEO of Digitas Inc., a digital and direct marketing agency, and a member of the Executive Committee of Publicis Groupe, an international media and communications firm that acquired Digitas earlier this year. Mr. Kenny was recommended to the Board of Directors by the Company's Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee (the "Committee") in accordance with the provisions of the Committee's charter.
There are no arrangements or understandings between Mr. Kenny and any other person pursuant to which Mr. Kenny was elected as a director. Mr. Kenny has been appointed to serve on the Audit Committee and the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors. There are no transactions in which Mr. Kenny has an interest requiring disclosure under Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K.
In accordance with the Company's Director Compensation Plan, Mr. Kenny was granted an option to purchase 25,000 shares of the Company's common stock with an exercise price of $, the closing share price of the Company's common stock on the date of grant, July 17, 2007. Such option will vest over a four-year period so long as Mr. Kenny remains a member of the Board of Directors.
49.14
 
A copy of the press release issued by the Company announcing Mr. Kenny's election is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and applications online, today announced the election to its Board of Directors of David W. Kenny, Chairman and CEO of Digitas. Kenny is also a member of the Executive Committee of Publicis Groupe S.A. (Euronext Paris: FR0000130577, NYSE: PUB), where he leads the Groupe's overall digital and interactive strategy. Publicis, which acquired Digitas earlier this year, is the world's fourth largest communications group and second largest media counsel and buying group.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  July 17, 2007 
Mr. Kenny, 45, became CEO of Digitas in 1997, and has led Digitas through a decade of evolution and growth. Digitas has become one of the industry's leading digital marketing services organizations, serving blue-chip global brands.
"It is an honor to welcome David to our Board of Directors. I have long been impressed by his intelligence, integrity, and curiosity," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "He brings valuable expertise and insight in the fields of Internet advertising and marketing, and has helped blue-chip, global brands develop, engage and profit from digital and interactive strategies. David shares our vision, values, and passion for leveraging Internet technology, and will be an important contributor to the Board's work on behalf of shareholders."
"Akamai provides a unique set of services to help companies manage, deliver and monetize their digital assets and initiatives," said Kenny. "Marrying those services with innovative online advertising campaigns is a key opportunity moving forward. It's a privilege and important responsibility to be a member of the board of this dynamic company."
A former senior partner at Bain & Company, David holds a B.S. from the General Motors Institute (Kettering University) and an M.B.A. from Harvard Business School. He is a board member for Teach For America and a director of The Corporate Executive Board.
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and applications online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is "" For more information, visit
The Trusted Choice for Online Business.
www.akamai.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20070725160615.txt.gz
TIME:20070725160615
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 25, 2007, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2007. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and applications online, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2007. Revenue for the second quarter 2007 was $152.7 million, a ten percent increase over first quarter 2007 revenue of $139.3 million, and a 52 percent increase over second quarter 2006 revenue of $100.6 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
July 25, 2007
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the second quarter of 2007 was $21.6 million, or $0.12 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $55.4 million, or $0.30 per normalized diluted share*, in the second quarter of 2007, a 9 percent increase over first quarter 2007 normalized net income of $50.7 million, or $0.28 per diluted share, and a 55 percent improvement over 2006 second quarter normalized earnings of $35.8 million, or $0.20 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"Demand for our core content delivery and application acceleration services grew in all sectors of our business," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "With our record performance in the second quarter, we are excited about the potential we see to expand our business going forward."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the second quarter of 2007 was $65.6 million, up from $58.8 million in the first quarter 2007, and $40.0 million in the second quarter of 2006. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the second quarter was 43 percent, a three point improvement over the second quarter of last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $37.3 million in the second quarter. On a year-to-date basis, cash from operations was $93.6 million, an increase of 54 percent over the same period last year. At the end of the second quarter, the Company had approximately $504 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 165.2 million shares of common stock outstanding as of June 30, 2007.
Customers
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the second quarter increased by 74 to a record 2,555, a 24 percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 20 percent and 23 percent, respectively, of revenue for the second quarter 2007.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 4839771.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai
is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and applications online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are
not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. This measure is also used by management in their financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-related compensation and impairment of intangible assets. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized diluted shares" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized diluted shares to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, unexpected expenses associated with the acquisitions and integrations of Nine Systems, Netli and Red Swoosh, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20071012163111.txt.gz
TIME:20071012163111
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
(d) On October 9, 2007, the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") elected Jill A. Greenthal as a director to fill a vacancy on its Board of Directors. Ms. Greenthal was designated as a Class I member of the Board of Directors and was elected to serve until the 2009 Annual Meeting of Stockholders or her successor is duly appointed and qualified. Ms. Greenthal is a Senior Advisor in private equity at The Blackstone Group, a provider of financial advisory services. Ms. Greenthal was recommended to the Board of Directors by the Company's Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee in accordance with the provisions of its charter.
There are no arrangements or understandings between Ms. Greenthal and any other person pursuant to which Ms. Greenthal was elected as a director. Ms. Greenthal has been appointed to serve on the Audit Committee and the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of the Board of Directors. There are no transactions in which Ms. Greenthal has an interest requiring disclosure under Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K.
In accordance with the Company's Director Compensation Plan, Ms. Greenthal was granted an option to purchase 25,000 shares of the Company's common stock with an exercise price of $37.13, the closing share price of the Company's common stock on the date of grant, October 10, 2007. Such option will vest over a four-year period so long as Ms. Greenthal remains a member of the Board of Directors.
 
A copy of the press release issued by the Company announcing Ms. Greenthal's election is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and applications online, today announced the election of Jill A. Greenthal, a Senior Advisor in Private Equity at the Blackstone Group. Ms Greenthal, a former investment banker with over 20 years experience representing many of the world's leading media, technology and telecommunications companies, will fill a vacancy on Akamai's Board of Directors.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  October 10, 2007 
"It is an honor to welcome Jill Greenthal to our Board of Directors," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "Jill has a deep understanding of the media, Internet technology and telecommunications industries and we will benefit from her knowledge of the rapid changes rippling through these industries as we continue to expand the breadth of our offerings."
Ms. Greenthal said, "Akamai has dramatically transformed how many industries are leveraging the Internet to expand their businesses. In addition to providing technology for the reliable and scalable delivery of rich media, Akamai is helping its customers create entirely new business models for monetizing their digital assets. I am looking forward to the opportunity to contribute to such a dynamic company."
Before joining Blackstone in 2003, Ms. Greenthal was co-head of the Global Media Group, co-head of the Boston Office and a member of the Executive Board of Investment Banking at Credit Suisse First Boston. She was also co-head of the Boston office of Donaldson, Lufkin and Jenrette, before its acquisition by CSFB. Prior to joining DLJ, Ms. Greenthal was head of the Media Group at Lehman Brothers.
Ms. Greenthal is also a member of the board of directors of Freedom Communications, Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia, Orbitz Worldwide, and Universal Orlando.
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and applications online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses.
Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20071024160709.txt.gz
TIME:20071024160709
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
On October 24, 2007, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2007. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and applications online, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2007. Revenue for the third quarter 2007 was $161.2 million, a six percent increase over second quarter 2007 revenue of $152.7 million, and a 45 percent increase over third quarter 2006 revenue of $111.5 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
October 24, 2007
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the third quarter of 2007 was $24.3 million, or $0.13 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $62.4 million, or $0.34 per normalized diluted share*, in the third quarter of 2007, a 13 percent increase over second quarter 2007 normalized net income of $55.4 million, or $0.30 per diluted share, and a 49 percent improvement over 2006 third quarter normalized earnings of $41.8 million, or $0.24 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We were very pleased with our third quarter results and the demand we saw for our services, especially as we experienced increased momentum during September," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We saw strong growth across all of our core markets, as we continued to support our broad customer base with innovative solutions to help them realize the potential of their online businesses."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the third quarter of 2007 was $71.9 million, up from $65.6 million in the second quarter 2007, and $46.8 million in the third quarter of 2006. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the third quarter was 45 percent, a three point improvement over the third quarter of last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $77.4 million in the third quarter. On a year-to-date basis, cash from operations was $171.0 million, an increase of 56 percent over the same period last year. At the end of the third quarter, the Company had approximately $566 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 165.7 million shares of common stock outstanding as of September 30, 2007.
Customers
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the third quarter increased by 61 to a record 2,616, a 22 percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 18 percent and 23 percent, respectively, of revenue for the third quarter 2007.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687
www.akamai.com
(or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 18946845.
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and applications online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a
meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-related compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-related compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA over revenue. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment and capitalization of internal-use software development costs. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, stock-related compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized diluted shares" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized diluted shares to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20080201170243.txt.gz
TIME:20080201170243
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(e)
 
On January 29, 2008, the Compensation Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai," the "Company," or the "Registrant") adopted cash and equity compensation programs for 2008 for the following executive officers: Paul Sagan, Chief Executive Officer; Melanie Haratunian, Senior Vice President and General Counsel; Robert Hughes, Executive Vice President  Global Sales, Services & Marketing; and J. Donald Sherman, Chief Financial Officer (collectively, the "Executives").
Each of the cash incentive components of the 2008 compensation program provides for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, each Executive's cash bonus is weighted as follows: 80% based on Akamai achievement of revenue and normalized earnings per share targets for fiscal year 2008 and 20% based on achievement of individual or departmental performance goals. Akamai defines "normalized earnings per share" as earnings per share excluding amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits, release of deferred tax asset valuation allowance and similar items excluded in determining normalized earnings per share in issuing its earnings announcement for fiscal year 2008. Such individual or departmental performance goals reflect the expected executive's contribution to the Company's strategic goals. For Mr. Sagan, the target cash bonus is equal to 150% of his base salary of $525,000, and the maximum and cash bonus is equal to 270% of his base salary. For Ms. Haratunian, the target cash bonus is equal to 50% of her base salary of $325,000, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 90% of her base salary. For Mr. Hughes, the target cash bonus is equal to 125% of his base salary of $415,000, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 225% of his base salary. For Mr. Sherman, the target cash bonus is equal to 75% of his base salary of $415,000, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 135% of his base salary.
Each Executive was also granted stock options and Restricted Stock Units ("RSUs") under the 2008 compensation program as follows:
 
The options will have an effective date of the second day following the Company's release of financial results for fiscal year 2007; the effective date is expected to be February 8, 2008. The exercise price for the options will be equal to the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the effective date. The options will vest in accordance with the following schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the effective date and the remaining 75% vest in equal quarterly installments of 6.25% thereafter, subject to continued employment. Options are subject to
the terms of the Company's standard form of incentive stock option agreement previously filed on August 20, 1999 with the Securities and Exchange Commission. These are options are referred to as the "Four Year Vesting Options."
Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting. Base RSUs vest in 33% annual installments on the second business day following the date on which the Company releases its financial results for the preceding fiscal year only if the Company achieved an enumerated revenue target during such preceding fiscal year. Performance-Based RSUs will only vest to the extent that the Company exceeds specified cumulative revenue and normalized earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2008, 2009 and 2010. The maximum number of performance-based RSUs that may vest is equal to 50% of the number of base RSUs granted on the same date; such maximum vesting would only occur if the Company meets or exceeds 105% of both its cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2008, 2009 and 2010. No performance-based RSUs will vest if the Company fails to exceed the applicable targets. If the Company's cumulative revenue and/or earnings per share results for the applicable years is between 100% and 105% of the targets, the Executive would receive between zero RSUs and the maximum deliverable amount set forth above. In addition, vesting of the RSUs is subject to continued employment. The foregoing description of the RSUs is qualified in its entirety by the text of the RSU agreement, the form of each of which was included as an exhibit to Akamai's Current Report on Form 10-K filed with the Commission on January 22, 2007.
Mr. Hughes was granted an additional option to purchase 30,000 shares of the Company's common stock. The options will have an effective date of the second day following the Company's release of financial results for fiscal year 2007; the effective date is expected to be February 8, 2008. The exercise price for the options will be equal to the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the effective date. The options will vest in accordance with the following schedule: 33% vest on each of the second, third and fourth anniversary of the effective date, subject to continued employment.
On January 29, 2008, Chris Schoettle, the Company's Executive Vice President  Site Acceleration and a named executive officer for whom executive compensation disclosure was required in our most recent proxy statement, was granted 10,000 Four Year Vesting Options, the material terms of which are described above. It is expected that, in February 2008, Mr. Schoettle will be granted RSUs with vesting provisions consistent with those applicable to the RSUs granted to the Executives. Mr. Schoettle's base salary for 2008 is $315,000, and he has the opportunity to earn a bonus of $210,000. Mr. Schoettle's bonus will be determined based on the same factors used to determine the Executives' bonuses.
 
On January 29, 2008, the Compensation Committee approved an amended compensation plan for Akamai's Executive Chairman of the Board and the non-employee members of the Company's Board of Directors. The new compensation plan is summarized as follows:
The Executive Chairman of the Board of Directors and the non-employee directors of Akamai are entitled to annual compensation of $250,000, of which $50,000 is paid in cash and $200,000 is paid in deferred stock units ("DSUs") representing the right to acquire shares of Akamai common stock. The number of DSUs issued is based on the fair market value of Akamai's common stock on the date of issuance, which is the date of its annual stockholders meeting. For so long as the person remains a director, DSUs will vest over a two-year period with 50% vesting on the first anniversary of the date of grant and the remainder vesting in equal quarterly installments of 12.5% each. In addition, Akamai's Executive Chairman and its Lead Director are entitled to $40,000 of additional compensation, of which $20,000 is paid in cash and $20,000 is paid in DSUs. Chairs of the Audit Committee and the Compensation Committee are entitled to $25,000 in additional compensation, of which $5,000 in paid in cash and $20,000 is paid in DSUs. The Chair of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee is entitled to $10,000 of additional compensation, of which $5,000 is paid in cash and $5,000 is paid in DSUs. Each non-employee director is eligible to receive options to purchase shares of common stock
with a fair value of $400,000 when he or she joins the Board of Directors; the number of shares is determined based on the fair market value on the date of grant, which occurs at the first Compensation Committee following the date on which the director joins the Board or on such date if a Compensation Committee meeting is then held. The options will vest in accordance with the following schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the effective date and the remaining 75% vest in equal quarterly installments of 6.25% thereafter, subject to continued service as a director. Akamai also reimburses directors for reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred in attending meetings of the Board of Directors.
 
On January 29, 2008, the Compensation Committee approved an amendment to the employment agreement of Mr. Sagan. Under the terms of the amendment, if in the event of a change in control of Akamai (as defined in Mr. Sagan's employment agreement, dated January 4, 2005, which was previously filed as an exhibit to Akamai's Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 16, 2005, and the amendment thereto, dated August 9, 2006, which was previously filed as an exhibit to Akamai's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2006), it is determined that any payment or distribution, or any acceleration of vesting of any benefit or award, by the Company or its affiliated companies to or for Mr. Sagan's benefit,which would be subject to Section 280G of the Internal Revenue Code (the "Code") and/or would be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Code, or would result in any interest or penalties being incurred by Mr. Sagan with respect to such excise tax (such excise tax, together with any such interest and penalties, are hereinafter collectively referred to as the "Excise Tax"), then Mr. Sagan shall be entitled to receive a payment not to exceed $5 million (a "Gross-Up Payment") such that after payment by Mr. Sagan of all taxes imposed upon the Gross-Up Payment and any interest or penalties imposed with respect to such taxes, Mr. Sagan retain an amount of the Gross-Up Payment equal to the sum of: (a) the Excise Tax; and (b) the product of any deductions disallowed because of the inclusion of the Gross-Up Payment in his adjusted gross income and the highest applicable marginal rate of federal income taxation for the calendar year in which the Gross-Up Payment is to be made.
On January 29, 2008, the Compensation Committee approved entering into an agreement with Chris Schoettle, one of the Registrant's named executive officers in its most recently filed Proxy Statement, to extend the benefits of the Company's Executive Severance Pay Plan to him through the remainder of 2008. The Company's Executive Severance Pay Plan was filed as an exhibit to our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed with the Commission on August 9, 2006.
 
(d) Exhibits
None
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
None


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20080206160549.txt.gz
TIME:20080206160549
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 6, 2008, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading global service provider for accelerating content and applications online, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2007. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2007 was $183.2 million, a 14 percent increase over third quarter revenue of $161.2 million, and a 46 percent increase over fourth quarter 2006 revenue of $125.7 million. Total revenue for 2007 was $636.4 million, a 48 percent increase over 2006 revenue of $428.7 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 6, 2008
"2007 was another year of impressive growth and significant accomplishments for Akamai," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "The relationships we've built with customers across our target industries drove annual revenue growth of nearly 50 percent. As we begin our tenth year as a company, we believe the value of Akamai's differentiated services is stronger than ever  a testament to the dedication of our employees and the commitment of our customers to building great businesses on the Internet."
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the fourth quarter of 2007 was $35.9 million, or $0.20 per diluted share. Full-year GAAP net income for 2007 was $101.0 million, or $0.56 per diluted share.
 
The Company generated normalized net income* of $75.9 million, or $0.41 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2007, a 22 percent increase over prior quarter normalized net income of $62.4 million, or $0.34 per diluted share. Full-year normalized net income grew 58 percent year-over-year to $244.4 million, or $1.32 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2007 was $86.9 million, up from $71.9 million in the prior quarter, and $53.0 million in the fourth quarter of 2006. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the fourth quarter was 47 percent, a 5-point improvement over the fourth quarter of last year. For the full year, adjusted EBITDA was $283.2 million, up from $173.3 million in 2006. Full-year adjusted EBITDA margin improved to 44 percent, up from 40 percent in 2006. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Full-year cash from operations was $235.4 million, or 37 percent of revenue, up 78 percent over the prior year. At year-end, the Company had approximately $633.5 million of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 166.5 million shares of common stock outstanding as of December 31, 2007.
The number of customers under long-term service contracts at the end of the fourth quarter increased by 29 to a record 2,645, a 13 percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 16 percent and 23 percent, respectively, of revenue for the fourth quarter 2007.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-689-4521 (or 1-706-645-9202 for international calls). A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-800-642-1687 (or 1-706-645-9291 for international calls) and using conference ID No. 30455196.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit .
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why
non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-related compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-related compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trends and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-related compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, stock-related compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "diluted shares used in normalized net income per share calculation" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with
revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, unexpected expenses associated with the integration of Nine Systems, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20080306160216.txt.gz
TIME:20080306160216
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 4, 2008, the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Registrant") approved an amendment (the "Amendment") to the Amended and Restated By-laws of the Registrant, which became effective on March 4, 2008, to change the voting standard for electing directors in an uncontested election from a plurality voting standard to a majority voting standard. Pursuant to the terms of the Amendment, to be elected in an uncontested election, a director nominee must receive more "For" votes than "Against" votes. In contested elections, directors will continue to be elected by plurality vote.
The foregoing summary of the Amendment is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the Amendment, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
 
On February 29, 2008, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Registrant") issued a press release announcing that a jury in the United States District Court for the District of Massachusetts had returned a verdict in favor of the Registrant in a patent infringement case instituted by the Registrant against Limelight Networks, Inc. The jury awarded the Registrant $45.5 million in damages, plus interest.
The press release regarding the jury verdict is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
Section 1.9 of Article I of these Amended and Restated By-laws is hereby amended by deleting such section in its entirety and substituting therefor the following:
1.9 When a quorum is present at any meeting, for the election of directors, a nominee for director shall be elected by the stockholders at such meeting if the votes cast "for" such nominee's election exceed the votes cast "against" such nominee's election (with "abstentions", "broker non-votes" and "withheld" votes not counted as a vote either "for" or "against" that director's election); provided, that directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast when a quorum is present at any meeting of stockholders for which (i) the secretary of the corporation receives a notice that a stockholder has nominated a person for election to the Board of Directors in compliance with the advance notice requirements for stockholder nominees for director set forth in Section 1.10 of these By-laws and (ii) such nomination has not been withdrawn by such stockholder on or before the tenth business day before the corporation first mails its notice of meeting to the stockholders.
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) announced that a jury in the U.S. District Court of Massachusetts returned a verdict today that Limelight Networks, Inc. is infringing the content delivery patent asserted by Akamai. As a result, the jury awarded Akamai $45,526,946 in damages, plus interest.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  February 29, 2008 
The verdict, which came at the end of a three-week trial in Boston, stemmed from a lawsuit that Akamai had filed in 2006. The jury found that Limelight infringed all four of the claims that Akamai had asserted in its Internet content delivery patent, U.S. patent 6,108,703, issued in the name of Akamai founders Tom Leighton and the late Danny Lewin.
The jury rejected Limelight's defense that Akamai's patent was invalid.
"We are extremely pleased with the jury's verdict," said Melanie Haratunian, senior vice president and general counsel of Akamai. "Today's ruling recognizes the strength of Akamai's patent portfolio and is a tangible reflection of our resolve to vigorously defend the Company's intellectual property."
Akamai intends to ask the Court to issue a permanent injunction prohibiting Limelight from continuing to sell infringing services.
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading global service provider for accelerating content and business processes online. Thousands of organizations have formed trusted relationships with Akamai, improving their revenue and reducing costs by maximizing the performance of their online businesses. Leveraging the Akamai EdgePlatform, these organizations gain business advantage today, and have the foundation for the emerging Web solutions of tomorrow. Akamai is For more information, visit www.akamai.com.
"The Trusted Choice for Online Business."


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20080430160648.txt.gz
TIME:20080430160648
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2 below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 30, 2008, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2008. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering rich media, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2008. Revenue for the first quarter 2008 was $187.0 million, a 34 percent increase over first quarter 2007 revenue of $139.3 million, and a two percent increase over fourth quarter 2007 revenue of $183.2 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 30, 2008
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the first quarter of 2008 was $36.9 million, or $0.20 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $75.6 million, or $0.41 per normalized diluted share*, in the first quarter of 2008, a 49 percent improvement over 2007 first quarter normalized earnings of $50.7 million, or $0.28 per diluted share, which was roughly consistent with the fourth quarter 2007 normalized net income of $75.9 million, or $0.41 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"Building on the robust growth we experienced in 2007, these first quarter results demonstrated momentum across our business," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "Our performance illustrates the value of having a broad portfolio of solutions and a diverse set of customers. We saw strong demand for our services as businesses continued to take advantage of the Internet to build global scale and reduce costs associated with infrastructure build out."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the first quarter of 2008 was $87.2 million, a 48 percent increase over first quarter 2007 adjusted EBITDA of $58.8 million, and roughly consistent with $86.9 million in the fourth quarter 2007. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the first quarter was 47 percent, a five point improvement over the first quarter of last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $88.0 million in the first quarter of 2008, up 66 percent over 2007 first quarter cash from operations of $52.9 million. At the end of the first quarter of 2008, the Company had approximately $687 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 167.1 million shares of common stock outstanding as of March 31, 2008.
Customers
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the first quarter increased by 27 to a record 2,672, an 8 percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 16 percent and 25 percent, respectively, of revenue for the first quarter 2008.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-314-9013 (or 1-617-213-8053 for international calls) and using passcode No. 21274426. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 56793805.
www.akamai.com
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering rich media, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. An S&P 500 and NASDAQ 100 company, Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit .
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance
and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-related compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-related compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-related compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-related compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "diluted shares used in normalized net income per share calculation" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20080730160548.txt.gz
TIME:20080730160548
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 30, 2008, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2008. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering rich media, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2008. Revenue for the second quarter 2008 was $194.0 million, a 27 percent increase over second quarter 2007 revenue of $152.7 million, and a four percent increase over first quarter 2008 revenue of $187.0 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
July 30, 2008
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the second quarter of 2008 was $34.3 million, or $0.19 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $76.5 million, or $0.41 per normalized diluted share*, in the second quarter of 2008, a 38 percent improvement over 2007 second quarter normalized earnings of $55.4 million, or $0.30 per diluted share, which was roughly consistent with the first quarter 2008 normalized net income of $75.6 million, or $0.41 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We delivered solid results in a challenging environment," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We continued to benefit from the diversity of our enterprise-class customer base and increasingly broad portfolio of value-added solutions that have gained significant acceptance in the marketplace."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the second quarter of 2008 was $92.7 million, a 41 percent increase over second quarter 2007 adjusted EBITDA of $65.6 million, and a six percent increase over first quarter 2008 adjusted EBITDA of $87.2 million. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the second quarter was 48 percent, a five point improvement over the second quarter of last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $69.8 million in the second quarter of 2008. Year to date cash from operations was $157.8 million, up 78 percent over the first half of 2007 cash from operations of $88.6 million. At the end of the second quarter of 2008, the Company had approximately $745 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 168.9 million shares of common stock outstanding as of June 30, 2008.
Customers
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the second quarter increased by 53 to a record 2,725.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 16 percent and 26 percent, respectively, of revenue for the second quarter 2008.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-831-6234 (or 1-617-213-8854 for international calls) and using passcode No. 88451641. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 93394260.
www.akamai.com
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering rich media, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. An S&P 500 and NASDAQ 100 company, Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit .
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
* Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations
associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-related compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-related compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-related compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's condensed consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-related compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "diluted shares used in normalized net income per share calculation" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, deteriorating macro-economic conditions, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new
service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20081023164239.txt.gz
TIME:20081023164239
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 21, 2008, Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Akamai"), announced that it had entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated October 20, 2008 (the "Merger Agreement") by and among Akamai, Arrow Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Akamai (the "Merger Sub"), iB Holdco Inc, a Delaware corporation ("HoldCo"), I-Behavior Inc., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of HoldCo ("I-Behavior"), aCerno Inc., a Delaware corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of I-Behavior ("acerno"), IB Spinco LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("SpinCo"), the sole member of which is HoldCo, and Shareholder Representative Service, LLC, a Colorado limited liability company. Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, Merger Sub will merge with and into HoldCo (the "Merger") and at the time of the closing of the Merger, Akamai will acquire all of the outstanding equity of HoldCo in exchange for approximately $92 million in cash, subject to certain closing adjustments. In addition, Akamai has agreed to pay up to an additional $8 million in the event acerno meets certain performance metrics during the fourth quarter of 2008.
The Merger Agreement further provides that, upon the closing of the Merger, all (i) outstanding vested options to purchase Holdco's common stock granted pursuant to Holdco's stock option plan will be cancelled in exchange for the right to receive a cash payment in connection with the Merger, (ii) unvested options to purchase Holdco's common stock held by acerno employees who will be employed by Akamai following the Merger will be assumed by Akamai and represent the right to receive common stock of Akamai in accordance with the terms set forth in the Merger Agreement and (iii) unvested options to purchase Holdco's common stock held by individuals who will not be employed by Akamai following the Merger will be cancelled.
Holdco, I-Behavior, acerno and Spinco (collectively, the "Holdco Entities") have made certain representations and warranties to Akamai in the Merger Agreement and agreed to comply with certain covenants in the Merger Agreement. Subject to certain limitations, Akamai is entitled to be indemnified for any breach of these representations, warranties and covenants.
Immediately prior to the closing of the Merger, (1) certain of the assets and liabilities associated with I-Behavior will be transferred and assigned to SpinCo and (2) the equity interests in Spinco with be distributed to the shareholders of Holdco as part of a recapitalization and redemption transaction (the "Distribution"). As a result of the Distribution, in the Merger, Akamai will acquire only the acerno online advertising cooperative business. The current Holdco stockholders will continue to own the I-Behavior business. The closing of the Merger is subject to customary closing conditions. The HoldCo stockholders have already approved the Merger.
A copy of the press release announcing the signing of the Merger Agreement is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1.
 
(d) On October 20, 2008, Akamai's Board of Directors elected C. Kim Goodwin as a director to fill a newly-created vacancy on its Board of Directors. Ms. Goodwin was designated as a Class III member of the Board of Directors and was elected to serve until the 2011 Annual Meeting of Stockholders or her successor is duly appointed and qualified. Ms. Goodwin most recently served as Managing Director and Head of Equities, Globally for Credit Suisse's Asset Management Division, responsible for the management of all Credit Suisse equity products in the Americas, Europe and Asia
Pacific. Ms. Goodwin was recommended to the Board of Directors by the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee in accordance with the provisions of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee Charter. Ms. Goodwin previously served as a director of Akamai from February 2004 to November 2006, when she joined Credit Suisse.
There are no arrangements or understandings between Ms. Goodwin and any other person pursuant to which Ms. Goodwin was elected as a director. Ms. Goodwin has been appointed to serve on the Audit Committee and the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors. There are no transactions in which Ms. Goodwin has an interest requiring disclosure under Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K.
Ms. Goodwin was granted an option, pursuant to Akamai's 2006 Stock Incentive Plan, to purchase 6,250 shares of Akamai's common stock with an exercise price of $14.85, the closing share price of Akamai's common stock on the date of grant, October 21, 2008. Such option will vest over a four-year period so long as Ms. Goodwin remains a member of the Board of Directors.
A copy of the press release announcing Ms. Goodwin's election is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.2.
 
(d)    Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM) and acerno announced today that the two companies have signed a definitive agreement for Akamai to acquire acerno in a merger transaction. The transaction, which is subject to customary closing conditions, including the approval of acerno's stockholders, is anticipated to close later this quarter. The acquisition is not expected to have a material impact on Akamai's normalized earnings* in 2008.
CAMBRIDGE, MA and NEW YORK, NY  October 21, 2008 
The acquisition of acerno, a unique online co-operative of shopping and purchase data for enabling more relevant online advertising, is expected to greatly enhance Akamai's Advertising Decision Solutions, a new product line also being announced today. These new Akamai solutions will enable online advertising businesses to boost the performance of their online marketing investments by driving smarter advertising decisions based on relevant audience segments.
Real-Time Solution for Online Advertising Decision-Making
Akamai's Advertising Decision Solutions are designed to help buyers and sellers of online advertising create attractive audience segments with the necessary scale to achieve better results from campaigns and investments. acerno's powerful technology will complement the ability of Akamai's Advertising Decision Solutions to seamlessly incorporate real-time anonymous Web browsing information with anonymous online purchasing data from advertisers' websites to present the most relevant ad. In addition, Akamai's Advertising Decision Solutions can be enabled without costly and time consuming implementation, leading to faster time to market and increased ad revenue.
As a result, publishers will be able provide advertisers with better access to relevant consumers, strengthening the relationship with those advertisers and driving increased advertising revenue. In addition, advertisers will benefit by seeing greater return on investment and improved ad campaign performance, while cutting waste from their ad budgets by reaching their intended audience at the right time. Finally, consumers, often faced with irrelevant online advertising clutter, will enjoy greater advertising relevance and continued growth in the amount of content that is available for free because it is supported by advertising.
Protecting Consumer Privacy
Akamai already powers the online efforts of many of the Internet's largest publishers and ad networks, as well as hundreds of leading consumer brands. Akamai's Advertising Decision Solutions will build on the company's unique and trusted position in the online industry.
As members of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), Akamai and acerno are committed to maintaining both user privacy and customer confidentiality. All of Akamai's Advertising Decision Solutions, as well as acerno's services, rely solely on anonymous and non-personally identifiable end user information.
"Akamai's new Advertising Decision Solutions are a critical advancement in our product portfolio, designed to stimulate the economic model of online advertising by bringing greater simplicity and effectiveness to both ad buyers and sellers," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "As a trusted and strategic partner to today's leading online retailers, publishers, and advertisers, supporting an estimated $84 billion in e-commerce transactions on our network for U.S. retailers alone, Akamai's goal is to offer the industry's most efficient online advertising solutions, while being a leader in upholding consumer privacy. Our investment in developing the Advertising Decision Solutions line over the past two years and acquiring acerno today, represent a strategic next step for Akamai."
Mike Afergan, Akamai's CTO and senior vice president of Advertising Decision Solutions, added, "We plan to leverage and grow acerno's unique industry co-operative to enhance our new solution line. Our combined capabilities with acerno should benefit the eco-system of ad networks, online publishers and Internet advertisers by providing them with real-time, actionable data to serve more relevant marketing messages. Our Advertising Decision Solutions have already been adopted by several key stakeholders in the online advertising industry, resulting in higher revenues and better results."
"This is a big win for the online advertising industry," said Tom Sperry, president and CEO of acerno. "Greater precision in the advertising world reduces inefficiency, so advertisers earn a higher return on their investment. Together, Akamai and acerno will be able to create a unique solution for advertisers to expand their reach of customers across multiple publishers and networks, while leveraging predictive and descriptive modeling for improving conversion rates. For acerno's customers, Akamai will bring instantaneous scale and increased efficiencies to further improve the value of the co-op."
Many of the Internet's leading retailers currently contribute anonymous data to acerno's information co-op. This data is used in acerno's predictive models to determine why online shoppers actually browse, add merchandise to carts and eventually buy. In turn, this allows co-op members access to the most comprehensive source of information about what millions of online shoppers are looking to purchase and when they are likely to buy.
"Tom Sperry and Dave Hinton, chief operating officer of acerno, have assembled a first-class team, designed a set of breakthrough services, and built trusted relationships with a valuable set of clients," Sagan added. "We look forward to welcoming the entire acerno team to Akamai and to working together to build even more value for our customers."
 
Under terms of the agreement, Akamai will acquire all of the outstanding equity of a holding company that owns acerno in exchange for approximately $95 million in cash, subject to certain closing adjustments. The merger transaction is expected to be accounted for by Akamai under the purchase method of accounting.
About acerno
Using anonymous consumer shopping data from product manufacturers and multi-channel retailers, acerno's powerful analytics predict who these consumers are and what products or services they are interested in buying. acerno is a community of retailers, brand marketers and consumers whose interests align: brands create consumer demand for products; retailers promote those products for sale; consumers react positively to relevant advertising. acerno was founded in 2004 by an experienced team of direct marketing, online advertising and e-commerce professionals. acerno's financial advisor in the transaction was The Jordan, Edmiston Group, Inc.
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering rich media, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Serving the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries, Akamai has revolutionized how online publishers can monetize their content, and how online advertisers can expand their customer reach. Transforming the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, interact, and collaborate, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit .
The Akamai Difference
www.akamai.com
The release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about new services to be offered by Akamai, the anticipated closing of the acquisition, the expectations with respect to benefits and the expected future business and financial performance of Akamai resulting from and following the acquisition. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, inability to successfully integrate the technology of acerno or to develop services based on the technology, material adverse changes in the financial conditions or operations of acerno, substantial delay in the expected closing of the proposed merger, inability to secure all consents and stockholder approvals necessary to effect the proposed merger and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
* In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the non-GAAP financial metrics we have mentioned are useful to management and investors because they provide additional insight into our operations as well as help us assess and monitor developments in our business. Set forth below are definitions of the non-GAAP term we used and explanation of some of the benefits provided by this metric.
Akamai defines "normalized earnings" as net income before amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, depreciation of capitalized equity-related compensation, certain gains and losses on equity investments, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai
considers normalized earnings to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.

Exhibit 99.2
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering rich media, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today announced that C. Kim Goodwin will rejoin the Company's Board of Directors, having previously served as a Director from February 2004 to November 2006.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  October 21, 2008 
With over twenty years of experience in investment and financial services, Ms. Goodwin most recently served as Managing Director and Head of Equities, Globally for Credit Suisse's Asset Management Division. Based in Europe, Ms. Goodwin had been responsible for the management of all Credit Suisse equity products in the Americas, Europe and Asia Pacific, as well as all multi-country equity products.
"We are very fortunate to welcome Kim back to the Akamai Board," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "She was a trusted advisor during her earlier service as a Board member, and her strategic guidance contributed directly to Akamai's success. I am confident Kim will pick up right where she left off and bring her recent global business experience to bear as we consider Akamai's options to expand around the world, including in the financial sector that Kim understands thoroughly."
Ms. Goodwin commented, "I am looking forward to the opportunity to rejoin the dynamic group of individuals that make up the Akamai Board, many of whom I had the pleasure of serving with before. Akamai remains among an elite group of leading technology companies that are profoundly transforming how business is done on the Internet. It is exciting to once again participate as a Director."
Prior to Credit Suisse, Ms. Goodwin's career includes senior executive positions at State Street Research & Management Company, American Century Investments, Putnam Investments, Prudential Investments, and Mellon Bank.
Along with her business accomplishments, Ms. Goodwin appears frequently in the financial press, including , and has been featured in , , , and .
CNBC
Time Magazine
USA Today
Investment News
Barron's
Ms. Goodwin holds a bachelor's degree in politics from Princeton, and two master's degrees from the University of Texas at Austin  one in public affairs from The Lyndon B. Johnson School of Public Affairs, and an MBA degree in finance from The McCombs School of Business.
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering rich media, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit .
www.akamai.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20081030160303.txt.gz
TIME:20081030160303
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 30, 2008, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2008. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering rich media, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2008. Revenue for the third quarter 2008 was $197.3 million, a 22 percent increase over third quarter 2007 revenue of $161.2 million, and a two percent increase over second quarter 2008 revenue of $194.0 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
October 30, 2008
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the third quarter of 2008 was $33.4 million, or $0.18 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $74.2 million, or $0.40 per normalized diluted share*, in the third quarter of 2008, a 19 percent improvement over 2007 third quarter normalized earnings of $62.4 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, and down slightly compared to the second quarter 2008 normalized net income of $76.5 million, or $0.41 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We delivered solid earnings and revenue growth in an increasingly difficult environment, and year-to-date we've generated a quarter of a billion dollars in cash flow from operations," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We continued to experience strong growth in our newer solutions, such as application performance services and dynamic site acceleration, and we're excited about the introduction of Akamai's Advertising Decision Solutions product line complemented by the announcement of the pending acquisition of acerno."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the third quarter of 2008 was $90.5 million, a 26 percent increase over third quarter 2007 adjusted EBITDA of $71.9 million, and down two percent from the second quarter 2008 adjusted EBITDA of $92.7 million. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the third quarter was 46 percent, a one point improvement over the third quarter of last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $93 million in the third quarter of 2008. Year to date cash from operations was $251 million, an increase of 52 percent over the same period last year. At the end of the third quarter of 2008, the Company had approximately $789 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 169 million shares of common stock outstanding as of September 30, 2008.
Customers
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the third quarter increased by 83 to a record 2,808.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 17 percent and 26 percent, respectively, of revenue for the third quarter 2008.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-800-561-2813 (or 1-617-614-3529 for international calls) and using passcode No. 24912844. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 92182435.
www.akamai.com
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering rich media, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit .
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest expense, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "diluted shares used in normalized net income per share calculation" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, deteriorating macroeconomic conditions, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20081119172243.txt.gz
TIME:20081119172243
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 20, 2008, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") announced that it is taking actions to reduce its operating costs. These initiatives include a reduction in its global workforce of approximately 110 employees, or seven percent of its employee population. The Company will inform affected employees on November 19
th
and 20
th
, 2008 and expects to complete all activities associated with the restructuring actions by June 30, 2009. Additionally, the Company has decided to sublease a portion of its committed office space on a non-permanent basis.
As a result of these cost-cutting measures, the Company expects to incur aggregate restructuring charges and other costs of approximately $4.0 million in the fourth quarter of 2008. These anticipated charges consist of approximately $3.8 million for severance and similar personnel-related expenses and approximately $0.2 million in other costs. These costs are expected to be partially offset by a net reduction in non-cash stock-based compensation of $0.8 million, reflecting a modification to certain stock-based awards previously granted to the affected employees. Additionally, the Company expects to recognize a loss on sublease income of approximately $2.5 million related to certain leased facilities. The Company expects to incur total cash expenditures of approximately $6.0 million in connection with these cost-reduction measures.
Forward Looking Statements
This Current Report on Form 8-K contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties and are based on the beliefs and assumptions of the Company's management as of the date hereof based on information currently available to the Company's management. Use of words such as "expects" and "anticipates" or similar expressions indicate a forward-looking statement and include those statements regarding the restructuring charges and costs in the fourth quarter of 2008, the charges attributable to severance and other personnel-related expenses, and total cash expenditures in connection with the Company's cost reduction measures. Forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. Actual results may differ materially from the forward-looking statements the Company makes. See the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008, including the information set forth therein under the caption "Risk Factors," for a discussion of certain risks associated with our business. We disclaim any obligation to update forward-looking statements as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20090123170106.txt.gz
TIME:20090123170106
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(e)
 
On January 20, 2009, the Compensation Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai," the "Company," or the "Registrant") adopted cash and equity compensation programs for 2009 for the following executive officers: Paul Sagan, Chief Executive Officer; Debra Canner, Senior Vice President  Human Resources; Melanie Haratunian, Senior Vice President and General Counsel; Robert Hughes, Executive Vice President  Global Sales, Services & Marketing; and J. Donald Sherman, Chief Financial Officer (collectively, the "Executives").
Each of the cash incentive components of the 2009 compensation program provides for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, each Executive's cash bonus is weighted as follows: 80% based on Akamai's achievement of revenue and normalized earnings per share targets for fiscal year 2009 and 20% based on achievement of individual or departmental performance goals. For Mr. Hughes, the portion of his bonus that is based on Akamai's financial performance also requires achievement against a third component, a measure of the financial performance of Akamai's Advertising Decision Solutions operations.
For Mr. Sagan, the target cash bonus is equal to 150% of his base salary of $540,750, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 270% of his base salary. For Ms. Canner, the target cash bonus is equal to 50% of her base salary of $283,250, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 90% of her base salary. For Ms. Haratunian, the target cash bonus is equal to 50% of her base salary of $334,750, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 90% of her base salary. For Mr. Hughes, the target cash bonus is equal to 125% of his base salary of $427,450, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 225% of his base salary. For Mr. Sherman, the target cash bonus is equal to 75% of his base salary of $427,450, and the maximum cash bonus is equal to 135% of his base salary.
As described in the table below, each Executive was also granted stock options and restricted stock units ("RSUs") under the 2009 compensation program as follows:
 
 
The options will have an effective date of the second day following the Company's release of financial results for fiscal year 2008; the effective date is expected to be February 6, 2009. The aggregate number of options to be granted to each individual shall be calculated by applying a Black-Scholes option pricing model to the value set forth in the chart above based on the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the effective date. Such price shall also be the exercise price for the options. The options will vest in accordance with the following schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the effective date and the remaining 75% vest in equal quarterly installments of 6.25% thereafter. Options are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of non-statutory stock option agreement previously filed on March 1, 2007 with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting. Annual performance-based vesting RSUs (the "Base RSUs") vest in 33% annual installments on the second business day following the date on which the Company releases its financial results for the preceding fiscal year only if the Company achieved an enumerated revenue and normalized earnings per share target during such preceding fiscal year. Three-Year performance-based vesting RSUs (the "Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs") will only vest to the extent that the Company exceeds specified cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2009, 2010 and 2011. The maximum number of Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs that may vest is equal to 50% of the number of Base RSUs granted on the same date that have subsequently vested; the maximum vesting would only occur if the Company meets or exceeds 107% of both its cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2009, 2010 and 2011. No Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs will vest if the Company fails to exceed the applicable targets. If the Company's cumulative revenue and/or earnings per share results for the applicable years is between 100% and 107% of the targets, between zero Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs and the maximum deliverable amount set forth above will vest. The foregoing description of the RSUs is qualified in its entirety by the text of the relevant RSU agreement, each of which will be filed with Akamai's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008.
 
On January 20, 2009, the Board of Directors of the Corporation exercised its discretion to award Mr. Sagan a special bonus of $157,500, which is equivalent to 20% of the target bonus that was reflected in his 2008 cash incentive plan. On January 20, 2009, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors voted to authorize Mr. Sagan to award discretionary bonuses in an amount equal to 20% of each Executive's target bonus that was reflected in his or her 2008 cash incentive plan. Mr. Sagan has granted to Ms. Canner a bonus of $15,435; to Ms. Haratunian a bonus of $32,500; to Mr. Hughes a bonus of $103,750; and to Mr. Sherman a bonus of $62,250. These special bonuses were awarded to Mr. Sagan and the other Executives in light of their contributions to Akamai's financial performance in 2008 and to the overall success and achievement of Akamai in a challenging economic environment. These bonuses are scheduled to be paid in February 2009.
The discretionary bonuses described above are in addition to amounts earned under the terms of each Executive's 2008 cash incentive plan. The Board of Directors determined that Mr. Sagan achieved his individual performance goals under the 2008 cash incentive plan, and Mr. Sagan determined that all of the other Executives met or exceeded their individual performance goals under such plan. As a result, each Executive earned 20% of his or her target bonus under the terms of such plan.
When combined with the discretionary bonuses, each Executive was awarded total cash bonus payments equal to 40% of his or her 2008 target cash bonus.
 
(d) Exhibits
None
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
None


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20090204161824.txt.gz
TIME:20090204161824
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 4, 2009, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering rich media, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2008. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2008 was $212.6 million, an 8 percent increase over third quarter revenue of $197.3 million, and a 16 percent increase over fourth quarter 2007 revenue of $183.2 million. Total revenue for 2008 was $790.9 million, a 24 percent increase over 2007 revenue of $636.4 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 4, 2009
"2008 was another year of impressive growth and significant accomplishments for Akamai," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "As the external environment has become more challenging, we're pleased that we were able to grow revenue and earnings throughout the year while broadening our portfolio of solutions to improve Internet performance for our customers."
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the fourth quarter of 2008 was $40.5 million, or $0.22 per diluted share. Full-year GAAP net income for 2008 was $145.1 million, or $0.79 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $82.2 million, or $0.44 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2008, an 11 percent increase over prior quarter normalized net income
of $74.2 million, or $0.40 per diluted share. Full-year normalized net income grew 26 percent year-over-year to $308.5 million, or $1.66 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2008 was $100.3 million, up from $90.5 million in the prior quarter, and $86.9 million in the fourth quarter of 2007. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the fourth quarter was 47 percent, consistent with the same period last year. For the full year, adjusted EBITDA was $370.8 million, up from $283.2 million in 2007. Full-year adjusted EBITDA margin improved to 47 percent, up from 44 percent in 2007. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Full-year cash from operations was $343.5 million, or 43 percent of revenue, up 45 percent over the prior year. At year-end, the Company had approximately $771.6 million of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 169.4 million shares of common stock outstanding as of December 31, 2008.
The number of customers under long-term service contracts at the end of the fourth quarter increased by 50 to a record 2,858, an 8 percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 17 percent and 25 percent, respectively, of revenue for the fourth quarter 2008.
Akamai's fourth quarter consolidated financial results include two months of activity from acerno, following the closing of Akamai's acquisition of acerno on November 3, 2008. acerno contributed approximately $6.9 million of revenue during the fourth quarter of 2008.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-270-6057 (or 1-617-213-8891 for international calls) and using passcode No. 25657509. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 48935965.
www.akamai.com
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering rich media, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit .
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core
operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, gains on legal settlements, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "diluted shares used in normalized net income per share calculation" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by
these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforwards, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, unexpected expenses associated with the integration of acerno, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20090429161224.txt.gz
TIME:20090429161224
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 29, 2009, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2009. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
On April 29, 2009, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a stock repurchase program for up to $100 million of the company's common stock from time to time on the open market or in privately negotiated transactions. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering rich media, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2009. Revenue for the first quarter 2009 was $210.4 million, a 12 percent increase over first quarter 2008 revenue of $187.0 million, and a one percent decrease under fourth quarter 2008 revenue of $212.6 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 29, 2009
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the first quarter of 2009 was $37.1 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, a slight increase from 2008 first quarter GAAP net income of $36.9 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, and a 9 percent decrease from fourth quarter 2008 GAAP net income of $40.5 million, or $0.22 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $80.5 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2009, a 7 percent improvement over 2008 first quarter normalized net income of $75.6 million, or $0.41 per diluted share, and down slightly from the fourth quarter 2008 normalized net income of $82.2 million, or $0.44 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We are pleased with our strong start to the year," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "The Company's first quarter results demonstrate the power of Akamai's business model, which is based on providing differentiated, value-added solutions to our clients worldwide. Further, our scale provides us with tremendous operating advantages that are clear in our bottom line results."
The Company also announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a $100 million share repurchase program to be funded by cash from operations. The Company plans to use this program over the next several quarters to roughly offset dilution created by ongoing equity compensation programs.
The timing and amount of any shares repurchased will be determined by the Company's management based on its evaluation of market conditions and other factors. Repurchases may also be made under a Rule 10b5-1 plan, which would permit the Company to repurchase shares when the Company might otherwise be precluded from doing so under insider trading laws. The Company may choose to suspend or discontinue the repurchase program at any time.
"The Board's authorization of a share repurchase program reflects our continued confidence in the future of our business and our focus on providing an attractive return on investment to our shareholders," said JD Sherman, CFO of Akamai. "We plan to fund this program out of our operating cash flow while maintaining flexibility to make strategic investments, which is a testament to our belief in the strength of our business."
Cash from operations was $90.5 million in the first quarter of 2009, up 3 percent over 2008 first quarter cash from operations of $88.0 million. At the end of the first quarter of 2009, the Company had approximately $848.5 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
The Company had approximately 172.7 million shares of common stock outstanding as of March 31, 2009.
Customers
The number of customers under long-term services contracts at the end of the first quarter increased to a record 2,950, including acerno customers, a 10 percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 17 percent and 28 percent, respectively, of revenue for the first quarter 2009.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-383-8008 (or 1-617-597-5341 for international calls) and using passcode No. 98556092. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 37657932.
www.akamai.com
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering rich media, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit .
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Recent legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial
metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, gains on legal settlements, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss
on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "diluted shares used in normalized net income per share calculation" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of FAS 123R under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business, the strength of our business model, our operating advantages, and expectations with respect to revenue and the scope of, and the availability of operating cash flow for, the proposed repurchase program. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to continue to generate positive cash flow, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20090526160104.txt.gz
TIME:20090526160104
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 19, 2009, the shareholders of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") approved the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "2009 Plan"), which was previously approved by the Board of Directors of the Company on March 16, 2009. 8,500,000 shares are available for grant under the 2009 Plan. Awards outstanding under the Company's Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, 2001 Stock Incentive Plan and the 2006 Stock Incentive Plan (collectively, the "Existing Plans") as of May 19, 2009 that subsequently expire or are terminated, surrendered, cancelled or forfeited will also become available for grant under the 2009 Plan. The Company will no longer grant awards under the Existing Plans.
The 2009 Plan provides for the grant of incentive stock options intended to qualify under Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code"), non-statutory stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock, restricted stock units, deferred stock units, other stock-based awards and cash awards, including awards subject to specified performance criteria designed to qualify for deduction under Section 162(m) of the Code.
Employees, officers, directors, consultants and advisors of the Company and its subsidiaries are eligible to be granted awards under the 2009 Plan. Under present law, however, incentive stock options may only be granted to employees of the Company and its majority owned subsidiaries. The 2009 Plan is administered by the Company's Board of Directors. Under the terms of the 2009 Plan, the Board of Directors may delegate authority under the 2009 Plan to one or more committees or subcommittees of the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors has authorized the Compensation Committee (the "Committee") to administer certain aspects of the 2009 Plan, including the granting of awards to executive officers. In addition, as permitted by the terms of the 2009 Plan, the Board of Directors has delegated to the Chief Executive Officer of the Company the authority to grant equity awards to non-executive employees in accordance with guidelines established by the Committee.
The Board of Directors or the Committee may modify awards granted to participants who are foreign nationals or employed outside the United States or establish sub plans or procedures under the 2009 Plan to recognize differences in laws, rules, regulations or customs of such foreign jurisdictions with respect to tax, securities, currency, employee benefit or other matters.
The foregoing description of the 2009 Plan is qualified in its entirety by reference to the 2009 Plan, which was filed as Exhibit 99.1 to the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-159340) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 19, 2009.
In connection with the adoption of the 2009 Plan, the Committee also approved new form agreements for awards to be granted under the 2009 Plan. These forms are substantially similar to the forms used for grants of awards under the Company's 2006 Stock Incentive Plan, the equity plan generally used for grant of awards by the Company prior to the approval of the 2009 Plan and consist of:
 
 
 
These forms are filed as Exhibits 10.1 through 10.6 hereto.
 
(d) Exhibits
See Exhibit Index attached hereto which is incorporated herein by reference.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
This Incentive Stock Option Agreement (this "Agreement") evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), on                      (the "Grant Date") to                     , an employee of the Company (the "Participant"), of an option to purchase, in whole or in part, on the terms provided herein and in the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"), a total of                      shares (the "Shares") of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") at $            per Share. Unless earlier terminated, this option shall expire on the seventh anniversary of the Grant Date (the "Final Exercise Date").
It is intended that the option evidenced by this agreement shall, to the extent it so qualifies, be an incentive stock option as defined in Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended and any regulations promulgated there under (the "Code"). hereto sets forth the number of shares with respect to which this option qualifies as an incentive stock option as of the date of grant. To the extent that the option does not on the date of grant, or hereafter ceases to, qualify as an incentive stock option, it shall be a non-qualified stock option. Except as otherwise indicated by the context, the term "Participant", as used in this option, shall be deemed to include any person who acquires the right to exercise this option validly under its terms.
Schedule A
 
(a) . This option will become exercisable ("vest") as to 25% of the original number of Shares on the first anniversary of the Grant Date and as to an additional 6.25% of the original number of Shares at the end of each successive full three-month period following the first anniversary of the Grant Date until the fourth anniversary of the Grant Date. For purposes of this Section 2(a) the Vesting Start Date shall be the Grant Date.
General
The right of exercise shall be cumulative so that to the extent the option is not exercised in any period to the maximum extent permissible it shall continue to be exercisable, in whole or in part, with respect to all shares for which it is vested until the earlier of the Final Exercise Date or the termination of this option under Section 3 hereof or the Plan.
(b) . Upon a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), the number of Shares as to which this option has vested shall be calculated pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date.
Change in Control
 
(a) In order to exercise this option, the Participant shall notify the Company's third-party stock option plan administrator, Charles Schwab & Co., or any successor appointed by the Company (the
 
ISO  NQ AGREEMENT
"Plan Administrator"), of the Participant's intent to exercise this option, and shall follow the procedures established by the Plan Administrator for exercising stock options under the Plan and provide payment in full in the manner provided in the Plan. The Participant may purchase less than the number of shares covered hereby, provided that no partial exercise of this option may be for any fractional share.
(b) . Except as otherwise provided in this Section 3, this option may not be exercised unless the Participant, at the time he or she exercises this option, is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company or any parent or subsidiary of the Company as defined in Section 424(e) or (f) of the Code (an "Eligible Participant").
Continuous Relationship with the Company Required
(c) . If the Participant ceases to be an Eligible Participant for any reason, then, except as provided in paragraphs (d) and (e) below, the right to exercise this option shall terminate three months after such cessation (but in no event after the Final Exercise Date), this option shall be exercisable only to the extent that the Participant was entitled to exercise this option on the date of such cessation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Participant, prior to the Final Exercise Date, violates the non-competition or confidentiality provisions of any employment contract, confidentiality and nondisclosure agreement or other agreement between the Participant and the Company, the right to exercise this option shall terminate immediately upon such violation.
Termination of Relationship with the Company
provided
that
(d) . If the Participant dies or becomes disabled (within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Code) prior to the Final Exercise Date while he or she is an Eligible Participant and the Company has not terminated such relationship for "cause" as specified in paragraph (e) below, this option shall be exercisable, within the period of one year following the date of death or disability of the Participant by the Participant, (i) this option shall be exercisable only to the extent that this option was exercisable by the Participant on the date of his or her death or disability, (ii) this option shall not be exercisable after the Final Exercise Date, and (iii) to the extent that the option or any portion thereof is exercised at any time later than one year after the Participant's termination as an employee of the Company or any parent or subsidiary of the Company (as defined in Section 424(e) or (f) of the Code) by reason of his or her disability (as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Code), the option shall be a non-qualified stock option.
Exercise Period Upon Death or Disability
provided
that
(e) . If the Participant, prior to the Final Exercise Date, is discharged by the Company for "cause" (as defined below), the right to exercise this option shall terminate immediately upon the effective date of such discharge. "Cause" shall mean willful misconduct by the Participant or willful failure by the Participant to perform his or her responsibilities to the Company (including, without limitation, breach by the Participant of any provision of any employment, consulting, advisory, nondisclosure, non-competition or other similar agreement between the Participant and the Company), as determined by the Company, which determination shall be conclusive. The Participant shall be considered to have been discharged for "cause" if the Company determines, prior to or simultaneously with the Participant's resignation, that discharge for cause was warranted.
Discharge for Cause
 
ISO  NQ AGREEMENT
No Shares will be issued pursuant to the exercise of this option unless and until the Participant pays to the Company, or makes provision satisfactory to the Company for payment of, any federal, state or local withholding taxes required by law to be withheld in respect of this option.
 
This option may not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged or otherwise encumbered by the Participant, either voluntarily or by operation of law, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution, and, during the lifetime of the Participant, this option shall be exercisable only by the Participant.
 
If the Participant disposes of Shares acquired upon exercise of this option within two years from the Grant Date (or, in the case of Shares acquired upon exercise of an Additional Grant, the date of the Addendum) or one year after such Shares were acquired pursuant to exercise of this option, the Participant shall notify the Company in writing of such disposition.
 
This option is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is furnished to, or has otherwise been available to, the Participant with this option.
 
ISO  NQ AGREEMENT
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this option to be executed under its corporate seal by its duly authorized officer. This option shall take effect as a sealed instrument.
 
The undersigned hereby accepts the foregoing option and agrees to the terms and conditions thereof. The undersigned hereby acknowledges receipt of a copy of the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan.
 
 
ISO  NQ AGREEMENT
Number of shares as to which this option qualifies as an incentive stock option on the Grant Date: ISO_Shares
Number of shares as to which this option is a non-qualified stock option on the Grant Date: NQ_Shares
 
ISO  NQ AGREEMENT

Exhibit 10.2
 
This Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement (this "Agreement") evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), on                      (the "Grant Date") to                     , an employee of the Company (the "Participant"), of an option to purchase, in whole or in part, on the terms provided herein and in the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"), a total of                      shares (the "Shares") of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") at Exercise_Price per Share. Unless earlier terminated, this option shall expire on the seventh anniversary of the Grant Date (the "Final Exercise Date").
It is intended that the option evidenced by this agreement shall not be an incentive stock option as defined in Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Code"). Except as otherwise indicated by the context, the term "Participant", as used in this option, shall be deemed to include any person who acquires the right to exercise this option validly under its terms.
 
(a) . This option will become exercisable ("vest") as to 25% of the original number of Shares on the first anniversary of the Grant Date and as to an additional 6.25% of the original number of Shares at the end of each successive full three-month period following the first anniversary of the Grant Date until the fourth anniversary of the Grant Date. For purposes of this Section 2(a) the Vesting Start Date shall be the Grant Date.
General
The right of exercise shall be cumulative so that to the extent the option is not exercised in any period to the maximum extent permissible it shall continue to be exercisable, in whole or in part, with respect to all shares for which it is vested until the earlier of the Final Exercise Date or the termination of this option under Section 3 hereof or the Plan.
(b) . Upon a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Plan, the number of Shares as to which this option has vested shall be calculated pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date.
Change in Control
 
(a) . In order to exercise this option, the Participant shall notify the Company's third-party stock option plan administrator, Charles Schwab & Co., or any successor appointed by the Company (the "Plan Administrator"), of the Participant's intent to exercise this option, and shall follow the procedures established by the Plan Administrator for exercising stock options under the Plan and provide payment in full in the manner provided in the Plan. The Participant may purchase less than the number of shares covered hereby, provided that no partial exercise of this option may be for any fractional share.
Form of Exercise
 
(b) . Except as otherwise provided in this Section 3, this option may not be exercised unless the Participant, at the time he or she exercises this option, is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee of the Company or any parent or subsidiary of the Company as defined in Section 424(e) or (f) of the Code (an "Eligible Participant").
Continuous Relationship with the Company Required
(c) . If the Participant ceases to be an Eligible Participant for any reason, then, except as provided in paragraphs (d) and (e) below, the right to exercise this option shall terminate three months after such cessation (but in no event after the Final Exercise Date), this option shall be exercisable only to the extent that the Participant was entitled to exercise this option on the date of such cessation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Participant, prior to the Final Exercise Date, violates the non-competition or confidentiality provisions of any employment contract, confidentiality and nondisclosure agreement or other agreement between the Participant and the Company, the right to exercise this option shall terminate immediately upon such violation.
Termination of Relationship with the Company
provided
that
(d) . If the Participant dies or becomes disabled (within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Code) prior to the Final Exercise Date while he or she is an Eligible Participant and the Company has not terminated such relationship for "cause" as specified in paragraph (e) below, this option shall be exercisable, within the period of one year following the date of death or disability of the Participant by the Participant, (i) this option shall be exercisable only to the extent that this option was exercisable by the Participant on the date of his or her death or disability, and (ii) this option shall not be exercisable after the Final Exercise Date.
Exercise Period Upon Death or Disability
provided
that
(e) . If the Participant, prior to the Final Exercise Date, is discharged by the Company for "cause" (as defined below), the right to exercise this option shall terminate immediately upon the effective date of such discharge. "Cause" shall mean willful misconduct by the Participant or willful failure by the Participant to perform his or her responsibilities to the Company (including, without limitation, breach by the Participant of any provision of any employment, consulting, advisory, nondisclosure, non-competition or other similar agreement between the Participant and the Company), as determined by the Company, which determination shall be conclusive. The Participant shall be considered to have been discharged for "cause" if the Company determines, prior to or simultaneously with the Participant's resignation, that discharge for cause was warranted.
Discharge for Cause
 
No Shares will be issued pursuant to the exercise of this option unless and until the Participant pays to the Company, or makes provision satisfactory to the Company for payment of, any federal, state or local withholding taxes required by law to be withheld in respect of this option.
 
This option may not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged or otherwise encumbered by the Participant, either voluntarily or by operation of law, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution, and, during the lifetime of the Participant, this option shall be exercisable only by the Participant.
 
This option is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is furnished to the Participant with this option.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this option to be executed under its corporate seal by its duly authorized officer. This option shall take effect as a sealed instrument.
 
The undersigned hereby accepts the foregoing option and agrees to the terms and conditions thereof. The undersigned hereby acknowledges receipt of a copy of the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan.
 
 

Exhibit 10.3
 
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on                     ,              (the "Grant Date") to you (the "Participant") of              restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (the "Agreement") and the 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
 
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and provided that the Participant continues to provide services until the Vesting Date (as defined below):
(a) This award shall vest as to 33% of the original number of RSUs on the first anniversary of the Grant Date and as to an additional 8.375% of the original number of RSUs at the end of each successive full three-month period thereafter; provided, however, that if any of the foregoing dates is not a business day, then vesting shall occur on the next succeeding business day. The date on which RSUs vest may be referred to herein as the "Vesting Date."
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company.
(c) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated for any reason, including by reason of death or disability, other than "Cause" (as defined below), then the number of RSUs which shall be vested shall be the number that are vested as of the date of actual termination. For purposes of this Section 2, "Cause" shall mean unsatisfactory job performance (as determined by the Company), willful misconduct, fraud, gross negligence, disobedience or dishonesty. In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company is terminated for Cause, all unvested RSUs shall be forfeited effective as of the date of termination.
(d) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
 
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs after a Vesting Date but before distribution of the corresponding Shares), the Shares of Common Stock represented by RSUs that vested on such vesting date as soon as
administratively practicable after each vesting date (each such date of distribution is hereinafter referred to as a "Settlement Date") but in any event within the period ending on the later to occur of the date that is two and one-half months from the end of (i) Participant's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date or (ii) the Company's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
 
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
 
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
 
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), each RSU shall become exercisable, realizable or vested as to number of RSUs as would be vested pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date.
 
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
 
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
 
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
 
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this Agreement prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may
Electronic Delivery
 
be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed), the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
 

Exhibit 10.4
 
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), on January 29, 2008 (the "Grant Date") to you (the "Participant") of              restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2006 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
 
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and provided that the Participant continues to provide services until the Vesting Date (as defined below):
(a) This award shall vest:
(i) as to one-third of the original number of RSUs on the second business day following the date on which the Company releases its earnings results for 2009 in the event that the Company achieved the following revenue and normalized earnings per share ("Normalized EPS") metrics during 2009:
 
(ii) as to one-third of the original number of RSUs on the second business day following the date on which the Company releases its earnings results for 2010 in the event that the Company achieved the revenue and Normalized EPS metrics for 2010 established by the Board (or a committee thereof) in early 2010.
(iii) as to one-third of the original number of RSUs on the second business day following the date on which the Company releases its earnings results for 2011 in the event that the Company achieved the revenue and Normalized EPS metrics for 2011 established by the Board (or a committee thereof) in early 2011.
"Normalized EPS" shall mean shall mean the Company's annual earnings per diluted share for the applicable fiscal year excluding amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits, release of deferred tax assets and similar items excluded by the Company in determining normalized earnings per share in issuing its earnings announcement for such fiscal year.
Each of the dates on which RSUs vest may be referred to herein as a "Vesting Date." If the Company does not meet the applicable revenue and Normalized EPS metrics during a fiscal year, the 33% of RSUs eligible for vesting in connection therewith shall be forfeited.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company.
(c) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated for any reason, including by reason of death or disability, other than "Cause" (as defined below), then the number of RSUs which shall be vested shall be the number that are vested as of the date of actual termination. For purposes of this Section 2, "Cause" shall mean unsatisfactory job performance (as determined by the Company), willful misconduct, fraud, gross negligence, disobedience or dishonesty. In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company is terminated for Cause, all unvested RSUs shall be forfeited effective as of the date of termination.
(d) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
 
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs after a Vesting Date but before distribution of the corresponding Shares), the Shares of Common Stock represented by RSUs that vest on each Vesting Date as soon as administratively practicable after such Vesting Date (each such date of distribution is hereinafter referred to as a "Settlement Date") but in any event within the period ending on the later to occur of the date that is two and one-half months from the end of (i) Participant's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date or (ii) the Company's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
 
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
 
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
 
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), each RSU shall become exercisable, realizable or vested as to such number of RSUs as would be vested pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date and all performance targets on which vesting in contingent have been achieved.
 
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
 
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
 
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
 
Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this Agreement prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed), the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
 

Exhibit 10.5
 
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on             , 2009 (the "Grant Date") to you (the "Participant") of restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (the "Agreement") and the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The minimum number of shares issuable is zero; the maximum number of shares issuable is equal to 50% of the number of shares issued on the Grant Date under the terms of the other Restricted Stock Unit Agreement that subsequently vest (the maximum number of RSUs issuable hereunder, the "Maximum RSU Bonus Award"). The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
 
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement including, without limitation, Paragraph 2(c) below, this award shall vest on the 2011 Reporting Date if, and to the extent that, the Company achieves the financial performance criteria set forth in to this Agreement. Such date or any other date on which shares vest under this Agreement may be referred to herein as a "Vesting Date."
Schedule 1
(b) The "2011 Reporting Date" shall mean the date on which the Company files its annual Public Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2011 or completes its annual Private Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2011, as applicable. If, on December 31, 2011, the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-K shall constitute its "Public Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. If, on December 31, 2011, the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, the Company's regularly prepared annual audited financial statements prepared by management shall be its "Private Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. The applicable financial statements may be referred to herein as the "2011 Financial Statements."
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company. For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
(d) If the Participant dies or becomes disabled on or after January 1, 2012 but before the 2011 Reporting Date, he or she shall be deemed to have been employed as of the 2011 Reporting Date.
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs on or after January 1, 2012) the Shares of Common Stock represented by vested RSUs as follows: within 30 days of the Vesting Date; provided that if the Participant vests as the result of the application of Section 2(d), the earlier of 30 days after the 2011 Reporting Date or March 15, 2012.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
 
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
 
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
 
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), vesting of each RSU shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of to this Agreement.
Schedule 1
 
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings
 
regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
 
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
 
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties and supersede all prior agreements and understandings relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this Agreement prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
 
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed) or as soon as practicable thereafter, the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
 
 
The RSUs shall vest only upon the Company's achievement of certain financial metrics based on target cumulative Revenue of $             million and target cumulative Normalized EPS of $             per share over the Company's fiscal years 2009, 2010 and 2011. The Company's performance measured against each metric shall be equally weighted to enable comparison as a percentage of a combined target. For purposes of this Agreement, such metrics shall have the following meanings:
"Revenue" shall mean the Company's cumulative annual revenue for fiscal years 2009, 2010 and 2011 calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America as reported in the 2011 Financial Statements.
"Normalized EPS" shall mean the Company's shall mean the Company's cumulative annual earnings per diluted share for fiscal years 2009, 2010 and 2011 excluding cumulative amortization of intangible assets, equity-related compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on equity investments, non-cash income taxes and loss on early extinguishment of debt.
"Vesting Amount" shall mean the aggregate amount, if any, issuable to the Participant based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS performance measured against the Actual Percentage of Targets defined below.
 
The Company's Revenue shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative revenue for fiscal years 2009, 2010 and 2011 of $             million and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Revenue Percentage Component"). The Company's Normalized EPS shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative normalized earnings per share, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America, as reported in the 2011 Financial Statements for fiscal years 2009, 2010 and 2011 of $             and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Normalized EPS Component"). The sum of the Revenue Percentage Component and the Normalized EPS Component shall be the "Actual Percentage of Targets."
 
1. If the Actual Percentage of Targets fails to exceed 100%, then none of the RSUs shall vest and zero Shares shall be distributed in respect thereof.
2. If the Actual Percentage of Targets equals 103.4%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal one-half of the Maximum RSU Bonus Award, as defined in Paragraph 1 of the Agreement (the "Intermediate RSU Bonus Award"), and shall vest.
3. If the Actual Percentage of Targets equals 106.9% or more, then the Vesting Amount shall equal the Maximum RSU Bonus Award, as defined in Paragraph 1 of the Agreement, and shall vest.
4. If the Actual Percentage of Targets is between 100% and 103.4%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal a number of RSUs equal to the product of the Intermediate RSU Bonus Award multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which is the Actual Percentage of Targets Revenue minus 100% and the denominator is 3.4% and shall vest.
 
5. If the Actual Percentage of Targets is between 103.4% and 106.9%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal the sum of (a) the Intermediate RSU Bonus Award plus (b) the product of (i) the difference between the Maximum RSU Bonus Award and the Intermediate RSU Bonus Award multiplied by (ii) a fraction the numerator of which is the Actual Percentage of Targets Revenue minus 103.4% and the denominator is 3.5%, and shall vest.
 
In the event that the Company enters into an Acquisition Transaction during 2009, then Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be adjusted to give effect to such Acquisition Transaction. An "Acquisition Transaction" means (i) the purchase by the Company of more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange which results in the Company acquiring more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, or (iii) the purchase or other acquisition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the ordinary course of business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 50% of another entity's total assets or assets that account for more than 50% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of such entity.
As soon as practicable following the closing of an Acquisition Transaction, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company shall make a determination of the estimated impact of the Acquisition Transaction on the Company's cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS through 2011. If the Acquisition Transaction is estimated to be accretive, then:
(i) in calculating Revenue for purposes of determining the Revenue Percentage Component, reported Revenue shall be reduced by the amount of estimated revenue contribution from the Acquisition Transaction; and
(ii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2011 Financial Statements, shall be reduced by the amount of the estimated Normalized EPS contribution from the Acquisition Transaction.
If the Acquisition is estimated to be non-accretive, then:
(iii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2011 Financial Statements, shall be increased by the amount of the estimated negative Normalized EPS impact from the Acquisition Transaction.
All determinations of the Compensation Committee regarding the estimated impact of an Acquisition Transaction shall be final, binding and non-appealable. This Agreement shall be deemed to be automatically amended, without further action by the Company or the Participant, to give effect to any adjustments required by this Section D.
 
(1) If there is a Change of Control Event prior to December 31, 2011, the RSUs shall vest as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event and Participant shall be entitled to receive a pro rated number of Shares based on the amount of time elapsed between the Grant Date and December 31, 2011. The number of Shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs, if any, shall be calculated based on a pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets calculated as follows:
(i) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2009, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results during the twelve-month period ending on the last day of the most recently reported fiscal quarter prior to the closing date of the Change of Control Event. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
 
(ii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2010, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal year 2009. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
(iii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2011, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal years 2009 and 2010 plus an amount equal to the Revenue and Normalized EPS for 2011 that would result if the rate of growth (loss) for Revenue and Normalized EPS, respectively, between 2009 and 2010 were to continue for 2011. Such sums shall be used for calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
Once the pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets has been determined and the number of Shares, if any, that would have been issuable in respect of the RSUs on the 2011 Reporting Date (the "Pro Forma Distribution Amount") calculated, the actual number of Shares issuable shall be adjusted proportionally based on the percentage of the three-year calculation period that has elapsed as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event (e.g., if the closing date of the Change in Control Event were April 1, 2010, the number of Shares issuable would be 41.7% (15 months/36 months) of the total Pro Forma Distribution Amount).
(2) If (i) there is a Change of Control Event between January 1, 2012 and September 30, 2012; (ii) Participant meets the requirements of Paragraph 2(c) of this Agreement as of immediately prior to the Change of Control Event and (iii) Participant's employment is terminated by the surviving entity in the Change of Control transaction at any time during the period between the Change of Control Event and October 1, 2012 for any reason other than for Cause (as defined below), then the entire portion of the Vesting Amount that had not vested prior to Participation's termination shall vest in full as of the effective date of Participant's termination. For purposes of this Agreement, "Cause" shall mean (a) any act or omission by Participant that has an adverse effect on Akamai's business or on the employee's ability to perform services for Akamai, including, without limitation, the commission of any crime (other than ordinary traffic violations), or (b) refusal or failure to perform assigned duties, serious misconduct, or excessive absenteeism. Whether a Participant has been terminated for "Cause" shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Company's management or, in the case of an executive officer, the Board of Directors or a committee thereof.
 

Exhibit 10.6
This DEFERRED STOCK UNIT AGREEMENT (the "Agreement") is entered into as of             ,          (the "Grant Date"), between Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and                      (the "Grantee").
For valuable consideration, receipt of which is acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
The Company hereby grants to Grantee, and Grantee hereby accepts from the Company, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and in the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"),              deferred stock units of the Company (the "DSUs"). Each DSU represents the right to receive one share of the Company's Common Stock, par value $.01 per share ("Common Stock"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and the Plan. The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the DSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Subject to the provisions of Section 2(b) hereof, this award of DSUs is irrevocable and is intended to conform in all respects with the Plan.
1. .
Grant of Award
2. .
Vesting
(a) . Except as otherwise provided in the Plan or this Section 2, the DSUs will vest as follows: 50% shall vest on first anniversary of the Grant Date, and the remaining 50% shall vest in equal installments of 12.5% on a quarterly basis thereafter.
Regular Vesting
(b) . Vesting in any of the DSUs pursuant to subsection (a) above is contingent upon the continuation of Grantee's service as a Director of the Company. In the event that Grantee ceases to be a Director of the Company for any reason or no reason, including but not limited to Grantee's voluntary resignation, death, or failure to be nominated for election, or to be elected, as a Director, all vesting shall cease as of the date of Grantee's cessation of service as a Director. Unvested DSUs will be immediately forfeited as of such date and neither Grantee nor its estate will have any further rights to such unvested DSUs or the Shares represented by those forfeited DSUs.
Forfeiture
(c) . Upon a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), the number of DSUs which are considered vested shall be calculated pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the actual Grant Date.
Change of Control
3. .
Distribution of Shares
(a) . Unless Grantee has made a proper deferral election pursuant to Section 3(b) below, the Company will distribute to Grantee (or to Grantee's estate in the event that his or her death occurs after a vesting date but before distribution of the corresponding Shares), within thirty (30) days after each vesting date, the Shares of Common Stock represented by DSUs that vested on such vesting date. If Grantee has elected to defer receipt of only a portion of the Shares distributable on a vesting date pursuant to Section 3(b) below, within thirty (30) days after such vesting date, the Company will distribute to Grantee the Shares of Common Stock represented by DSUs that vested on such vesting date and as to which distribution was not deferred. No fractional Shares will be issued.
Distribution Upon Vesting
 
(b) . Notwithstanding the distribution dates specified in Section 3(a) above, if the Grantee has previously elected, by providing written notice to the Vice President of Human Resources of the Company on or before December 31 of the year preceding the date of this Agreement to defer receipt of all or a portion of the Shares represented by the DSUs scheduled to vest on such vesting date until a date (the "Deferred Distribution Date") that is at least one year following the scheduled vesting date but not more than ten (10) years following the Grant Date. If Grantee elects to defer receipt of all or a portion of the Shares, Grantee must also specify how Grantee wishes the Shares to be distributed in the event of a Change in Control of the Company (i.e., whether Shares are to be distributed upon the effectiveness of the Change in Control or whether the Shares or rights attendant thereto are to be received in accordance with the deferral election). Each election made pursuant to their Section 3(b) shall be irrevocable and not subject to further deferral.
Deferral of Distributions
(c) . The Company shall not be obligated to issue to Grantee the Shares upon the vesting of any DSU or on any Deferred Distribution Date (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
Compliance with Law
(d) . Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
General Rule of Deferrals and Accelerations
This Agreement may not be transferred, assigned, pledged or otherwise encumbered by Grantee in any manner whatsoever, except that it may be transferred by will or the laws of descent and distribution. References to Grantee, to the extent relevant in the context, shall include references to authorized transferees. Without the prior written consent of the Company, Grantee shall not sell, transfer, assign, pledge or otherwise encumber or dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise, any DSUs (each, a "transfer"). Any such transfer by Grantee in violation of this Section 4 shall be void and of no force or effect, and shall result in the immediate forfeiture of all DSUs.
4. .
Restrictions on Transfer
5. .
Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights
(a) . If at any time during the period between the date that any deferred DSU vests and the Deferred Distribution Date for Shares represented by that deferred DSU (a "Deferral Period"), the Company pays a dividend on its Common Stock, then on each such dividend payment date (each, a "Dividend Payment Date"), Grantee will automatically receive an additional number of DSUs DSUs that have a value equal to the dollar value of the dividend payment based on the Fair Market Value (as defined in the Plan) of the Shares distributable in respect of such deferred DSUs on the Dividend Payment Date. Any such additional DSUs issued under this Section 5(a) shall be considered DSUs under this Agreement and shall also be credited with additional DSUs as dividends, if any, are declared. Shares represented by DSUs issued as dividends will be distributed on the same date as Shares distributable in respect of the underlying DSUs.
Dividends
(b) . Except as set forth in Section 5(a) above and in the Plan, neither Grantee nor any person claiming under or through Grantee shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the DSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to Grantee.
Other Shareholder Rights
 
The Company's obligation to deliver Shares to Grantee upon the vesting of DSUs shall be subject to the satisfaction of all applicable federal, state and local income and employment tax withholding requirements ("Withholding Taxes"). The Company may take such steps as it deems necessary or desirable for satisfaction of Withholding Taxes obligations.
6. .
Withholding of Taxes
All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery, deposit with a nationally recognized courier service, or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his, her or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 7.
7. .
Notices
This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
8. .
Governing Law
This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is furnished to Grantee with this Agreement.
9. .
Provisions of the Plan
This Agreement shall not be construed as giving Grantee the right to continued employment, service as a Director, or any other relationship with the Company.
10. .
No Right to Status as a Director
This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and Grantee and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
11. .
Binding Effect
The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
12. .
Severability
This Agreement may be amended or modified only by a written instrument executed by both the Company and Grantee. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board. A waiver on one occasion shall not be deemed to be a waiver of the same or any other breach on a future occasion. If there is any inconsistency between the provisions of this Agreement and of the Plan, the provisions of the Plan shall govern. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Plan.
13. .
Amendment; Waiver; Miscellaneous
This Agreement and the Plan embody the entire agreement of the parties hereto with respect to the DSUs, the Shares and all other matters contained herein. This Agreement and the Plan supersede and replace any and all prior oral or written agreements with respect to the subject matter hereof.
14. .
Entire Agreement
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Grantee have caused this Agreement to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20090729160650.txt.gz
TIME:20090729160650
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 29, 2009, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2009. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering rich media, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2009. Revenue for the second quarter 2009 was $204.6 million, a 5 percent increase over second quarter 2008 revenue of $194.0 million, and a 3 percent decrease from first quarter 2009 revenue of $210.4 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
July 29, 2009
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the second quarter of 2009 was $36.0 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, a 5 percent increase over second quarter 2008 GAAP net income of $34.3 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, and a 3 percent decrease from first quarter 2009 GAAP net income of $37.1 million, or $0.20 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $75.3 million, or $0.40 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2009, a 2 percent decrease from second quarter 2008 normalized net income of $76.5 million, or $0.41 per diluted share, and down 7 percent from the first quarter 2009 normalized net income of $80.5 million, or $0.43 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"Our operating performance reflects solid execution in the face of difficult market conditions for many of our clients," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "In today's challenging environment, our scale and strong balance sheet give us the flexibility to support changing customer requirements, particularly in the media and entertainment vertical where traffic growth has been accelerating. Further, we continued to experience good traction with our newer, value-added solutions, such as application performance services and dynamic site acceleration."
Cash from operations was $105 million in the second quarter of 2009. Year-to-date cash from operations was $196 million, an increase of 24 percent over the same period last year. At the end of the second quarter of 2009, the Company had approximately $927 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
During the second quarter of 2009, the Company repurchased 713,200 shares of common stock for $15.0 million at an average price of $21.02 per share.
The Company had approximately 172.8 million shares of common stock outstanding as of June 30, 2009.
Customers
The number of customers under recurring contracts at the end of the second quarter increased to a record 2,979, a nine percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 18 percent and 28 percent, respectively, of revenue for the second quarter of 2009.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-383-7989 (or 1-617-597-5328 for international calls) and using passcode No. 66912108. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 20292264.
www.akamai.com
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering rich media, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit .
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial
and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, gains on legal settlements, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "diluted shares used in normalized net income per share calculation" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of stock-based compensation under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business, the strength of our business model and cost structure, the superiority of our service offerings, our ability to support changing customer requirements and our operating advantages. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to continue to generate positive cash flow, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20091028160555.txt.gz
TIME:20091028160555
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 28, 2009, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2009. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering video, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2009. Revenue for the third quarter 2009 was $206.5 million, a 5 percent increase over third quarter 2008 revenue of $197.3 million, and a 1 percent increase from second quarter 2009 revenue of $204.6 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
October 28, 2009
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the third quarter of 2009 was $32.7 million, or $0.18 per diluted share, a 2 percent decrease over third quarter 2008 GAAP net income of $33.4 million, or $0.18 per diluted share, and a 9 percent decrease from second quarter 2009 GAAP net income of $36.0 million, or $0.19 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $70.8 million, or $0.38 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2009, a 5 percent decrease from third quarter 2008 normalized net income of $74.2 million, or $0.40 per diluted share, and down 6 percent from the second quarter 2009 normalized net income of $75.3 million, or $0.40 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We are pleased with Akamai's solid performance in the third quarter, with both promising signs of growth in high quality video online and continued strong demand for our value-added solutions," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "Our results demonstrated our ability to leverage the Company's unique cost structure and scale while improving performance and reliability for our enterprise-class customers."
Cash from operations was $105 million in the third quarter of 2009. Year-to-date cash from operations was $300 million, an increase of 19 percent over the same period last year. At the end of the third quarter of 2009, the Company had approximately $973 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
During the third quarter of 2009, the Company repurchased approximately 2 million shares of common stock for $36.2 million at an average price of $18.41 per share.
The Company had approximately 171.2 million shares of common stock outstanding as of September 30, 2009.
Customers
The number of customers under recurring contracts at the end of the third quarter increased to a record 3,031, an 8 percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 19 percent and 28 percent, respectively, of revenue for the third quarter of 2009.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-800-510-9834 (or 1-617-614-3669 for international calls) and using passcode No. 93777894. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 78517440.
www.akamai.com
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering video, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit .
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, gains on legal settlements, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "diluted shares used in normalized net income per share calculation" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of stock-based compensation under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of
1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and the markets in which we operate, the strength of our business model and cost structure and the superiority of our service offerings. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to continue to generate positive cash flow, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20100122170131.txt.gz
TIME:20100122170131
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b) On January 19, 2010, Ronald L. Graham notified Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai," the "Registrant," or the "Company") that he has voluntarily determined not to stand for re-election as a Director of the Company at the next annual meeting of stockholders and, therefore, is resigning from the Board of Directors effective as of May 17, 2009. On January 20, 2010, the Board of Directors of the Company voted to reduce the size of the Board of Directors to 11 members effective upon the resignation of Mr. Graham.
(e)
I. 2010 Executive Compensation
On January 20, 2010, the Compensation Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of the Board of Directors of the Company adopted cash and equity compensation programs for 2010 for the following executive officers: Paul Sagan, Chief Executive Officer; Debra Canner, Senior Vice President  Human Resources; Melanie Haratunian, Senior Vice President and General Counsel; Robert Hughes, Executive Vice President  Global Sales, Services & Marketing; and J. Donald Sherman, Chief Financial Officer (collectively, the "Executives").
Each of the cash incentive components of the 2010 compensation program provides for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, each Executive's cash bonus is weighted as follows: 80% based on Akamai's achievement of revenue and normalized earnings per share targets for fiscal year 2010 and 20% based on achievement of individual or departmental performance goals. For Mr. Hughes, the portion of his bonus that is based on Akamai's financial performance also requires achievement against a third component, a measure of the financial performance of Akamai's Advertising Decision Solutions operations. The new base salaries will take effect on April 1, 2010. Below, we use the term "2010 base salary earnings" to refer to the sum of amounts paid in 2010 under the salary in effect between January 1, 2010 and March 31, 2010 plus those paid in 2010 under the salary in effect between April 1, 2010 and December 31, 2010.
For Mr. Sagan, his new base salary will be $625,000 with a target cash bonus equal to 125% of his 2010 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 225% of his 2010 base salary earnings. For Ms. Canner, her new base salary will be $284,625 with a target cash bonus equal to 50% of her 2010 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 90% of her 2010 base salary earnings. For Ms. Haratunian, her new base salary will be $336,375 with a target cash bonus equal to 50% of her 2010 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 90% of her 2010 base salary earnings. For Mr. Hughes, his new base salary will be $429,525 with a target cash bonus equal to 125% of his 2010 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 225% of his 2010 base salary earnings. For Mr. Sherman, his new base salary will be $429,525 with a target cash bonus equal to 75% of his 2010 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 135% of his 2010 base salary earnings.
As described in the table below, each Executive was also granted stock options and restricted stock units ("RSUs") under the 2010 compensation program as follows:
 
The options will have an effective date of the second day following the Company's release of financial results for fiscal year 2009; the effective date is expected to be February 5, 2010. The aggregate number of options to be granted to each individual shall be calculated by applying a Black-Scholes option pricing model to the value set forth in the chart above based on the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the effective date. Such price shall also be the exercise price for the options. The options will vest in accordance with the following schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the effective date and the remaining 75% vest in equal quarterly installments of 6.25% thereafter. Options are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of non-statutory stock option agreement previously filed on May 26, 2009 with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting. Annual performance-based vesting RSUs (the "Base RSUs") vest in 33% annual installments on the second business day following the date on which the Company releases its financial results for the preceding fiscal year only if the Company achieved an enumerated revenue and normalized earnings per share target during such preceding fiscal year. Three-Year performance-based vesting RSUs (the "Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs") will only vest to the extent that the Company exceeds specified cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2010, 2011 and 2012. The maximum number of Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs that may vest is equal to 50% of the number of Base RSUs granted on the same date that have subsequently vested; the maximum vesting would only occur if the Company meets or exceeds 108% of its weighted average cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2010, 2011 and 2011. No Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs will vest if the Company fails to exceed the applicable weighted average target. If the Company's cumulative revenue and/or earnings per share results for the applicable years is between 100% and 108% of the weighted average target, between zero Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs and the maximum deliverable amount set forth above will vest. The foregoing description of the RSUs is qualified in its entirety by the text of the relevant RSU agreement, each of which was previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 26, 2009.
II. 2009 Special Bonus Award
On January 20, 2010, the Board of Directors of the Corporation exercised its discretion to award Mr. Sagan a special bonus of $50,000. This special bonus was awarded to Mr. Sagan in light of his contribution to Akamai's financial performance in 2009 and to the overall success and achievement of Akamai in a challenging economic environment. The bonus is scheduled to be paid in February 2010.
 
(d) Exhibits
None
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
None


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20100203161425.txt.gz
TIME:20100203161425
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 3, 2010, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering video, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2009. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2009 was $238.3 million, a 15 percent increase over third quarter revenue of $206.5 million, and a 12 percent increase over fourth quarter 2008 revenue of $212.6 million. Total revenue for 2009 was $859.8 million, a 9 percent increase over 2008 revenue of $790.9 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 3, 2010
"We were very pleased with how our business performed in 2009, capping a solid year with a return to double-digit revenue growth in the fourth quarter," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "For the year, we grew revenue, improved our cash gross margins, and generated over $400 million of cash from operations in a tough economic environment. We believe these results provide us with strong momentum coming into 2010, and position Akamai for the next wave of growth on the Internet."
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the fourth quarter of 2009 was $40.1 million, or $0.21 per diluted share. Full-year GAAP net income for 2009 was $145.9 million, or $0.78 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $85.4 million, or $0.46 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2009, a 21 percent increase over prior quarter normalized net income of $70.8 million, or $0.38 per diluted share. Full-year normalized net income grew 1 percent year-over-year to $312.0 million, or $1.67 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2009 was $111.6 million, up from $95.9 million in the prior quarter, and $100.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2008. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the fourth quarter was 47 percent, consistent with the same period last year. For the full year, adjusted EBITDA was $405.2 million, up from $370.8 million in 2008. Full-year adjusted EBITDA margin remained at 47 percent, consistent with 2008. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Full-year cash from operations was $424.4 million, or 49 percent of revenue, up 24 percent over the prior year. At year-end, the Company had over $1 billion of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
During the fourth quarter of 2009, the Company repurchased approximately 646 thousand shares of common stock for $15.1 million at an average price of $23.34 per share. For the full-year, the Company repurchased approximately 3.3 million shares of common stock for $66.3 million at an average price of $19.93 per share.
The Company had approximately 171.2 million shares of common stock outstanding as of December 31, 2009.
The number of customers under recurring service contracts at the end of the fourth quarter increased by 91 to a record 3,122, a 9 percent increase year-over-year.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 19 percent and 28 percent, respectively, of revenue for the fourth quarter 2009.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-271-6130 (or 1-617-213-8894 for international calls) and using passcode No. 93206918. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 25898500.
www.akamai.com
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering video, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and performance for businesses to succeed online. Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, gains on legal settlements, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt, utilization of tax NOLs/credits and release of the deferred tax asset valuation allowance. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "fully-taxed normalized net income" as normalized net income, excluding impact from utilization of tax NOLs/credits. Akamai considers fully-taxed normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "diluted shares used in normalized net income per share calculation" as diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation, excluding the effect of stock-based compensation under the treasury stock method. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and expectations with respect to revenue. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, unexpected increases in Akamai's use of funds, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforwards, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20100217090751.txt.gz
TIME:20100217090751
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 3, 2010, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Registrant") announced its preliminary financial results for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009. Set forth below is a revised balance sheet dated December 31, 2009 that corrects two errors in the unaudited balance sheet dated December 31, 2009 (the "original balance sheet") that was included in the press release furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K dated February 3, 2010.
Under the terms of Akamai's 1% senior convertible subordinated notes due 2033 (the "convertible notes"), holders of the convertible notes will have the right to require the repayment of some or all of the principal amount of such convertible notes on specified dates beginning in December 2010. The indebtedness associated with such convertible notes was erroneously classified as a long-term liability in the original balance sheet. Accordingly, Akamai has reclassified the indebtedness associated with such convertible notes as a current liability in the balance sheet set forth below. See Note 12 to the financial statements included in the Registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2009 for a more complete discussion of the terms of the convertible notes. In addition, a $9.9 million non-cash deferred tax item was erroneously recorded in the original balance sheet as an increase, rather than a decrease, in each of Deferred Income Tax Assets and Stockholders' Equity. To reflect the correction of such item, the Deferred Income Tax Assets and Stockholders' Equity have each been reduced by $19.8 million in the balance sheet set forth below.
None of the changes to the original balance sheet require any adjustments to the Registrant's Condensed Consolidated Statement of Operations for the year ended December 31, 2009, Condensed Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows for the year ended December 31, 2009, or Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet dated December 31, 2008 included in the original press release.
Akamai expects to timely file its Annual Report on Form 10-K, including its audited consolidated financial statements, on or about March 1, 2010.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20100428160612.txt.gz
TIME:20100428160612
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 28, 2010, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for its fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2010. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leader in powering video, dynamic transactions and enterprise applications online, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2010. Revenue for the first quarter 2010 was $240.0 million, a 14 percent increase over first quarter 2009 revenue of $210.4 million, and a 1 percent increase over fourth quarter 2009 revenue of $238.3 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 28, 2010
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the first quarter of 2010 was $40.9 million, or $0.22 per diluted share, a 10 percent increase from first quarter 2009 GAAP net income of $37.1 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, and a 2 percent increase from fourth quarter 2009 GAAP net income of $40.1 million, or $0.21 per diluted share.
The Company generated fully taxed normalized net income* of $66.0 million, or $0.35 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2010, a 14 percent improvement over first quarter 2009 fully taxed normalized net income of $57.7 million, or $0.31 per diluted share, and up 5 percent from fourth quarter 2009 fully taxed normalized net income of $62.9 million, or $0.34 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We are very pleased with our strong start to the year," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We are seeing exciting developments in cloud computing, video distribution over the Internet and online advertising, which contributed to our accelerated growth this quarter."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the first quarter of 2010 was $118.1 million, up from $111.6 million in the prior quarter and $100.3 million in the first quarter of 2009. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the first quarter was a record 49 percent, up 1 point from the same period last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $87.8 million in the first quarter of 2010 or 37% of revenue. At the end of the first quarter of 2010, the Company had approximately $1.1 billion in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 18 percent and 28 percent, respectively, of revenue for the first quarter 2010.
The Company also announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a $150 million extension of its share repurchase program, which is expected to be funded by cash from operations. The Company plans to use this program over the next several quarters with a goal to offset dilution created by its ongoing equity compensation programs.
The timing and amount of any shares repurchased will be determined by the Company's management based on its evaluation of market conditions and other factors. Repurchases may also be made under a Rule 10b5-1 plan, which would permit the Company to repurchase shares when the Company might otherwise be precluded from doing so under insider trading laws. The Company may choose to suspend or discontinue the repurchase program at any time.
"We are pleased that the Board authorized a continuation of our share repurchase program, which we plan to fund out of our operating cash flow while maintaining our flexibility to make strategic investments," said JD Sherman, CFO of Akamai. "The program reflects our continued confidence in the future of our business and our focus on providing an attractive return on investment to our shareholders."
During the first quarter of 2010, the Company repurchased approximately 834,000 shares of common stock for an aggregate of $21.9 million at an average price of $26.26 per share. As of March 31, 2010, the Company had repurchased a total of 4.2 million shares for an aggregate of $88.2 million at an average price of $21.20 per share under the share repurchase program that was approved by the Board of Directors in April 2009.
As of March 31, 2010, the Company had approximately 172 million shares of common stock outstanding.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-700-6067 (or 1-617-213-8834 for international calls) and using passcode No. 80731954. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investors section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 29622786.
www.akamai.com
The Akamai Difference
Akamai provides market-leading managed services for powering video, dynamic transactions, and enterprise applications online. Having pioneered the content delivery market one decade ago, Akamai's services have been adopted by the world's most recognized brands across diverse industries. The alternative to centralized Web infrastructure, Akamai's global network of tens of thousands of distributed servers provides the scale, reliability, insight and
performance for businesses to succeed online. Akamai has transformed the Internet into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, interact, and collaborate. To experience The Akamai Difference, visit and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By
providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "fully taxed normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers fully taxed normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "fully taxed normalized net income per share" as fully taxed normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculation. Akamai considers fully taxed normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and fully taxed normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and the markets in which we operate and expected cash flows from operations to be used to fund the share repurchase program and potential strategic initiatives. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to continue to generate positive cash flow, the
effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20100521163113.txt.gz
TIME:20100521163113
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Annual Meeting of Stockholders of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") was held on May 19, 2010 (the "Annual Meeting"). There were 171,647,027 shares of Akamai's common stock eligible to vote, and 139,148,630 shares present in person or by proxy at the Annual Meeting. Two items of business were acted upon by stockholders at the Annual Meeting.
 
Stockholders elected F. Thomson Leighton, Paul Sagan and Naomi Seligman to serve as Class II directors for a term of three years. The vote totals were as follows:
 
2.     Ratification of the Selection of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP ("PwC") as the Company's independent auditors for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2010.
Stockholders ratified the selection of PwC to serve as the Company's independent auditors for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2010. The vote totals were as follows:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20100728160538.txt.gz
TIME:20100728160538
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 28, 2010, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") announced its financial results for its fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2010. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information provided under Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
On July 22, 2010, Akamai's Board of Directors elected David W. Kenny, 48, to the position of President of the Company and accepted the resignation of Paul Sagan as President, which was submitted to the Company on the same date. Mr. Sagan will remain Akamai's Chief Executive Officer and will continue to be a member of the Board of Directors; Mr. Kenny will report to Mr. Sagan. Mr. Kenny will also continue to be a member of the Board of Directors; however, he will no longer serve on the Audit Committee or the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee. Mr. Kenny is expected to join Akamai as President on September 7, 2010 (the actual date he joins Akamai, the "Start Date").
Mr. Kenny has served as a director of Akamai since July 2007. From June 2008 until his resignation in June 2010, Mr. Kenny was the Managing Partner of VivaKi, which is the media and digital arm of Publicis Groupe, S.A., a global marketing services holding company. From September 1997 through May 2008, he was Chief Executive Officer of Digitas, Inc., a relationship marketing services firm that was acquired by Publicis Groupe in January 2007. Mr. Kenny was a director of Digitas between 1999 and 2007 and served on the board of directors of Publicis Groupe between January 2007 and June 2010. Mr. Kenny is also currently a member of the board of directors of The Corporate Executive Board, which provides research and analysis focusing on corporate strategy and operations. Mr. Kenny does not have any family relationships with other directors or officers of the Company nor has he engaged in any related-party transactions with Akamai.
On July 22, 2010, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee") also approved Mr. Kenny's compensation arrangements, which are summarized below and shall become effective as of the date on which he formally becomes President.
Mr. Kenny shall initially have a base salary of $550,000.00 and shall be eligible to participate in the Company's executive cash bonus program. For 2010, he will be eligible to receive a pro rata bonus of up to 125% of his base salary, based on Akamai's financial achievement and Mr. Kenny's individual performance objectives (capped at the 100% attainment level).
The Compensation Committee approved granting Mr. Kenny stock options to purchase shares of common stock of the Company under the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Stock Incentive Plan"). The options will be issued on the Start Date. The aggregate number of shares of common stock of the Company subject to the stock options will be determined so as to make the value of such stock options equal to $4 million determined under a Black-Scholes option pricing model. The exercise price for the stock options will be the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported
 
on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the Start Date. The options will vest in accordance with the following schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the Start Date and the remaining 75% vest over the ensuing three years in equal quarterly installments of 6.25%. The options are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of non-statutory stock option agreement previously filed on May 26, 2009 with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
The Compensation Committee also approved a grant of restricted stock units ("RSUs") to Mr. Kenny under the Stock Incentive Plan. The RSUs will be issued on the Start Date. The aggregate number of RSUs to be granted shall be calculated by dividing $2 million by the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the Start Date. Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting. The RSUs vest 25% on the first anniversary of the Start Date, and the remaining 75% vest over the ensuing three years in equal quarterly installments of 6.25%. The RSUs are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of RSU agreement previously filed on May 26, 2009 with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
As Akamai's President, Mr. Kenny will become eligible for benefits under the terms of a Change of Control and Severance Agreement with the Company (the "Kenny Severance Agreement") in the event his employment with the Company terminates under certain circumstances. Under the terms of the agreement, if Mr. Kenny is terminated for any reason other than "cause" (as defined in the Kenny Severance Agreement) and has signed a separation and release agreement acceptable to Akamai, would be entitled to:
 
 
 
If Mr. Kenny is terminated without "cause" or resigns for "good reason" (as defined in the Kenny Severance Agreement) within 12 months following a change in control of Akamai, he would be entitled to:
 
 
 
 
The Compensation Committee also approved amendments to the severance benefits payable to Mr. Sagan under an updated letter agreement dated July 22, 2010 (the "2010 Sagan Agreement"). Under the terms of the employment arrangements entered into between Mr. Sagan and the Company when he was elected Chief Executive Officer in January 2005 (the "2005 Sagan Agreement"), if Mr. Sagan terminates his employment for "good reason" within 12 months following a change in control of Akamai, he will be entitled to a lump sum cash payment equal to two years of his then-current base salary and an award equal to two times his then-applicable annual incentive bonus at target. Under the terms of the 2010 Sagan Agreement, the benefits described in the prior sentence would also be payable to him if his employment is terminated by Akamai or its successor within 12 months following a change of control for any reason other than "cause." The 2010 Sagan Agreement also now provides that if, within 12 months following a change of control of Akamai, Mr. Sagan's employment is terminated by Akamai or its successor for any reason other than "cause" or he resigns for "good reason," he will be entitled to 100% vesting of all RSUs (other than RSUs that vest only upon the achievement of performance targets based on periods greater than one year) held by the him as of the date his employment terminates. The 2010 Sagan Agreement also includes amended definitions of "cause" and "good reason" that apply to all circumstances in which severance benefits are payable to him.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading provider of cloud optimization services, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2010. Revenue for second quarter 2010 was $245.3 million, a 20 percent increase over second quarter 2009 revenue of $204.6 million, and a 2 percent increase over first quarter 2010 revenue of $240.0 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
July 28, 2010
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the second quarter of 2010 was $38.1 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, a 6 percent increase from second quarter 2009 GAAP net income of $36.0 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, and a 7 percent decrease from first quarter 2010 GAAP net income of $40.9 million, or $0.22 per diluted share.
The Company generated fully taxed normalized net income* of $65.0 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2010, an 18 percent improvement over second quarter 2009 fully taxed normalized net income of $55.0 million, or $0.29 per diluted share, and down 1 percent from first quarter 2010 fully taxed normalized net income of $66.0 million, or $0.35 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"Demand for our services grew across all verticals of our business," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We believe our strong performance in the second quarter demonstrated continued traction for our services that enable cloud computing adoption, growth in online HD video, and more effective online advertising. We were also pleased to announce the acquisition of Velocitude in June, as we continue to extend our portfolio of solutions into the mobile market."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the second quarter of 2010 was $112.1 million, up 15 percent from $97.4 million in the second quarter of 2009 and down 5 percent from $118.1 million in the
prior quarter. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the second quarter of 2010 was 46 percent, down 2 points from the same period last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $86.4 million in the second quarter of 2010 or 35 percent of revenue. At the end of the second quarter of 2010, the Company had just over $1.1 billion in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 19 percent and 28 percent, respectively, of revenue for the second quarter 2010.
During the second quarter of 2010, the Company repurchased approximately 537,000 shares of common stock for an aggregate of $20.4 million at an average price of $38.02 per share. As of June 30, 2010, the Company had repurchased a total of 4.7 million shares for an aggregate of $108.6 million at an average price of $23.12 per share under the share repurchase program that was approved by the Board of Directors in April 2009 and extended in April 2010.
As of June 30, 2010, the Company had approximately 182 million shares of common stock outstanding.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-383-7989 (or 1-617-597-5328 for international calls) and using passcode No. 95298336. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 79962698.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai provides market-leading, cloud-based services for optimizing Web and mobile content and applications, online HD video, and secure e-commerce. Combining highly-distributed, energy-efficient computing with intelligent software, Akamai's global platform is transforming the cloud into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, transact and collaborate. To learn how the world's leading enterprises are optimizing their business in the cloud, please visit www.akamai.com and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "fully taxed normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs, certain gains and losses on investments and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers fully taxed normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "fully taxed normalized net income per share" as fully taxed normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers fully taxed normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and fully taxed normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected benefits of the Velocitude acquisition and the anticipated growth and development of our business and the markets in which we operate. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to continue to generate positive cash flow, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20101027160532.txt.gz
TIME:20101027160532
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On October 27, 2010, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") announced its financial results for its fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2010. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information provided under Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: October 27, 2010
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
/s/    J. Donald Sherman                                
J. Donald Sherman
Chief Financial Officer
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading provider of cloud optimization services, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2010. Revenue for third quarter 2010 was $253.6 million, a 23 percent increase over third quarter 2009 revenue of $206.5 million, and a 3 percent increase over second quarter 2010 revenue of $245.3 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
October 27, 2010
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the third quarter of 2010 was $39.7 million, or $0.21 per diluted share, a 21 percent increase from third quarter 2009 GAAP net income of $32.7 million, or $0.18 per diluted share, and a 4 percent increase from second quarter 2010 GAAP net income of $38.1 million, or $0.20 per diluted share.
The Company generated fully taxed normalized net income* of $64.2 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2010, a 23 percent improvement over third quarter 2009 fully taxed normalized net income of $52.3 million, or $0.28 per diluted share, and a 1 percent decrease from second quarter 2010 fully taxed normalized net income of $65.0 million, or $0.34 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"Akamai performed very well in the third quarter, and we believe we have solid momentum heading into our seasonally strongest quarter of the year," said Paul Sagan, CEO of Akamai. "We continued to make key investments to support our customers' online businesses and successfully meet the growing demand we have been seeing for our portfolio of cloud-based services."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the third quarter of 2010 was $114.1 million, up 19 percent from $95.9 million in the third quarter of 2009 and up 2 percent from $112.1 million in the prior quarter. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the third quarter of 2010 was 45 percent, down 1 point from the same period last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
 
Cash from operations was $118 million in the third quarter of 2010 or 47 percent of revenue. At the end of the third quarter of 2010, the Company had $1.2 billion in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 18 percent and 28 percent, respectively, of revenue for the third quarter 2010.
During the third quarter of 2010, under a share repurchase program that was approved by the Board of Directors in April 2009 and extended in April 2010, the Company repurchased approximately 522,000 shares of common stock for an aggregate of $22.7 million at an average price of $43.57 per share. As of September 30, 2010, the Company had repurchased a total of 5.2 million shares for an aggregate of $131.4 million at an average price of $25.17 per share under the program.
As of September 30, 2010, the Company had approximately 182.4 million shares of common stock outstanding.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-510-0704 (or 1-617-597-5362 for international calls) and using passcode No. 63374268. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 81364618.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai provides market-leading, cloud-based services for optimizing Web and mobile content and applications, online HD video, and secure e-commerce. Combining highly-distributed, energy-efficient computing with intelligent software, Akamai's global platform is transforming the cloud into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, transact and collaborate. To learn how the world's leading enterprises are optimizing their business in the cloud, please visit and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible
assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "fully taxed normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs, certain gains and losses on investments and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers fully taxed normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "fully taxed normalized net income per share" as fully taxed normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers fully taxed normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and fully taxed normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the anticipated growth and development of our business and the markets in which we operate. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to continue to generate positive cash flow, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, inability to realize the benefits of our net operating loss carryforward, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20110119172705.txt.gz
TIME:20110119172705
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 19, 2011, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. approved four new form agreements for restricted stock unit awards to be granted under the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan. The forms are filed as Exhibits 10.1 through 10.4 hereto.
 
 
See Exhibit Index attached hereto which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 10.1
1. .
Grant of Award
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on                     , 20         (the "Grant Date") to                      (the "Participant") of      restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and the 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
2. .
Vesting; Forfeiture
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and provided that the Participant continues to provide services until the Vesting Date (as defined below):
(a) This award shall vest as to one-third of the original number of RSUs on each of the first, second and third anniversaries of the Grant Date. The date on which RSUs vest may be referred to herein as the "Vesting Date."
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company.
(c) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated for any reason, including by reason of death or disability, other than "Cause" (as defined below), then the number of RSUs which shall be vested shall be the number that are vested as of the date of actual termination. For purposes of this Section 2, "Cause" shall mean unsatisfactory job performance (as determined by the Company), willful misconduct, fraud, gross negligence, disobedience or dishonesty. In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company is terminated for Cause, all unvested RSUs shall be forfeited effective as of the date of termination.
(d) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
3. .
Distribution of Shares
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs after a Vesting Date but before distribution of the corresponding Shares), the Shares of Common Stock represented by RSUs that vested on such vesting date as soon as administratively practicable after each vesting date (each such date of distribution is hereinafter referred to as a "Settlement Date") but in any event within the period ending on the later to occur of the date that is two and one-half months from the end of (i) Participant's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date or (ii) the Company's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the delivery of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
4. .
Restrictions on Transfer
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
5. .
Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
6. .
Provisions of the Plan; Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), each RSU shall become exercisable, realizable or vested as to number of RSUs as would be vested pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date.
7. .
Withholding Taxes
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the
 
receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
8. .
Miscellaneous
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
 
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed), the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
 

EXHIBIT 10.2
1. .
Grant of Award
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on                     , 20         (the "Grant Date") to you (the "Participant") of restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (the "Agreement") and the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The minimum number of shares issuable is zero; the maximum number of shares issuable is equal to                     . The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
2. .
Vesting; Forfeiture
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement including, without limitation, Paragraph 2(c) below, this award shall vest on the 2013 Reporting Date if, and to the extent that, the Company achieves the financial performance criteria set forth in to this Agreement. Such date or any other date on which shares vest under this Agreement may be referred to herein as a "Vesting Date."
Schedule 1
(b) The "2013 Reporting Date" shall mean the date on which the Company files its annual Public Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2013 or completes its annual Private Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2013, as applicable. If, on December 31, 2013, the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-K shall constitute its "Public Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. If, on December 31, 2013, the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, the Company's regularly prepared annual audited financial statements prepared by management shall be its "Private Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. The applicable financial statements may be referred to herein as the "2013 Financial Statements."
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company. For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
(d) If the Participant dies or becomes disabled on or after January 1, 2014 but before the 2013 Reporting Date, he or she shall be deemed to have been employed as of the 2013 Reporting Date.
3.
Distribution of Shares.
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs on or after January 1, 2014) the Shares of Common Stock represented by vested RSUs as follows: within 30 days of the Vesting Date; provided that if the Participant vests as the result of the application of Section 2(d), the earlier of 30 days after the 2013 Reporting Date or March 15, 2014.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
4. .
Restrictions on Transfer
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
5.
Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights.
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
6. .
Provisions of the Plan; Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), vesting of each RSU shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of to this Agreement.
Schedule 1
7. .
Withholding Taxes
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings
 
regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
8. .
Miscellaneous
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting
No Rights to Employment
 
schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties and supersede all prior agreements and understandings relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this Agreement prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
 
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed) or as soon as practicable thereafter, the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
A.
Overview
The RSUs shall vest only upon the Company's achievement of certain financial metrics based on target cumulative Revenue of $             million and target cumulative Normalized EPS of $             per share over the Company's fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013. The Company's performance measured against each metric shall be equally weighted to enable comparison as a percentage of a combined target. For purposes of this Agreement, such metrics shall have the following meanings:
"Revenue" shall mean the Company's cumulative annual revenue for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America as reported in the 2013 Financial Statements.
"Normalized EPS" shall mean the Company's cumulative annual earnings per diluted share for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 excluding cumulative amortization of intangible assets, stock-based compensation, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition-related costs, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt and other items excluded by the Company when publicly reporting such metric at the time of the 2013 Reporting Date.
"Vesting Amount" shall mean the aggregate amount, if any, issuable to the Participant based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS performance measured against the Actual Percentage of Targets defined below.
B.
Calculation of Percentages
The Company's Revenue shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative revenue for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 of $             million and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Revenue Percentage Component"). The Company's Normalized EPS shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative normalized earnings per share, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America, as reported in the 2013 Financial Statements for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 of $             and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Normalized EPS Component"). The sum of the Revenue Percentage Component and the Normalized EPS Component shall be the "Actual Percentage of Targets."
C.
Vesting Amounts
1. If the Actual Percentage of Targets fails to exceed 92.1%, then none of the RSUs shall vest and zero Shares shall be distributed in respect thereof.
2. If the Actual Percentage of Targets equals 92.1%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal                      (the "Base Vesting Amount") and shall vest.
3. If the Actual Percentage of Targets equals 100%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal                      (the "Target Vesting Amount") and shall vest.
4. If the Actual Percentage of Targets equals 110.5% or greater, then the Vesting Amount shall equal                      (the "Maximum Vesting Amount") and shall vest.
 
5. If the Actual Percentage of Targets is between 92.1% and 100%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal the sum of (a) the Base Vesting Amount plus (b) the product of (i) the difference between the Base Vesting Amount and the Target Vesting Amount multiplied by (ii) a fraction the numerator of which is the Actual Percentage of Targets Revenue minus 92.1% and the denominator is 7.9%, and shall vest.
6. If the Actual Percentage of Targets is between 100% and 110.5%, then the Vesting Amount shall equal the sum of (a) the Target Vesting Amount plus (b) the product of (i) the difference between the Maximum Vesting Amount and the Target Vesting Amount multiplied by (ii) a fraction the numerator of which is the Actual Percentage of Targets Revenue minus 100% and the denominator is 10.5%, and shall vest.
D.
Effect of an Acquisition by the Company
In the event that the Company enters into an Acquisition Transaction during 2011, then Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be adjusted to give effect to such Acquisition Transaction. An "Acquisition Transaction" means (i) the purchase by the Company of more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange which results in the Company acquiring more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, or (iii) the purchase or other acquisition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the ordinary course of business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 50% of another entity's total assets or assets that account for more than 50% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of such entity.
As soon as practicable following the closing of an Acquisition Transaction, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company shall make a determination of the estimated impact of the Acquisition Transaction on the Company's cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS through 2013. If the Acquisition Transaction is estimated to be accretive, then:
(i) in calculating Revenue for purposes of determining the Revenue Percentage Component, reported Revenue shall be reduced by the amount of estimated revenue contribution from the Acquisition Transaction; and
(ii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2013 Financial Statements, shall be reduced by the amount of the estimated Normalized EPS contribution from the Acquisition Transaction.
If the Acquisition is estimated to be non-accretive, then:
(iii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2013 Financial Statements, shall be increased by the amount of the estimated negative Normalized EPS impact from the Acquisition Transaction.
All determinations of the Compensation Committee regarding the estimated impact of an Acquisition Transaction shall be final, binding and non-appealable. This Agreement shall be deemed to be automatically amended, without further action by the Company or the Participant, to give effect to any adjustments required by this Section D.
E.
Effect of a Change in Control Event
 
(1) If there is a Change of Control Event prior to December 31, 2013, the RSUs shall vest as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event and Participant shall be entitled to receive a pro rated number of Shares based on the amount of time elapsed between the Grant Date and December 31, 2013. The number of Shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs, if any, shall be calculated based on a pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets calculated as follows:
(i) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2011, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results during the twelve-month period ending on the last day of the most recently reported fiscal quarter prior to the closing date of the Change of Control Event. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
(ii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2012, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal year 2011. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
(iii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2013, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal years 2011 and 2012 plus an amount equal to the Revenue and Normalized EPS for 2013 that would result if the rate of growth (loss) for Revenue and Normalized EPS, respectively, between 2011 and 2012 were to continue for 2013. Such sums shall be used for calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
Once the pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets has been determined and the number of Shares, if any, that would have been issuable in respect of the RSUs on the 2013 Reporting Date (the "Pro Forma Distribution Amount") calculated, the actual number of Shares issuable shall be adjusted proportionally based on the percentage of the three-year calculation period that has elapsed as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event (e.g., if the closing date of the Change in Control Event were April 1, 2012, the number of Shares issuable would be 41.7% (15 months/36 months) of the total Pro Forma Distribution Amount).
(2) If (i) there is a Change of Control Event between January 1, 2014 and September 30, 2014; (ii) Participant meets the requirements of Paragraph 2(c) of this Agreement as of immediately prior to the Change of Control Event and (iii) Participant's employment is terminated by the surviving entity in the Change of Control transaction at any time during the period between the Change of Control Event and October 1, 2014 for any reason other than for Cause (as defined below), then the entire portion of the Vesting Amount that had not vested prior to Participation's termination shall vest in full as of the effective date of Participant's termination. For purposes of this Agreement, "Cause" shall mean (a) any act or omission by Participant that has an adverse effect on Akamai's business or on the employee's ability to perform services for Akamai, including, without limitation, the commission of any crime (other than ordinary traffic violations), or (b) refusal or failure to perform assigned duties, serious misconduct, or excessive absenteeism. Whether a Participant has been terminated for "Cause" shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Company's management or, in the case of an executive officer, the Board of Directors or a committee thereof.
 

EXHIBIT 10.3
1. .
Grant of Award
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on                     , 20         (the "Grant Date") to you (the "Participant") of restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (the "Agreement") and the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The minimum number of shares issuable is zero; the maximum number of shares issuable is equal to 25% of the number of shares issued on the Grant Date under the terms of the other Restricted Stock Unit Agreement that subsequently vest (the maximum number of RSUs issuable hereunder, the "Maximum RSU Bonus Award"). The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
2. .
Vesting; Forfeiture
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement including, without limitation, Paragraph 2(c) below, this award shall vest on the 2013 Reporting Date if, and to the extent that, the Company achieves the financial performance criteria set forth in to this Agreement. Such date or any other date on which shares vest under this Agreement may be referred to herein as a "Vesting Date."
Schedule 1
(b) The "2013 Reporting Date" shall mean the date on which the Company files its annual Public Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2013 or completes its annual Private Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2013, as applicable. If, on December 31, 2013, the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-K shall constitute its "Public Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. If, on December 31, 2013, the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, the Company's regularly prepared annual audited financial statements prepared by management shall be its "Private Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. The applicable financial statements may be referred to herein as the "2013 Financial Statements."
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company. For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
(d) If the Participant dies or becomes disabled on or after January 1, 2014 but before the 2013 Reporting Date, he or she shall be deemed to have been employed as of the 2013 Reporting Date.
3. .
Distribution of Shares
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs on or after January 1, 2014) the Shares of Common Stock represented by vested RSUs as follows: within 30 days of the Vesting Date; provided that if the Participant vests as the result of the application of Section 2(d), the earlier of 30 days after the 2013 Reporting Date or March 15, 2014.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
4. .
Restrictions on Transfer
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
5. .
Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
6. .
Provisions of the Plan; Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), vesting of each RSU shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of to this Agreement.
Schedule 1
7. .
Withholding Taxes
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings
 
regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
8. .
Miscellaneous
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting
No Rights to Employment
 
schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties and supersede all prior agreements and understandings relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this Agreement prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
 
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed) or as soon as practicable thereafter, the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
 
A.
Overview
The RSUs shall vest only upon the Company's achievement of certain financial metrics based on target cumulative Revenue of $             million and target cumulative Normalized EPS of $             per share over the Company's fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013. The Company's performance measured against each metric shall be equally weighted to enable comparison as a percentage of a combined target. For purposes of this Agreement, such metrics shall have the following meanings:
"Revenue" shall mean the Company's cumulative annual revenue for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America as reported in the 2013 Financial Statements.
"Normalized EPS" shall mean the Company's cumulative annual earnings per diluted share for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 excluding cumulative amortization of intangible assets, stock-based compensation, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition-related costs, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt and other items excluded by the Company when publicly reporting such metric at the time of the 2013 Reporting Date.
"Vesting Amount" shall mean the aggregate amount, if any, issuable to the Participant based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS performance measured against the Actual Percentage of Targets defined below.
B.
Calculation of Percentages
The Company's Revenue shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative revenue for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 of $             million and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Revenue Percentage Component"). The Company's Normalized EPS shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative normalized earnings per share, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America, as reported in the 2013 Financial Statements for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 of $             and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Normalized EPS Component"). The sum of the Revenue Percentage Component and the Normalized EPS Component shall be the "Actual Percentage of Targets."
C.
Vesting Amounts
 
 
 
 
D.
Effect of an Acquisition by the Company
In the event that the Company enters into an Acquisition Transaction during 2011, then Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be adjusted to give effect to such Acquisition Transaction. An "Acquisition Transaction" means (i) the purchase by the Company of more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange which results in the Company acquiring more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, or (iii) the purchase or other acquisition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the ordinary course of business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 50% of another entity's total assets or assets that account for more than 50% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of such entity.
As soon as practicable following the closing of an Acquisition Transaction, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company shall make a determination of the estimated impact of the Acquisition Transaction on the Company's cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS through 2013. If the Acquisition Transaction is estimated to be accretive, then:
(i) in calculating Revenue for purposes of determining the Revenue Percentage Component, reported Revenue shall be reduced by the amount of estimated revenue contribution from the Acquisition Transaction; and
(ii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2013 Financial Statements, shall be reduced by the amount of the estimated Normalized EPS contribution from the Acquisition Transaction.
If the Acquisition is estimated to be non-accretive, then:
(iii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2013 Financial Statements, shall be increased by the amount of the estimated negative Normalized EPS impact from the Acquisition Transaction.
All determinations of the Compensation Committee regarding the estimated impact of an Acquisition Transaction shall be final, binding and non-appealable. This Agreement shall be deemed to be automatically amended, without further action by the Company or the Participant, to give effect to any adjustments required by this Section D.
E.
Effect of a Change in Control Event
(1) If there is a Change of Control Event prior to December 31, 2013, the RSUs shall vest as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event and Participant shall be entitled to receive a pro rated number of Shares based on the amount of time elapsed between the Grant Date and December 31, 2013. The number of Shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs, if any, shall be calculated based on a pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets calculated as follows:
(i) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2011, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results during the twelve-month period ending on the last day of the most recently reported fiscal quarter prior to the closing date of the Change of Control Event. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
 
(ii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2012, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal year 2011. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
(iii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2013, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal years 2011 and 2012 plus an amount equal to the Revenue and Normalized EPS for 2013 that would result if the rate of growth (loss) for Revenue and Normalized EPS, respectively, between 2011 and 2012 were to continue for 2013. Such sums shall be used for calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
Once the pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets has been determined and the number of Shares, if any, that would have been issuable in respect of the RSUs on the 2013 Reporting Date (the "Pro Forma Distribution Amount") calculated, the actual number of Shares issuable shall be adjusted proportionally based on the percentage of the three-year calculation period that has elapsed as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event (e.g., if the closing date of the Change in Control Event were April 1, 2012, the number of Shares issuable would be 41.7% (15 months/36 months) of the total Pro Forma Distribution Amount).
(2) If (i) there is a Change of Control Event between January 1, 2014 and September 30, 2014; (ii) Participant meets the requirements of Paragraph 2(c) of this Agreement as of immediately prior to the Change of Control Event and (iii) Participant's employment is terminated by the surviving entity in the Change of Control transaction at any time during the period between the Change of Control Event and October 1, 2014 for any reason other than for Cause (as defined below), then the entire portion of the Vesting Amount that had not vested prior to Participation's termination shall vest in full as of the effective date of Participant's termination. For purposes of this Agreement, "Cause" shall mean (a) any act or omission by Participant that has an adverse effect on Akamai's business or on the employee's ability to perform services for Akamai, including, without limitation, the commission of any crime (other than ordinary traffic violations), or (b) refusal or failure to perform assigned duties, serious misconduct, or excessive absenteeism. Whether a Participant has been terminated for "Cause" shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Company's management or, in the case of an executive officer, the Board of Directors or a committee thereof.
 

EXHIBIT 10.4
1. .
Grant of Award
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on                     , 20         (the "Grant Date") to you (the "Participant") of restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (the "Agreement") and the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The minimum number of shares issuable is zero; the maximum number of shares issuable is equal to 50% of the number of shares issued on the Grant Date under the terms of the other Restricted Stock Unit Agreement that subsequently vest (the maximum number of RSUs issuable hereunder, the "Maximum RSU Bonus Award"). The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
2. .
Vesting; Forfeiture
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement including, without limitation, Paragraph 2(c) below, this award shall vest on the 2013 Reporting Date if, and to the extent that, the Company achieves the financial performance criteria set forth in to this Agreement. Such date or any other date on which shares vest under this Agreement may be referred to herein as a "Vesting Date."
Schedule 1
(b) The "2013 Reporting Date" shall mean the date on which the Company files its annual Public Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2013 or completes its annual Private Company Financial Statements for fiscal year 2013, as applicable. If, on December 31, 2013, the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-K shall constitute its "Public Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. If, on December 31, 2013, the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, the Company's regularly prepared annual audited financial statements prepared by management shall be its "Private Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. The applicable financial statements may be referred to herein as the "2013 Financial Statements."
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company. For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
(d) If the Participant dies or becomes disabled on or after January 1, 2014 but before the 2013 Reporting Date, he or she shall be deemed to have been employed as of the 2013 Reporting Date.
3. .
Distribution of Shares
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs on or after January 1, 2014) the Shares of Common Stock represented by vested RSUs as follows: within 30 days of the Vesting Date; provided that if the Participant vests as the result of the application of Section 2(d), the earlier of 30 days after the 2013 Reporting Date or March 15, 2014.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
4. .
Restrictions on Transfer
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
5. .
Dividend and Other Shareholder Rights
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
6. .
Provisions of the Plan; Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), vesting of each RSU shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of to this Agreement.
Schedule 1
7. .
Withholding Taxes
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings
 
regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
8. .
Miscellaneous
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting
No Rights to Employment
 
schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties and supersede all prior agreements and understandings relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this Agreement prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
 
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed) or as soon as practicable thereafter, the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
 
A.
Overview
The RSUs shall vest only upon the Company's achievement of certain financial metrics based on target cumulative Revenue of $                 million and target cumulative Normalized EPS of $                 per share over the Company's fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013. The Company's performance measured against each metric shall be equally weighted to enable comparison as a percentage of a combined target. For purposes of this Agreement, such metrics shall have the following meanings:
"Revenue" shall mean the Company's cumulative annual revenue for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America as reported in the 2013 Financial Statements.
"Normalized EPS" shall mean the Company's cumulative annual earnings per diluted share for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 excluding cumulative amortization of intangible assets, stock-based compensation, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition-related costs, certain gains and losses on equity investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt and other items excluded by the Company when publicly reporting such metric at the time of the 2013 Reporting Date.
"Vesting Amount" shall mean the aggregate amount, if any, issuable to the Participant based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS performance measured against the Actual Percentage of Targets defined below.
B.
Calculation of Percentages
The Company's Revenue shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative revenue for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 of $                 million and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Revenue Percentage Component"). The Company's Normalized EPS shall be calculated as a percentage of the Company's target cumulative normalized earnings per share, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America, as reported in the 2013 Financial Statements for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013 of $                 and multiplied by 0.5 (the "Normalized EPS Component"). The sum of the Revenue Percentage Component and the Normalized EPS Component shall be the "Actual Percentage of Targets."
C.
Vesting Amounts
 
 
 
 
D.
Effect of an Acquisition by the Company
In the event that the Company enters into an Acquisition Transaction during 2011, then Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be adjusted to give effect to such Acquisition Transaction. An "Acquisition Transaction" means (i) the purchase by the Company of more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange which results in the Company acquiring more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, or (iii) the purchase or other acquisition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the ordinary course of business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 50% of another entity's total assets or assets that account for more than 50% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of such entity.
As soon as practicable following the closing of an Acquisition Transaction, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company shall make a determination of the estimated impact of the Acquisition Transaction on the Company's cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS through 2013. If the Acquisition Transaction is estimated to be accretive, then:
(i) in calculating Revenue for purposes of determining the Revenue Percentage Component, reported Revenue shall be reduced by the amount of estimated revenue contribution from the Acquisition Transaction; and
(ii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2013 Financial Statements, shall be reduced by the amount of the estimated Normalized EPS contribution from the Acquisition Transaction.
If the Acquisition is estimated to be non-accretive, then:
(iii) in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2013 Financial Statements, shall be increased by the amount of the estimated negative Normalized EPS impact from the Acquisition Transaction.
All determinations of the Compensation Committee regarding the estimated impact of an Acquisition Transaction shall be final, binding and non-appealable. This Agreement shall be deemed to be automatically amended, without further action by the Company or the Participant, to give effect to any adjustments required by this Section D.
E.
Effect of a Change in Control Event
(1) If there is a Change of Control Event prior to December 31, 2013, the RSUs shall vest as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event and Participant shall be entitled to receive a pro rated number of Shares based on the amount of time elapsed between the Grant Date and December 31, 2013. The number of Shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs, if any, shall be calculated based on a pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets calculated as follows:
(i) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2011, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results during the twelve-month period ending on the last day of the most recently reported fiscal quarter prior to the closing date of the Change of Control Event. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
 
(ii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2012, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the Company's Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal year 2011. Such numbers shall then be multiplied by three for purposes of calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
(iii) If the Change of Control Event occurs in 2013, Revenue and Normalized EPS shall be calculated based on the cumulative Revenue and Normalized EPS results for fiscal years 2011 and 2012 plus an amount equal to the Revenue and Normalized EPS for 2013 that would result if the rate of growth (loss) for Revenue and Normalized EPS, respectively, between 2011 and 2012 were to continue for 2013. Such sums shall be used for calculating the Actual Percentage of Targets.
Once the pro forma Actual Percentage of Targets has been determined and the number of Shares, if any, that would have been issuable in respect of the RSUs on the 2013 Reporting Date (the "Pro Forma Distribution Amount") calculated, the actual number of Shares issuable shall be adjusted proportionally based on the percentage of the three-year calculation period that has elapsed as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event (e.g., if the closing date of the Change in Control Event were April 1, 2012, the number of Shares issuable would be 41.7% (15 months/36 months) of the total Pro Forma Distribution Amount).
(2) If (i) there is a Change of Control Event between January 1, 2014 and September 30, 2014; (ii) Participant meets the requirements of Paragraph 2(c) of this Agreement as of immediately prior to the Change of Control Event and (iii) Participant's employment is terminated by the surviving entity in the Change of Control transaction at any time during the period between the Change of Control Event and October 1, 2014 for any reason other than for Cause (as defined below), then the entire portion of the Vesting Amount that had not vested prior to Participation's termination shall vest in full as of the effective date of Participant's termination. For purposes of this Agreement, "Cause" shall mean (a) any act or omission by Participant that has an adverse effect on Akamai's business or on the employee's ability to perform services for Akamai, including, without limitation, the commission of any crime (other than ordinary traffic violations), or (b) refusal or failure to perform assigned duties, serious misconduct, or excessive absenteeism. Whether a Participant has been terminated for "Cause" shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Company's management or, in the case of an executive officer, the Board of Directors or a committee thereof.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20110121170129.txt.gz
TIME:20110121170129
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
On January 19, 2011, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") elected Pamela L. Craig as a director to fill a newly-created vacancy on the Board, effective on April 1, 2011 (the "Effective Date"). Ms. Craig was designated as a Class II member of the Board and was elected to serve until the 2013 Annual Meeting of Stockholders or until her successor is duly appointed and qualified. Ms. Craig is the Chief Financial Officer of Accenture, a publicly-traded global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company. Ms. Craig was recommended to the Board by its Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee in accordance with the provisions of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee Charter.
There are no arrangements or understandings between Ms. Craig and any other person pursuant to which she was elected as a director. Ms. Craig has not yet been designated to serve on any committees of the Board. There are no transactions in which Ms. Craig has an interest requiring disclosure under Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
On the Effective Date, Ms. Craig will be granted an option, pursuant to Akamai's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "2009 Stock Plan"), to purchase a number of shares of Akamai common stock having a Black Scholes value of $400,000 with an exercise price per share equal to the closing sale price of one share of Akamai's common stock on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the grant date. Such option will vest over a four-year period, so long as Ms. Craig remains a member of the Board.
A copy of the press release announcing Ms. Craig's election is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.1
 
On January 19, 2011, the Compensation Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of the Board adopted cash and equity compensation programs for 2011 for the following executive officers: Paul Sagan, Chief Executive Officer; Debra Canner, Senior Vice President  Human Resources; Melanie Haratunian, Senior Vice President and General Counsel; Robert Hughes, Executive Vice President  Global Sales, Services & Marketing; David Kenny, President; and J. Donald Sherman, Chief Financial Officer (collectively, the "Executives").
Each of the cash incentive components of the 2011 compensation program provides for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, each Executive's cash bonus is weighted as follows: 80% based on Akamai's achievement of revenue and normalized earnings per share targets for fiscal year 2011 and 20% based on achievement of individual or departmental performance goals. The new base salaries will take effect on April 4, 2011. Below we use the term 2011 base salary earnings to refer to the sum of amounts paid or payable in 2011 under the salary in effect between January 1, 2011 and April 3, 2011 plus those payable in 2011 under the salary in effect between April 4, 2011 and December 31, 2011.
For Mr. Sagan, his new base salary will be $750,000 with a target cash bonus is equal to 125% of his 2011 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 225% of his 2011 base salary earnings. For Ms. Canner, her new base salary will be $294,000 with a target cash bonus equal to 50% of her 2011 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 90% of her 2010 base salary earnings. For Ms. Haratunian, her new base salary will be $347,000 with a target cash bonus equal to 50% of her 2011 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 90% of her 2011 base salary earnings. For Mr. Hughes, his new base salary will be $443,500 with a target cash bonus equal to 125% of his 2011 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 225% of his 2011 base salary earnings. For Mr. Kenny, his new base salary will be $560,000 with a target cash bonus equal to 125% of his 2011 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 225% of his 2011 base salary earnings. For Mr. Sherman, his new base salary will be $443,500 with a target cash bonus equal to 75% of his 2011 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 135% of his 2011 base salary earnings.
As described in the table below, each Executive was also granted stock options and restricted stock units ("RSUs") issuable pursuant to the 2009 Stock Plan as follows:
 
The options will have an effective date of the second day following the Company's release of financial results for fiscal year 2010; the effective date is expected to be February 11, 2011. The aggregate number of options to be granted to each individual shall be calculated by applying a Black-Scholes option pricing model to the value set forth in the chart above based on the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the grant date. Such price shall also be the exercise price for the options. The options will vest in accordance with the following schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the grant date and the remaining 75% vest in equal quarterly installments of 6.25% thereafter. Options are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of non-statutory stock option agreement previously filed on May 26, 2009 with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting. RSUs with annual vesting vest in 33% annual installments on the first, second and third anniversaries of the date of grant. Three-Year performance-based vesting RSUs (the "Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs") will only vest to the extent that the Company exceeds specified cumulative revenue and earnings per share targets for fiscal years 2011, 2012 and 2013. The maximum number of Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs that may vest is set forth in the chart above; such number will vest if Akamai meets or exceed 110.5% of the applicable weighted average targets. If Akamai achieves 100% of the applicable weighted average targets, then 50% of the maximum issuable number of RSUs will vest. If Akamai achieves 92.1% of the applicable weighted average targets, then 25% of the maximum issuable number of RSUs will vest. No Three-Year Cumulative Performance RSUs will vest if the Company fails to exceed 92.1% of the applicable weighted average target. Pro-rata amounts will be issued for performance between 92.1% and 100% and 100% and 110.5%, respectively. The foregoing description of the RSUs is qualified in its entirety by the text of the relevant RSU agreement, each of which was previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 19, 2011.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Exhibit 99.1     Press Release dated January 20, 2011

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading provider of cloud optimization services, today announced the election of Pamela J. Craig, chief financial officer at Accenture (NYSE: ACN), to the Akamai Board of Directors effective April 1, 2011.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  January 20, 2011 
A member of Accenture's executive leadership team, Ms. Craig's tenure at the global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company spans more than three decades. As CFO, she is responsible for leading Accenture's finance organization, which includes the corporate controllership, treasury, tax, investor relations, corporate transaction services, client and corporate finance, finance operations and strategic planning and analysis functions in different parts of the world.
"We are honored to welcome Pam to our Board of Directors, and we look forward to benefiting from her significant global management and consulting expertise," said Paul Sagan, CEO of Akamai. "Pam's global focus and insight on operational effectiveness, client development, and technology and systems integration will be invaluable to Akamai as we continue to innovate to make the Internet work better for business."
Ms. Craig commented, "Akamai has dramatically transformed how many industries around the globe are leveraging the Internet for business success. I am looking forward to the opportunity to contribute to such a dynamic and innovative company."
Prior to her leadership roles in finance, Ms. Craig was Group Director of Business Operations and Services, managing an annual budget of nearly $1.4 billion and an organization of 7,300 people around the world. She had direct global responsibility for Accenture's geographic operations and IT organization as well as oversight responsibility for market image, strategy execution and operational issues in all of Accenture's countries. She also served as Managing Partner of Accenture's Global Media and Entertainment Industry Group, developing and managing the practice worldwide when first created in 1994.
During more than 20 years in consulting at Accenture, Ms. Craig focused on designing and building finance and performance management systems for consumer products, communications, media and other companies, helping clients build shared services organizations and integrate operations after mergers or other business formations.
Ms. Craig joined Accenture in 1979 and was elected a partner in 1991. In addition to her many contributions to the success of the company, she has played a key role in the advancement and retention of women at Accenture. Most notably, she led the launch of the Communications & High Tech operating group's women's initiative and the company's first women's program in Japan. She is also a member of the Committee of 200, a professional organization of preeminent women entrepreneurs and corporate leaders, and was recently recognized with a National Association of Female Executives and Entrepreneurs "Women of Excellence" award last month.
About Akamai
Akamai provides market-leading, cloud-based services for optimizing Web and mobile content and applications, online HD video, and secure e-commerce. Combining highly-distributed, energy-efficient computing with intelligent software, Akamai's global platform is transforming the cloud into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, transact and collaborate. To learn how the world's leading enterprises are optimizing their business in the cloud, please visit and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20110209160143.txt.gz
TIME:20110209160143
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 9, 2011, Akamai Technologies, Inc. announced its financial results for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading provider of cloud optimization services, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2010. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2010 was $284.7 million, a 12 percent increase over third quarter revenue of $253.6 million, and a 19 percent increase over fourth quarter 2009 revenue of $238.3 million. Total revenue for 2010 was $1,023.6 million, a 19 percent increase over 2009 revenue of $859.8 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 9, 2011
"With strength across cloud computing and online digital media solutions, Akamai completed its first $1 billion revenue year in 2010," said Paul Sagan, CEO of Akamai. "With our unique, distributed network and growing portfolio of solutions, we believe we are well positioned to help our customers grow as use of cloud computing, online commerce, software-as-a-service, and online media continue to proliferate around the world."
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the fourth quarter of 2010 was $52.5 million, or $0.27 per diluted share. Full-year GAAP net income for 2010 was $171.2 million, or $0.90 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $76.5 million, or $0.40 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2010, a 19 percent increase over prior quarter normalized net income of $64.2 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, and a 22 percent increase over fourth quarter 2009 normalized net income of $62.9 million, or $0.34 per diluted share. Full-year normalized net income grew 19 percent year-over-year to $271.7 million, or $1.43 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2010 was $129.2 million, up from $114.1 million in the prior quarter, and $111.6 million in the fourth quarter of 2009. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the fourth quarter was 45 percent, consistent with the prior quarter and 2 points below the same period last year. For the full year, adjusted EBITDA was $473.6 million, up from $405.2 million in 2009. Full-year adjusted EBITDA margin in 2010 was at 46 percent, down a point from 2009. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Full-year cash from operations was $402.5 million, or 39 percent of revenue, down 5 percent from the prior year. At year end, the Company had over $1.2 billion of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 18 percent and 27 percent, respectively, of revenue for the fourth quarter 2010.
During the fourth quarter of 2010, under a share repurchase program that was approved by the Board of Directors in April 2009 and extended in April 2010, the Company repurchased approximately 560,000 shares of common stock for $26.9 million at an average price of $48.06 per share. As of December 31, 2010, the Company had repurchased 5.8 million shares of common stock for $158.3 million at an average price of $27.38 per share
The Company had approximately 186.6 million shares of common stock outstanding as of December 31, 2010.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-800-884-5695 (or 1-617-786-2960 for international calls) and using passcode No. 30950348. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 44458971.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai provides market-leading, cloud-based services for optimizing Web and mobile content and applications, online HD video, and secure e-commerce. Combining highly-distributed, energy-efficient computing with intelligent software, Akamai's global platform is transforming the cloud into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, transact and collaborate. To learn how the world's leading enterprises are optimizing their business in the cloud, please visit and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which makes comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on historic cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "fully taxed normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers fully taxed normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "fully taxed normalized net income per share" as fully taxed normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers fully taxed normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and fully taxed normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the expected growth and development of our business and the markets in which we operate, the strength of our business model and cost structure and the superiority of our service offerings. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to continue to generate positive cash flow, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20110427160748.txt.gz
TIME:20110427160748
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 27, 2011, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") announced its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
As previously reported on the Current Report on Form 8-K filed on January 19, 2011, Pamela Craig was appointed as a director of the Company effective as of April 1, 2011. On the recommendation of its Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, the Company's Board of Directors has appointed Ms. Craig to serve on the Audit Committee and the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of the Board of Directors effective as of May 1, 2011.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE
Contacts:
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading provider of cloud optimization services, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2011. Revenue for the first quarter of 2011 was $276.0 million, a 15 percent increase over first quarter 2010 revenue of $240.0 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 27, 2011
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the first quarter of 2011 was $50.6 million, or $0.26 per diluted share, a 24 percent increase from first quarter 2010 GAAP net income of $40.9 million, or $0.22 per diluted share, and a 4 percent decrease from fourth quarter 2010 GAAP net income of $52.5 million, or $0.27 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $72.2 million, or $0.38 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2011, a 9 percent increase over first quarter 2010 normalized net income of $66.0 million, or $0.35 per diluted share , and a 6 percent decrease from the prior quarter normalized net income of $76.5 million, or $0.40 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"Continued demand for our value-added solutions, now comprising almost 60 percent of our business, drove our strong results in the first quarter," said Paul Sagan, CEO of Akamai. "We have built a portfolio of cloud computing solutions that leverages our intelligent Internet platform and is designed to address the diverse needs of businesses on the Web."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the first quarter of 2011 was $129.2 million, consistent with the prior quarter, and up from $118.1 million in the first quarter of 2010. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the first quarter was 47 percent, up 2 points from the prior quarter and down 2 points from the same period last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $88.5 million in the first quarter of 2011, or 32 percent of revenue. At the end of the first quarter of 2011, the Company had approximately $1.26 billion in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 18 percent and 30 percent, respectively, of revenue for the first quarter of 2011.
The Company also announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a second $150 million expansion of its share repurchase program, which is expected to be funded by cash from operations. The Company's goal for this program, which will extend for 12 months beginning in May 2011, is to offset dilution created by its equity compensation programs.
The timing and amount of any shares repurchased will be determined by the Company's management based on its evaluation of market conditions and other factors. Repurchases may also be made under a Rule 10b5-1 plan, which would permit the Company to repurchase shares when the Company might otherwise be precluded from doing so under insider trading laws. The Company may choose to suspend or discontinue the repurchase program at any time but cannot carry over unused authorization amounts to future periods.
During the first quarter of 2011, the Company repurchased approximately 1 million shares of common stock for an aggregate of $42.8 million at an average price of $41.60 per share. As of March 31, 2011, the Company had repurchased a total of 6.8 million shares for an aggregate of $201.1 million at an average price of $29.53 per share, under the share repurchase program that was initially approved by the Board of Directors in April 2009.
As of March 31, 2011, the Company had approximately 186.9 million shares of common stock outstanding.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-730-5767 (or 1-857-350-1591for international calls) and using passcode No. 76371792. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 95542558.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai provides market-leading, cloud-based services for optimizing Web and mobile content and applications, online HD video, and secure e-commerce. Combining highly-distributed, energy-efficient computing with intelligent software, Akamai's global platform is transforming the cloud into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, transact and collaborate. To learn how the world's leading enterprises are optimizing their business in the cloud, please visit and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on the historical cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized net income per share" as normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the anticipated growth and development of our business and the markets in which we operate. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to continue to generate positive cash flow, the effects of any attempts to intentionally disrupt our services or network by unauthorized users or others, failure to have available sufficient transmission capacity, failure of our stock repurchase program to offset a significant amount of dilution created by our equity compensation programs, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20110523160053.txt.gz
TIME:20110523160053
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At the annual meeting of stockholders of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") held on May 18, 2011 (the "Annual Meeting"), the Company's stockholders approved an amendment to the Akamai Technologies Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "2009 Plan") to increase the number of shares available for issuance thereunder by 7 million; such amendment had previously been adopted by the Company's Board of Directors subject to stockholder approval.
The following brief description of the 2009 Plan is qualified in its entirety by reference to the complete text of the plan, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference:
The 2009 Plan allows for the issuance of incentive stock options intended to qualify under Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, nonstatutory stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock awards, restricted stock units, deferred stock units and other stock unit awards. Subject to adjustment in the event of stock splits, stock dividends or similar events, awards may be made under the 2009 Plan for (i) up to 8,500,000 shares of the Company's common stock and (ii) any shares of common stock subject to awards that are currently outstanding under existing equity incentive plans that are terminated, cancelled, surrendered or forfeited, subject to adjustment under the terms of the 2009 Plan. As a result of the approved amendment, the 8,500,000 share allowance increased to 15,500,000.
Employees, officers, directors, consultants and advisors of the Company and its subsidiaries are eligible to be granted awards under the 2009 Plan. Under present law, however, incentive stock options may only be granted to employees of the Company and its majority owned subsidiaries. The 2009 Plan is administered by the Company's Board of Directors. Under the terms of the 2009 Plan, the Board of Directors may delegate authority under the 2009 Plan to one or more committees or subcommittees of the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors has authorized the Compensation Committee (the "Committee") to administer certain aspects of the 2009 Plan, including the granting of awards to executive officers. In addition, as permitted by the terms of the 2009 Plan, the Board of Directors has delegated to the Chief Executive Officer of the Company, as a committee of one director, the authority to grant equity awards to non-executive employees in accordance with guidelines established by the Committee.
The Board of Directors or the Committee may modify awards granted to participants who are foreign nationals or employed outside the United States or establish sub plans or procedures under the 2009 Plan to recognize differences in laws, rules, regulations or customs of such foreign jurisdictions with respect to tax, securities, currency, employee benefit or other matters.
 
At the Annual Meeting, five items of business were acted upon by stockholders. There were 187,464,359 shares of Akamai's common stock eligible to vote, and 158,595,378 shares present in person or by proxy at the Annual Meeting.
1. The following nominees were elected to the Company's Board of Directors as Class III directors for terms expiring at the 2014 annual meeting of stockholders.
 
Following the Annual Meeting, George H. Conrades, Martin M. Coyne II, Jill A. Greenthal and Geoffrey A. Moore, having terms expiring in 2012, and Pamela J. Craig, F. Thomson Leighton, Paul Sagan and Naomi O. Seligman, having terms expiring in 2013, continued in office.
2. An amendment to the 2009 Plan to increase the number of shares available for issuance thereunder by 7 million was approved.
 
3. A non-binding, advisory proposal on the compensation of the Company's named executive officers was approved.
 
4. The stockholders recommended, in a non-binding, advisory vote, that future advisory votes on the compensation of the Company's named executive officers be held every year.
 
After taking into consideration the foregoing voting results and the Board's prior recommendation in favor of an annual advisory stockholder vote on the compensation of the Company's named executive officers, the Board intends to hold future advisory votes on the compensation of the Company's named executive officers every year.
5. The appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP as the independent registered public accounting firm for the Company for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2011 was ratified.
 
 
(d) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
The Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan") be and hereby is amended by deleting the first two sentences of Section 4(a) thereof in their entirety and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
"Subject to adjustment under Section 9, Awards may be made under the Plan for up to 15,500,000 shares of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Company (the "Common Stock"). Subject to adjustment under Section 9, up to 15,500,000 shares of Common Stock may be issued upon exercise of Incentive Stock Options (as hereinafter defined) granted under the Plan."
Adopted by the Board of Directors on January 19, 2011.
Approved by the Stockholders on May 18, 2011.
 
The purpose of this 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan") of Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company" or "Akamai"), is to advance the interests of the Company's stockholders by enhancing the Company's ability to attract, retain and motivate persons who are expected to make important contributions to the Company and by providing such persons with equity ownership opportunities and performance-based incentives that are intended to align their interests with those of the Company's stockholders. Except where the context otherwise requires, the term "Company" shall include any of the Company's present or future parent or subsidiary corporations as defined in Sections 424(e) or (f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Code") and any other business venture (including, without limitation, joint venture or limited liability company) in which the Company has a controlling interest, as determined by the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board").
 
Except as otherwise provided in Section 5(b), all of the Company's employees, officers, directors, consultants and advisors are eligible to receive options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock, restricted stock units and other stock-based awards (each, an "Award") under the Plan. Each person who receives an Award under the Plan is deemed a "Participant".
 
(a) . The Plan will be administered by the Board. Subject to and consistent with the provisions of the Plan, the Board shall have the authority and discretion to: (i) determine which eligible employees, officers, directors, consultants and advisors will receive Awards, (ii) determine the number of shares of Common Stock (as hereinafter defined), cash, or other
Administration by Board of Directors
consideration to be covered by each Award, (iii) determine the terms and conditions of any Award (including Fair Market Value (as hereinafter defined), the exercise price, the vesting schedule, the term of the Award, and the period following termination from employment or service during which an Award may be exercised), (iv) approve forms of Award agreements and other documentation for use under the Plan, (v) adopt, alter, and repeal administrative rules, guidelines, and practices governing the operation of the Plan, (vi) interpret the provisions of the Plan and any Award documentation and remedy any ambiguities, omissions, or inconsistencies therein, (vii) modify or amend Awards, or grant waivers of Plan or Award conditions, (viii) determine the nature and provisions of Other Stock Unit Awards (as hereinafter defined) permitted pursuant to Section 8, and (ix) make all other determinations necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan. All decisions by the Board shall be made in the Board's sole discretion and shall be final and binding on all persons having or claiming any interest in the Plan or in any Award. No director or person acting pursuant to the authority delegated by the Board shall be liable for any action or determination relating to or under the Plan made in good faith.
(b) .To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Board may delegate any or all of its powers under the Plan to one or more committees or subcommittees of the Board (a "Committee"). All references in the Plan to the "Board" shall mean the Board or a Committee of the Board or the officers referred to in Section 3(c) to the extent that the Board's powers or authority under the Plan have been delegated to such Committee or officers. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for purposes of granting Awards to directors, the Committee shall mean the Compensation Committee.
Appointment of Committees
(c) . To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Board may delegate to one or more officers of the Company the power to grant Awards to employees or officers of the Company or any of its present or future subsidiary corporations and to exercise such other powers under the Plan as the Board may determine, provided that the Board shall fix the terms of the Awards to be granted by such officers (including the exercise price of such Awards, which may include a formula by which the exercise price will be determined) and the maximum number of shares subject to Awards that the officers may grant; provided further, however, that no officer shall be authorized to grant Awards to any "executive officer" of the Company (as defined by Rule 3b-7 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act")) or to any "officer" of the Company (as defined by Rule 16a-1 under the Exchange Act).
Delegation to Officers
(d) . Awards to non-employee directors will only be granted and administered by a Committee, all of the members of which are independent as defined by Section 4200(a)(15) of the Nasdaq Marketplace Rules.
Awards to Non-Employee Directors
 
(a) . Subject to adjustment under Section 9, Awards may be made under the Plan for up to 8,500,000 shares of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Company (the "Common Stock"). Subject to adjustment under Section 9, up to 8,500,000 shares of Common Stock may be issued upon exercise of Incentive Stock Options (as hereinafter defined) granted under the Plan. If any Award granted under this Plan or any stock award granted under the Company's Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, 2001 Stock Incentive Plan or 2006 Stock Incentive Plan (together, the "Existing Plans") expires or is terminated, surrendered or canceled without having been fully exercised, is forfeited in whole or in part, is settled in cash or otherwise, or results in any Common Stock not being issued, the unused Common Stock covered by such Award or any award issued under the Existing Plans shall revert or again be available for the grant of Awards under the Plan. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Section 4(a), any shares not issued or delivered as a result of the net settlement of any outstanding Stock Appreciation Right, any shares tendered in payment of an Option's exercise price (whether by attestation or actual delivery), any shares tendered or withheld to satisfy a tax withholding on an Award, and any shares repurchased by the Company using Option proceeds shall not
Number of Shares
 
revert or again be available for the grant of Awards under the Plan. In the case of Incentive Stock Options (as hereinafter defined), the foregoing provisions shall be subject to any limitations under the Code. Shares issued under the Plan may consist in whole or in part of authorized but unissued shares, treasury shares or shares purchased on the open market.
(b) . Subject to adjustment under Section 9, the following sub-limits on the number of shares subject to Awards shall apply:
Sub-limits
(1) . The maximum number of shares of Common Stock with respect to which Awards may be granted to any Participant under the Plan shall be 1,000,000 per calendar year. For purposes of the foregoing limit, the combination of an Option in tandem with an SAR (as each is hereafter defined) shall be treated as a single Award. The per-Participant limit described in this Section 4(b)(1) shall be construed and applied consistently with Section 162(m) of the Code or any successor provision thereto, and the regulations thereunder ("Section 162(m)").
Section 162(m) Per-Participant Limit
(2) . The maximum number of shares with respect to which Awards other than Options and SARs may be granted shall be 90% of the total number of shares available for issuance under the Plan.
Limit on Awards other than Options and SARS
(3) . The maximum aggregate number of shares with respect to which Awards may be granted to directors who are not employees of the Company at the time of grant shall be 10% of the total number of shares available for issuance under the Plan.
Limit on Awards to Directors
(c) . In connection with a merger or consolidation of an entity with the Company or the acquisition by the Company of property or stock of an entity, the Board may grant Awards in substitution for any options or other stock or stock-based awards granted by such entity or an affiliate thereof. Substitute Awards may be granted on such terms as the Board deems appropriate in the circumstances, notwithstanding any limitations on Awards contained in the Plan. Substitute Awards shall not count against the overall share limit set forth in Section 4(a), except as may be required by reason of Section 422 and related provisions of the Code.
Substitute Awards
 
(a) . The Board may grant options to purchase Common Stock (each, an "Option") and determine the number of shares of Common Stock to be covered by each Option, the exercise price of each Option and the conditions and limitations applicable to the exercise of each Option, including conditions relating to applicable federal or state securities laws, as it considers necessary or advisable. An Option that is not intended to be an Incentive Stock Option (as hereinafter defined) shall be designated a "Nonstatutory Stock Option".
General
(b) . An Option that the Board intends to be an "incentive stock option" as defined in Section 422 of the Code (an "Incentive Stock Option") shall only be granted to employees of Akamai, any of Akamai's present or future parent or subsidiary corporations as defined in Sections 424(e) or (f) of the Code, and any other entities the employees of which are eligible to receive Incentive Stock Options under the Code, and shall be subject to and shall be construed consistently with the requirements of Section 422 of the Code. If the Fair Market Value (as defined below) of shares on the date of grant with respect to which Incentive Stock Options are exercisable for the first time by a Participant during any calendar year exceeds $100,000, the Options for the first $100,000 worth of shares to become exercisable in that calendar year will be Incentive Stock Options, and the Options for the shares with a Fair Market Value (as defined below) in excess of $100,000 that become exercisable in that calendar year will be Nonstatutory Stock Options. The Company shall have no liability to a Participant, or any other party, if an Option (or any part thereof) that is intended to be an Incentive Stock Option is not an Incentive Stock Option or for any action taken by the Board, including without limitation the conversion of an Incentive Stock Option to a Nonstatutory Stock Option.
Incentive Stock Options
 
(c) . The Board shall establish the exercise price of each Option and specify such exercise price in the applicable option agreement; provided however, that the exercise price shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value (as defined below) on the date the Option is granted, provided that if the Board approves the grant of an Option with an exercise price to be determined on a future date, the exercise price shall be not less than 100% of the Fair Market Value on such future date.
Exercise Price
(d) .Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Plan, the Company shall not engage in any repricing of Options or SARs granted under this Plan without further stockholder approval. For this purpose, the term "repricing" shall mean any of the following or other action that has the same effect: (i) lowering the exercise price of an Option or a SAR after it is granted, (ii) any other action that is treated as a repricing under generally accepted accounting principles, or (iii) canceling an Option or a SAR at a time when its exercise price exceeds the fair market value of the underlying stock in exchange for another Option, SAR, Restricted Stock, or other equity of the Company, unless the cancellation and exchange occurs in connection with a merger, acquisition, spin-off, or similar corporate transaction (including any adjustment described in Section 9).
No Repricing of Options
 
(e) . Each Option shall be exercisable at such times and subject to such terms and conditions as the Board may specify in the applicable option agreement; provided however, that no Option will be granted for a term in excess of 7 years.
Duration of Options
(f) . Options may be exercised by delivery to the Company of a written notice of exercise signed by the proper person or by any other form of notice (including electronic notice) approved by the Board together with payment in full as specified in Section 5(g) for the number of shares for which the Option is exercised. Shares of Common Stock subject to the Option will be delivered by the Company following exercise either as soon as practicable or, subject to such conditions as the Board shall specify, on a deferred basis (with the Company's obligation to be evidenced by an instrument providing for future delivery of the deferred shares at the time or times specified by the Board).
Exercise of Option
(g) . Common Stock purchased upon the exercise of an Option granted under the Plan shall be paid for as follows:
Payment Upon Exercise
(1) in cash or by check, payable to the order of the Company;
(2) except as may otherwise be provided in the applicable option agreement, by (i) delivery of an irrevocable and unconditional undertaking by a creditworthy broker to deliver promptly to the Company sufficient funds to pay the exercise price and any required tax withholding or (ii) delivery by the Participant to the Company of a copy of irrevocable and unconditional instructions to a creditworthy broker to deliver promptly to the Company cash or a check sufficient to pay the exercise price and any required tax withholding;
(3) to the extent provided for in the applicable option agreement or approved by the Board, in its sole discretion, by delivery (either by actual delivery or attestation) of shares of Common Stock owned by the Participant valued at their fair market value as determined by (or in a manner approved by) the Board ("Fair Market Value") provided (i) such method of payment is then permitted under applicable law, (ii) such Common Stock, if acquired directly from the Company, was owned by the Participant for such minimum period of time, if any, as may be established by the Board in its discretion and (iii) such Common Stock is not subject to any repurchase, forfeiture, unfulfilled vesting or other similar requirements;
 
(4) to the extent permitted by applicable law and provided for in the applicable option agreement or approved by the Board in its sole discretion, by (i) delivery of a promissory note of the Participant to the Company on terms determined by the Board, or (ii) payment of such other lawful consideration as the Board may determine;
(5) to the extent permitted by applicable law and provided for in the applicable option agreement or approved by the Board in its sole discretion, by retaining shares of Common Stock otherwise issuable pursuant to the Option;
(6) by any combination of the above permitted forms of payment.
(h) . No option granted under the Plan shall contain any provision entitling the grantee to the automatic grant of additional Options in connection with any exercise of the original Option.
No Reload Rights
 
(a) . The Board may grant Awards consisting of a Stock Appreciation Right, "SAR", entitling the holder, upon exercise, to receive an amount in Common Stock determined by reference to appreciation, from and after the date of grant, in the fair market value of a share of Common Stock. The date as of which such appreciation or other measure is determined shall be the exercise date.
General
(b) . Stock Appreciation Rights may be granted in tandem with, or independently of, Options granted under the Plan.
Grants
(1) . When Stock Appreciation Rights are expressly granted in tandem with Options, (i) the Stock Appreciation Right will be exercisable only at such time or times, and to the extent, that the related Option is exercisable (except to the extent designated by the Board in connection with an Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event) and will be exercisable in accordance with the procedure required for exercise of the related Option; (ii) the Stock Appreciation Right will terminate and no longer be exercisable upon the termination or exercise of the related Option, except to the extent designated by the Board in connection with an Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event and except that a Stock Appreciation Right granted with respect to less than the full number of shares covered by an Option will not be reduced until the number of shares as to which the related Option has been exercised or has terminated exceeds the number of shares not covered by the Stock Appreciation Right; (iii) the Option will terminate and no longer be exercisable upon the exercise of the related Stock Appreciation Right; and (iv) the Stock Appreciation Right will be transferable only with the related Option.
Tandem Awards
(2) . A Stock Appreciation Right not expressly granted in tandem with an Option will become exercisable at such time or times, and on such conditions, as the Board may specify in the SAR Award.
Independent SARs
(c) . The grant price or exercise price of a SAR shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value per share of Common Stock on the date of grant of the SAR.
Grant Price
(d) . The term of a SAR shall not be more than 7 years from the date of grant.
Term
(e) . Stock Appreciation Rights may be exercised by delivery to the Company of a written notice of exercise signed by the proper person or by any other form of notice (including electronic notice) approved by the Board, together with any other documents required by the Board.
Exercise
 
(a) . The Board may grant Awards entitling recipients to acquire shares of Common Stock ("Restricted Stock"), subject to the right of the Company to repurchase all or part of such shares at their issue price or other stated or formula price (or to require forfeiture of such shares if issued at no cost) from the recipient in the event that conditions specified by the Board in the applicable Award are not satisfied prior to the end of the applicable restriction period or periods established by the Board for such Award. Instead of granting Awards for Restricted Stock, the Board may grant Awards entitling the recipient to receive shares of Common Stock to be delivered at the time such shares of Common Stock vest ("Restricted Stock Units" or "Deferred Stock Units"). (Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Units and Deferred Stock Units are each referred to herein as a "Restricted Stock Award".)
General
(b) . The Board shall determine the terms and conditions of a Restricted Stock Award, including the conditions for vesting and repurchase (or forfeiture) and the issue price, if any.
Terms and Conditions for all Restricted Stock Awards
(c) .
Additional Provisions Relating to Restricted Stock
(1) . Participants holding shares of Restricted Stock will be entitled to all ordinary cash dividends paid with respect to such shares, unless otherwise provided by the Board. If any such dividends or distributions are paid in shares, or consist of a dividend or distribution to holders of Common Stock other than an ordinary cash dividend, the shares, cash or other property will be subject to the same restrictions on transferability and forfeitability as the shares of Restricted Stock with respect to which they were paid. Each dividend payment will be made no later than the end of the calendar year in which the dividends are paid to shareholders of that class of stock or, if later, the 15th day of the third month following the date the dividends are paid to shareholders of that class of stock.
Dividends
(2) . The Company may require that any stock certificates issued in respect of shares of Restricted Stock shall be deposited in escrow by the Participant, together with a stock power endorsed in blank, with the Company (or its designee). At the expiration of the applicable restriction periods, the Company (or such designee) shall deliver the certificates no longer subject to such restrictions to the Participant or if the Participant has died, to the beneficiary designated, in a manner determined by the Board, by a Participant to receive amounts due or exercise rights of the Participant in the event of the Participant's death (the "Designated Beneficiary"). In the absence of an effective designation by a Participant, "Designated Beneficiary" shall mean the Participant's estate.
Stock Certificates
(d) Additional Provisions Relating to Deferred Stock Units and Restricted Stock Units.
(1) . Upon the vesting of and/or lapsing of any other restrictions (i.e., settlement) with respect to each Restricted Stock Unit or Deferred Stock Unit, the Participant shall be entitled to receive from the Company one share of Common Stock or an amount of cash equal to the Fair Market Value of one share of Common Stock, as provided in the applicable Award agreement. The Board may, in its discretion, provide that settlement of Restricted Stock Units and Deferred Stock Units shall be deferred, on a mandatory basis or at the election of the Participant in a manner that complies with Code Section 409A.
Settlement
(2) . A Participant shall have no voting rights with respect to any Restricted Stock Units or Deferred Stock Units.
Voting Rights
(3) . To the extent provided by the Board, in its sole discretion, a grant of Restricted Stock Units or Deferred Stock Units may provide Participants with the right to receive an amount equal to any dividends or other distributions declared and paid on an equal number of
Dividend Equivalents
 
outstanding shares of Common Stock ("Dividend Equivalents"). Dividend Equivalents may be paid currently or credited to an account for the Participants, may be settled in cash and/or shares of Common Stock and may be subject to the same restrictions on transfer and forfeitability as the Restricted Stock Units or Deferred Stock Units with respect to which paid, as determined by the Board in its sole discretion, subject in each case to such terms and conditions as the Board shall establish, in each case to be set forth in the applicable Award agreement. To the extent Dividend Equivalents are paid, any payments will be made no later than the end of the calendar year in which the dividends are paid to shareholders of that class of stock or, if later, the 15th day of the third month following the date the dividends are paid to shareholders of that class of stock.
 
Other Awards of shares of Common Stock, and other Awards that are valued in whole or in part by reference to, or are otherwise based on, shares of Common Stock or other property, may be granted hereunder to Participants ("Other Stock Unit Awards"), including without limitation Awards entitling recipients to receive shares of Common Stock to be delivered in the future. Such Other Stock Unit Awards shall also be available as a form of payment in the settlement of other Awards granted under the Plan or as payment in lieu of compensation to which a Participant is otherwise entitled. Other Stock Unit Awards may be paid in shares of Common Stock or cash, as the Board shall determine. Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Board shall determine the terms and conditions of each Other Stock Unit Award, including any purchase price applicable thereto.
 
(a) . In the event of any stock split, reverse stock split, stock dividend, recapitalization, combination of shares, reclassification of shares, spin-off or other similar change in capitalization or event, or any dividend or distribution to holders of Common Stock other than an ordinary cash dividend, (i) the number and class of securities available under this Plan, (ii) the sub-limits set forth in Section 4(b), (iii) the number and class of securities and exercise price per share of each outstanding Option, (iv) the share- and per-share provisions and the exercise price of each Stock Appreciation Right, (v) the number of shares subject to and the repurchase price per share subject to each outstanding Restricted Stock Award and (vi) the share- and per-share-related provisions and the purchase price, if any, of each outstanding Other Stock Unit Award, shall be appropriately adjusted by the Company (or substituted Awards may be made, if applicable) to the extent determined by the Board. If this Section 9(a) applies and Section 9(c) also applies to any event, Section 9(c) shall be applicable to such event, and this section 9(a) shall not be applicable.
Changes in Capitalization
(b) . In the event of a proposed liquidation or dissolution of the Company, the Board shall upon written notice to the Participants provide that all then unexercised Options will (i) become exercisable in full as of a specified time at least 10 business days prior to the effective date of such liquidation or dissolution and (ii) terminate effective upon such liquidation or dissolution, except to the extent exercised before such effective date. The Board may specify the effect of a liquidation or dissolution on any Restricted Stock Award or other Award granted under the Plan at the time of the grant of such Award.
Liquidation or Dissolution
(c)
Acquisition and Change in Control Events
(1) Definitions
(a) An "Acquisition Event" shall mean:
 
 
(b) A "Change in Control Event" shall mean:
 
 
 
 
(2) Effect on Options
(a) . Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes a Change in Control Event), or the execution by the Company of any agreement with respect to an Acquisition Event (regardless of whether such event will result in a Change in Control Event), the Board shall provide that all outstanding Options shall be assumed, or equivalent options shall be substituted, by the acquiring or succeeding corporation (or an affiliate thereof); provided that if such Acquisition Event also constitutes a Change in Control Event, except to the extent specifically provided to the contrary in the instrument evidencing any Option or any other agreement between a Participant and the Company, such assumed or substituted options shall be immediately exercisable in full upon the occurrence of such Acquisition Event. For purposes hereof, an Option shall be considered to be assumed if, following consummation of the Acquisition Event, the Option confers the right to purchase, for each share of Common Stock subject to the Option immediately prior to the consummation of the Acquisition Event, the consideration (whether cash, securities or other property) received as a result of the Acquisition Event by holders of Common Stock for each share of Common Stock held immediately prior to the consummation of the Acquisition Event (and if holders were offered a choice of consideration, the type of consideration chosen by the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of Common Stock); provided, however, that if the consideration received as a result of the Acquisition Event is not solely common stock of the acquiring or succeeding corporation (or an affiliate thereof), the Company may, with the consent of the acquiring or succeeding corporation, provide for the consideration to be received upon the exercise of Options to consist solely of common stock of the acquiring or succeeding corporation (or an affiliate thereof) equivalent in fair market value to the per share consideration received by holders of outstanding shares of Common Stock as a result of the Acquisition Event.
Acquisition Event
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the acquiring or succeeding corporation (or an affiliate thereof) does not agree to assume, or substitute for, such Options, then the Board shall, upon written notice to the Participants, provide that all then unexercised Options will become exercisable in full as of a specified time prior to the Acquisition Event and will terminate immediately prior to the consummation of such Acquisition Event, except to the extent exercised by the Participants before the consummation of such Acquisition Event; provided, however, in the event of an Acquisition Event under the terms of which holders of Common Stock will receive upon consummation thereof a cash payment for each share of Common Stock surrendered pursuant to such Acquisition Event (the "Acquisition Price"), then the Board may instead provide that all outstanding Options shall terminate upon consummation of such Acquisition Event and that each Participant shall receive, in exchange therefor, a cash payment equal to the amount (if any) by which (A) the Acquisition Price multiplied by the number of shares of Common Stock subject to such outstanding Options (whether or not then exercisable), exceeds (B) the aggregate exercise price of such Options.
(b) . Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event that does not also constitute an Acquisition Event, except to the extent specifically provided to the contrary in the instrument evidencing any Option or any other agreement between a Participant and the Company, all Options then-outstanding shall automatically become immediately exercisable in full.
Change in Control Event that is not an Acquisition Event
 
(3) Effect on Restricted Stock Awards
(a) . Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event that is not a Change in Control Event, the repurchase and other rights of the Company under each outstanding Restricted Stock Award shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such Restricted Stock Award.
Acquisition Event that is not a Change in Control Event
(b) . Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), except to the extent specifically provided to the contrary in the instrument evidencing any Restricted Stock Award or any other agreement between a Participant and the Company, all restrictions and conditions on all Restricted Stock Awards then-outstanding shall automatically be deemed terminated or satisfied.
Change in Control Event
(4) Effect on Other Awards
(a) . The Board may specify at the time of grant the effect of an Acquisition Event that is not a Change in Control Event on any SAR and Other Stock Unit Award granted under the Plan at the time of the grant of such Award.
Acquisition Event that is not a Change in Control Event
(b) . Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), except to the extent specifically provided to the contrary in the instrument evidencing any SAR or Other Stock Unit Award or any other agreement between a Participant and the Company, all other Awards shall become exercisable, realizable or vested in full, or shall be free of all conditions or restrictions, as applicable to each such Award.
Change in Control Event
 
(a) . Awards shall not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged or otherwise encumbered by the person to whom they are granted, either voluntarily or by operation of law, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution or, other than in the case of an Incentive Stock Option, pursuant to a qualified domestic relations order, and, during the life of the Participant, shall be exercisable only by the Participant; provided, however, that the Board may permit or provide in an Award for the gratuitous transfer of the Award by the Participant to or for the benefit of any immediate family member, family trust or other entity established for the benefit of the Participant and/or an immediate family member thereof if, with respect to such proposed transferee, the Company would be eligible to use a Form S-8 for the registration of the sale of the Common Stock subject to such Award under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, provided that Incentive Stock Options may be transferable only to the extent permitted by the Code; provided, further, that the Company shall not be required to recognize any such transfer until such time as the Participant and such permitted transferee shall, as a condition to such transfer, deliver to the Company a written instrument in form and substance satisfactory to the Company confirming that such transferee shall be bound by all of the terms and conditions of the Award. References to a Participant, to the extent relevant in the context, shall include references to authorized transferees.
Transferability of Awards
(b) . Each Award shall be evidenced in such form (written, electronic or otherwise) as the Board shall determine. Each Award may contain terms and conditions in addition to (but, except as expressly contemplated by another provision herein, not inconsistent with) those set forth in the Plan.
Documentation
 
(c) . Except as otherwise provided by the Plan, each Award may be made alone or in addition or in relation to any other Award. The terms of each Award need not be identical, and the Board need not treat Participants uniformly.
Board Discretion
(d) . The Board shall determine the effect on an Award of the disability, death, termination of employment, authorized leave of absence or other change in the employment or other status of a Participant and the extent to which, and the period during which, the Participant, or the Participant's legal representative, conservator, guardian or Designated Beneficiary, may exercise rights under the Award.
Termination of Status
(e) . Each Participant shall pay to the Company, or make provision satisfactory to the Company for payment of, any taxes required by law to be withheld in connection with an Award to such Participant. Except as the Board may otherwise provide in an Award, for so long as the Common Stock is registered under the Exchange Act, Participants may satisfy such tax obligations in whole or in part by delivery of shares of Common Stock, including shares retained from the Award creating the tax obligation, valued at their Fair Market Value; provided, however, except as otherwise provided by the Board, that the total tax withholding where stock is being used to satisfy such tax obligations cannot exceed the Company's minimum statutory withholding obligations (based on minimum statutory withholding rates for federal and state tax purposes, including payroll taxes, that are applicable to such supplemental taxable income). Shares surrendered to satisfy tax withholding requirements cannot be subject to any repurchase, forfeiture, unfulfilled vesting or other similar requirements. The Company may, to the extent permitted by law, deduct any such tax obligations from any payment of any kind otherwise due to a Participant.
Withholding
(f) . Except as provided in Section 5(d), the Board may amend, modify or terminate any outstanding Award, including but not limited to, substituting therefor another Award of the same or a different type, changing the date of exercise or realization, and converting an Incentive Stock Option to a Nonstatutory Stock Option, provided either (i) that the Participant's consent to such action shall be required unless the Board determines that the action, taking into account any related action, would not materially and adversely affect the Participant or (ii) that the change is permitted under Section 9 hereof.
Amendment of Award
(g) . The Company will not be obligated to deliver any shares of Common Stock pursuant to the Plan or to remove restrictions from shares previously delivered under the Plan until (i) all conditions of the Award have been met or removed to the satisfaction of the Company, (ii) in the opinion of the Company's counsel, all other legal matters in connection with the issuance and delivery of such shares have been satisfied, including any applicable securities laws and any applicable stock exchange or stock market rules and regulations, and (iii) the Participant has executed and delivered to the Company such representations or agreements as the Company may consider appropriate to satisfy the requirements of any applicable laws, rules or regulations.
Conditions on Delivery of Stock
(h) . Except as set forth in Section 10(j), the Board may at any time provide that any Award shall become immediately exercisable in full or in part, free of some or all restrictions or conditions, or otherwise realizable in full or in part, as the case may be.
Acceleration
(i) .
Performance Awards
(1) . Restricted Stock Awards and Other Stock Unit Awards under the Plan may be made subject to the achievement of performance goals pursuant to this Section 10(i) ("Performance Awards"), subject to the limit in Section 4(b)(1) on shares covered by such grants.
Grants
 
(2) . Grants of Performance Awards to any Covered Employee intended to qualify as "performance-based compensation" under Section 162(m) ("Performance-Based Compensation") shall be made only by a Committee (or subcommittee of a Committee) comprised solely of two or more directors eligible to serve on a committee making Awards qualifying as "performance-based compensation" under Section 162(m). In the case of such Awards granted to Covered Employees, references to the Board or to a Committee shall be deemed to be references to such Committee or subcommittee. "Covered Employee" shall mean any person who is a "covered employee" under Section 162(m)(3) of the Code.
Committee
(3) . For any Award that is intended to qualify as Performance-Based Compensation, the Committee shall specify that the degree of granting, vesting and/or payout shall be subject to the achievement of one or more objective performance measures established by the Committee, which shall be based on the relative or absolute attainment of specified levels of one or any combination of the following: (a) net income, (b) earnings before or after discontinued operations, interest, taxes, depreciation and/or amortization, (c) operating profit before or after discontinued operations and/or taxes, (d) revenue, (e) sales growth, (f) earnings growth, (g) cash flow or cash position, (h) gross margins, (i) stock price, (j) market share, (k) return on sales, assets, equity or investment, (l) improvement of financial ratings, (m) achievement of balance sheet or income statement objectives, (n) total shareholder return, or (o) earnings per share and may be absolute in their terms or measured against or in relationship to other companies comparably, similarly or otherwise situated. Such performance measures may be adjusted to exclude any one or more of (I) extraordinary items, (II) gains or losses on the dispositions of discontinued operations, (III) the cumulative effects of changes in accounting principles, (IV) the writedown of any asset, (V) charges for restructuring and rationalization programs, (VI) other non-cash charges or items, and (VII) gains or losses relating to financing or investment activities. Such performance measures: (A) may vary by Participant and may be different for different Awards; (B) may be particular to a Participant or the department, branch, line of business, subsidiary or other unit in which the Participant works and may cover such period as may be specified by the Committee; and (C) shall be set by the Committee within the time period prescribed by, and shall otherwise comply with the requirements of, Section 162(m). Awards that are not intended to qualify as Performance-Based Compensation may be based on these or such other performance measures as the Board may determine.
Performance Measures
(4) . Notwithstanding any provision of the Plan, with respect to any Performance Award that is intended to qualify as Performance-Based Compensation, the Committee may adjust downwards, but not upwards, the cash or number of Shares payable pursuant to such Award, and the Committee may not waive the achievement of the applicable performance measures except in the case of the death or disability of the Participant.
Adjustments
(5) . The Committee shall have the power to impose such other restrictions on Performance Awards as it may deem necessary or appropriate to ensure that such Awards satisfy all requirements for Performance-Based Compensation. Prior to the payment of any Award subject to this Section 10(i) the underlying metrics for which have not been included in a public filing or press release issued by the Company, the Committee shall certify in writing (which may be satisfied by the inclusion of such a determination in the minutes of a meeting of such Committee) that the performance goals and other material terms applicable to such Award were satisfied.
Other
(j) . Each Restricted Stock Award and Other Stock Unit Award (other than those Restricted Stock Awards and Other Stock Unit Awards which may only be settled in cash) granted under the Plan (each, a "Full Value Award") shall vest in accordance with a schedule that does not permit such Full Value Award to vest in full prior to the third anniversary of the date of grant of the Award. This minimum vesting requirement shall not, however, preclude the Board from exercising its discretion to (i) accelerate the vesting of any Full Value Award
Minimum Vesting Requirements for Full Value Awards
 
upon retirement, termination of employment by the Company, death or disability, (ii) accelerate the vesting of any Full Value Award in accordance with Section 9(c), (iii) establish a shorter vesting schedule for any Full Value Award granted to an advisor, consultant, director, or newly-hired employee, (iv) establish a shorter vesting schedule for any Full Value Award that is granted in exchange for or in lieu of the right to receive the payment of an equivalent amount of salary, bonus, directors' fees, or other cash compensation, (v) establish a shorter performance-based vesting schedule in accordance with Section 10(i) or otherwise (but in each case of not less than one year), or (vi) vest up to 1,000 shares per year for each Participant; provided, however, that the aggregate number of Full Value Awards that may be granted under clauses (iii) and (vi) above shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the number of shares available for issuance under the Plan.
(k) .To the extent required to comply with Treasury Regulation Section 1.401(k)-1(d)(2)(iv)(B)(4), or any amendment or successor thereto, a Participant's "elective and employee contributions" (within the meaning of such Treasury Regulation) under the Plan shall be suspended for a period of twelve months following such Participant's receipt of a hardship distribution made in reliance on such Treasury Regulation from any plan containing a cash or deferred arrangement under Section 401(k) of the Code maintained by the Company or a related party within the provisions of Section 414 of the Code.
Limitation Following a Hardship Distribution
 
 
(a) . No person shall have any claim or right to be granted an Award, and the grant of an Award shall not be construed as giving a Participant the right to continued employment or any other relationship with the Company. The Company expressly reserves the right at any time to dismiss or otherwise terminate its relationship with a Participant free from any liability or claim under the Plan, except as expressly provided in the applicable Award.
No Right To Employment or Other Status
(b) . Subject to the provisions of the applicable Award, no Participant or Designated Beneficiary shall have any rights as a stockholder with respect to any shares of Common Stock to be distributed with respect to an Award until becoming the record holder of such shares. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the Company effects a split of the Common Stock by means of a stock dividend and the exercise price of and the number of shares subject to such Option are adjusted as of the date of the distribution of the dividend (rather than as of the record date for such dividend), then an optionee who exercises an Option between the record date and the distribution date for such stock dividend shall be entitled to receive, on the distribution date, the stock dividend with respect to the shares of Common Stock acquired upon such Option exercise, notwithstanding the fact that such shares were not outstanding as of the close of business on the record date for such stock dividend.
No Rights As Stockholder
(c) . The Plan shall become effective on the date the Plan is approved by the Company's stockholders (the "Effective Date"). No Awards shall be granted under the Plan after the completion of 10 years from the Effective Date, but Awards previously granted may extend beyond that date.
Effective Date and Term of Plan
(d) . The Board may amend, suspend or terminate the Plan or any portion thereof at any time provided that (i) to the extent required by Section 162(m), no Award granted to a Participant that is intended to comply with Section 162(m) after the date of such amendment shall become exercisable, realizable or vested, as applicable to such Award, unless and until such amendment shall have been approved by the Company's stockholders if required by Section 162(m) (including the vote required under Section 162(m)); (ii) no amendment that would require stockholder approval under the rules of the NASDAQ Stock Market ("NASDAQ") may be made effective unless and until such amendment shall have been approved by the Company's stockholders; and (iii) if the NASDAQ amends its corporate governance rules so that such rules no longer require stockholder approval of material
Amendment of Plan
 
amendments to equity compensation plans, then, from and after the effective date of such amendment to the NASDAQ rules, no amendment to the Plan (A) materially increasing the number of shares authorized under the Plan (other than pursuant to Section 9), (B) expanding the types of Awards that may be granted under the Plan, (C) materially expanding the class of participants eligible to participate in the Plan, or (D) materially increasing benefits generally available to Participants shall be effective unless stockholder approval is obtained. In addition, if at any time the approval of the Company's stockholders is required as to any other modification or amendment under Section 422 of the Code or any successor provision with respect to Incentive Stock Options, the Board may not effect such modification or amendment without such approval.
(e) . The Board may modify Awards or Options granted to Participants who are foreign nationals or employed outside the United States or establish subplans or procedures under the Plan to recognize differences in laws, rules, regulations or customs of such foreign jurisdictions with respect to tax, securities, currency, employee benefit or other matters.
Provisions for Foreign Participants
(f) . Except as provided in individual Award agreements initially or by amendment, if and to the extent any portion of any payment, compensation or other benefit provided to a Participant in connection with his or her employment termination is determined to constitute "nonqualified deferred compensation" within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code and the Participant is a specified employee as defined in Section 409A(a)(2)(B)(i) of the Code, as determined by the Company in accordance with its procedures, by which determination the Participant (through accepting the Award) agrees that he or she is bound, such portion of the payment, compensation or other benefit shall not be paid before the day that is six months plus one day after the date of "separation from service" (as determined under Code Section 409A) (the "New Payment Date"), except as Code Section 409A may then permit. The aggregate of any payments that otherwise would have been paid to the Participant during the period between the date of separation from service and the New Payment Date shall be paid to the Participant in a lump sum on such New Payment Date, and any remaining payments will be paid on their original schedule. The Company shall have no liability to a Participant, or any other Party if an Award that is intended to be exempt from, or compliant with, Section 409A is not so exempt or compliant or for any action taken by the Board.
Compliance With Code Section 409A
(g) . Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Plan, no individual acting as a director, officer, other employee, or agent of the Company will be liable to any Participant, former Participant, spouse, beneficiary, or any other person for any claim, loss, liability, or expense incurred in connection with the Plan, nor will such individual be personally liable with respect to the Plan because of any contract or other instrument he or she executes in his or her capacity as a director, officer, other employee, or agent of the Company. The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each director, officer, other employee, or agent of the Company to whom any duty or power relating to the administration or interpretation of the Plan has been or will be delegated, against any cost or expense (including attorneys' fees) or liability (including any sum paid in settlement of a claim with the Board's approval) arising out of any act or omission to act concerning this Plan unless arising out of such person's own fraud or bad faith.
Limitations on Liability
(h) . The Board may from time to time establish one or more sub-plans under the Plan for purposes of satisfying applicable securities or tax laws of various jurisdictions. The Board shall establish such sub-plans by adopting supplements to the Plan containing (i) such limitations on the Board's discretion under the Plan as the Board deems necessary or desirable or (ii) such additional terms and conditions not otherwise inconsistent with the Plan as the Board shall deem necessary or desirable. All supplements adopted by the Board shall be deemed to be part of the Plan, but each supplement shall apply only to Participants within the affected jurisdiction and the Company shall not be required to provide copies of any supplement to Participants in any jurisdiction which is not the subject of such supplement.
Authorization of Sub-Plans
 
(i) . The provisions of the Plan and all Awards made hereunder shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such state that would require the application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such state.
Governing Law
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20110727160639.txt.gz
TIME:20110727160639
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 27, 2011, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") announced its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2011. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Contacts:
 
 
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading provider of cloud optimization services, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2011. Revenue for second quarter 2011 was $277.0 million, a 13 percent increase over second quarter 2010 revenue of $245.3 million, and slightly above first quarter 2011 revenue of $276.0 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.  July 27, 2011 
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the second quarter of 2011 was $47.9 million, or $0.25 per diluted share, a 26 percent increase from second quarter 2010 GAAP net income of $38.1 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, and a 5 percent decrease from first quarter 2011 GAAP net income of $50.6 million, or $0.26 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $65.8 million, or $0.35 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2011, a 1 percent improvement over second quarter 2010 normalized net income of $65.0 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, and down 9 percent from first quarter 2011 normalized net income of $72.2 million, or $0.38 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Included in these results for the second quarter of 2011 is a tax charge of $28.3 million, based on a full-year GAAP tax rate of 35 percent. This tax rate is higher than the previous forecast of 32 to 33 percent, due to increased costs attributable to investment in the Company's network outside of North America. The impact of the higher tax rate on net income in the second quarter of 2011 was approximately $5.0 million, or $0.03 per diluted share.
"Trends in cloud computing, Internet security, mobile connectivity, and the proliferation of online video have continued to drive our customers' online initiatives and our business success," said Paul Sagan, CEO of Akamai. "With the scale, data and software underlying the Akamai intelligent platform, combined with our deep industry expertise, we believe Akamai is uniquely capable of enabling our customers' online businesses to grow revenues and reduce costs. We continue to position Akamai to lead the next evolution of cloud computing by investing in the business to build new and innovative solutions that leverage the Company's core competencies."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the second quarter of 2011 was $126.2 million, up 13 percent from $112.1 million in the second quarter of 2010 and down about 2 percent from $129.2 million in the prior quarter. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the second quarter of 2011 was 46 percent, consistent with the same period last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $111.8 million in the second quarter of 2011 or 40 percent of revenue. At the end of the second quarter of 2011, the Company had approximately $1.3 billion in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 19 percent and 30 percent, respectively, of revenue for the second quarter 2011.
During the second quarter of 2011, under a share repurchase program that was approved by the Board of Directors in April 2009 and extended in April 2011, the Company repurchased approximately 1.5 million shares of common stock for $50.5 million at an average price of $32.90 per share. As of June 30, 2011, the Company had repurchased 8.3 million shares of common stock for $251.5 million at an average price of $30.15 per share.
As of June 30, 2011, the Company had approximately 186.0 million shares of common stock outstanding.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-800-8652 (or 1-617-614-2705 for international calls) and using passcode No. 92064685. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 65335286.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai provides market-leading, cloud-based services for optimizing Web and mobile content and applications, online HD video, and secure e-commerce. Combining highly-distributed, energy-efficient computing with intelligent software, Akamai's global platform is transforming the cloud into a more viable place to inform, entertain, advertise, transact and collaborate. To learn how the world's leading enterprises are optimizing their business in the cloud, please visit and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory changes discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on the historical cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized net income per share" as normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of a non-cash item.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the anticipated growth and development of our business and the markets in which we operate. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all, inability to increase our revenue and keep our expenses consistent with revenues, inability to continue to generate positive cash flow, changes in estimates we make about tax liabilities and other contingencies, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20111026160536.txt.gz
TIME:20111026160536
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 26, 2011, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") announced its financial results for its fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2011. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information provided under Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(b) On October 24, 2011, David W. Kenny notified the Company of his resignation as President and a Director of the Company effective as of such date. On October 24, 2011, the Board of Directors of the Company voted to reduce the size of the Board of Directors to 11 members to fill the vacancy created by the resignation of Mr. Kenny.
(c) The Board of Directors also voted to elect Paul Sagan, currently Chief Executive Officer of Akamai, as President effective on October 24, 2011. Mr. Sagan will retain the titles of CEO and Director.
(e)
 
In connection with his resignation, Mr. Kenny and Akamai entered into a Separation Agreement setting forth certain matters related to his departure. During the period between October 24, 2011 and December 31, 2011, Mr. Kenny will serve as an advisor to Mr. Sagan. During such period, Mr. Kenny shall be paid at the same rate as his salary in effect prior to his resignation and continue to vest in outstanding equity awards held by him. He shall also be eligible to receive payment of a cash bonus for 2011 based on the percentage payout against corporate performance targets expected to be paid to the other executives of the Company under Akamai's 2011 executive cash bonus program. A copy of the Separation Agreement is filed as Exhibit 10.1 hereto.
 
On October 24, 2011, the Compensation Committee of the Board approved a new form agreement for restricted stock unit awards to be granted under the 2009 Plan; the grant agreement provides for time-based vesting with acceleration of vesting upon the earliest to occur of (i) a change of control of the Company, (ii) death or disability of the grantee, or (iii) the Company's termination of the grantee's employment without cause (the "New RSU Agreement Form"). The form is filed as Exhibit 10.2 hereto.
 
On October 24, 2011, the Compensation Committee (the "Compensation Committee") of the Board of Directors of the Company approved the issuance of restricted stock units ("RSU") to the
 
following executive officers having the initial dollar value indicated: Paul Sagan, Chief Executive Officer ($7,000,000); Melanie Haratunian, Senior Vice President and General Counsel ($750,000); Robert Hughes, Executive Vice President  Global Sales, Services & Marketing ($3,000,000); and J. Donald Sherman, Chief Financial Officer ($2,500,000) (collectively, the "Executives"). The actual number of RSUs to be issued will be determined by dividing the initial dollar value by the closing sale price of one share of the Company's common stock on October 28, 2011, the second day following release of its third quarter 2011 earnings results (the "Grant Date"). Each RSU will be issued on the Grant Date and represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting and vests 50% on the first anniversary of the Grant Date and 50% on the second anniversary of the Grant Date. The terms of the New RSU Agreement Form shall apply to such grants, and the description set forth above is qualified in its entirety by the text of such agreement.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
This Separation and Release Agreement (the "Agreement") is made by and between Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company"), and David Kenny (the "Executive") (collectively, the "Parties").
In consideration of the promises and conditions set forth herein, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, and provided this Agreement is signed no later than October 24, 2011, the Parties agree as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Parties have freely and voluntarily entered into this Agreement effective as of the date set forth below.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
To be signed and returned on, but not before, the Separation Date.
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on                              (the "Grant Date") to                              (the "Participant") of                              restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and the 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
 
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and provided that the Participant continues to provide services until the Vesting Date (as defined below), this award shall vest over a             -year period as follows:                                                                                                                                                                    . Each date on which RSUs vest may be referred to herein as the "Vesting Date."
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company.
(c) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated (i) by reason of death or disability, (ii) by the Company for a reason other than "Cause" (as defined below), then 100% of all unvested RSUs shall vest in full as of the date of actual termination. For purposes of this Section 2, "Cause" shall mean unsatisfactory job performance (as determined by the Company), willful misconduct, fraud, gross negligence, disobedience or dishonesty.
(d) In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company is terminated by the Company for Cause or the Participant resigns, all unvested RSUs shall be forfeited effective as of the date of termination.
(e) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
 
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs after a vesting date but before distribution of the corresponding Shares), the Shares of Common Stock represented by RSUs that vested on such vesting date as soon as administratively practicable after each vesting date (each such date of distribution is hereinafter referred to as a "Settlement Date") but in any event within the period ending on the later to occur of the date that is 75 days from the end of (i) Participant's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date or (ii) the Company's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
 
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
 
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
 
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), each RSU shall become exercisable, realizable or vested in full.
 
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and
 
payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability or require Participant to enter into a sale-to-cover agreement effected through a brokerage firm selected by the Company.
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
 
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power,
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
 
among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2011. Revenue for third quarter 2011 was $281.9 million, an 11 percent increase over third quarter 2010 revenue of $253.6 million, and a 2 percent increase over second quarter 2011 revenue of $277.0 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.  October 26, 2011 
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the third quarter of 2011 was $42.3 million, or $0.23 per diluted share, a 6 percent increase from third quarter 2010 GAAP net income of $39.7 million, or $0.21 per diluted share, and a 12 percent decrease from second quarter 2011 GAAP net income of $47.9 million, or $0.25 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $63.4 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2011, down 1 percent from third quarter 2010 normalized net income of $64.2 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, and down 4 percent from second quarter 2011 normalized net income of $65.8 million, or $0.35 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We are pleased with Akamai's performance in the third quarter, as more customers adopted the Akamai Platform for their online businesses," said Paul Sagan, president and CEO of Akamai. "We have continued to develop the platform of choice for businesses seeking to capitalize on opportunities in mobile, cloud, security, and video, as well as manage the risks of the hyperconnected world."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the third quarter of 2011 was $122.4 million, up 7 percent from $114.1 million in the third quarter of 2010 and down 3 percent from $126.2 million in the prior quarter. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the third quarter of 2011 was 43 percent, down 2 points from the same period last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $116.3 million in the third quarter of 2011, or 41 percent of revenue. At the end of the third quarter of 2011, the Company had approximately $1.2 billion in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 19 percent and 29 percent, respectively, of revenue for the third quarter 2011.
Akamai also announced today that David Kenny resigned as president and director of the Company.
"As a director, David was a strong advocate for innovation, mobile capabilities and global expansion. As president, he helped to re-align the organization to deliver faster on those critical strategies," Mr. Sagan said. "Thanks in part to David's leadership, we have established a strong path for growth that we intend to follow for many years to come."
Mr. Kenny said, "It has been a privilege to serve Akamai as a director and to be a part of the management team to help Paul strengthen the Company's foundation for future growth. While I now want to return to my first passion of pursuing emerging opportunities on the consumer Internet, I will miss the great people at Akamai and their relentless pursuit of excellence in everything they do. I believe Akamai is well-positioned to capture the opportunities ahead in the enterprise marketplace."
Mr. Kenny, who will serve as a consultant to the Company on business strategy, joined Akamai as president in September 2010 after previously serving as a member of the Company's Board of Directors for three years.
Akamai also announced today that the Board re-appointed Mr. Sagan as president, a title that he will hold in addition to CEO and director.
Share Repurchase Program
During the third quarter of 2011, under a share repurchase program that was approved by the Board of Directors in April 2011 and expanded in August 2011, the Company repurchased approximately 6.8 million shares of its common stock for $155.1 million, an average price of $22.75 per share. As of September 30, 2011, the Company had repurchased 15.2 million shares of its common stock for $406 million, at an average price of $26.82 per share, since the commencement of the current repurchase program.
As of September 30, 2011, the Company had approximately 179.5 million shares of common stock outstanding.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-800-573-4754 (or 1-617-224-4325 for international calls) and using passcode No. 35896882. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 90643566.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere. At the core of the Company's solutions is the Akamai Intelligent Platform providing extensive reach, coupled with unmatched reliability, security, visibility and expertise. Akamai removes the complexities of connecting the increasingly mobile world, supporting 24/7 consumer demand, and enabling enterprises to securely leverage the cloud. To learn more about how Akamai is accelerating the pace of innovation in a hyperconnected world, please visit and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
Financial Statements
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory pronouncements discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release and our earnings call helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or that do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on the historical cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments and loss on early extinguishment of debt. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized net income per share" as normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of non-cash items.
Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the anticipated growth and development of our business and the markets in which we operate. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all, inability to increase our revenue at the same rate as in the past and keep our expenses from increasing at a greater rate than our revenues, changes in estimates we make about tax liabilities and other contingencies, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20120118172234.txt.gz
TIME:20120118172234
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
On January 18, 2012, the Compensation Committee of the Board approved four new form agreements for equity grant awards under the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan. The forms are filed as Exhibits 10.1 through 10.4 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
See Exhibit Index attached hereto which is incorporated herein by reference.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on                     ,          (the "Grant Date") to you (the "Participant") of              restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (the "Agreement") and the 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
 
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and provided that the Participant continues to provide services until the Vesting Date (as defined below):
(a) This award shall vest as                                         ; provided, however, that if any of the foregoing dates is not a business day, then vesting shall occur on the next succeeding business day. The date on which RSUs vest may be referred to herein as the "Vesting Date."
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2, RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company.
(c) Except as reflected in Section 6 below, in the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases or is terminated for any reason other than "Cause" (as defined below), other than by reason of death or disability, then the number of RSUs which shall be vested shall be the number that are vested as of the date of actual termination. For purposes of this Section 2, "Cause" shall mean unsatisfactory job performance (as determined by the Company), willful misconduct, fraud, gross negligence, disobedience or dishonesty. In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company is terminated for Cause, all unvested RSUs shall be forfeited effective as of the date of termination. In the event that the Participant's employment with the Company ceases due to death or disability (as defined under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code")), then all unvested RSUs shall vest as of the date of death or disability.
(d) For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
 
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant (or to the Participant's estate in the event that his or her death occurs after a Vesting Date but before distribution of the corresponding Shares), the Shares of Common Stock represented by RSUs that vested on such vesting date as soon as
administratively practicable after each vesting date (each such date of distribution is hereinafter referred to as a "Settlement Date") but in any event within the period ending on the later to occur of the date that is two and one-half months from the end of (i) Participant's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date or (ii) the Company's tax year that includes the applicable Vesting Date.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under the Code.
 
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
 
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
 
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan) that is not a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), each RSU shall become exercisable, realizable or vested as to number of RSUs as would be vested pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date; provided, however, in the event that upon the occurrence of Change in Control Event, the RSUs represented by this Agreement are not exchanged for a Replacement Award (as defined below), then each RSU shall immediately become fully vested as of immediately prior to the closing of the Change in Control Event.
(d) For purposes of this Agreement, an award issuing by the acquiring company in a Change in Control Event shall qualify as a "Replacement Award" if (i) it has a value at least equal to the value of the RSUs represented by this Agreement (the "Replaced Award") as determined by the Committee in its sole discretion; (ii) it relates to publicly traded equity securities of the Company or its successor in the Change in Control Event or another entity that is affiliated with the Company or its successor following the Change in Control Event; and (iii) its other terms and conditions are not less
 
favorable to the Participant than the terms and conditions of the Replaced Award. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Replacement Award may take the form of a continuation of the Replaced Award if the requirements of the preceding sentence are satisfied. The determination of whether the conditions of this clause (d) are satisfied shall be made by the Committee, as constituted immediately before the Change in Control Event, in its sole discretion.
(e) In the event that Participant's employment with the Corporation is terminated for a reason other than Cause (as defined above) within twelve months after a Change in Control Event, all then-unvested RSUs shall vest as of the date of termination of employment.
 
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the
 
extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
 
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
Notice
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
 
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this Agreement prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed), the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on                     , 2012 (the "Grant Date") to you (the "Participant") of restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (the "Agreement") and the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The minimum number of shares issuable is zero; the maximum number of shares issuable is             (the maximum number of RSUs issuable hereunder, the "Maximum RSU Amount"). The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
 
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement including, without limitation, Paragraph 2(b) below, the number of Shares issuable pursuant to the calculation set forth in to this Agreement shall vest as follows: 50% on the second anniversary of the Grant Date and 50% on the third anniversary of the Grant Date. Such date or any other date on which shares vest under this Agreement may be referred to herein as a "Vesting Date."
Schedule 1
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2 or , RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company. For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
Schedule 1
 
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant the Shares of Common Stock represented by vested RSUs as follows: within 30 days of the Vesting Date.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code").
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
 
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
 
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), vesting of each RSU shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of to this Agreement.
Schedule 1
 
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
 
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
 
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post
Notice
 
Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties and supersede all prior agreements and understandings relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this Agreement prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed) or as soon as practicable thereafter, the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
 
 
The RSUs shall vest only upon the Company's achievement of certain financial performance and qualitative metrics for the applicable year established by the Chief Executive Officer (or, if the Participant is the Chief Executive Officer, by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors) ("Mission Critical Goals").
With respect to the financial performance, achievement shall be calculated based on actual corporate performance against a target of $            in respect of Normalized EPS (as defined below) for fiscal year 2012 (the "Target Metric") as reported in its Public Company Financial Statements for such year. The maximum amount issuable upon achievement against the Target Metric shall be 50% of the Maximum RSU Amount and is referred to herein as the "Financial Performance Component." If, on December 31, 2012, the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-K shall constitute its "Public Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. If, on December 31, 2012, the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, the Company's regularly prepared annual audited financial statements prepared by management shall be its "Private Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. The applicable financial statements may be referred to herein as the "2012 Financial Statements."
"Normalized EPS" shall mean the Company's annual earnings per diluted share for the applicable fiscal year excluding cumulative amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, stock-based compensation expense reflected as a component of amortization of capitalized software, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, utilization of NOL carryforwards and credits, loss on early extinguishment of debt and similar items excluded by Akamai in determining normalized earnings per share in issuing its earnings announcements for such fiscal year.
With respect to Mission Critical Goals, achievement shall be calculated based on a determination by the Chief Executive Officer (or, if the Participant is the Chief Executive Officer, by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors) as to whether the Participant has (i) partially achieved the Mission Critical Goals; (ii) achieved the Mission Critical Goals at the target level, or (iii) achieved the Mission Critical Goals at an outstanding level. The maximum amount issuable upon achievement against the Mission Critical Goals shall be 50% of the Maximum RSU Amount and is referred to herein as the "Mission Critical Goals Component."
 
1. Calculating Payout Against the Financial Performance Component
(a) If the actual performance against the Target Metric fails to exceed [        ]%, then no Shares shall be issuable in respect of the Financial Performance Component.
(b) If the actual performance against the Target Metric is 100%, then 50% of the Financial Performance Component shall become issuable (the "Target-Level Financial Performance Payout Amount").
 
(c) If the actual performance against the Target Metric is [        ]%, then 100% of the Financial Performance Component shall become issuable.
(d) If the actual performance is between [        ]% of the Target Metric and 100% of the Target Metric, then the number of Shares issuable shall equal the product of (i) the Target-Level Financial Performance Payout Amount multiplied by (ii) a fraction the numerator of which is 100% minus the actual percentage performance against the Target Metric and the denominator is [        ]%, subject to the vesting schedule set forth in Paragraph 2(a) of the Agreement.
(e) If the actual performance is between 100% of the Target Metric and [        ]% of the Target Metric, then the number of Shares issuable shall equal the Target-Level Financial Performance Payout plus the product of (i) the Financial Performance Component minus the Target-Level Financial Performance Payout multiplied by (ii) a fraction the numerator of which is the actual percentage performance against the Target Metric minus 100% and the denominator is [        ]%, subject to the vesting schedule set forth in Paragraph 2(a) of the Agreement.
2. Calculating Payout Against the Mission Critical Goals Component
If is determined that there was partial achievement of Mission Critical Goals during the applicable year, then Shares representing 25% of the Mission Critical Goals Component shall become issuable. If it is determined that that there was target level achievement of Mission Critical Goals during the applicable year, then Shares representing 50% of the Mission Critical Goals Component shall become issuable. If it is determined that there was outstanding achievement of Mission Critical Goals during the applicable year, then Shares representing 100% of the Mission Critical Goals Component shall become issuable. If the Participant failed to meet the partial achievement level, then no Shares shall be issuable in respect of the Mission Critical Goals Components.
3. The sum of the amounts calculated pursuant to paragraphs 1 and 2 above shall be the total amount of Shares issuable under this Agreement, subject to the vesting provisions set forth herein.
 
In the event that the Company enters into an Acquisition Transaction during the applicable year, then Normalized EPS shall be adjusted to give effect to such Acquisition Transaction. An "Acquisition Transaction" means (i) the purchase by the Company of more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange which results in the Company acquiring more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, or (iii) the purchase or other acquisition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the ordinary course of business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 50% of another entity's total assets or assets that account for more than 50% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of such entity.
As soon as practicable following the closing of an Acquisition Transaction, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company shall make a determination of the estimated impact of the Acquisition Transaction on the Company's 2012 Normalized EPS through the applicable year. If the Acquisition Transaction is estimated to be accretive, then in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2012 Financial Statements, shall be reduced by the amount of the estimated Normalized EPS contribution from the Acquisition Transaction. If the Acquisition is estimated to be non-accretive, then in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2012 Financial Statements, shall be increased by the amount of the estimated negative Normalized EPS impact from the Acquisition Transaction. All determinations of the
 
Compensation Committee regarding the estimated impact of an Acquisition Transaction shall be final, binding and non-appealable. This Agreement shall be deemed to be automatically amended, without further action by the Company or the Participant, to give effect to any adjustments required by this Section C.
 
(1) If there is a Change of Control Event on or prior to December 31, 2012, then 50% of the Maximum RSU Amount shall vest as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event.
(2) If there is a Change of Control Event after December 31, 2012, then the number of vested Shares calculated pursuant to this Schedule 1 shall vest as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event (to the extent not previously vested under the Section 2(a) of the Agreement).
 
(1) If the Participant dies or is disabled (within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Code) prior to December 31, 2012, then 50% of the Maximum RSU Amount shall vest as of the date of death.
(2) If the Participant dies or is disabled (within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Code) after December 31, 2012, then the number of vested Shares calculated pursuant to this Schedule 1 shall vest as of the date of death or disability (to the extent not previously vested under the Section 2(a) of the Agreement).
 

Exhibit 10.3
 
This Agreement evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company") on                     , 2012 (the "Grant Date") to you (the "Participant") of restricted stock units of the Company (individually, an "RSU" and collectively, the "RSUs"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (the "Agreement") and the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") as provided in this Agreement. The minimum number of shares issuable is zero; the maximum number of shares issuable is equal to 25% of the number of shares issued on the Grant Date under the terms of the other Restricted Stock Unit Agreement that subsequently vest (the maximum number of RSUs issuable hereunder, the "Maximum RSU Amount"). The shares of Common Stock that are issuable upon vesting of the RSUs are referred to in this Agreement as "Shares." Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified in the Plan.
 
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement including, without limitation, Paragraph 2(b) below, the number of Shares issuable pursuant to the calculation set forth in to this Agreement shall vest as follows: 50% on the second anniversary of the Grant Date and 50% on the third anniversary of the Grant Date. Such date or any other date on which shares vest under this Agreement may be referred to herein as a "Vesting Date."
Schedule 1
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section 2 or , RSUs shall not continue to vest unless the Participant is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee, officer or director of, or consultant or advisor to, the Company. For purposes of this Agreement, employment with the Company shall include employment with a parent, subsidiary, affiliate or division of the Company.
Schedule 1
 
(a) The Company will distribute to the Participant the Shares of Common Stock represented by vested RSUs as follows: within 30 days of the Vesting Date.
(b) The Company shall not be obligated to issue to the Participant the Shares upon the vesting of any RSU (or otherwise) unless the issuance and delivery of such Shares shall comply with all relevant provisions of law and other legal requirements including, without limitation, any applicable federal or state securities laws and the requirements of any stock exchange upon which shares of Common Stock may then be listed.
(c) Neither the Company nor the Participant shall have the right to accelerate or defer the deliver of any shares under this Agreement except to the extent specifically permitted under Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code").
The Participant shall not sell, assign, transfer, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of, by operation of law or otherwise (collectively "transfer") any RSUs, or any interest therein, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution.
 
Except as set forth in the Plan, neither the Participant nor any person claiming under or through the Participant shall be, or have any rights or privileges of, a stockholder of the Company in respect of the Shares issuable pursuant to the RSUs granted hereunder until the Shares have been delivered to the Participant.
 
(a) This Agreement is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is made available to the Participant with this Agreement.
(b) Upon the occurrence of an Acquisition Event (as defined in the Plan), each RSU (whether vested or unvested) shall inure to the benefit of the Company's successor and shall apply to the cash, securities or other property which the Common Stock was converted into or exchanged for pursuant to such Acquisition Event in the same manner and to the same extent as they applied to the Common Stock subject to such RSU.
(c) Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control Event (regardless of whether such event also constitutes an Acquisition Event), vesting of each RSU shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of to this Agreement.
Schedule 1
 
(a) Regardless of any action the Company or the Participant's employer ("Employer") takes with respect to any or all income tax, social insurance, payroll tax, payment on account or other tax-related withholding ("Tax-Related Items"), the Participant acknowledges that the ultimate liability for all Tax-Related Items legally due by him or her is and remains the Participant's responsibility and that the Company and/or the Employer (1) make no representations or undertakings regarding the treatment of any Tax-Related Items in connection with any aspect of the Restricted Stock Unit award, including the grant and vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents; and (2) do not commit to structure the terms of the award or any aspect of the Restricted Stock Units to reduce or eliminate the Participant's liability for Tax-Related Items.
(b) In the event that the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division is required to withhold any Tax-Related Items as a result of the award or vesting of the Restricted Stock Units, or the receipt of cash or any dividends or dividend equivalents, the Participant shall pay or make adequate arrangements satisfactory to the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division to satisfy all withholding and payment on account obligations of the Company, subsidiary, affiliate or division. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement, including the delivery of shares upon vesting, shall be conditioned on compliance by the Participant with this Section 7. In this regard, the Participant authorizes the Company and/or the Employer to withhold all applicable Tax-Related Items legally payable by the Participant from his or her wages or other cash compensation paid to the Participant by the Company and/or the Employer. Alternatively, or in addition, if permissible under local law, the Company may withhold in shares of Common Stock an amount of shares sufficient to cover the Participant's tax liability.
 
(c) The Participant will pay to the Company or the Employer any amount of Tax-Related Items that the Company or the Employer may be required to withhold as a result of the Participant's participation in the Plan or the Participant's award that cannot be satisfied by the means previously described.
(d) As a condition to receiving any Shares, on the date of this Agreement, Participant must execute the Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares attached hereto, which authorizes the Company and Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. (or such substitute brokerage firm as is contracted to manage the Company's employee equity award program, the "Broker") to take the actions described in Section 7(b) and this Section 7(d) (the "Standing Order").
(e) Participant understands and agrees that the number of Shares that the Broker will sell will be based on the closing price of the Common Stock on the last trading day before the applicable Vesting Date. The Participant agrees to execute and deliver such documents, instruments and certificates as may reasonably be required in connection with the sale of the Shares pursuant to this Section 7.
(f) Participant agrees that the proceeds received from the sale of Shares pursuant to Section 7(d) will be used to satisfy the Tax-Related Items and, accordingly, Participant hereby authorizes the Broker to pay such proceeds to the Company for such purpose. Participant understands that to the extent that the proceeds obtained by such sale exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the Tax-Related Items, such excess proceeds shall be deposited into the Participants account with Broker. Participant further understands that any remaining Shares shall be deposited into such account.
(g) The Participant represents to the Company that, as of the date hereof, he is not aware of any material nonpublic information about the Company or the Common Stock. The Participant and the Company have structured this Agreement to constitute a "binding contract" relating to the sale of Common Stock pursuant to this Section 7, consistent with the affirmative defense to liability under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 under Rule 10b5-1(c) promulgated under such Act.
 
(a) . The Participant acknowledges and agrees that the vesting of the RSUs pursuant to Section 2 hereof is earned only by continuing service as an employee at the will of the Company (not through the act of being hired or purchasing shares hereunder). The Participant further acknowledges and agrees that the transactions contemplated hereunder and the vesting schedule set forth herein do not constitute an express or implied promise of continued engagement as an employee or consultant for the vesting period, for any period, or at all.
No Rights to Employment
(b) . The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement, and each other provision of this Agreement shall be severable and enforceable to the extent permitted by law.
Severability
(c) . Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors of the Company.
Waiver
(d) . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and the Participant and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the restrictions on transfer set forth in Section 4 of this Agreement.
Binding Effect
(e) . All notices required or permitted hereunder shall be in writing and deemed effectively given upon personal delivery or five days after deposit in the United States Post
Notice
 
Office, by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party hereto at the address shown beneath his or its respective signature to this Agreement, or at such other address or addresses as either party shall designate to the other in accordance with this Section 8(e).
(f) . Whenever the context may require, any pronouns used in this Agreement shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine or neuter forms, and the singular form of nouns and pronouns shall include the plural, and vice versa.
Pronouns
(g) . This Agreement and the Plan constitute the entire agreement between the parties and supersede all prior agreements and understandings relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. In the event of any conflict between this Agreement and the Plan, the Plan shall control. In the event of any ambiguity in this Agreement, or any matters as to which this Agreement is silent, the Plan shall govern including, without limitation, the provisions thereof pursuant to which the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) has the power, among other things, to (i) interpret the Plan, (ii) prescribe, amend and rescind rules and regulations relating to the Plan and (iii) make all other determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan.
Entire Agreement; Conflicts and Interpretation
(h) . The Company may modify, amend or waive the terms of this Agreement prospectively or retroactively, but no such modification, amendment or waiver shall impair the rights of the Participant without his or her consent, except as required by applicable law, NASDAQ or stock exchange rules, tax rules or accounting rules. Any provision for the benefit of the Company contained in this Agreement may be waived, either generally or in any particular instance, by the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) of the Company. The waiver by either party of compliance with any provision of this Agreement shall not operate or be construed as a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, or of any subsequent breach by such party of a provision of this Agreement.
Amendment
(i) . This Agreement shall be construed, interpreted and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Delaware without regard to any applicable conflicts of laws.
Governing Law
(j) . The right of the Participant to receive Common Stock pursuant to this Agreement is an unfunded and unsecured obligation of the Company. The Participant shall have no rights under this Agreement other than those of an unsecured general creditor of the Company.
Unfunded Rights
(k) . The Company may, in its sole discretion, decide to deliver any documents related to the RSUs awarded under and participation in the Plan or future options that may be awarded under the Plan by electronic means or to request the Participant's consent to participate in the Plan by electronic means. The Participant hereby consents to receive such documents by electronic delivery and, if requested, to agree to participate in the Plan through an on-line or electronic system established and maintained by the Company or another third party designated by the Company.
Electronic Delivery
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed as of the day and year first above written. Electronic acceptance of this Agreement pursuant to the Company's instructions to Participant (including through an online acceptance process managed by the Company's agent) is acceptable.
 
 
The Participant has been granted restricted stock units ("RSUs") by Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai"), which is evidenced by a restricted stock unit agreement between me and Akamai (the "Agreement," copy attached). Provided that I remain employed by Akamai on each vesting date, the shares vest according to the provisions of the Agreement.
I understand that on each vesting date, the shares issuable in respect of vested RSUs (the "Shares") will be deposited into my account at Charles Schwab & Co., Inc. ("Schwab") and that I will recognize taxable ordinary income as a result. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and as a condition of my receipt of the Shares, I understand and agree that, for each vesting date, I must sell a number of shares sufficient to satisfy all withholding taxes applicable to that ordinary income. Therefore, I understand that Schwab will remit the proceeds to Akamai for payment of the withholding taxes.
I hereby direct Schwab to sell, at the market price and on each vesting date listed above (or the first business day thereafter if a vesting date should fall on a day when the market is closed) or as soon as practicable thereafter, the number of Shares that Akamai informs Schwab is sufficient to satisfy the applicable withholding taxes, which shall be calculated based on the closing price of Akamai's common stock on the last trading day before each vesting date.
I hereby agree to indemnify and hold Schwab harmless from and against all losses, liabilities, damages, claims and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs, arising out of any (i) negligent act, omission or willful misconduct by Akamai in carrying out actions pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph and (ii) any action taken or omitted by Schwab in good faith reliance upon instructions herein or upon instructions or information transmitted to Schwab by Akamai pursuant to the third sentence of the preceding paragraph.
I understand and agree that by signing below or effecting an online acceptance of the Agreement, I am making an Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares which will remain in effect until all of the shares have vested. I also agree that this Irrevocable Standing Order to Sell Shares is in addition to and subject to the terms and conditions of any existing Account Agreement that I have with Schwab.
 
 
 
The RSUs shall vest only upon the Company's achievement of certain financial metrics based on a target of $            in respect of Normalized EPS (as defined below) for fiscal year 2012 (the "Target Metric") as reported in its Public Company Financial Statements for such year. If, on December 31, 2012, the Company is required to make periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-K shall constitute its "Public Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. If, on December 31, 2012, the Company is not required to make periodic reports under the Exchange Act, the Company's regularly prepared annual audited financial statements prepared by management shall be its "Private Company Financial Statements" and shall apply. The applicable financial statements may be referred to herein as the "2012 Financial Statements."
"Normalized EPS" shall mean the Company's annual earnings per diluted share for the applicable fiscal year excluding cumulative amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, stock-based compensation expense reflected as a component of amortization of capitalized software, restructuring charges and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, utilization of NOL carryforwards and credits, loss on early extinguishment of debt and similar items excluded by Akamai in determining normalized earnings per share in issuing its earnings announcements for such fiscal year.
 
1. If the actual performance fails to meet the Target Metric fails, then none of the Shares shall become issuable.
2. If the actual performance equals [        %] of the Target Metric or greater, then the Maximum RSU Amount shall become issuable, subject to the vesting schedule set forth in Paragraph 2(a) of the Agreement.
3. If the actual performance is between 100% of the Target Metric and [        ]% of the Target Metric, then the number of Shares issuable shall equal the product of (i) the Maximum RSU Amount multiplied by (ii) a fraction the numerator of which is the actual percentage performance against the Target Metric minus 100% and the denominator is [        ]%, subject to the vesting schedule set forth in Paragraph 2(a) of the Agreement.
 
In the event that the Company enters into an Acquisition Transaction during 2012, then Normalized EPS shall be adjusted to give effect to such Acquisition Transaction. An "Acquisition Transaction" means (i) the purchase by the Company of more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, (ii) any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, business combination, liquidation, dissolution or share exchange which results in the Company acquiring more than 50% of the voting power of another entity, or (iii) the purchase or other acquisition (including, without limitation, via license outside of the ordinary course of business or joint venture) of assets that constitute more than 50% of another entity's total assets or assets that account for more than 50% of the consolidated net revenues or net income of such entity.
 
As soon as practicable following the closing of an Acquisition Transaction, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company shall make a determination of the estimated impact of the Acquisition Transaction on the Company's cumulative Normalized EPS through 2012. If the Acquisition Transaction is estimated to be accretive, then in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2012 Financial Statements, shall be reduced by the amount of the estimated Normalized EPS contribution from the Acquisition Transaction. If the Acquisition is estimated to be non-accretive, then in calculating Normalized EPS for purposes of determining the Normalized EPS Percentage Component, Normalized EPS, as calculated based on the 2012 Financial Statements, shall be increased by the amount of the estimated negative Normalized EPS impact from the Acquisition Transaction. All determinations of the Compensation Committee regarding the estimated impact of an Acquisition Transaction shall be final, binding and non-appealable. This Agreement shall be deemed to be automatically amended, without further action by the Company or the Participant, to give effect to any adjustments required by this Section C.
 
(1) If there is a Change of Control Event on or prior to December 31, 2012, then no Shares shall vest.
(2) If there is a Change of Control Event after December 31, 2012, then the number of vested Shares calculated pursuant to this Schedule 1 shall vest as of the closing date of the Change of Control Event (to the extent not previously vested under the Section 2(a) of the Agreement).
 
(1) If the Participant dies or becomes disabled (within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Code) after December 31, 2012, then no Shares shall vest.
(2) If the Participant dies or becomes disabled (within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Code) after December 31, 2012, then the number of vested Shares calculated pursuant to this Schedule 1 shall vest as of the date of death or disability (to the extent not previously vested under the Section 2(a) of the Agreement).
 

Exhibit 10.4
 
This Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement (this "Agreement") evidences the grant by Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), on                      (the "Grant Date") to                     , an employee of the Company (the "Participant"), of an option to purchase, in whole or in part, on the terms provided herein and in the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the "Plan"), a total of                      shares (the "Shares") of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Company ("Common Stock") at Exercise_Price per Share. Unless earlier terminated, this option shall expire on the seventh anniversary of the Grant Date (the "Final Exercise Date").
It is intended that the option evidenced by this agreement shall not be an incentive stock option as defined in Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Code"). Except as otherwise indicated by the context, the term "Participant", as used in this option, shall be deemed to include any person who acquires the right to exercise this option validly under its terms.
 
(a) . This option will become exercisable ("vest") as to 33% of the original number of Shares on each of the first, second and third anniversaries of the Grant Date. For purposes of this Section 2(a) the Vesting Start Date shall be the Grant Date.
General
The right of exercise shall be cumulative so that to the extent the option is not exercised in any period to the maximum extent permissible it shall continue to be exercisable, in whole or in part, with respect to all shares for which it is vested until the earlier of the Final Exercise Date or the termination of this option under Section 3 hereof or the Plan.
(b) . Upon a Change in Control Event (as defined in the Plan), notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Plan, the number of Shares as to which this option has vested shall be calculated pursuant to Section 2(a) as though the Grant Date were the date that is one year prior to the Grant Date.
Change in Control
 
(a) . In order to exercise this option, the Participant shall notify the Company's third-party stock option plan administrator, Charles Schwab & Co., or any successor appointed by the Company (the "Plan Administrator"), of the Participant's intent to exercise this option, and shall follow the procedures established by the Plan Administrator for exercising stock options under the Plan and provide payment in full in the manner provided in the Plan. The Participant may purchase less than the number of shares covered hereby, provided that no partial exercise of this option may be for any fractional share.
Form of Exercise
 
(b) . Except as otherwise provided in this Section 3, this option may not be exercised unless the Participant, at the time he or she exercises this option, is, and has been at all times since the Grant Date, an employee of the Company or any parent or subsidiary of the Company as defined in Section 424(e) or (f) of the Code (an "Eligible Participant").
Continuous Relationship with the Company Required
(c) . If the Participant ceases to be an Eligible Participant for any reason, then, except as provided in paragraphs (d) and (e) below, the right to exercise this option shall terminate three months after such cessation (but in no event after the Final Exercise Date), this option shall be exercisable only to the extent that the Participant was entitled to exercise this option on the date of such cessation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Participant, prior to the Final Exercise Date, violates the non-competition or confidentiality provisions of any employment contract, confidentiality and nondisclosure agreement or other agreement between the Participant and the Company, the right to exercise this option shall terminate immediately upon such violation.
Termination of Relationship with the Company
provided
that
(d) . If the Participant dies or becomes disabled (within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Code) prior to the Final Exercise Date while he or she is an Eligible Participant and the Company has not terminated such relationship for "cause" as specified in paragraph (e) below, this option shall be exercisable, within the period of one year following the date of death or disability of the Participant by the Participant, (i) this option shall be exercisable only to the extent that this option was exercisable by the Participant on the date of his or her death or disability, and (ii) this option shall not be exercisable after the Final Exercise Date.
Exercise Period Upon Death or Disability
provided
that
(e) . If the Participant, prior to the Final Exercise Date, is discharged by the Company for "cause" (as defined below), the right to exercise this option shall terminate immediately upon the effective date of such discharge. "Cause" shall mean willful misconduct by the Participant or willful failure by the Participant to perform his or her responsibilities to the Company (including, without limitation, breach by the Participant of any provision of any employment, consulting, advisory, nondisclosure, non-competition or other similar agreement between the Participant and the Company), as determined by the Company, which determination shall be conclusive. The Participant shall be considered to have been discharged for "cause" if the Company determines, prior to or simultaneously with the Participant's resignation, that discharge for cause was warranted.
Discharge for Cause
 
No Shares will be issued pursuant to the exercise of this option unless and until the Participant pays to the Company, or makes provision satisfactory to the Company for payment of, any federal, state or local withholding taxes required by law to be withheld in respect of this option.
 
This option may not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged or otherwise encumbered by the Participant, either voluntarily or by operation of law, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution, and, during the lifetime of the Participant, this option shall be exercisable only by the Participant.
 
This option is subject to the provisions of the Plan, a copy of which is furnished to the Participant with this option.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this option to be executed under its corporate seal by its duly authorized officer. This option shall take effect as a sealed instrument.
 
The undersigned hereby accepts the foregoing option and agrees to the terms and conditions thereof. The undersigned hereby acknowledges receipt of a copy of the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20120124162303.txt.gz
TIME:20120124162303
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
_________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report:
January 19, 2012
(Date of earliest event reported)
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)
Delaware
            
0-27275
            
04-3432319
(State or Other Jurisdiction
    
(Commission File Number)
    
(IRS Employer Identification No.)
of Incorporation)
8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)
    
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(617) 444-3000
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
o
    
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
2012 Executive Compensation
On January 19, 2012, the Compensation Committee (the Compensation Committee) of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. adopted cash and equity compensation programs for 2012 for the following executive officers: Paul Sagan, Chief Executive Officer; Melanie Haratunian, Senior Vice President and General Counsel; Robert Hughes, Executive Vice President - Global Sales, Services & Marketing; and J. Donald Sherman, Chief Financial Officer (collectively, the Executives).
The cash incentive components of the 2012 compensation program provide for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, each Executive's cash bonus is weighted as follows: 40% based on Akamai's achievement of a specified revenue target for fiscal year 2012; 40% based on Akamai's achievement of a specified normalized earnings per share (normalized EPS) target for fiscal year 2012; and 20% based on achievement of individual or departmental performance goals. The new base salaries will take effect on April 1, 2012. Below we use the term 2012 base salary earnings to refer to the aggregate amount of base salary paid to an Executive during the 2012 calendar year.
For Mr. Sagan, his new base salary will be $776,250, with a target cash bonus equal to 125% of his 2012 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 225% of his 2012 base salary earnings. For Ms. Haratunian, her new base salary will be $365,000, with a target cash bonus equal to 50% of her 2012 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 90% of her 2012 base salary earnings. For Mr. Hughes, his new base salary will be $459,023, with a target cash bonus equal to 125% of his 2012 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 225% of his 2012 base salary earnings. For Mr. Sherman, his new base salary will be $459,023, with a target cash bonus equal to 75% of his 2012 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 135% of his 2012 base salary earnings.
As described in the table below, each Executive was also granted restricted stock units (RSUs), and approved for a future grant of stock options, in each case issuable pursuant to the 2009 Stock Plan as follows:
The options will have an effective grant date of the second day following the Company's release of financial results for fiscal year 2011; the effective date is expected to be February 10, 2012. The exercise price for the options will be the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the grant date. The aggregate number of options to be granted to each Executive will be calculated by applying a Black Scholes option pricing model to the value listed in the chart above based on the exercise price of the options. The options will vest as follows: 33% vest on each of the first, second and third anniversaries of the effective date. The options are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of stock option agreement previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 18, 2012.
    
Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting. RSUs with annual vesting vest in 33% annual installments on the first, second and third anniversaries of the date of grant. As described in the following paragraphs, the performance-vested RSUs will only become issuable to the extent that (i) the Company exceeds specified normalized EPS target for fiscal year 2012 and (ii) the executive achieves specified mission critical goals established for him or her for 2012. Each of such components are equally weighted. The maximum number of performance-vested RSUs that will become issuable is set forth in the chart above.
If Akamai achieves 94.9% of the normalized EPS target, then 25% of the maximum issuable number of RSUs attributable to the normalized EPS component will become issuable. If Akamai achieves 100% of such target, then 50% of the maximum issuable number of RSUs attributable to the normalized EPS component will become issuable. If Akamai achieves 105.1% or more of such target, then 100% of the maximum issuable number of performance-vested RSUs attributable to the normalized EPS component will become issuable. Pro-rata amounts will be issuable for performance between 94.9% and 100% and 100% and 105.1%, respectively. With respect to Mission Critical Goals, achievement will be calculated based on a determination by the Chief Executive Officer (or, if the Participant is the Chief Executive Officer, by the Board of Directors or a committee thereof) as to whether the Participant has (i) partially achieved the Mission Critical Goals; (ii) achieved the Mission Critical Goals at the target level, or (iii) achieved the Mission Critical Goals at an outstanding level.
To the extent performance-vested RSUs become issuable, they will vest in two equal 50% installments on the second and third anniversaries of the date of grant. The foregoing description of the RSUs is qualified in its entirety by the text of the relevant RSU agreements, each of which was previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 18, 2012.
    
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20120208160553.txt.gz
TIME:20120208160553
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 8, 2012, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") announced its financial results for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2011. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information provided under Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
On February 3, 2012, J. Donald Sherman notified the Company of his resignation as Chief Financial Officer of the Company effective as of the end of the day on February 29, 2012.
On February 6, 2012, Akamai's Board of Directors elected James Benson, 45, to the position of Chief Financial Officer of the Company effective as of March 1, 2012.
Mr. Benson has been Akamai's Senior Vice President  Finance since September 2009. Prior to joining the Company, he was Vice President, Finance/Operations & CFO  Americas Technology Solutions Group at Hewlett-Packard Company, a technology company, since 2004.
On February 6, 2012, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee") also approved Mr. Benson's compensation arrangements, which are summarized below.
Mr. Benson shall initially have a base salary of $373,000 and be eligible to participate in the Company's executive cash bonus program. For 2012, he will be eligible to receive a pro rata bonus of up to 75% of his base salary, based on Akamai's financial achievement and his individual performance objectives.
The Compensation Committee approved granting Mr. Benson stock options to purchase shares of common stock of the Company under the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan. The options will be issued on February 10, 2012. The aggregate number of shares of common stock of the Company subject to the stock options will be determined so as to make the value of such stock options equal to $312,500 determined under a Black-Scholes option pricing model. The exercise price for the stock options will be the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the grant date. The options will vest in accordance with the following schedule: 25% vest on the first anniversary of the Start Date and the remaining 75% vest over the ensuing three years in equal quarterly installments of 6.25%. The options are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of non-statutory stock option agreement previously filed on January 18, 2012 with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Mr. Benson was also granted two sets of restricted stock units representing the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting ("RSUs"). The first set of RSUs, having an initial value of $625,000, vest over three years in 33% annual installments on the first, second and third anniversaries of the date of grant. The second set of RSUs, having an initial maximum grant value of $625,000, are performance-vested RSUs that will only become issuable to the extent that (i) the Company exceeds specified normalized EPS target for fiscal year 2012 and (ii) Mr. Benson achieves specified mission critical goals established for him for 2012 ("Mission Critical Goals"). Each of such components is equally weighted.
If Akamai achieves 94.9% of the normalized EPS target, then 25% of the maximum issuable number of RSUs attributable to the normalized EPS component will become issuable. If Akamai achieves 100% of such target, then 50% of the maximum grant value attributable to the normalized EPS component will become issuable. If Akamai achieves 105.1% or more of such target, then 100% of the maximum grant value attributable to the normalized EPS component will become issuable. Pro-rata amounts will be issuable for performance between 94.9% and 100% and 100% and 105.1%, respectively. With respect to Mission Critical Goals, achievement will be calculated based on a determination by the Chief Executive Officer as to whether Mr. Benson has (i) partially achieved the Mission Critical Goals; (ii) achieved the Mission Critical Goals at the target level, or (iii) achieved the Mission Critical Goals at an outstanding level.
To the extent performance-vested RSUs become issuable, they will vest in two equal 50% installments on the second and third anniversaries of the date of grant. The foregoing description of the RSUs is qualified in its entirety by the text of the relevant RSU agreements, each of which was previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 18, 2012.
It is also expected that Mr. Benson will enter into a change of control and severance agreement consistent with the form previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 2, 2009 and will be eligible to participate in the Executive Severance Plan which was previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 9, 2011.
Under the Severance Plan, participants who are terminated for any reason other than "cause" (as defined in the Severance Plan) and have signed a separation and release agreement acceptable to Akamai are entitled to:
 
 
 
Our standard change of control and severance agreement for executives provides that if the executive is employed by the Company as of the date of a Change of Control Event (as defined therein); and within one year of the Change of Control Event the executive's employment is terminated by the surviving entity for any reason other than for Cause (as defined therein), including the executive's voluntary termination for Good Reason (as defined therein), then the executive shall be entitled to:
 
 
 
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2011. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2011 was $324 million, a 15 percent increase over third quarter revenue of $282 million, and a 14 percent increase over fourth quarter 2010 revenue of $285 million. Total revenue for 2011 was $1,159 million, a 13 percent increase over 2010 revenue of $1,024 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 8, 2012
"Akamai posted record results in the fourth quarter, with accelerated growth across our business." said Paul Sagan, President and CEO of Akamai. "We believe our Content Delivery and Cloud Infrastructure solutions are stronger than ever, and we look forward to further enhancing our Cloud Infrastructure portfolio with the completed acquisition of Blaze and the planned acquisition of Cotendo, which may close as early as the first quarter."
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the fourth quarter of 2011 was $60 million, or $0.33 per diluted share. Full-year GAAP net income for 2011 was $201 million, or $1.07 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $83 million, or $0.45 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2011, a 31 percent increase over the prior quarter's normalized net income of $63 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, and a 9 percent increase over fourth quarter 2010 normalized net income of $77 million, or $0.40 per diluted share. Full-year normalized net income grew 5 percent year-over-year to $285 million, or $1.52 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2011 was $148 million, up from $122 million in the prior quarter, and $129 million in the fourth quarter of 2010. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the fourth quarter was 46 percent, up 3 points from the prior quarter and up 1 point from the same period last year. For the full year, adjusted EBITDA was $525 million, up from $474 million in 2010. Full-year adjusted EBITDA margin in 2011 was at 45 percent, down one percent from 2010. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Full-year cash from operations was $453 million, or 39 percent of revenue, consistent with the prior year. At year end, the Company had over $1.2 billion of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 19 percent and 28 percent, respectively, of revenue for the fourth quarter 2011.
Share Repurchase Program
During the fourth quarter of 2011, under a share repurchase program that was approved by the Board of Directors in April 2011 and expanded in August 2011, the Company repurchased approximately 3 million shares of its common stock for $76 million, an average price of $26.38 per share. As of December 31, 2011, the Company had repurchased 12 million shares of its common stock for $325 million, at an average price of $26.45 per share, during fiscal 2011.
The Company had approximately 178 million shares of common stock outstanding as of December 31, 2011.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-831-6247 (or 1-617-213-8856 for international calls) and using passcode No. 92823340. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 69462788.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere. At the core of the Company's solutions is the Akamai Intelligent Platform providing extensive reach, coupled with unmatched reliability, security, visibility and expertise. Akamai removes the complexities of connecting the increasingly mobile world, supporting 24/7 consumer demand, and enabling enterprises to securely leverage the cloud. To learn more about how Akamai is accelerating the pace of innovation in a hyperconnected world, please visit or , and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
blogs.akamai.com
 
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory pronouncements discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release and our earnings call helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or that do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on the historical cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized net income per share" as normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of non-cash items. Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements concerning the closing of our proposed acquisition of Cotendo Inc. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, inability to close the Cotendo acquisition within the anticipated time frame or at all, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all, inability to increase our revenue at the same rate as in the past and keep our expenses from increasing at a greater rate than our revenues, changes in estimates we make about tax liabilities and other contingencies, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities particularly our content delivery and cloud infrastructure solutions, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20120425161435.txt.gz
TIME:20120425161435
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 25, 2012, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2012. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information provided under Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(b)    Akamai also announced today that President and CEO Paul Sagan plans to transition out of such roles by the end of 2013. The Company expects that he will continue as President and CEO until his successor is named.
 
(d)    Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2012. Revenue for the first quarter of 2012 was $319 million, a 16 percent increase over first quarter 2011 revenue of $276 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 25, 2012
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the first quarter of 2012 was $43 million, or $0.24 per diluted share, a 15 percent decrease from first quarter 2011 GAAP net income of $51 million, or $0.26 per diluted share, and a 28 percent decrease from fourth quarter 2011 GAAP net income of $60 million, or $0.33 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $75 million, or $0.41 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2012, a 4 percent increase over first quarter 2011 normalized net income of $72 million, or $0.38 per diluted share, and a 10 percent decrease from the prior quarter normalized net income of $83 million, or $0.45 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"We are very pleased with our first quarter results, which were driven by continued adoption of our cloud infrastructure solutions and an acceleration of traffic growth in our content delivery solutions," said Paul Sagan, President and CEO of Akamai. "Customers have responded positively to the product investments we have made to support mobile and cloud computing, Web security, and the shift of video and other rich media to the Internet."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the first quarter of 2012 was $143 million, up 10 percent from $129 million in the first quarter of 2011, and down 3 percent from $148 million in the prior quarter. Adjusted EBITDA margin for the first quarter was 45 percent, down 1 point from the prior quarter and down 2 points from the same period last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $93 million in the first quarter of 2012, or 29 percent of revenue. At the end of the first quarter of 2012, the Company had approximately $979 million in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 21 percent and 28 percent, respectively, of revenue for the first quarter of 2012.
Share Repurchase Program
The Company also announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a $150 million extension of its share repurchase program, effective for a 12-month period beginning on May 1, 2012. The Company's goal for this program, which is expected to be funded by cash from operations, is primarily to offset dilution created by its equity compensation programs.
The timing and amount of any shares repurchased will be determined by the Company's management based on its evaluation of market conditions and other factors. Repurchases may also be made under a Rule 10b5-1 plan, which would permit the Company to repurchase shares when the Company might otherwise be precluded from doing so under insider trading laws. The Company may choose to suspend or discontinue the repurchase program at any time but cannot carry over unused authorization amounts to future periods.
During the first quarter of 2012, under its current share repurchase program, the Company repurchased approximately 223,000 shares of its common stock for $8 million, an average price of $35.45 per share. As of March 31, 2012, the Company had repurchased 18 million shares of its common stock for $491 million, at an average price of $26.86 per share since April 2009.
The Company had approximately 179 million shares of common stock outstanding as of March 31, 2012.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-888-396-2386 (or 1-617-847-8712 for international calls) and using passcode No. 53739683. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 47744833.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere. At the core of the Company's solutions is the Akamai Intelligent Platform providing extensive reach, coupled with unmatched reliability, security, visibility and expertise. Akamai removes the complexities of connecting the increasingly mobile world, supporting 24/7 consumer demand, and enabling enterprises to securely leverage the cloud. To learn more about how Akamai is accelerating the pace of innovation in a hyperconnected world, please visit or , and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
blogs.akamai.com
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory pronouncements discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release and our earnings call helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or that do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on the historical cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized net income per share" as normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of non-cash items. Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about future revenue growth. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services, loss of significant customers, failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all, inability to increase our revenue at the same rate as in the past and keep our expenses from increasing at a greater rate than our revenues, changes in estimates we make about tax liabilities and other contingencies, a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure, delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities particularly our content delivery and cloud infrastructure solutions, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause
these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20120518164315.txt.gz
TIME:20120518164315
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
_________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report:
May 16, 2012
(Date of earliest event reported)
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)
Delaware
    
0-27275
    
04-3432319
(State or Other Jurisdiction
    
(Commission File Number)
    
(IRS Employer Identification No.)
of Incorporation)
8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)
    
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(617) 444-3000
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the Company) held its annual meeting of stockholders on May 16, 2012 (the Annual Meeting). At the Annual Meeting, three items of business were acted upon by stockholders. There were 179,077,805 shares of Akamai's common stock eligible to vote, and 149,260,953 shares present in person or by proxy at the Annual Meeting.
1.
    
The following nominees were elected to the Company's Board of Directors as Class I for terms expiring at the 2015 annual meeting of stockholders.
Following the Annual Meeting, Pamela J. Craig, F. Thomson Leighton, Paul Sagan and Naomi O. Seligman, having terms expiring in 2013, and C. Kim Goodwin, Peter J. Kight and Frederic V. Salerno, having terms expiring in 2014, continued in office.
2.
    
A non-binding, advisory proposal on the compensation of the Company's named executive officers was approved.
3. The appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP as the independent registered public accounting firm for the Company for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2012 was ratified.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
None
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20120723163212.txt.gz
TIME:20120723163212
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
_________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report:
July 18, 2012
(Date of earliest event reported)
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)
Delaware
    
0-27275
    
04-3432319
(State or Other Jurisdiction
    
(Commission File Number)
    
(IRS Employer Identification No.)
of Incorporation)
8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)
    
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(617) 444-3000
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
(e)
    
On July 18, 2012, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (Akamai) approved an amended Executive Severance Plan (the Severance Plan). The primary purpose of such amendments was to clarify what employees are eligible to participate in the plan. The purpose of the Severance Plan is to assist executives of Akamai who are involuntarily terminated for reasons other than cause (as defined therein) and to resolve fully and finally all potential issues arising out of their employment. The foregoing description of the amended Severance Plan is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the Severance Plan set forth in Exhibit 10.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
See Exhibit Index attached hereto which is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
See Exhibit Index attached hereto which is incorporated herein by reference.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 10.1
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.'S
EXECUTIVE SEVERANCE PAY PLAN
AND SUMMARY PLAN DESCRIPTION
Effective July 18, 2006
As amended on May 9, 2008, December 16, 2008, April 19, 2011 and July 18, 2012
1.
Establishment of the Plan
. Akamai Technologies, Inc. (referred to herein collectively with its subsidiaries as Akamai or the Company) hereby establishes an unfunded Executive Severance Pay Plan (the Plan) which is intended to be a welfare benefit plan within the meaning of Section 3(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (ERISA). The Plan is in effect for Akamai executives who participate in the executive compensation program overseen by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the Executives), at the time that they are terminated.
2.
Purpose
. The Plan is for the purpose of assisting Executives of Akamai who are involuntarily terminated for reasons other than cause and to resolve fully and finally all potential issues arising out of their employment. This Plan supersedes the provisions of any other agreement(s) an Executive may have regarding payments to be made upon termination of employment, including but not limited to, the acceleration of stock options and/or any lump sum payment an Executive may receive in the event of termination following a Change in Control, as that term is defined in such agreement(s); provided, however, that this Plan shall not be deemed to terminate or replace, but shall be deemed to supplement, (a) provisions in restricted stock unit agreements entered into with Executives that relate to the effect of a termination of employment or (b) provisions in stock option agreements or the Company's Stock Incentive Plans that that provide for the automatic acceleration of vesting of options upon a Change in Control Event. This Plan is intended to operate and provide benefits in conjunction with the contractual Change in Control benefits for Executives that have been approved by the Company's Board of Directors or Compensation Committee.
3.
Definition of Termination for Cause
.
For the purposes of this Plan, Cause is defined as (i) any act or omission by an Executive that has a significant adverse effect on Akamai's business or on the Executive's ability to perform services for Akamai, including, without limitation, the commission of any crime (other than ordinary traffic violations), or (ii) refusal or failure to perform assigned duties, serious misconduct, or excessive absenteeism, or (iii) refusal or failure to comply with Akamai's Code of Business Ethics. Whether an Executive has been terminated for cause shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Plan Administrator after consultation with appropriate members of Akamai's management.
4.
Eligibility
. Eligibility to participate in the Plan, which is to be determined in the sole discretion of the Plan Administrator, is limited to regular fulltime Executives who are involuntarily terminated by Akamai or any of its subsidiaries on or after July 18, 2012 and who have signed a separation agreement acceptable to and provided by the Company that contains, among other provisions, a full release of claims and, where permitted by applicable law, an agreement not to compete with the Company for one year following such termination, in such forms and within such times as may be reasonably determined by the Company.
The following are
NOT
eligible for severance pay under this Plan:
(a)
    
an Executive who resigns voluntarily, including but not limited to an Executive who is offered an employment opportunity with any purchaser or other successor of Akamai, its business operations or any part thereof (regardless of whether or not such employment opportunity is accepted);
(b)
    
an Executive who fails to continue in the employ of Akamai, satisfactorily performing his or her assigned duties, until the date actually set for his or her involuntary termination;
(c)
    
an Executive who does not sign and return a separation agreement acceptable to and provided by the
Company that contains, among other things, a release (the Release) in accordance with Section 5 below;
(d)
    
an Executive who fails to return all of Akamai's property in his or her possession or under his or her control, including, but not limited to, intellectual property and other confidential information;
(e)
    
an Executive who, despite Akamai's request, fails to execute any documents evidencing Akamai's interest in and to any intellectual property;
(f)     an Executive who is not employed on the United States payroll of the Company or any of its subsidiaries whose termination benefits are determined by local law or an employment contract;
(g)     the Chief Executive Officer;
(h)
    
the President;
(i)
    
an Executive who becomes totally disabled or dies prior to the date set for his or her involuntary termination by Akamai;
(j)
    
an Executive who is terminated for Cause; and
(k)
    
an Executive who, pursuant to a change in control agreement with the Company, receives severance pay and/or benefits upon a Change in Control Event, as that term is defined in Section 9(c)(1)(b) of the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan.
5.
Severance Pay and Benefits
. Any Executive terminated for any reason other than Cause as defined above shall be entitled to the following severance pay benefits, all of which shall be paid less applicable withholdings for taxes and other deductions required by law:
(a)
A lump sum payment equal to one year of the Executive's then-current base salary.
 
(b)
A lump sum payment equal to the annual incentive bonus at target that would have been payable to the Executive under the Company's then-current Executive Bonus Plan, if any, in the year of the Executive's termination had both the Company and the Executive achieved the target bonus objectives set forth in such Executive's Bonus Plan during such year.
(c)
Reimbursement for up to 12 months of the amount paid by the Executive for continued health and dental insurance coverage under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act (COBRA). In order to receive this benefit, the Executive must timely elect COBRA continuation coverage in accordance with the Company's usual COBRA procedures.
All payments and benefits under this Section 5 are conditioned upon the Executive's satisfaction of all eligibility requirements under this Plan, including but not limited to, the execution of a separation agreement acceptable to and provided by the Company that contains, among other provisions, a full release of claims and, where permitted by applicable law, an agreement not to compete with the Company for one year following the Executive's termination. The payments and benefits described in Sections 5(a) and 5(b) shall be provided within sixty (60) days after the Executive's termination of employment, provided the Executive has executed the separation agreement described herein and such agreement has become enforceable; provided that if such the last day of such sixty day period occurs in the calendar year after the calendar year of termination, the payments and benefits shall be made no earlier than January 1 of such subsequent calendar year
6.    
Section 409A
.
The payments under this Plan shall be subject to
Appendix A
.
7.    
Funding
. All cash payments under the Plan shall be funded solely from Akamai's general assets.
8.    
Duration of Plan
. The initial term of the Plan shall commence effective July 18, 2006 through December 31, 2006 and shall automatically renew for successive one year periods unless otherwise terminated by the Company. The Plan may be amended or terminated at Akamai's discretion without prior notice at any time.
9.    
Plan Administration
. The general administration of the Plan herein set forth and the responsibility for carrying out its provisions shall be vested in the Plan Administrator. The Plan Administrator shall be the Administrator within the meaning of section 3(16) of ERISA and shall have all the responsibilities and duties contained therein. Akamai is the Plan Administrator of the Plan. The Board of Directors of Akamai may delegate to an Administrative Committee, such as the Compensation Committee, the day-to-day operation and administration of the Plan.
    
The Plan Administrator shall discharge its duties with respect to the Plan solely in the interest of the participants and their beneficiaries, with the care, skill, prudence and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like objectives. However, the inclusion of this language in the Plan is for the sole purpose of informing the Plan Administrator of the applicable standard of care under ERISA. It is not intended that this provision impose any additional duties, responsibilities, or liabilities than would otherwise apply under ERISA.
The Plan Administrator shall have such powers as are necessary to discharge its duties, including, but not limited to, interpretation and construction of the Plan, sole discretion to determine all questions of eligibility, participation and benefits and all other related or incidental matters. The Plan Administrator shall decide all such questions in accordance with the terms of the controlling legal documents and applic-able law, and its decision will be binding on Akamai, the participant, the participant's spouse or other dependent or beneficiary and all other interested parties.
The Plan Administrator may adopt rules and procedures of uniform applicability in its interpretation and implementation of the Plan.
The Plan Administrator may require each participant to submit, in such form as it shall deem reasonable and accept-able, proof of any information which the Plan Administrator finds necessary or desirable for the proper administration of the Plan.
The Plan Administrator shall main-tain such records as are necessary to carry out the provisions of the Plan. The Plan Administrator shall also make all disclosures which are required by ERISA and any subsequent amendments thereto.
10.    
Questions and Claims Procedure
. Any questions concerning eligibility to participate in the Plan and the payment of any severance pay or benefits hereunder should be directed to the Administrative Committee. The Plan will comply with the Claims Procedure set forth in ERISA regulations at Title 29 C.F.R.  2560.5031.
(a)
    
Any person claiming benefits under the Plan (Claimant) may be required to submit an application therefor, together with such other documents and information as the Administrative Committee may require (Application).
(b)
    
Within ninety (90) days following receipt of the Application, the Administrative Committee's authorized delegate will review the claim and furnish the Claimant with written notice of the decision rendered with respect to the Application.
(c)
    
Should special circumstances require an extension of time for processing the claim, written notice of the extension will be furnished to the Claimant prior to the expiration of the initial ninety (90) day period.
10.2
    
Content of Denial
. In the case of a denial of the Claimant's Application, the written notice will set forth:
(a)
    
The specific reasons for the denial;
(b)
    
References to the Plan provisions upon which the denial is based;
(c)
    
A description of any additional information or material necessary for perfection of the Application (together with an explanation of why the material or information is necessary); and
(d)
    
An explanation of the Plan's claim review procedure.
10.3
    
Appeals
. In order to appeal the decision rendered with respect to his or her Application or with respect to the amount of his or her benefit, the Claimant must follow the procedures set forth in this Section 10.3.
(b)
If the Claimant does not file the appeal within this time period (or request in writing an extension from the Administrative Committee), the Claimant will be precluded from appealing the decision at a later time.
(c)
The Claimant may request that his or her Application be given a full and fair review by the Administrative Committee. The Claimant may review all pertinent documents and submit issues and comments in writing in connection with the appeal.
(d)
The decision of the Administrative Committee will be made promptly, and not later than sixty (60) days after the Administrative Committee's receipt of a request for review, unless special circumstances require an extension of time for processing. In such a case, a decision will be rendered as soon as possible, but not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after receipt of the request for review.
(e)
The decision on review will be in writing and will include specific reasons for the decision, written in a manner designed to be understood by the Claimant, with specific references to the pertinent Plan provisions upon which the decision is based.
11.    
Tax and Other Withholdings
. Akamai may withhold from any payment under the Plan any federal, state, or local taxes required by law to be withheld with respect to such payment and such sum as Akamai may reasonably estimate is necessary to cover any taxes for which Akamai may be liable and which may be assessed with regard to such payment. Akamai may also withhold sums to cover an Executive's share of any applicable group health insurance premiums. Akamai may also withhold sums owed to Akamai by an Executive which have not been repaid in full before the time for payment of any benefits due under this Plan.
12.    
Agent for Service of Legal Process
. Legal process with respect to claims under the Plan may be served on the Plan Administrator at Akamai's corporate headquarters.
13.    
Expenses
. All costs and expenses incurred in administering the Plan, including the expenses of the Plan Administrator, shall be borne by Akamai.
14.    
Plan Not an Employment Contract
. The Plan is not a contract between Akamai and any Executive, nor is it a condition of employment of any Executive. Nothing contained in the Plan gives, or is intended to give, any Executive the right to be retained in the service of Akamai, or to interfere with the right of Akamai to discharge or terminate the employment of any Executive at any time and for any reason. Except as provided in paragraph 2 above, no Executive shall have the right or claim to benefits beyond those expressly provided in this Plan. All rights and claims are limited as set forth in the Plan.
15.    
Indemnification
. To the extent permitted by law, the Plan Administrator and all Executives, agents and representatives of the Plan Administrator shall be indemnified by Akamai and saved harmless against any claim and the expenses of defending against such claims, resulting from any action or conduct relating to the administration of the Plan except to the extent that such claims arise from gross negligence, willful neglect, or willful misconduct. However, Akamai will have the right to select counsel and to control the prosecution or defense of any lawsuit. Additionally, Akamai will not be required to indemnify any person for any amount incurred through any settlement unless Akamai consents to the settlement.
16.    
Separability
. In case any one or more of the provisions of this Plan (or part thereof) shall be held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability shall not affect the other provisions hereof, and this Plan shall be construed as if such invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions (or part thereof) never had been contained herein.
17.    
Non-Assignability
. No right or interest of any participant in the Plan shall be assignable or transferable in whole or in part either directly or by operation of law or otherwise, including, but not limited to, execution, levy, garnishment, attachment, pledge or bankruptcy, provided, however, that this provision shall not be applicable in the case of obligations of a participant to Akamai.
18.    
Amendment or Termination
. Akamai reserves the right, through its Board of Directors, to amend, modify or terminate this Plan at any time.
19.    
Integration with Other Pay or Benefits Requirements
. The pay and benefits provided for in the Plan are the maximum benefits that Akamai will pay. To the extent that any federal, state or local law, including, without limitation, socalled plant closing laws, requires Akamai to make a payment of any kind to an Executive because of that Executive's involuntary termination due to a Layoff, Reduction in Force, Plant or Facility Closing, Sale of Business, or similar event, the benefits provided under this Plan shall be reduced in an amount equal to any such payment(s). Akamai intends for the benefits provided under this Plan to satisfy any and all statu-tory obligations which may arise out of an Executive's involuntary termination for the foregoing reasons and the Plan Administrator shall so construe and implement the terms of the Plan.
20.    
Governing Law
. The Plan and the rights of all persons under the Plan shall be construed in accordance with and under applicable provisions of ERISA, and the regulations thereunder, and the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts to the extent not pre-empted by federal law.
21.    
Gender and Number
. Except where otherwise indicated by the context, any masculine gender used herein shall also include the feminine and vice versa, and the definition of any term herein in the singular shall also include the plural, and vice versa.
22.    
Statement of ERISA Rights
. Participants in the Plan are entitled to certain rights and protections under ERISA. ERISA provides that all Plan participants shall be entitled to:
(a)
    
Examine, without charge, at the Plan Administrator's office all Plan documents, including insurance contracts, collective bargaining agreements, and copies of all documents filed by the Plan with the United
States Department of Labor and Internal Revenue Service, such as annual reports and plan descriptions.
(b)
    
Obtain copies of all Plan documents and other plan information upon written request to the Plan Administrator.
The Plan Administrator may make a reasonable charge for the copies.
In addition to creating rights for Plan participants, ERISA imposes duties upon the people who are responsible for the operation of the Plan. The people who operate the Plan, called fiducia-ries of the Plan, have a duty to do so prudently and in the interest of all Plan participants and beneficiaries. No one, including Akamai or any other person, may fire a participant or otherwise discriminate against the participant in any way for the purpose of preventing the participant from obtaining a benefit or exercising his or her rights under ERISA. If a participant's claim for a benefit is denied in whole or in part, the participant must receive a written explanation of the reason for the denial. The participant has the right to have the Plan Administrator review and reconsider the claim. Under ERISA, there are steps a participant can take to enforce the above rights. For instance, if the participant requests materials from the Plan Administrator and does not receive them within 30 days, the participant may file suit in a federal court. In such a case, the court may require the Plan Adminis-trator to provide the materials and pay the participant up to $100 a day until the participant receives the materials, unless the materials were not sent because of reasons beyond the control of the Plan Administrator. If a participant has a claim for benefits which is denied or ignored, in whole or in part, the participant may file suit in a state or federal court. If it should happen that Plan fiduciaries misuse the Plan's money, or if a participant is discriminated against for asserting his or her rights, the participant may seek assistance from the United States Department of Labor, or may file suit in a federal court. The court will decide who should pay court costs and legal fees. If the participant is successful, the court may order the person whom the participant sued to pay these costs and fees. If the participant loses, the court may order the partici-pant to pay these costs and fees, if, for example, it finds the claim is frivolous. If the participant has any questions about this Plan, the participant should contact the Plan Administrator. If a participant has any questions about this statement or about his or her rights under ERISA, the participant should contact the nearest Area Office of Pension and Welfare Benefits, United States Department of Labor.
APPENDIX A
PAYMENTS SUBJECT TO SECTION 409A
1.
    
Subject to this Appendix A, payments or benefits under this Agreement shall begin only upon the date of the Executive's separation from service (determined as set forth below) which occurs on or after the termination of the Executive's employment. The following rules shall apply with respect to distribution of the payments and benefits, if any, to be provided to an Executive under this Agreement, as applicable:
A.
    
It is intended that each installment of the payments and benefits provided under this Agreement shall be treated as a separate payment for purposes of Section 409A of the Code and the guidance issued thereunder (Section 409A). Neither the Company nor the Executive shall have the right to accelerate or defer the delivery of any such payments or benefits except to the extent specifically permitted or required by Section 409A.
B.
    
If, as of the date of the Executive's separation from service from the Company, the Executive is not a specified employee (within the meaning of Section 409A), then each installment of the payments and benefits shall be made on the dates and terms set forth in this Agreement.
C.
    
If, as of the date of Executive's separation from service from the Company, the Executive is a specified employee (within the meaning of Section 409A), then:
(i)
    
Each installment of the payments and benefits due under this Agreement that, in accordance with the dates and terms set forth therein, will in all circumstances, regardless of when the separation from service occurs, be paid within the period of time permitted under Treasury Regulation Section 1.409A-1(b)(4) shall be treated as a short-term deferral within the meaning of such Section to the maximum extent possible; and
(ii)
    
Each installment of the payments and benefits due under this Agreement that is not described in this Appendix A, 1.C.i. above and that would, absent this subsection, be paid within the six-month period following the Executive's separation from service from the Company shall not be paid until the date that is six months and one day after such separation from service (or, if earlier, the Executive's death), with any such installments that are required to be delayed being accumulated during the six-month period and paid in a lump sum on the date that is six months and one day following the Executive's separation from service and any subsequent installments, if any, being paid in accordance with the dates and terms set forth in this Agreement (or other applicable agreement); provided, however, that the preceding provisions of this sentence shall not apply to any installment of payments and benefits if and to the maximum extent that that such installment is deemed to be paid under a separation pay plan that does not provide for a deferral of compensation by reason of the application of Treasury Regulation 1.409A-1(b)(9)(iii) (relating to separation pay upon an involuntary separation from service). Any installments that qualify for the exception under Treasury Regulation Section 1.409A-1(b)(9)(iii) must be paid no later than the last day of the Executive's second taxable year following his taxable year in which the separation from service occurs.
(iii)
    
The determination of whether and when the Executive's separation from service from the Company has occurred shall be made and in a manner consistent with, and based on the presumptions set forth in, Treasury Regulation Section 1.409A-1(h). Solely for purposes of this Appendix A, 1.C.iii., Company shall include all persons with whom the Company would be considered a single employer under Section 414(b) and 414(c) of the Code.
2.
    
All reimbursements and in-kind benefits provided this Agreement shall be made or provided in accordance with the requirements of Section 409A to the extent that such reimbursements or in-kind benefits are subject to Section 409A, including, where applicable, the requirements that (i) any reimbursement is for expenses incurred during the Executive's lifetime (or during a shorter period of time specified in this Agreement), (ii) the amount of expenses eligible for reimbursement during a calendar year may not affect the expenses eligible for reimbursement in any other calendar year, (iii) the reimbursement of an eligible expense will be made on or before the last day of
the calendar year following the year in which the expense is incurred and (iv) the right to reimbursement is not subject to set off or liquidation or exchange for any other benefit.
3.
    
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Company shall have no liability to the Executive or to any other person if the payments and benefits provided in this Agreement that are intended to be exempt from or compliant with Section 409A are not so exempt or compliant.
MISCELLANEOUS INFORMATION
2.
    
EMPLOYER:
            
Akamai Technologies, Inc.
(PLAN SPONSOR)
ADDRESS:
            
8 Cambridge Center
Cambridge, MA 02142
TELEPHONE:
            
617-444-3000
3.
    
EMPLOYER ID NUMBER:
    
04-3432319
4.
    
PLAN NUMBER:
        
2006.5
5.
    
PLAN ADMINISTRATOR:
    
Akamai Technologies, Inc.
Executive Severance Pay Plan
8 Cambridge Center
Cambridge, MA 02142


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20120725160624.txt.gz
TIME:20120725160624
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 25, 2012, Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company") announced its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2012. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2012. Revenue for the second quarter of 2012 was $331 million, a 20 percent increase over second quarter 2011 revenue of $277 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
July 25, 2012
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the second quarter of 2012 was $44 million, or $0.24 per diluted share, an 8 percent decrease from second quarter 2011 GAAP net income of $48 million, or $0.25 per diluted share, and a 2 percent increase from first quarter 2012 GAAP net income of $43 million, or $0.24 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $78 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2012, an 18 percent increase over second quarter 2011 normalized net income of $66 million, or $0.35 per diluted share, and a 3 percent increase from the prior quarter normalized net income of $75 million, or $0.41 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"Akamai's very strong second quarter results were driven on the top line by increased adoption of our cloud infrastructure solutions as well as continued growth of content delivery solutions," said Paul Sagan, President and CEO of Akamai. "Our bottom line performance was the result of significant benefits we have begun to realize from improvements we are making to scale our network operations."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the second quarter of 2012 was $143 million, up 13 percent from $126 million in the second quarter of 2011, and flat with the prior quarter. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the second quarter was 43 percent, down 2 points from the prior quarter and down 3 points from the same period last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $150 million in the second quarter of 2012, or 45 percent of revenue. At the end of the second quarter of 2012, the Company had just over $1 billion in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 21 percent and 27 percent, respectively, of revenue for the second quarter of 2012.
Share Repurchase Program
During the second quarter of 2012, under a share repurchase program that was approved by the Board of Directors in April 2011 and expanded in May 2012, the Company repurchased approximately 2 million shares of its common stock for $67 million, at an average price of $30.78 per share. As of June 30, 2012, the Company had repurchased 20 million shares of its common stock for $558 million, at an average price of $27.27 per share since April 2009.
The Company had approximately 178 million shares of common stock outstanding as of June 30, 2012.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-800-291-5365 (or 1-617-614-3922 for international calls) and using passcode No. 94771540. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 25706113.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere. At the core of the Company's solutions is the Akamai Intelligent Platform providing extensive reach, coupled with unmatched reliability, security, visibility and expertise. Akamai removes the complexities of connecting the increasingly mobile world, supporting 24/7 consumer demand, and enabling enterprises to securely leverage the cloud. To learn more about how Akamai is accelerating the pace of innovation in a hyperconnected world, please visit or , and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
blogs.akamai.com
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory pronouncements discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release and our earnings call helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of
capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or that do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on the historical cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized net income per share" as normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of non-cash items. Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about future revenue growth. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, effects of increased competition including potentially failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services and loss of significant customers; failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all; inability to increase our revenue at the same rate as in the past and keep our expenses from increasing at a greater rate than our revenues; a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure; delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities or failure of such solutions to operate as expected, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause
these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20120727160559.txt.gz
TIME:20120727160559
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
_________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report:
July 25, 2012
(Date of earliest event reported)
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)
Delaware
            
0-27275
            
04-3432319
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation)
    
(Commission File Number)
    
(IRS Employer Identification No.)         
8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)
    
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(617) 444-3000
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
(b)    
On July 25, 2012, Peter J. Kight notified Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the "Company" or "Akamai") of his resignation as a Director of the Company effective on that date.
On July 25, 2012, Debra L. Canner announced her resignation as SVP -- Human Resources of the Company. Her employment with Akamai is expected to terminate effective as of December 31, 2012.
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: July 27, 2012
                
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
/s/ Melanie Haratunian
                    
Melanie Haratunian
SVP and General Counsel


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20121024160537.txt.gz
TIME:20121024160537
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 24, 2012, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") announced its financial results for its fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2012. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information provided under Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2012. Revenue for the third quarter of 2012 was $345 million, a 23 percent increase over third quarter 2011 revenue of $282 million, and a 4 percent increase over second quarter 2012 revenue of $331 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
October 24, 2012
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the third quarter of 2012 was $48 million, or $0.27 per diluted share, a 14 percent increase from third quarter 2011 GAAP net income of $42 million, or $0.23 per diluted share, and a 9 percent increase from second quarter 2012 GAAP net income of $44 million, or $0.24 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $79 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2012, a 24 percent increase over third quarter 2011 normalized net income of $63 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, and a 1 percent increase from the prior quarter normalized net income of $78 million, or $0.43 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
"Akamai experienced its fourth consecutive quarter of accelerating revenue growth and delivered higher margins," said Paul Sagan, President and CEO of Akamai. "We continued to capitalize on our investments in cloud computing, web security, mobile services, and online video by expanding our product portfolio, while effectively managing the cost and efficiency of our network. These efforts paid off in both the Company's top and bottom line performance."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the third quarter of 2012 was $157 million, up 28 percent from $122 million in the third quarter of 2011, and up 9 percent from $143 million in the prior quarter. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the third quarter was 45 percent, up two points from the prior quarter and from the same period last year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Cash from operations was $141 million in the third quarter of 2012, or 41 percent of revenue. At the end of the third quarter of 2012, the Company had over $1 billion in cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 22 percent and 29 percent, respectively, of revenue for the third quarter of 2012.
Share Repurchase Program
During the third quarter of 2012, under a share repurchase program that was approved by the Board of Directors in May 2012, the Company repurchased approximately 1 million shares of its common stock for $37 million, at an average price of $31.53 per share. During the three quarters ended September 30, 2012, the Company repurchased approximately 4 million shares of its common stock for $112 million, at an average price of $31.31 per share. The Company has $68 million remaining on its current authorization, which runs through April 30, 2013.
The Company had approximately 177 million shares of common stock outstanding as of September 30, 2012.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-800-706-7745(or 1-617-614-3472 for international calls) and using passcode No. 82472044. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 96448745.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere. At the core of the Company's solutions is the Akamai Intelligent Platform providing extensive reach, coupled with unmatched reliability, security, visibility and expertise. Akamai removes the complexities of connecting the increasingly mobile world, supporting 24/7 consumer demand, and enabling enterprises to securely leverage the cloud. To learn more about how Akamai is accelerating the pace of innovation in a hyperconnected world, please visit or , and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
blogs.akamai.com
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory pronouncements discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release and our earnings call helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or that do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on the historical cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth. Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized net income per share" as normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of non-cash items. Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about future revenue growth. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, effects of increased competition including potentially failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services and loss of significant customers; failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all; inability to increase our revenue at the same rate as in the past and keep our expenses from increasing at a greater rate than our revenues; a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure; delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities or failure of such solutions to operate as expected, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20121114173836.txt.gz
TIME:20121114173836
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
_________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report:
November 12, 2012
(Date of earliest event reported)
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)
Delaware
                    
0-27275
                
04-3432319
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation)
    
(Commission File Number)
    
(IRS Employer Identification No.)
8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)
    
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(617) 444-3000
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 7.01.
    
Other Events
On November 14, 2012, Akamai Technologies, Inc. issued a press release in which it affirmed certain financial guidance for the fourth quarter ending December 31, 2012 that was previously issued in connection with its third quarter investor conference call. The full text of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Akamai to Postpone Investor Summit
CAMBRIDGE, MA
-
November 14, 2012
- Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere, announced today that it will postpone its Investor Summit scheduled for December 12, 2012. The meeting will be rescheduled to an appropriate date after the Company has named and transitioned to a new Chief Executive Officer.
Earlier this year, the Company announced that its Board of Directors was conducting a search to name a new chief executive to succeed Paul Sagan, who is completing his eighth year as CEO and said at the time that he wanted to transition to a successor.
Akamai today also reaffirmed its previously-issued financial guidance for the fourth quarter of 2012. The Company expects fourth quarter revenue to be in the range of $373 to $385 million and normalized net income* of $0.48 to $0.50 per diluted share.
About Akamai
Akamai
is the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere.  At the core of the Company's solutions is the Akamai Intelligent Platform providing extensive reach, coupled with unmatched reliability, security, visibility and expertise.  Akamai removes the complexities of connecting the increasingly mobile world, supporting 24/7 consumer demand, and enabling enterprises to securely leverage the cloud.  To learn more about how Akamai is accelerating the pace of innovation in a hyperconnected world, please visit
www.akamai.com
or
blogs.akamai.com
, and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
# # #
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory pronouncements discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may
make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP (where
available) and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized net income per share" as normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of non-cash items. Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Akamai is unable to provide a reconciliation on a forward-looking basis of normalized net income per share to net income per share calculated in accordance with GAAP because the Company does not have and is currently unable to estimate the following items that are excluded from the calculate of net income per share: amortization of other intangible assets; stock-based compensation expense; amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation; acquisition related costs (benefits); and restructuring (benefits) charges.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about revenue and earnings per share guidance for the fourth quarter of 2012. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, effects of increased competition including potentially failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services and loss of significant customers; failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all; inability to increase our revenue at the same rate as in the past and keep our expenses from increasing at a greater rate than our revenues; a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure; delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities or failure of such solutions to operate as expected, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release.  Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change.  However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so.  These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20121217061525.txt.gz
TIME:20121217061525
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
_________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report:
December 11, 2012
(Date of earliest event reported)
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)
Delaware
    
0-27275
    
04-3432319
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.)
8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)
    
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(617) 444-3000
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
On December 11, 2012, the Board of Directors (the Board) of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (Akamai or the Company) took several actions relating to the leadership of the Company.
The Board elected F. Thomson Leighton, 56, to the position of President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company effective January 1, 2013. Dr. Leighton will continue to serve as a member of the Board. Dr. Leighton, a co-founder of the Company, has served as Akamai's Chief Scientist and as a director since August 1998. Dr. Leighton has also been a professor of Mathematics at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology since 1982; however, he will take a leave of absence upon assumption of his new position at Akamai. Dr. Leighton will initially continue to receive his current annual salary of $20,000, which has represented his annual compensation since 2002. The Compensation Committee of the Board is expected to review Dr. Leighton's compensation arrangements as part of its annual review of compensation for all executives in January 2013.
The Board accepted the previously-announced resignation of Paul Sagan as President and Chief Executive Officer effective as of January 1, 2013. Mr. Sagan will continue to serve as a member of the Board and as Senior Advisor to the Company.
The Board also approved promotions for the following individuals by electing them to the respective positions reflected below effective as of January 1, 2013:
Robert Hughes
        
President, Worldwide Operations
Rick McConnell
    
President, Products and Development
Robert Blumofe
        
EVP, Platform
Melanie Haratunian
    
EVP, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: December 17, 2012
            
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
/s/ Melanie Haratunian
                                            
Melanie Haratunian
SVP, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20130123162757.txt.gz
TIME:20130123162757
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
_________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report:
January 16, 2013
(Date of earliest event reported)
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)
Delaware
    
0-27275
    
04-3432319
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation)
    
(Commission File Number)
    
(IRS Employer Identification No.)
8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)
    
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(617) 444-3000
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
2013 Executive Compensation Arrangements
On January 16, 2013, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the "Compensation Committee") of Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") adopted cash and equity compensation programs for 2013 for the following individuals (our principal executive officer, principal financial officer and other named executive officers): F. Thomson Leighton, Chief Executive Officer; James Benson, Chief Financial Officer; Melanie Haratunian, Executive Vice President and General Counsel; and Robert Hughes, President - Worldwide Operations (each, an Executive and collectively, the Executives).
The cash incentive components of the 2013 compensation program provide for an annual base salary and a cash bonus, the amount of such bonus to be determined based upon the achievement of certain pre-determined individual and corporate performance objectives. Specifically, each Executive's cash bonus is weighted as follows: 40% based on Akamai's achievement of a specified revenue target for fiscal year 2013; 40% based on Akamai's achievement of a specified normalized pre-tax income target for fiscal year 2013; and 20% based on achievement of individual or departmental performance goals. Calculation of performance against the revenue target will take into account the impact of foreign currency fluctuations. The new base salary will take effect on April 1, 2013 for Mr. Benson; January 1, 2013 was the effective date for the others individuals' salaries. Below we use the term 2013 base salary earnings to refer to the aggregate amount of base salary paid to an Executive during the 2013 calendar year.
For Dr. Leighton, his base salary will be $1.00, with a target and maximum cash bonus equal to 100% of his 2013 base salary earnings. For Mr. Benson, his new base salary will be $400,000, with a target and cash bonus equal to 75% of his 2013 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 135% of his 2013 base salary earnings. For Ms. Haratunian, her new base salary will be $400,000, with a target cash bonus equal to 65% of her 2013 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 117% of her 2013 base salary earnings. For Mr. Hughes, his new base salary will be $500,000, with a target cash bonus equal to 100% of his 2013 base salary earnings and a maximum cash bonus equal to 180% of his 2013 base salary earnings.
As described in the table below, the Compensation Committee also approved the grant to each Executive of restricted stock units (RSUs) and stock options, in each case issuable pursuant to the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan as follows:
    
The options and RSUs will have an effective grant date of the second day following the Company's release of financial results for fiscal year 2012; the effective date is expected to be February 8, 2013. The exercise price for the options will be the closing sale price of Akamai's common stock as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on the grant date (the FMV). The aggregate number of options to be granted to each Executive will be calculated by applying a Black Scholes option pricing model to the value listed in the chart above based on the exercise price of the options. The options will vest as follows: 1/3 on each of the first, second and third
anniversaries of the effective date. The options are subject to the terms of the Company's standard form of stock option agreement previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2012.
The number of RSUs to be issued will be calculated by dividing the dollar value set forth above by the FMV. Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of Akamai common stock upon vesting. RSUs with annual vesting vest as follows: 1/3 on each of the first, second and third anniversaries of the date of grant. As described in the following paragraphs, the performance-vested RSUs will only become issuable to the extent that the Company exceeds the 2013 performance targets for the following metrics that have been established by the Compensation Committee (weighted as indicated by the associated percentage figures): total revenue from the Company's cloud services (40%); total revenue from new services introduced by the Company (25%); total revenue from the Company's content delivery services (20%); and total free cash flow earned by the Company (15%). Calculation of performance against revenue targets will take into account the impact of foreign currency fluctuations. For each metric, there is a threshold, at which 25% of the maximum number of RSUs will become issuable; a target at which 50% of the maximum issuable number of RSUs will become issuable; and a maximum achievement level at which the maximum number of performance-vested RSUs attributable to such metric will become issuable. Such levels are reflected below:
Pro-rata amounts will be issuable for performance between threshold and target and target and maximum.
To the extent performance-vested RSUs become issuable, they will vest in two equal installments on the second and third anniversaries of the date of grant. The foregoing description of the RSUs is qualified in its entirety by the text of the relevant RSU agreements, each of which was previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2012.
    
Executive Vice Chairman Compensation
On January 16, 2013, the Board of Directors elected Paul Sagan as Executive Vice Chairman. The Compensation Committee approved the following annual compensation for Mr. Sagan: deferred stock units, which vest over two years (50% on the first anniversary of the date of grant and then in equal quarterly installments of 12.5% each quarter thereafter) having an initial value of $220,000 and $120,000 in cash. We expect to issue the deferred stock units in May.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20130206160638.txt.gz
TIME:20130206160638
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 6, 2013, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") announced its financial results for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2012. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information provided under Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2012. Revenue for the fourth quarter 2012 was $378 million, a 9 percent increase over third quarter revenue of $345 million, and a 17 percent increase over fourth quarter 2011 revenue of $324 million. Total revenue for 2012 was $1,374 million, a 19 percent increase over 2011 revenue of $1,159 million.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
February 6, 2013
"With strong revenue and profit performance in the fourth quarter, Akamai closed out 2012 with record results on both the top and bottom line," said Tom Leighton, CEO of Akamai. "Throughout the year, we announced new products across every solution line, closed a record number of strategic acquisitions, and achieved margin expansion through continued improvement in our network efficiency even as we expanded its capacity worldwide to meet rising demand for Akamai services. We believe these efforts have positioned us well to help our customers capitalize on the opportunities, and mitigate the challenges, of conducting business online."
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the fourth quarter of 2012 was $68 million, or $0.38 per diluted share. Full-year GAAP net income for 2012 was $204 million, or $1.12 per diluted share.
The Company generated normalized net income* of $98 million, or $0.54 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2012, a 25 percent increase over the prior quarter's normalized net income of $79 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, and an 18 percent increase over fourth quarter 2011 normalized net income of $83 million, or $0.45 per diluted share. Full-year normalized net income grew 16 percent year-over-year to $329 million, or $1.81 per diluted share. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Adjusted EBITDA* for the fourth quarter of 2012 was $173 million, up from $157 million in the prior quarter, and $148 million in the fourth quarter of 2011. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the fourth quarter was 46 percent, up a point from the prior quarter and consistent with the same period last year. For the full year, adjusted EBITDA was $615 million, up from $525 million in 2011. Full-year adjusted EBITDA margin in 2012 was at 45 percent, consistent with the prior year. (*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Full-year cash from operations was $530 million, or 39 percent of revenue, consistent with the prior year. At year end, the Company had over $1 billion of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 23 percent and 29 percent, respectively, of revenue for the fourth quarter 2012.
Share Repurchase Program
The Company also announced today that its Board of Directors has authorized a $150 million extension of its share repurchase program, effective for a 12-month period beginning on February 1, 2013. As of this date, all prior repurchase authorizations have expired. The Company's goal for this program, which is expected to be funded through its free cash flow, is primarily to offset dilution created by its equity compensation programs.
The timing and amount of any shares repurchased will be determined by the Company's management based on its evaluation of market conditions and other factors. Repurchases may also be made under a Rule 10b5-1 plan, which would permit the Company to repurchase shares when the Company might otherwise be precluded from doing so under insider trading laws. The Company may choose to suspend or discontinue the repurchase program at any time but cannot carry over unused authorization amounts to future periods.
During the fourth quarter of 2012, under its current share repurchase program, the Company spent approximately $30 million repurchasing 0.8 million shares of its common stock, at an average price of $37.53 per share. During 2012, the Company spent approximately $141 million repurchasing 4.4 million shares of its common stock, at an average price of $32.45 per share.
The Company had approximately 178 million shares of common stock outstanding as of December 31, 2012.
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-314-4483 (or 1-617-213-8049 for international calls) and using passcode No. 17717131. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 29167666.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere. At the core of the Company's solutions is the Akamai Intelligent Platform providing extensive reach, coupled with unmatched reliability, security, visibility and expertise. Akamai removes the complexities of connecting the increasingly mobile world, supporting 24/7 consumer demand, and enabling enterprises to securely leverage the cloud. To learn more about how Akamai is accelerating the pace of innovation in a hyperconnected world, please visit or , and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
blogs.akamai.com
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai has historically provided additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Legislative and regulatory pronouncements discourage the use of and emphasis on non-GAAP financial metrics and require companies to explain why non-GAAP financial metrics are relevant to management and investors. We believe that the inclusion of these non-GAAP financial measures in this press release and our earnings call helps investors to gain a meaningful understanding of our past performance and future prospects, consistent with how management measures and forecasts our performance, especially when comparing such results to previous periods or forecasts. Our management uses these non-GAAP measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods and to the performance of our competitors. These measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. By providing both GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, we believe that investors are able to compare our GAAP results to those of other companies while also gaining a better understanding of our operating performance as evaluated by management.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA" as net income, before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of
capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA to be an important indicator of the Company's operational strength and performance of its business and a good measure of the Company's historical operating trend.
Adjusted EBITDA eliminates items that are either not part of the Company's core operations, such as investment gains and losses, foreign exchange gains and losses, early debt extinguishment and net interest income, or that do not require a cash outlay, such as stock-based compensation. Adjusted EBITDA also excludes depreciation and amortization expense, which is based on the Company's estimate of the useful life of tangible and intangible assets. These estimates could vary from actual performance of the asset, are based on the historical cost incurred to build out the Company's deployed network, and may not be indicative of current or future capital expenditures.
Akamai defines "Adjusted EBITDA margin" as a percentage of Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues. Akamai considers Adjusted EBITDA margin to be an indicator of the Company's operating trend and performance of its business in relation to its revenue growth.
Akamai defines "capital expenditures" or "capex" as purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation. Capital expenditures or capex are disclosed in Akamai's consolidated Statement of Cash Flows in the Company's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Akamai defines "normalized net income" as net income before amortization of other intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, loss on early extinguishment of debt and gains and losses on legal settlements. Akamai considers normalized net income to be another important indicator of the overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effects of events that are either not part of the Company's core operations or are non-cash.
Akamai defines "normalized net income per share" as normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations. Akamai considers normalized net income per share to be another important indicator of overall performance of the Company because it eliminates the effect of non-cash items. Adjusted EBITDA and normalized net income should be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for, the Company's operating income and net income, as well as other measures of financial performance reported in accordance with GAAP.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In accordance with the requirements of Regulation G issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company is presenting the most directly comparable GAAP financial measures and reconciling the non-GAAP financial metrics to the comparable GAAP measures.
 
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about future business opportunities. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, effects of increased competition including potential failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services and loss of significant customers; failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all; inability to increase our revenue at the same rate as in the past and keep our expenses from increasing at a greater rate than our revenues; a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure; delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities or failure of such solutions to operate as expected, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20130311115024.txt.gz
TIME:20130311115024
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 11, 2013, Akamai Technologies, Inc. issued a press release in which it affirmed certain financial guidance for the fiscal quarter ending March 31, 2013 that was previously issued in connection with its fiscal 2012 investor conference call on February 6, 2013. The full text of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere, is today reaffirming its previously-issued first quarter 2013 financial guidance. In conjunction with its annual being held today, the Company is also announcing the adoption of new reporting methodologies for classifying certain costs in the statements of operations, and for calculating normalized net income, which will be referred to as non-GAAP net income going forward. These new reporting methodologies will be reflected beginning in the Company's first quarter 2013 results, and have no impact on the Company's operational performance, financial position or cash flows.
CAMBRIDGE, MA  March 11, 2013 
Investor Summit
First Quarter 2013 Guidance
The Company is announcing today that it continues to expect first quarter revenue in the range of $352 million to $362 million, adjusted EBITDA margins in the range of 42 to 43 percent and normalized net income per diluted share in the range of $0.50 to $0.52. Under the new methodology described below, the Company expects non-GAAP net income per diluted share in the range of $0.45 to $0.47.
New Reporting Methodologies
Starting in the first quarter 2013, the Company will classify both the cost of services and support and the cost of network build-out and support as costs of revenues in its statements of operations on a historic and prospective basis. The Company previously classified the cost of services and support in the sales and marketing line of the statements of operations and the cost of network build-out and support in the general and administrative line of the statements of operations. The effect of these reclassifications is to increase cost of revenues and decrease operating expenses. The changes do not impact adjusted EBITDA, GAAP and non-GAAP net income or operational free cash flow.
In addition, the Company previously calculated normalized net income by adding the following items on a non-tax-effected basis to net income calculated in accordance with GAAP:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Starting in the first quarter 2013, the Company will tax effect the items listed above to calculate non-GAAP net income. The Company believes this revised methodology will help investors more easily and consistently evaluate the Company's performance.
"Our goal is to align our reporting methodology with the evolution of our business," said Tom Leighton, CEO of Akamai. "As we look to the next phase of Akamai's growth, it is important that we help investors better understand the dynamics of our core and emerging businesses. These additional disclosures will provide increased granularity to enable measurement of Akamai's growth over the long term."
The following table provides an overview of the Company's first quarter 2013 guidance before and after these new reporting methodologies. Additional materials, including historical pro forma schedules for full-year 2010, 2011 and 2012 and quarterly for 2011 and 2012 are available on the Company's Investor Relations website. These schedules represent comparisons of non-GAAP financial measures with the most comparable GAAP financial measures for the related period.
 
 
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere. At the core of the Company's solutions is the Akamai Intelligent Platform providing extensive reach, coupled with unmatched reliability, security, visibility and expertise. Akamai removes the complexities of connecting the increasingly mobile world, supporting 24/7 consumer demand, and enabling enterprises to securely leverage the cloud. To learn more about how Akamai is accelerating the pace of innovation in a hyperconnected world, please visit or , and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
blogs.akamai.com
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai provides additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). We believe that making available non-GAAP financial measures may be helpful to investors as they examine our past performance and future prospects, especially when comparing such results to previous periods. Our management uses non-GAAP financial measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, as the basis for measuring our core operating performance and comparing such performance to that of prior periods. Some of these financial measures are also used by management in its financial and operational decision-making. There are limitations associated with reliance on these non-GAAP financial metrics because they are specific to our operations and financial performance, which may make comparisons with other companies' financial results more challenging. These non-GAAP financial measures should only be used as a supplement to results presented in accordance with GAAP.
Akamai defines the following non-GAAP financial measures as shown below:
GAAP net income adjusted for the following non-tax effected items: amortization of other acquired intangible assets; stock-based compensation expense; stock-based compensation reflected as a component of amortization of capitalized internal-use software; restructuring charges and benefits; acquisition-related costs and benefits; certain gains and losses on investments; loss on early extinguishment of debt; gains and losses on legal settlements and other non-recurring or unusual items that may arise from time to time.
Normalized net income 
 GAAP net income adjusted for the following tax-effected items: amortization of other acquired intangible assets; stock-based compensation expense; stock-based compensation reflected as a component of amortization of capitalized internal-use software; restructuring charges and benefits; acquisition-related costs and benefits; certain gains and losses on investments; loss on early extinguishment of debt; gains and losses on legal settlements and other non-recurring or unusual items that may arise from time to time.
Non-GAAP net income
 Normalized net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations.
Normalized net income per share
 Non-GAAP net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations.
Non-GAAP net income per share
 GAAP net income before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets, stock-based compensation expense, amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation, restructuring charges and benefits, acquisition related costs and benefits, certain gains and losses on investments, foreign exchange gains and losses, loss on early extinguishment of debt, gains and losses on legal settlements and other non-recurring or unusual items that may arise from time to time.
Adjusted EBITDA
 Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues.
Adjusted EBITDA margin
 Revenues less GAAP cost of revenues, excluding stock-based compensation and depreciation and amortization, as a percentage of revenues.
Cash gross margin
 GAAP operating expenses (consisting of Research and Development, Sales and Marketing, General and Administrative expenses, Amortization of other intangible assets and Restructuring charge (benefit)), excluding stock-based compensation, amortization of other intangible assets, depreciation and amortization, restructuring charges and benefits and acquisition related costs and benefits.
Cash operating expenses
 Purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation.
Capital expenditures (CapEx)
 Adjusted EBITDA less capital expenditures, or CapEx, excluding stock-based compensation.
Operational free cash flow, or free cash flow
 GAAP tax rate excluding the tax effect of non-GAAP adjustments and certain discrete income tax items.
Non-GAAP tax rate
Akamai is unable to provide a reconciliation on a forward-looking basis of the foregoing non-GAAP financial measures to corresponding metrics calculated in accordance with GAAP because the Company does not have and is currently unable to estimate the following items that are
excluded from the calculations of such non-GAAP metrics: amortization of other intangible assets; stock-based compensation expense; amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation; acquisition related costs (benefits); restructuring (benefits) charges; and capital expenditures.
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about guidance for the first quarter of 2013. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, effects of increased competition including potential failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services and loss of significant customers; failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all; inability to increase our revenue at the same rate as in the past and keep our expenses from increasing at a greater rate than our revenues; a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure; delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities or failure of such solutions to operate as expected; and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012.
The statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20130416160955.txt.gz
TIME:20130416160955
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
_________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report:
April 12, 2013
(Date of earliest event reported)
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)
Delaware
    
0-27275
    
04-3432319
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation)
    
(Commission File Number)
    
(IRS Employer Identification No.)
8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)
    
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(617) 444-3000
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
(b)
    
On April 12, 2013, C. Kim Goodwin notified Akamai Technologies, Inc. that she is voluntarily resigning from the Board of Directors effective as of May 10, 2013.
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20130424160907.txt.gz
TIME:20130424160907
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 24, 2013, Akamai Technologies, Inc. ("Akamai" or the "Company") announced its financial results for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2013. The full text of the press release issued in connection with the announcement is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The information provided under this Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act") or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibit relating to Item 2.02 shall be deemed to be furnished, and not filed:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
 
 
  Akamai Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ: AKAM), the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2013. Revenue for the first quarter of 2013 was $368 million, a 15 percent increase over first quarter 2012 revenue of $319 million, or up 18 percent adjusted for the Advertising Decision Solutions (ADS) divestiture*.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass.
April 24, 2013
Net income in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP, for the first quarter of 2013 was $71 million, or $0.39 per diluted share, a 5 percent increase over the prior quarter's GAAP net income of $68 million, or $0.38 per diluted share, and a 65 percent increase over first quarter 2012 GAAP net income of $43 million, or $0.24 per diluted share.
The Company generated non-GAAP net income* of $93 million, or $0.51 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2013, a 4 percent increase over the prior quarter's non-GAAP net income of $90 million, or $0.50 per diluted share, and a 43 percent increase over first quarter 2012 non-GAAP net income of $65 million, or $0.36 per diluted share.
Both GAAP and non-GAAP net income results for the first quarter of 2013 include a $15 million, or $0.08 per diluted share, benefit from the retroactive reinstatement of the 2012 federal R&D tax credit and change in our depreciation methodology effective on January 1, 2013.
"We are very pleased with our first quarter results, delivering better than expected revenue growth and EPS expansion," said Tom Leighton, CEO of Akamai. "We saw strong acceleration in our media delivery solutions, made further traction in our management of network costs, and continued our investments to capitalize on what we see as the opportunities and megatrends shaping online business: cloud, mobile, video and security."
Adjusted EBITDA* for the first quarter of 2013 was $166 million, down from $173 million in the prior quarter, and up from $143 million in the first quarter of 2012. Adjusted EBITDA margin* for the first quarter of 2013 was 45 percent, down a point from the prior quarter and consistent with the same period last year.
Cash from operations for the first quarter of 2013 was $103 million, or 28 percent of revenue, down a point from the same period last year. At the end of the first quarter of 2013, the Company had over $1 billion of cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.
Sales through resellers and sales outside the United States accounted for 20 percent and 30 percent, respectively, of revenue for the first quarter of 2013.
Share Repurchase Program
During the first quarter of 2013, under a share repurchase program that was extended by the Board of Directors in February 2013, the Company spent approximately $40 million repurchasing 1.1 million shares of its common stock, at an average price of $36.79 per share. The Company has $119 million remaining on its current authorization, which runs through January 31, 2014.
The Company had approximately 178 million shares of common stock outstanding as of March 31, 2013.
(*See Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures below for definitions.)
Quarterly Conference Call
Akamai will host a conference call today at 4:30 p.m. ET that can be accessed through 1-866-384-8009 (or 1-617-597-5342 for international calls) and using passcode No. 99675413. A live Webcast of the call may be accessed at in the Investor section. In addition, a replay of the call will be available for one week following the conference through the Akamai Website or by calling 1-888-286-8010 (or 1-617-801-6888 for international calls) and using passcode No. 71184323.
www.akamai.com
About Akamai
Akamai is the leading cloud platform for helping enterprises provide secure, high-performing user experiences on any device, anywhere. At the core of the Company's solutions is the Akamai Intelligent Platform providing extensive reach, coupled with unmatched reliability, security, visibility and expertise. Akamai removes the complexities of connecting the increasingly mobile world, supporting 24/7 consumer demand, and enabling enterprises to securely leverage the cloud. To learn more about how Akamai is accelerating the pace of innovation in a hyperconnected world, please visit or , and follow @Akamai on Twitter.
www.akamai.com
blogs.akamai.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
*Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In addition to providing financial measurements based on generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America (GAAP), Akamai provides additional financial metrics that are not prepared in accordance with GAAP (non-GAAP). Management uses non-GAAP financial measures, in addition to GAAP financial measures, to understand and compare operating results across accounting periods, for financial and operational decision making, for planning and forecasting purposes and to evaluate Akamai's financial performance.
Management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures reflect Akamai's ongoing business in a manner that allows for meaningful comparisons and analysis of trends in its business, as they exclude expenses and gains that may be infrequent, unusual in nature and not reflective of the Company's ongoing operating results. Management also believes that these non-GAAP financial measures provide useful information to investors in understanding and evaluating the Company's operating results and future prospects in the same manner as management and in comparing financial results across accounting periods and to those of peer companies.
The non-GAAP financial measures do not replace the presentation of the Company's GAAP financial results and should only be used as a supplement to, not as a substitute for, the Company's financial results presented in accordance with GAAP. Akamai has provided a reconciliation of each non-GAAP financial measure used in its financial reporting to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure. This reconciliation captioned "Reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP Financial Measures" can be found on Akamai's website.
The non-GAAP adjustments, and Akamai's basis for excluding them from non-GAAP financial measures, are outlined below:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Akamai's definitions of its non-GAAP financial measures are outlined below:
 GAAP net income adjusted for the following tax-effected items: amortization of acquired intangible assets; stock-based compensation expense; amortization of capitalized internal-use software; restructuring charges and benefits; acquisition-related costs and benefits; certain gains and losses on investments; loss on early extinguishment of debt; gains and losses on legal settlements and other non-recurring or unusual items that may arise from time to time.
Non-GAAP net income
 Non-GAAP net income, plus interest add-back for diluted share calculation, divided by the basic weighted average or diluted common shares outstanding used in GAAP net income per share calculations.
Non-GAAP net income per share
 GAAP net income excluding the following items: interest; income taxes; depreciation and amortization of tangible and intangible assets; stock-based compensation expense; amortization of capitalized stock-based compensation; restructuring charges and benefits; acquisition-related costs and benefits; certain gains and losses on investments; foreign exchange gains and losses; loss on early extinguishment of debt; gains and losses on legal settlements and other non-recurring or unusual items that may arise from time to time.
Adjusted EBITDA
 Adjusted EBITDA as a percentage of revenues.
Adjusted EBITDA margin
 Purchases of property and equipment, capitalization of internal-use software development costs and capitalization of stock-based compensation.
Capital expenditures (Capex)
Akamai Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
This release contains information about future expectations, plans and prospects of Akamai's management that constitute forward-looking statements for purposes of the safe harbor provisions under The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about future business opportunities. Actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking statements as a result of various important factors including, but not limited to, effects of increased competition including potential failure to maintain the prices we charge for our services and loss of significant customers; failure of the markets we address or plan to address to develop as we expect or at all; inability to increase our revenue at the same rate as in the past and keep our expenses from increasing at a greater rate than our revenues; a failure of Akamai's services or network infrastructure; delay in developing or failure to develop new service offerings or functionalities, and if developed, lack of market acceptance of such service offerings and functionalities or failure of such solutions to operate as expected, and other factors that are discussed in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, and other documents periodically filed with the SEC.
In addition, the statements in this press release represent Akamai's expectations and beliefs as of the date of this press release. Akamai anticipates that subsequent events and developments may cause these expectations and beliefs to change. However, while Akamai may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. These forward-looking statements should not be relied upon as representing Akamai's expectations or beliefs as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AKAM/AKAM-8K-20130520163315.txt.gz
TIME:20130520163315
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
_________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report:
May 15, 2013
(Date of earliest event reported)
AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Charter)
Delaware
    
0-27275
    
04-3432319
(State or Other Jurisdiction
    
(Commission File Number)
    
(IRS Employer Identification No.)
of Incorporation)
8 Cambridge Center, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02142
(Address of Principal Executive Offices)
    
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:
(617) 444-3000
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e)
At the annual meeting of stockholders of Akamai Technologies, Inc. (the Company or Akamai) held on May 15, 2013 (the Annual Meeting), the Company's stockholders approved the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2013 Stock Incentive Plan (the 2013 Plan); the 2013 Plan had previously been adopted by the Company's Board of Directors subject to stockholder approval.
The following brief description of the 2013 Plan is qualified in its entirety by reference to the complete text of the plan, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference:
The 2013 Plan allows for the issuance of incentive stock options, non-statutory stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock, restricted stock units, other stock-based awards and cash-based awards. Subject to adjustment in the event of stock splits, stock dividends or similar events, awards may be made under the 2013 Plan for the sum of (i) up to 8,000,000 shares of our common stock; (ii) the number of shares of common stock that were available for grant under the Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2009 Stock Incentive Plan immediately prior to stockholder approval of the 2013 Plan; and (iii) any shares of common stock subject to awards that are currently outstanding under existing equity incentive plans that are terminated, cancelled, surrendered or forfeited.
Employees, officers, directors, consultants and advisors of the Company and its subsidiaries are eligible to be granted awards under the 2013 Plan. Under present law, however, incentive stock options may only be granted to employees of the Company and its majority owned subsidiaries. The 2013 Plan is administered by the Company's Board of Directors. Under the terms of the 2013 Plan, the Board of Directors may delegate authority under the 2013 Plan to one or more committees or subcommittees of the board of directors. The Board of Directors has authorized the Compensation Committee (the Committee) to administer certain aspects of the 2013 Plan, including the granting of awards to executive officers. In addition, as permitted by the terms of the 2013 Plan, the Board of Directors has delegated to the Chief Executive Officer of the Company, as a committee of one director, the authority to grant equity awards to non-executive employees in accordance with guidelines established by the Committee.
The Board of Directors or the Committee may modify awards granted to participants who are foreign nationals or employed outside the United States or establish sub plans or procedures under the 2013 Plan to recognize differences in laws, rules, regulations or customs of such foreign jurisdictions with respect to tax, securities, currency, employee benefit or other matters.
At the Annual Meeting, five items of business were acted upon by stockholders. There were 178,452,433 shares of Akamai's common stock eligible to vote, and 155,438,248 shares present in person or by proxy at the Annual Meeting.
1.
    
The following nominees were elected to the Company's Board of Directors as Class II directors for terms expiring at the 2016 annual meeting of stockholders.
Following the Annual Meeting, Frederic Salerno, having a term expiring in 2014, and George Conrades, Martin Coyne, Jill Greenthal and Geoffrey Moore, each having terms expiring in 2015, continued in office.
2.
    
The 2013 Plan was approved.
3a.
    
A proposed amendment to the Company's Certificate of Incorporation to declassify the Board of Directors, which required the affirmative vote of the holders of not less than 75% of outstanding shares of the Company's common stock, was not approved based upon the following vote:
3b.
    
A proposed amendment to the Company's Certificate of Incorporation to provide for director removal without cause following the declassification of the Board of Directors, which required the affirmative vote of the holders of not less than 75% of outstanding shares of the Company's common stock, was not approved based upon the following vote:
3c.
    
A proposed amendment to the Company's Certificate of Incorporation to eliminate the supermajority voting requirement for amending or repealing Article TENTH of the Certificate of Incorporation, which required the affirmative vote of the holders of not less than 75% of outstanding shares of the Company's common stock, was not approved based upon the following vote:
4. A non-binding, advisory proposal to approve the compensation of the Company's named executive officers was approved.
5. The appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP as the independent registered public accounting firm for the Company for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2013 was ratified.
  
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
99.1
    
Akamai Technologies, Inc. 2013 Stock Incentive Plan
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

AKAMAI TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
2013 STOCK INCENTIVE PLAN
The purpose of this 2013 Stock Incentive Plan (the Plan) of Akamai Technologies, Inc., a Delaware
corporation (the Company or Akamai), is to advance the interests of the Company's stockholders by enhancing the Company's ability to attract, retain and motivate persons who are expected to make important contributions to the Company and by providing such persons with equity ownership opportunities and performance-based incentives that are intended to align their interests with those of the Company's stockholders. Except where the context otherwise requires, the term Company shall include any of the Company's present or future parent or subsidiary corporations as defined in Sections 424(e) or (f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any regulations promulgated thereunder (the Code) and any other business venture (including, without limitation, joint venture or limited liability company) in which the Company has a controlling interest, as determined by the Board of Directors of the Company (the Board).
All of the Company's employees, officers and directors, as well as consultants and advisors to the Company (as the terms consultants and advisors are defined and interpreted for purposes of Form S-8 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the Securities Act), or any successor form) are eligible to be granted Awards under the Plan. Each person who is granted an Award under the Plan is deemed a Participant. The Plan provides for the following types of awards, each of which is referred to as an Award: Options (as defined in Section 5), SARs (as defined in Section 6), Restricted Stock (as defined in Section 7), Restricted Stock Units (as defined in Section 7) and Other Stock-Based Awards (as defined in Section 8) and Cash-Based Awards (as defined in Section 8).
(a)
Administration by Board of Directors
. The Plan will be administered by the Board. Subject to and consistent with the provisions of the Plan, the Board shall have the authority and discretion to: (i) determine which eligible employees, officers, directors, consultants and advisors will receive Awards, (ii) determine the number of shares of Common Stock (as hereinafter defined), cash, or other consideration to be covered by each Award, (iii) determine the terms and conditions of any Award (including Fair Market Value (as hereinafter defined), the exercise price, the vesting schedule, the term of the Award, and the period following termination from employment or service during which an Award may be exercised), (iv) approve forms of Award agreements and other documentation for use under the Plan, (v) adopt, alter, and repeal administrative rules, guidelines, and practices governing the operation of the Plan, (vi) interpret the provisions of the Plan and any Award documentation and remedy any ambiguities, omissions, or inconsistencies therein, (vii) modify or amend Awards, or grant waivers of Plan or Award conditions, (viii) determine the nature and provisions of Other Stock-Based Awards (as hereinafter defined) permitted pursuant to Section 8, and (ix) make all other determinations necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan. All decisions by the Board shall be made in the Board's sole discretion and shall be final and binding on all persons having or claiming any interest in the Plan or in any Award. No director or person acting pursuant to the authority delegated by the Board shall be liable for any action or determination relating to or under the Plan made in good faith.
(b)
Appointment of Committees
.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Board may delegate any or all of its powers under the Plan to one or more committees or subcommittees of the Board (a Committee). All references in the Plan to the Board shall mean the Board or a Committee of the Board or the officers referred to in Section 3(c) to the extent that the Board's powers or authority under the Plan have been delegated to such Committee or officers. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for purposes of granting Awards to directors, the Committee shall mean the Compensation Committee.
(c)
Delegation to Officers
. To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Board may delegate to one or more officers of the Company the power to grant Options and other Awards that constitute rights under Delaware law (subject to any limitations under the Plan) to employees or officers of the Company and to exercise such other powers under the Plan as the Board may determine, provided that the Board shall fix the terms of such Awards to be granted by such officers (including the exercise price of such Awards, which may include a formula by which the exercise price will be determined) and the maximum number of shares subject to such Awards that the officers may grant; provided further, however, that no officer shall be authorized to grant Awards to any executive officer of the Company (as defined by Rule 3b-7 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act)) or to any officer of the Company (as defined by Rule 16a-1
under the Exchange Act). The Board may not delegate authority under this Section 3(c) to grant Restricted Stock unless Delaware law then permits such delegation.
(d)
    
Awards to Non-Employee Directors
. Awards to non-employee directors will only be granted and administered by a Committee, all of the members of which are independent as defined by Section 5605(a)(2) of the NASDAQ Marketplace Rules.
(a)
Number of Shares
. Subject to adjustment under Section 9, Awards may be made under the Plan for up to such number of shares of common stock, $0.01 par value per share, of the Company (the 
Common Stock
) as is equal to the sum of:
(1)
8,000,000 shares of Common Stock; and
(2)
such additional number of shares of Common Stock as is equal to the sum of (i) the number of shares of Common Stock reserved for issuance under the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan (the 2009 Plan) that remain available for grant under the 2009 Plan immediately prior to the date this Plan is approved by the Company's stockholders and (ii) the number of shares of Common Stock subject to awards granted under the Company's 2009 Stock Incentive Plan, the Company's Second Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, the Company's 2001 Stock Incentive Plan and the Company's 2006 Stock Incentive Plan (together, the Existing Plans) which awards expire, terminate or are otherwise surrendered, canceled, forfeited or repurchased by the Company at their original issuance price pursuant to a contractual repurchase right (subject, however, in the case of Incentive Stock Options to any limitations of the Code).
Shares of Common Stock issued under the Plan may consist in whole or in part of authorized but unissued shares, treasury shares or shares purchased on the open market. Up to five million (5,000,000) shares of Common Stock shall be available under the Plan for Awards in the form of Incentive Stock Options (as defined in Section 5(b).
(b)
Share Counting
. For purposes of counting the number of shares available for grant of Awards under the Plan pursuant to Section 4(a) and the sublimits contained in Sections 4(c)(2) and 4(c)(3):
(1)
all shares of Common Stock covered by SARs shall be counted against the number of shares available for the grant of Awards under the Plan and against the sublimits listed in the first clause of this Section 4(b);
provided, however
, that (i) SARs that may be settled only in cash shall not be so counted and (ii) if the Company grants an SAR in tandem with an Option for the same number of shares of Common Stock and provides that only one such Award may be exercised (a Tandem SAR), only the shares covered by the Option, and not the shares covered by the Tandem SAR, shall be so counted, and the expiration of one in connection with the other's exercise will not restore shares to the Plan;
(2)
if any Award (i) expires or is terminated, surrendered or canceled without having been fully exercised or is forfeited in whole or in part (including as the result of shares of Common Stock subject to such Award being repurchased by the Company at the original issuance price pursuant to a contractual repurchase right) or (ii) results in any Common Stock not being issued (including as a result of an SAR that was settleable either in cash or in stock actually being settled in cash), the unused Common Stock covered by such Award shall again be available for the grant of Awards;
provided, however
, that (1) in the case of Incentive Stock Options, the foregoing shall be subject to any limitations under the Code, (2) in the case of the exercise of an SAR, the number of shares counted against the shares available under the Plan and against the sublimits listed in the first clause of this Section 4(b) shall be the full number of shares subject to the SAR multiplied by the percentage of the SAR actually exercised, regardless of the number of shares actually used to settle such SAR upon exercise and (3) the shares covered by a Tandem SAR shall not again become available for grant upon the expiration or termination of such Tandem SAR;
(3)
shares of Common Stock delivered (either by actual delivery, attestation, or net exercise) to the Company by a Participant to (i) purchase shares of Common Stock upon the exercise of an Award or (ii) satisfy tax withholding obligations (including shares retained from the Award creating the tax obligation) shall not be added back to the number of shares available for the future grant of Awards; and
(4)
shares of Common Stock repurchased by the Company on the open market using the proceeds from the exercise of an Award shall not increase the number of shares available for future grant of Awards.
(c)
Sub-limits
. Subject to adjustment under Section 9, the following sub-limits on the number of shares subject to Awards shall apply:
(1)
Section 162(m) Per-Participant Limit
. The maximum number of shares of Common Stock with respect to which Awards may be granted to any Participant under the Plan shall be
1,000,000 per calendar year. For purposes of the foregoing limit, the combination of an Option in tandem with an SAR (as each is hereafter defined) shall be treated as a single Award. The perParticipant limit described in this Section 4(c)(1) shall be construed and applied consistently with Section 162(m) of the Code or any successor provision thereto, and the regulations thereunder (Section 162(m)).
(2)
Limit on Awards other than Options and SARS
. The maximum number of shares with respect to which Awards other than Options and SARs may be granted shall be 90% of the total number of shares available for issuance under the Plan.
(3)
Limit on Awards to Non-Employee Directors
. The maximum aggregate number of shares with respect to which Awards may be granted to directors who are not employees of the Company at the time of grant shall be 10% of the total number of shares available for issuance under the Plan.
(d)
Substitute Awards
. In connection with a merger or consolidation of an entity with the Company or the acquisition by the Company of property or stock of an entity, the Board may grant Awards in substitution for any options or other stock or stock-based awards granted by such entity or an affiliate thereof. Substitute Awards may be granted on such terms as the Board deems appropriate in the circumstances, notwithstanding any limitations on Awards contained in the Plan. Substitute Awards shall not count against the overall share limit set forth in Section 4(a) or any sublimits contained in the Plan, except as may be required by reason of Section 422 and related provisions of the Code.
5.
Stock Options
(a)
General
. The Board may grant options to purchase Common Stock (each, an Option) and determine the number of shares of Common Stock to be covered by each Option, the exercise price of each Option and the conditions and limitations applicable to the exercise of each Option, including conditions relating to applicable federal or state securities laws, as it considers necessary or advisable. An Option that is not intended to be an Incentive Stock Option (as hereinafter defined) shall be designated a Nonstatutory Stock Option.
(b)
Incentive Stock Options
. An Option that the Board intends to be an incentive stock option as defined in Section 422 of the Code (an Incentive Stock Option) shall only be granted to employees of Akamai, any of Akamai's present or future parent or subsidiary corporations as defined in Sections 424(e) or (f) of the Code, and any other entities the employees of which are eligible to receive Incentive Stock Options under the Code, and shall be subject to and shall be construed consistently with the requirements of Section 422 of the Code. If the Fair Market Value (as defined below) of shares on the date of grant with respect to which Incentive Stock Options are exercisable for the first time by a Participant during any calendar year exceeds $100,000, the Options for the first $100,000 worth of shares to become exercisable in that calendar year will be Incentive Stock Options, and the Options for the shares with a Fair Market Value (as defined below) in excess of $100,000 that become exercisable in that calendar year will be Nonstatutory Stock Options. The Company shall have no liability to a Participant, or any other person, if an Option (or any part thereof) that is intended to be an Incentive Stock Option is not an Incentive Stock Option or for any action taken by the Board, including without limitation the conversion of an Incentive Stock Option to a Nonstatutory Stock Option.
(c)
Exercise Price
. The Board shall establish the exercise price of each Option or the formula by which such exercise price shall be determined. The exercise price shall be specified in the applicable option agreement; provided however, that the exercise price shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value (as defined below) on the date the Option is granted, provided that if the Board approves the grant of an Option with an exercise price to be determined on a future date, the exercise price shall be not less than 100% of the Fair Market Value on such future date.
(d)
No Repricing of Options
.
  
Unless such action is approved by the Company's stockholders, the Company may not (except as provided for under Section 9): (1) amend any outstanding Option granted under the Plan to provide an exercise price per share that is lower than the then-current exercise price per share of such outstanding Option, (2) cancel any outstanding option (whether or not granted under the Plan) and grant in substitution therefor new Awards under the Plan (other than Awards granted pursuant to Section 4(d)) covering the same or a different number of shares of Common Stock and having an exercise price per share lower than the then-current exercise price per share of the canceled option, (3) cancel in exchange for a cash payment any outstanding Option with an exercise price per share above the then-current Fair Market
Value, or (4) take any other action under the Plan that constitutes a repricing within the meaning of the rules of the NASDAQ Stock Market (
NASDAQ
).
(e)
Duration of Options
. Each Option shall be exercisable at such times and subject to such terms and conditions as the Board may specify in the applicable option agreement; provided however, that no Option will be granted for a term in excess of 7 years.
(f)
Exercise of Option
. Options may be exercised by delivery to the Company of a notice of exercise signed by the proper person or by any other form of notice (including electronic notice) approved by the Board together with payment in full as specified in Section 5(g) for the number of shares for which the Option is exercised. Shares of Common Stock subject to the Option will be delivered by the Company following exercise either as soon as practicable following exercise.
(g)
Payment Upon Exercise.
Common Stock purchased upon the exercise of an Option granted under the Plan shall be paid for as follows:
(1)
in cash or by check, payable to the order of the Company;
(2)
except as may otherwise be provided in the applicable option agreement or approved by the Board, by (i) delivery of an irrevocable and unconditional undertaking by a creditworthy broker to deliver promptly to the Company sufficient funds to pay the exercise price and any required tax withholding or (ii) delivery by the Participant to the Company of a copy of irrevocable and unconditional instructions to a creditworthy broker to deliver promptly to the Company cash or a check sufficient to pay the exercise price and any required tax withholding;
(3)
to the extent provided for in the applicable option agreement or approved by the Board, by delivery (either by actual delivery or attestation) of shares of Common Stock owned by the Participant valued at their fair market value as determined by (or in a manner approved by) the Board (Fair Market Value) provided (i) such method of payment is then permitted under applicable law, (ii) such Common Stock, if acquired directly from the Company, was owned by the Participant for such minimum period of time, if any, as may be established by the Board in its discretion and (iii) such Common Stock is not subject to any repurchase, forfeiture, unfulfilled vesting or other similar requirements;
(4)
to the extent provided for in the applicable Nonstatutory Stock Option agreement or approved by the Board, by delivery of a notice of net exercise to the Company, as a result of which the Participant would receive (i) the number of shares underlying the portion of the Option being exercised, less (ii) such number of shares as is equal to (A) the aggregate exercise price for the portion of the Option being exercised divided by (B) the Fair Market Value on the date of exercise;
(5)
to the extent permitted by applicable law and provided for in the applicable option agreement or approved by the Board, by payment of such other lawful consideration as the Board may determine;
(6)
by any combination of the above permitted forms of payment.
(h)
No Reload Rights
. No option granted under the Plan shall contain any provision entitling the grantee to the automatic grant of additional Options in connection with any exercise of the original Option.
(i)
No Dividend Equivalents
. No option shall provide for the payment or accrual of dividend equivalents.
6.
Stock Appreciation Rights
(a)
General
. The Board may grant Awards consisting of a Stock Appreciation Right, SAR, entitling the holder, upon exercise, to receive an amount in Common Stock or cash or a combination thereof (such form to be determined by the Board determined by reference to appreciation, from and after the date of grant, in the Fair Market Value of a share of Common Stock over the grant price established pursuant to Section 6(c). The date as of which such appreciation is determined shall be the exercise date.
(b)
Grants
.
Stock Appreciation Rights may be granted in tandem with, or independently of, Options granted under the Plan.
(1)
Tandem Awards
.
When Stock Appreciation Rights are expressly granted in tandem with Options, (i) the Stock Appreciation Right will be exercisable only at such time or times, and to the extent, that the related Option is exercisable (except to the extent designated by the Board in connection with an Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event) and will be exercisable in accordance with the procedure required for exercise of the related Option; (ii) the Stock
Appreciation Right will terminate and no longer be exercisable upon the termination or exercise of the related Option, except to the extent designated by the Board in connection with an Acquisition Event or Change in Control Event and except that a Stock Appreciation Right granted with respect to less than the full number of shares covered by an Option will not be reduced until the number of shares as to which the related Option has been exercised or has terminated exceeds the number of shares not covered by the Stock Appreciation Right; (iii) the Option will terminate and no longer be exercisable upon the exercise of the related Stock Appreciation Right; and (iv) the Stock Appreciation Right will be transferable only with the related Option.
(2)
Independent SARs
.
A Stock Appreciation Right not expressly granted in tandem with an Option will become exercisable at such time or times, and on such conditions, as the Board may specify in the SAR Award.
(c)
Grant Price
. The Board shall establish the grant price or exercise price of a SAR or the formula by which such exercise or grant price will be determined. The exercise or grant price shall be specified in the applicable SAR agreement. The exercise or grant price shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value per share of Common Stock on the date of grant of the SAR;
provided
that if the Board approved the grant of the SAR effective as of a future date, the grant price shall be not less than 100% of the Fair Market Value on such future date.
(d)
Term
.
    
The term of a SAR shall not be more than 7 years from the date of grant.
(e)
Exercise
. Stock Appreciation Rights may be exercised by delivery to the Company of a written notice of exercise signed by the proper person or by any other form of notice (including electronic notice) approved by the Board, together with any other documents required by the Board.
(f)
No Repricing of SARs
.
  
Unless such action is approved by the Company's stockholders, the Company may not (except as provided for under Section 9): (1) amend any outstanding SAR granted under the Plan to provide an grant price per share that is lower than the then-current grant price per share of such outstanding SAR, (2) cancel any outstanding stock appreciation right (whether or not granted under the Plan) and grant in substitution therefor new Awards under the Plan (other than Awards granted pursuant to Section 4(d)) covering the same or a different number of shares of Common Stock and having a grant price per share lower than the then-current exercise price per share of the canceled SAR, (3) cancel in exchange for a cash payment any outstanding SAR with a grant price per share above the then-current Fair Market Value, or (4) take any other action under the Plan that constitutes a repricing within the meaning of the rules of the NASDAQ.
(g)
No Reload Rights
. No SAR granted under the Plan shall contain any provision entitling the grantee to the automatic grant of additional SARs in connection with any exercise of the original SAR.
(h)
No Dividend Equivalents
. No SAR shall provide for the payment or accrual of dividend equivalents.
7.
Restricted Stock; Restricted Stock Units Stock
.
(a)
General
. The Board may grant Awards entitling recipients to acquire shares of Common Stock (Restricted Stock), subject to the right of the Company to repurchase all or part of such shares at their issue price or other stated or formula price (or to require forfeiture of such shares if issued at no cost) from the recipient in the event that conditions specified by the Board in the applicable Award are not satisfied prior to the end of the applicable restriction period or periods established by the Board for such Award. Instead of granting Awards for Restricted Stock, the Board may grant Awards entitling the recipient to receive shares of Common Stock or cash to be delivered at a future date on or after such Award vests (Restricted Stock Units). (Restricted Stock and Restricted Stock Units are each referred to herein as a Restricted Stock Award.)
(b)
Terms and Conditions for all Restricted Stock Awards
. The Board shall determine the terms and conditions of a Restricted Stock Award, including the conditions for vesting and repurchase (or forfeiture) and the issue price, if any.
(c)
Additional Provisions Relating to Restricted Stock
.
(1)
Dividends
. Unless otherwise provided in the applicable Award agreement, any dividend (whether paid in cash, stock or property) declared and paid by the Company with respect to shares of Restricted Stock (Unvested Dividends) shall be paid to the Participant only if and when such shares become free from the restrictions on transferability and forfeitability that apply to such shares. Each payment of Unvested Dividends will be made no later than the end of the calendar year in which the dividends are paid to shareholders of that class of stock or, if later, the 15th day of the third month following the date the lapsing of the restrictions on transferability and the forfeitability provisions applicable to the underlying shares of Restricted Stock. No interest will be paid on Unvested Dividends.
(2)
Stock Certificates
. The Company may require that any stock certificates issued in respect of shares of Restricted Stock, as well as any dividends or distributions paid on such Restricted Stock, shall be deposited in escrow by the Participant, together with a stock power endorsed in blank, with the Company (or its designee). At the expiration of the applicable restriction periods, the Company (or such designee) shall deliver the certificates no longer subject to such restrictions to the Participant or if the Participant has died, to the beneficiary designated, in a manner determined by the Board, by a Participant to receive amounts due or exercise rights of the Participant in the event of the Participant's death (the Designated Beneficiary). In the absence of an effective designation by a Participant, Designated Beneficiary shall mean the Participant's estate.
(d)
Additional Provisions Relating to Restricted Stock Units
.
(1)
Settlement
. Upon the vesting of and/or lapsing of any other restrictions (i.e., settlement) with respect to each Restricted Stock Unit, the Participant shall be entitled to receive from the Company the number of shares of Common Stock specified in the Award agreement or an amount of cash equal to the Fair Market Value of such number of shares, as provided in the applicable Award agreement. The Board may provide that settlement of Restricted Stock Units shall be deferred, on a mandatory basis or at the election of the Participant, in a manner that complies with Code Section 409A. Any Restricted Stock Units with a mandatory or elected deferral may be referred to by the Board as Deferred Stock Units.
(2)
Voting Rights
. A Participant shall have no voting rights with respect to any Restricted Stock Units.
(3)
Dividend Equivalents
. To the extent provided by the Board, in its sole discretion, a grant of Restricted Stock Units may provide Participants with the right to receive an amount equal to any dividends or other distributions declared and paid on an equal number of outstanding shares of Common Stock (Dividend Equivalents). Dividend Equivalents shall be credited to an account for the Participants, may be settled in cash and/or shares of Common Stock and shall be subject to the same restrictions on transfer and forfeitability as the Restricted Stock Units with respect to which paid, in each case to be set forth in the applicable Award agreement. No interest will be paid on Dividend Equivalents.
8.
Other Stock-Based Awards
The Board may grant other Awards of shares of Common Stock, and other Awards that are valued in whole or in part by reference to, or are otherwise based on, shares of Common Stock or other property (Other Stock-Based Awards), including without limitation Awards entitling recipients to receive shares of Common Stock to be delivered in the future. Such Other Stock-Based Awards shall also be available as a form of payment in the settlement of other Awards granted under the Plan or as payment in lieu of compensation to which a Participant is otherwise entitled. Other Stock-Based Awards may be paid in shares of Common Stock or cash, as the Board shall determine. The Company may also grant Performance Awards or other Awards denominated in cash rather than shares of Common Stock (Cash-Based Awards). Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Board shall determine the terms and conditions of each Other Stock-Based Award, including any purchase price applicable thereto, and the terms and conditions of each Cash-Based Award.
(a)
Changes in Capitalization
. In the event of any stock split, reverse stock split, stock dividend, recapitalization, combination of shares, reclassification of shares, spin-off or other similar change in capitalization or event, or any dividend or distribution to holders of Common Stock other than an ordinary cash dividend, (i) the number and class of securities available under this Plan, (ii) the sub-limits set forth in Section 4(c), (iii) the number and class of securities and exercise price per share of each outstanding Option, (iv) the share- and per-share provisions and the grant price of each Stock Appreciation Right, (v) the number of shares subject to and the repurchase price per share subject to each outstanding Restricted Stock Award and (vi) the share- and per-share-related provisions and the purchase price, if any, of each outstanding Other Stock-Based Award, shall be equitably adjusted by the Company (or substituted Awards may be made, if applicable) in the manner determined by the Board. If this Section 9(a) applies and Section 9(b) also applies to any event, Section 9(b) shall be applicable to such event, and this section 9(a) shall not be applicable.
(b)
Acquisition and Change in Control Events.
(1)
Definitions
termination of employment occurs within one year following the Company's receipt of such notice.
(2)    
Effect on Awards other than Restricted Stock
Restricted Stock Units shall terminate immediately prior to the consummation of the Acquisition Event without any payment in exchange therefor.
(3)    
Effect on Restricted Stock
(4)    
Effect on Other Awards.
10.
General Provisions Applicable to Awards
(a)
Transferability of Awards
. Awards shall not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged or otherwise encumbered by the Participant, either voluntarily or by operation of law, except by will or the laws of descent and distribution or, other than in the case of an Incentive Stock Option, pursuant to a qualified domestic relations order, and, during the life of the Participant, shall be exercisable only by the Participant; provided, however, that the Board may permit or provide in an Award for the gratuitous transfer of the Award by the Participant to or for the benefit of any immediate family member, family trust or other entity established for the benefit of the Participant and/or an immediate family member thereof if, with respect to such proposed transferee, the Company would be eligible to use a Form S-8 for the registration of the sale of the Common Stock subject to such Award under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, provided that Incentive Stock Options and Awards that are subject to Section 409A of the Code may be transferable only to the extent permitted by the Code; provided, further, that the Company shall not be required to recognize any such transfer until such time as the Participant and such permitted transferee shall, as a condition to such transfer, deliver to the Company a written instrument in form and substance satisfactory to the Company confirming that such transferee shall be bound by all of the terms and conditions of the Award. References to a Participant, to the extent relevant in the context, shall include references to authorized transferees. For the avoidance of doubt, nothing contained in this Section 10(a) shall be deemed to restrict a transfer to the Company.
(b)
Documentation
. Each Award shall be evidenced in such form (written, electronic or otherwise) as the Board shall determine. Each Award may contain terms and conditions in addition to (but, except as expressly contemplated by another provision herein, not inconsistent with) those set forth in the Plan.
(c)
Board Discretion
. Except as otherwise provided by the Plan, each Award may be made alone or in addition or in relation to any other Award. The terms of each Award need not be identical, and the Board need not treat Participants uniformly.
(d)
Termination of Status
. The Board shall determine the effect on an Award of the disability, death, termination or other cessation of employment, authorized leave of absence or other change in the employment or other status of a Participant and the extent to which, and the period during which, the Participant, or the Participant's legal representative, conservator, guardian or Designated Beneficiary, may exercise rights, or receive any benefits, under an Award.
(e)
Withholding
. The Participant must satisfy all applicable federal, state, and local or other income and employment tax withholding obligations before the Company will deliver stock certificates or otherwise recognize ownership of Common Stock under an Award. The Company may elect to satisfy the withholding obligations through additional withholding on salary or wages. If the Company elects not to or cannot withhold from other compensation, the Participant must pay the Company the full amount, if any, required for withholding or have a broker tender to the Company cash equal to the withholding obligations. Payment of withholding obligations is due before the Company will issue any shares on exercise, vesting or release from forfeiture of an Award or at the same time as payment of the exercise or purchase price, unless the Company determines otherwise. If provided for in an Award or approved by the Board, a Participant may satisfy such tax obligations in whole or in part by delivery (either by actual delivery or attestation) of shares of Common Stock, including shares retained from the Award creating the tax obligation, valued at their Fair Market Value;
provided, however
, except as otherwise provided by the Board, that the total tax withholding where stock is being used to satisfy such tax obligations cannot exceed the Company's minimum statutory withholding obligations (based on minimum statutory withholding rates for federal and state tax purposes, including payroll taxes, that are applicable to such supplemental taxable income). Shares used to satisfy tax withholding requirements cannot be subject to any repurchase, forfeiture, unfulfilled vesting or other similar requirements.
(f)
Amendment of Award
. Except as provided in Sections 5(d) and 6(f), the Board may amend, modify or terminate any outstanding Award, including but not limited to, substituting therefor another Award of the same or a different type, changing the date of exercise or realization, and converting an Incentive Stock Option to a Nonstatutory Stock Option,
provided that the Participant's consent to such action shall be required unless either (i) the Board determines that the action, taking into account any related action, would not materially and adversely affect the Participant or (ii) that the change is permitted under Section 9 hereof.
(g)
Conditions on Delivery of Stock
. The Company will not be obligated to deliver any shares of Common Stock pursuant to the Plan or to remove restrictions from shares previously delivered under the Plan until (i) all conditions of the Award have been met or removed to the satisfaction of the Company, (ii) in the opinion of the Company's counsel, all other legal matters in connection with the issuance and delivery of such shares have been satisfied, including any applicable securities laws and regulations and any applicable stock exchange or stock market rules and regulations, and (iii) the Participant has executed and delivered to the Company such representations or agreements as the Company may consider appropriate to satisfy the requirements of any applicable laws, rules or regulations.
(h)
Acceleration
. Except as set forth in Section 10(i), the Board may at any time provide that any Award shall become immediately exercisable in full or in part, free of some or all restrictions or conditions, or otherwise realizable in full or in part, as the case may be.
(i)
Performance Awards
.
(1)
Grants
. Restricted Stock Awards and Other Stock-Based Awards under the Plan may be made subject to the achievement of performance goals pursuant to this Section 10(i) (Performance Awards), subject to the limit in Section 4(c)(1) on shares covered by such grants. Performance Awards can also provide for cash payments of up to $15,000,000 per calendar year per individual.
(2)
Committee
. Grants of Performance Awards to any Covered Employee (as defined below) intended to qualify as performance-based compensation under Section 162(m) (Performance-Based Compensation) shall be made only by a Committee (or subcommittee of a Committee) comprised solely of two or more directors eligible to serve on a committee making Awards qualifying as performance-based compensation under Section 162(m). In the case of such Awards granted to Covered Employees, references to the Board or to a Committee shall be deemed to be references to such Committee or subcommittee. Covered Employee shall mean any person who is, or who the Committee, in its discretion determines may be, a covered employee under Section 162(m)(3) of the Code.
(3)
Performance Measures
. For any Award that is intended to qualify as Performance-Based Compensation, the Committee shall specify that the degree of granting, vesting and/or payout shall be subject to the achievement of one or more objective performance measures established by the Committee, which shall be based on the relative or absolute attainment of specified levels of one or any combination of the following, which may be determined pursuant to generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) or on a non-GAAP basis, as determined by the Committee: (a) net income, (b) earnings before or after discontinued operations, interest, taxes, depreciation and/or amortization, (c) operating profit before or after discontinued operations and/or taxes, (d) revenue, (e) sales growth, (f) earnings growth, (g) cash flow or cash position, (h) gross margins, (i) stock price, (j) market share, (k) return on sales, assets, equity or investment, (l) improvement of financial ratings, (m) achievement of balance sheet or income statement objectives, (n) total shareholder return, or (o) earnings per share and may be absolute in their terms or measured against or in relationship to other companies comparably, similarly or otherwise situated or relative to the performance of a peer group of entities or other external measure of the selected performance criteria. The Committee shall specify whether such performance measures are to be adjusted to exclude any one or more of (I) extraordinary items, (II) gains or losses on the dispositions of discontinued operations, (III) the cumulative effects of changes in accounting principles, (IV) the writedown of any asset, (V) charges for restructuring and rationalization programs, (VI) other non-cash charges or items, (VII) gains or losses relating to financing or investment activities, (VIII) the effect of acquisitions, or (IX) gains or losses as a result of foreign currency conversions or fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates. Such performance measures: (A) may vary by Participant and may be different for different Awards; (B) may be particular to a Participant or the department, branch, line of business, subsidiary or other unit in which the Participant works and may cover such period as may be specified by the Committee; and (C) shall be set by the Committee within the time period prescribed by, and shall otherwise comply with the requirements of, Section 162(m). Awards that are not intended to qualify as Performance-Based Compensation may be based on these or such other performance measures as the Board may determine.
(4)
Adjustments
. Notwithstanding any provision of the Plan, with respect to any Performance Award that is intended to qualify as Performance-Based Compensation, the Committee may adjust downwards, but not upwards, the cash
or number of Shares payable pursuant to such Award, and the Committee may not waive the achievement of the applicable performance measures except in the case of the death or disability of the Participant or a change in control of the Company.
(5)
Other
. The Committee shall have the power to impose such other restrictions on Performance Awards as it may deem necessary or appropriate to ensure that such Awards satisfy all requirements for Performance-Based Compensation. Prior to the payment of any Award subject to this Section 10(i), the Committee shall certify in writing (which may be satisfied by the inclusion of such a determination in the minutes of a meeting of such Committee) that the performance goals and other material terms applicable to such Award were satisfied.
(j)
Limitation Following a Hardship Distribution
.
  
To the extent required to comply with Treasury Regulation Section 1.401(k)-1(d)(2)(iv)(B)(4), or any amendment or successor thereto, a Participant's elective and employee contributions (within the meaning of such Treasury Regulation) under the Plan shall be suspended for a period of twelve months following such Participant's receipt of a hardship distribution made in reliance on such Treasury Regulation from any plan containing a cash or deferred arrangement under Section 401(k) of the Code maintained by the Company or a related party within the provisions of Section 414 of the Code.
11.
Miscellaneous
(a)
No Right To Employment or Other Status
. No person shall have any claim or right to be granted an Award by virtue of the adoption of the Plan, and the grant of an Award shall not be construed as giving a Participant the right to continued employment or any other relationship with the Company. The Company expressly reserves the right at any time to dismiss or otherwise terminate its relationship with a Participant free from any liability or claim under the Plan, except as expressly provided in the applicable Award.
(b)
No Rights As Stockholder
. Subject to the provisions of the applicable Award, no Participant or Designated Beneficiary shall have any rights as a stockholder with respect to any shares of Common Stock to be issued with respect to an Award until becoming the record holder of such shares. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the Company effects a split of the Common Stock by means of a stock dividend and the exercise price of and the number of shares subject to such Option are adjusted as of the date of the distribution of the dividend (rather than as of the record date for such dividend), then an optionee who exercises an Option between the record date and the distribution date for such stock dividend shall be entitled to receive, on the distribution date, the stock dividend with respect to the shares of Common Stock acquired upon such Option exercise, notwithstanding the fact that such shares were not outstanding as of the close of business on the record date for such stock dividend.
(c)
Effective Date and Term of Plan
. The Plan shall become effective on the date the Plan is approved by the Company's stockholders (the Effective Date). No Awards shall be granted under the Plan after the completion of 10 years from the Effective Date, but Awards previously granted may extend beyond that date.
(d)
Amendment of Plan
. The Board may amend, suspend or terminate the Plan or any portion thereof at any time provided that (i) to the extent required by Section 162(m), no Award granted to a Participant that is intended to comply with Section 162(m) after the date of such amendment shall become exercisable, realizable or vested, as applicable to such Award, unless and until such amendment shall have been approved by the Company's stockholders if required by Section 162(m) (including the vote required under Section 162(m)); (ii) no amendment that would require stockholder approval under the rules of the NASDAQ may be made effective unless and until such amendment shall have been approved by the Company's stockholders; and (iii) if the NASDAQ amends its corporate governance rules so that such rules no longer require stockholder approval of material amendments to equity compensation plans, then, from and after the effective date of such amendment to the NASDAQ rules, no amendment to the Plan (A) materially increasing the number of shares authorized under the Plan (other than pursuant to Section 9), (B) expanding the types of Awards that may be granted under the Plan, (C) materially expanding the class of participants eligible to participate in the Plan, or (D) materially increasing benefits generally available to Participants shall be effective unless stockholder approval is obtained. In addition, if at any time the approval of the Company's stockholders is required as to any other modification or amendment under Section 422 of the Code or any successor provision with respect to Incentive Stock Options, the Board may not effect such modification or amendment without such approval. Unless otherwise specified in the amendment, any amendment to the Plan adopted in accordance with this Section 11(d) shall apply to, and be binding on the holders of, all Awards outstanding under the Plan at the time the amendment is adopted, provided the Board determines that such amendment, taking into account any related action, does not materially and adversely affect the rights of Participants under the Plan.
(e)
Provisions for Foreign Participants
. The Board may modify Awards or Options granted to Participants who are foreign nationals or employed outside the United States or establish subplans or procedures under the Plan to recognize differences in laws, rules, regulations or customs of such foreign jurisdictions with respect to tax, securities, currency, employee benefit or other matters.
(f)
Compliance With Code Section 409A
. Except as provided in individual Award agreements initially or by amendment, if and to the extent any portion of any payment, compensation or other benefit provided to a Participant in connection with his or her employment termination is determined to constitute nonqualified deferred compensation within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code and the Participant is a specified employee as defined in Section 409A(a)(2)(B)(i) of the Code, as determined by the Company in accordance with its procedures, by which determination the Participant (through accepting the Award) agrees that he or she is bound, such portion of the payment, compensation or other benefit shall not be paid before the day that is six months plus one day after the date of separation from service (as determined under Code Section 409A) (the New Payment Date), except as Code Section 409A may then permit. The aggregate of any payments that otherwise would have been paid to the Participant during the period between the date of separation from service and the New Payment Date shall be paid to the Participant in a lump sum on such New Payment Date, and any remaining payments will be paid on their original schedule. The Company shall have no liability to a Participant, or any other Party if an Award that is intended to be exempt from, or compliant with, Section 409A is not so exempt or compliant or for any action taken by the Board.
(g)
Limitations on Liability
. Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Plan, no individual acting as a director, officer, other employee, or agent of the Company will be liable to any Participant, former Participant, spouse, beneficiary, or any other person for any claim, loss, liability, or expense incurred in connection with the Plan, nor will such individual be personally liable with respect to the Plan because of any contract or other instrument he or she executes in his or her capacity as a director, officer, other employee, or agent of the Company. The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each director, officer, other employee, or agent of the Company to whom any duty or power relating to the administration or interpretation of the Plan has been or will be delegated, against any cost or expense (including attorneys' fees) or liability (including any sum paid in settlement of a claim with the Board's approval) arising out of any act or omission to act concerning this Plan unless arising out of such person's own fraud or bad faith.
(h)
Authorization of Sub-Plans
. The Board may from time to time establish one or more sub-plans under the Plan for purposes of satisfying applicable securities or tax laws of various jurisdictions. The Board shall establish such sub-plans by adopting supplements to the Plan containing (i) such limitations on the Board's discretion under the Plan as the Board deems necessary or desirable or (ii) such additional terms and conditions not otherwise inconsistent with the Plan as the Board shall deem necessary or desirable. All supplements adopted by the Board shall be deemed to be part of the Plan, but each supplement shall apply only to Participants within the affected jurisdiction and the Company shall not be required to provide copies of any supplement to Participants in any jurisdiction which is not the subject of such supplement.
(i)    
Governing Law
. The provisions of the Plan and all Awards made hereunder shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such state that would require the application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such state.


</DOCUMENT>
